Toroi;-;My hours. help. I wrote something for real! These hours are legit, I played this game a lot in the past to avoid some tragic stuff in real life. I was young and didn't really have my gaming consoles anymore because of my brothers and I had a really bad pc, which i still own. TF2 was one of the games i could play pretty well on this pc but with horrid graphics, but it was one of the more fun games I installed. I met some real cool and nice people on this game as well as people who i plan to keep by my side. The community back then was more humble compared to nowadays. You have competitive gamers who spam their bind keys with unfunny/gross jokes and very obnoxious people who are either yelling at you or telling you to do specific things to win the game. When really, it doesn't even matter if you win or lose. However, you also have those people who are really awesome and you may meet some nice friends along the way! Although you never know what kinda person you're going to meet on this game. In my honest opinion, if you want to have a game to just waste time on (and money) or just mess around with people you know (which is what I do now), this is perfect. Esspecially the mann vs. machine co-op. I mainly play that now. Although to me, the game lost its touch, update wise, and I moved onto other games. I believe it's worth a shot to try it out but other than that, I'd keep it as a casual game. I don't think the competitive scene is worth getting into anymore because it's being flooded by crude people. Atleast from my experiance after over about 4+ years of playing it just got worse and worse. You will eventually be tied into drama even if you try to avoid it. You'll be more stressed than actually having fun, I'll tell you that! Although in all seriousness, this game is losing its touch and probably isn't worth making it your main game MAINLY because the updates they've been releasing are becoming very dull and not as great as they used to be. BUT, it's a great game to just play to pass the time and have fun! All you'll really notice nowdays is...people really love to trade more than actually play. Living off as a free to play would be very tough and you'd need to be patient with items you would want, unless you got that MONEY! Hope this helps. One last thing, I am not saying this game is bad in any way. I am saying that it's worth trying and playing with friends, or even meeting people! Although there are some downsides that you won't like, such as some stuff I pointed out above. Strictly towards the community. I personally think you should have this game as a side game rather than your come home to play sorta thing. Have it as a once in a while game, because it's nothing to be big about, unless you really do not like most of the millions of other games out there. Just give it a shot and see what you think! Have fun <3
Vale;-;Can you name any other unmodded First Person Shooter that lets you play as a cocky and fast Bostonian that can slap the hell out of urine throwing Australian campers with a fresh atlantic fish wrapped in fine christmas lights, eat a bucket of fried proccessed poultry over their corpses, and then get hit with an exploding cannonball launched from an African-Celtic one eyed alcoholic who can leap yards into the air from his own explosives while weilding a mystic ancient talking ghost claymore? I thought so.
A bLuE cOw;-;If you bind forward to a button on your mouse, you can play pyro and eat at the same time
UnfunnyName;-;The vicious cycle of Team fortress 2 First when you'll arrive in the game, you'll want Weapons, tons of them. Then you'll see that everyone has hats, and you'll want these, a tons of them. Then you'll realize that hats doesn't matter, only skill count, so you'll want a lot of skills, tons of them. Then new weapons will be added, and you'll want them, all of them. Then a new hat will be added and you'll want it, cause it'll be fancy on your main class. Then you'll realize again, that you don't give a damn about hats, all is about is skill. Then when you have waited for 3 years, new weapons will be added, and you'll want them. And then you realize that you spent like 2000 hours of your life for this, met great friends, and you'll have a server where's you feeling like home, and you discovered so much things via the community, it learnt you so much. Then the rude reality of life, bring you on earth, and this game is here, Waiting for you to play 1,2,3... hours, and you'll be happy to see that all your good friend are still here.
[CotC] King Conga Gandhi;-;Oh, and if you're wondering, the new update, Gun Mettle, did NOT ruin TF2 for me. I actually find it a LOT more fun now! I think Jerma summed up this game pretty nicely... "Maybe you got like two Pyros that just installed the game ten minutes ago. They don't have any hats, they're spraying  and they're having a blast. They might even be at the wrong point. They might be going backwards to the point that's already been capped. On the same team, there's a Scout with a Hale's Own Scattergun. He's got 18 kills with a 17 killstreak, he just got 18. He's going 'I just got 18, sick!' He runs up the stairs, he's trying his  off. He's get *beeping noises* dodging the 'Oh, the sentry almost got me!' He looks up to his left when he gets up the stairs on Gorge and there's two sandwich Heavies having a ing picnic. So he stops for a second and goes, 'Two... nnnggh!' so he walks forward and gets blown up by a soldier's rocket next door... ...The two sandwich Heavies then decide to move their picnic. There's ants. 'There's ants here, honey. I wanna get out of here.' So they get up, they pack their sandwiches, pack up their lunches, and their breakfast, and whatever the  they're eating. They get up and walk toward the door to go to RED because they think, 'That spot near the A point for RED is pretty good.' They walk out the door, and they see four Level 3 Sentry Guns pointing at them. They get shot a million times and blow up, and there's like nine Engineers swinging their wrenches in random directions. The BLU Scout, at this point, respawns, and walks by the at least 3-4 statues because we all know there's four people AFK when you play this game, you go by the museum of people standing still. He walks out the door and readies his weapon, he's ready, 'I'm going to get another 20 killstreak, just you watch Gaben, I'm going to praise Gaben!' And he goes forward and starts shooting, and he gets backstabbed by a Spy that has been sitting with the Cloak and Dagger in the corner for at least the last 68 seconds." Normally when I do reviews, I turn into a critic and start to examine that game, pointing out every little flaw and pro and determining a final score. However, Team Fortress 2 (or TF2 for short) helped me make so many memories that if I actually tried to make a fair review on it, it would still be way too biased to consider a valid review. Team Fortress 2, is, obviously, an amazing game. The teamplay is necessary and going out and attacking solo may be difficult. You need teammates in order to survive and win. The graphics are unique to a shooter game and really makes it a special game. I'm not here to explain the gameplay or graphics or whatnot. I love this game because of its charm. The game has such a unique and diverse cast of characters, you can't help to love all of them at some point. Scout is cocky and overconfident. Spy, another one of the characters in the game, is technically Scout's father. Soldier is a crazed WWII American patriot. He never actually joined the Army, but instead, he had his own personal Nazi killing spree. His roommate was a magician named Merasmus, who grew to hate Soldier. Pyro is mysterious, but portrays the world as one big happy paradise, known as Pyroland. Demoman is a Scottish alcoholic who, due to Merasmus, lost his eye that is now haunted. Heavy, although he appears to be dim-witted, is actually very intelligent and looks over three sisters. Engineer is very intelligent as well, and his grandfather was a major contributor to keeping the war with RED and BLU continue. Medic isn't fond of normal forms of medicine, but is still an important member nonetheless. Sniper is from New Zealand, but was raised in Australia. He prefers working from a distance and his backstory is very similar to Superman's. Spy is the master of disguise, and is technically Scout's father, as said before. Of all the characters, he appears to be the most "mature" and appears to be the ringleader at many times. Not only that, but the game has an interesting story. I would not like to get too detailed with it. However, it makes little to no sense but is still funny, engaging, and gives TF2 much more depth. There is also a storyline that takes place a few years later where Mann Co. is being attacked, so the mercenaries have to defend it, called Mann vs. Machine. This game mode ties in with the TF comics, which explain many characters' backstories and is currently still in the works as of this review. The other comics (all of which can be found on TF2's official website) are all funny and charming in their own way as well. The community has been quite debatable on how nice it is at many times, but in the end, it's still an overall great community. I've seen people give out stuff, others mentor some of the newbs (something I do as well) along with much, much more. Yes. the game is considered a "pay-to-win game" but it isn't necessarily a pay-to-win game. With lots of patience, you will get what you want from the game, whether it be hats, weapons, or whatever it is you want. The game has a learning curve that isn't too steep, but become dedicated and you'll fall in love with it. No matter how many times you rage to a W+M1 pyro that destroyed your 16 killstreak, or cheer when you unbox an Unusual, or maybe discover a few friends or learn a few things, Team Fortress 2 has been a huge part of my PC gaming life and without it, I would be as bored as hell. I cannot recommend this game enough, and I hope that many more memories are made on here. Valve may be cash cows, but you can't help but admit they are amazing when it comes to making games. Portal, Half-Life 2, Counter-Strike, but this game stands out from the rest to me. Do I recommend this game? Yes, yes, yes, YES.
Nerd House;-;Team Fortress 2. Being ranked as the third most-played game [steamcharts.com] on Steam, Team Fortress 2 is probably one of the best free-to-play games we've got. Why is it so popular? Let's take a look, shall we? First off, the obvious: It's free. 100% free. This means its accessible to everyone on Steam. This is just the icing on the cake though. What really shines about TF2 is the game itself. Team Fortress 2 usually consists of two teams (Red and Blue) going head to head against each other. Sometimes fulfilling certain objectives or just downright killing each other. There are many, many maps and modes, such as Payload, Capture Points, and Mann VS Machine. But the general idea no matter the map or mode is to KILL EVERYTHING THAT MOVES! And my god, is it fun to do so. The game has 9 playable mercenaries, each actually being a certain "class". Each class is divided into 3 different roles: Offense, Defense, and Support. Let's go over each role and class. Offensive roles specialize in dealing damage to the opposing team. These are your main attack force. Scouts are the speedy hit and run class, with the ability to double or even triple jump depending on equipped items. Soldiers pack a bit more firepower with their rocket launchers, which gives them not only power, but mobility due to the ability known as "rocket jumping". The Pyro is great at setting the opposition on fire, as well as extinguishing burning teammates using an airblast. Defensive roles serve to inhibit enemy access and to hold enemies back from vital points on the map. Overall, the defensive group has the most firepower of all the groups. Demomen can safeguard areas with stickybombs that they can detonate when enemies come by. Heavies are great for mowing down incoming troops and pushing back forces. Heavies can also keep enemies in an area while whittling their health for teammates to finish off. Engineers can build Sentry Guns for effective area defense, as well as build Teleporters and Dispensers for logistical support of the team. Support classes cannot hold the fight on their own, but their specialized abilities can tip the balance in their team's favor. They offer the offensive and defensive classes an extra edge in battle and can help turn the tide of the game. Whether crippling the enemy advance from behind or keeping teammates healed, the support classes are always handy to have around. Medics are the team healers, capable of providing numerous buffs depending on their equipments. Spies are great for sneak attacks or eiliminating key threats. Snipers excel at long range, also eliminating key threats, as well as extinguishing burning teammates with jarate and providing a damage boost to teammates. Next, let's look at the presentation. TF2 has a very unqiue art style. It's somewhat cartoonish, but very appealing. It's simple, and un-complex. But it doesn't need to be complex. It's simplicity is it's strength. Everything is detailed enough to where you can easily tell whats going on, what a specific model or item is, and they all stand out. The soundtrack is also very appealing and catchy, especially the main theme. I personally have it as a ringtone/alarm tone on my smartphone! :) One of the best aspects of TF2 is the Steam Workshop. Users can submit designs for items and weapons, and possibly have them added to the game! A very lucrative sub-market has also emerged from this game in the form of the Crate Keys. That's a whole different ballgame in and of itself, so we won't get into it here. During normal gameplay on most servers, you can obtain random items, weapons, and sometimes crates, and taunts....through the item drops system. You can only receive so many drops per week, and you will get them randomly as you play. You can use these items and weapons to customise your mercenary's loadout, or you can use them to craft other items, hats, and weapons. You can take multiples of items and craft them into Scrap, then Reclaimed Metal, then Refined Metal. You can then use these metals to craft specific class weapons/items, among other things. The crafting system is simple yet robust, with lots of possiblities. Some of it is very luck based. You can take some very common items and end up crafting a super rare hat or gun worth a lot of moolah on the Steam Market! All-in-all, Team Fortress 2 is just a very fun game. Endless entertainment awaits when you start up this game, especially if you play with friends on your favorite server. Probably the best free-to-play game on Steam. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=383235670 Highly Recommended Be sure to check out Nerd House Gaming for more reviews!
Mr Squiggles;-;How to play Team Fortress 2: Be polite, Be efficient, Have a pan to kill everyone you meet.
pacsomepuppes;-;> I was only 10 years old. > I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. > I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. > Then I got my first hat, The gibus. > Suddenly everything changed. > I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' > I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. > I had so many hats, I loved them all. > But then someone traded me, I accepted. > They offered an Unusual for all my hats. > It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. > But no Unusual, He scammed me. > I lost it all. > I was so sad I cried for hours. > Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. > I went to bed after praying. > I felt warm. > I looked behind me, It was Gaben! > He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning Team Captain. > Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning Team Captain and I was naked. > I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. > Hats are love. Hats are life. TF2: 11/10 Best hat simulator 1981 Overall, I'd give this game 9 out of 10 Gabe Narwalls Shoutout to ObsidianObelisk17 for making a youtube vid of this Showout to TheDisableBore for making a comic of this I cringe re reading this :smug:
Flexi;-;Ruined my life and cost me over 500. 10/10 would recommend to friends and family
Special;-;Team Fortress 2 is the most realistic hat simulator created to date. There is absolutely no other simulator quite like this one. The first time you start the simulator, you join a server where you can play a minigame where you show off your hats and items. If you kill a person three times in a row in the minigame, you get your very first hat: the Gibus. This is where it really starts; To play the simulator correctly, you have to spend money in the market place, made by Valve. After that, while you play the minigame, you can find hats which you can trade for, or collect! There is many other people who wants to collect and trade hats, just like you! After you collect enough items and/or hats, try joining a trade server! There, the REAL fun begins! Good luck, and beware of ending up poor!
Cats #hs;-;I'm sure I had a social life before... Doesn't matter, Hats.
Vincentor;-;I spent over 6.1 thousand hours playing this game for the past 5 years and I'm still not tired off it. It's somewhat decent.
Nate Socks;-;Want to jump around like an annoying prick who can dodge literally anything that's thrown at him? Want to use your ammunition to propel yourself across the map at incredibly high speeds and shoot a barrage of high powered rockets in the faces of your enemies? Want to burn down the homes of those you hate and simultaneously think about unicorns and rainbows? Want to operate highly explosive bombs and grenades while shouting like a drunk scottish man wielding a medieval sword? Want to eat sandviches? Want to carry your team by sticking a life saving device up other people's butts and become the center of attention because everyone either loves or hates your very soul? Want to build aimbot guns that do all of the work for you while you sit in a chair and drink beer? Want to be an MLG 360 noscope champion who throws  at people? Want to use invisible hacks and kill other players in just one hit by pretending you're one of their friends? Then play TF2. 10/10 would wear a hat again.
subinka :] ft. Pitbull;-;This game has taught me that you're only socially accepted when you have a nice hat. its alright 11/10
shibitto;-;best place to legally make 13 year olds cry 10/10
Knalraap;-;Team Fortress 2 was the final, fatal blow to what was left of my social life. And I still like it, 10/10 disregard friends acquire hats.
Etem;-;Whipped a 10 year old kid to death while dressed as Santa, then blew up his friend and didn't get arrested 10/10, it's alright - IGN
Astijfequn;-;One of the best free-to-play game out there and one of the best multiplayer experiences! Incredibly well balanced and very fun, especially when exploring the abilities of each class. Both the co-op and the versus modes are incredibly fun and unique in their one way. I highly recommend it! Edit: I disagree with those saying the game is pay to win: all weapons can be found in game through playing. The only items that cannot be found with a free to play account are cosmetics such as hats and accessories
Cnrtst;-;Its ok
Liberty;-;Probably the only game where no one cares about your skill as long as you have backpack filled with fancy hats to show off.
MILHOUSE;-;You can role-play an obese russian hat hoarder who has mental issue from his psychopathic war experiences. He has a speach impairment and can't prenounce sandwich and calls it "sandvich" whenever he eat 1 of his 12 a day. Also a crazy nazi scientist who is still mad about WW2 follows you around with a gun-thing that I'm sure gives you testicular cancer. 10/10 would recommend.
Puddington Bear;-;This is a well made, stylized, team based first person shooter. Teamwork is needed to win at higher levels of play, though lone wolfing is fine on lower skill levels such as on most public servers. There are 9 classes to choose from. Each class has unique weapons and abilities that allow each to fulfill a unique roll as part of a larger team. This provides for a challenging and rewarding experience when faced against opponents of similar or better skill levels. The game has an active dev team that continues to release updates to the game that add new content such as weapons or game modes. At the time of this review, there are two official modes of play: player versus player and 'Mann Versus Machine'. Player versus player is a mode where one team of players battles against another team of players. Within this mode, there are different types of maps. Each type of map has it's own objective or objectives for each team to achieve. 'Mann Versus Machine' is a mode where a team of up to 6 players battles against waves of bots. Players collect money from destroyed bots. The money is divided equally among players in the team and can be used to purchase upgrades and abilities for the next wave of bots. The pay to play sub-mode, "Mann Up", gives rewards upon completing a "tour". In addition to the official modes of play, there are several player made mods that introduce other modes of play such as 'Versus Saxton Hale', where a team of players battles against a player playing as a character named Saxton Hale; 'Dodge Ball', where two teams of players playing as Pyros must airblast rockets and other projectiles back and forth in order to stay alive; 'Zombie Mod', where a team of players must make it to the end of the map without dying to zombies that are played by other players; to name just a few of the many player made mods available. In addition to game play, players will randomly receive free items from the game. Some of the free items given out are weapons, hats and crates. Hats can be worn by a class to change the appearance of that class. Crates can be opened with a key. Keys can be purchased from the Mann Co Store or from the Steam Community Market or traded for from another player. Most crates will list which items can be found within them. The game has several communities for a player to choose from if a community is what you are looking for. The game is easy to pick up and play, either alone or with friends, yet has a depth of play that will keep you from becoming bored too quickly. The dynamics between the different classes, weapons, play styles, skill levels, modes and maps provides content for many hours of play. I have been playing since November 2007 and I still return to the game on a regular basis.
Ragin' Beige;-;Throw your pee at people. Wear hats. Lose your social life. Cry yourself to sleep. Spend 1000+ hours on this game. Conclusion: Conga Simulator 2014
Scuzzelbut;-;Ruined my life and stole my wallet. 10 out of 10 Hats
Slag;-;Uh Not too sure what to write here so heres a recipe for Pancakes instead Ingredients: 1 1/2 cups all-purpose flour 3 tablespoons sugar 1 tablespoon baking powder 1/4 teaspoon salt 1/8 teaspoon freshly ground nutmeg 2 large eggs, at room temperature 1 1/4 cups milk, at room temperature 1/2 teaspoon pure vanilla extract 3 tablespoons unsalted butter, plus more as needed Now to make it 1. In a large bowl, whisk together the flour, sugar, baking powder, salt, and nutmeg. 2. In another bowl, beat the eggs and then whisk in the milk and vanilla. 3. Melt the butter in a large cast iron skillet or griddle over medium heat. 4. Whisk the butter into the milk mixture. Add the wet ingredients to the flour mixture, and whisk until a thick batter is just formed 5. Keeping the skillet at medium heat, ladle about 1/4 cup of the batter onto the skillet, to make a pancake. Make 1 or 2 more pancakes, taking care to keep them evenly spaced apart. Cook, until bubbles break the surface of the pancakes, and the undersides are golden brown, about 2 minutes. Flip with a spatula and cook about 1 minute more on the second side. Serve immediately or transfer to a platter and cover loosely with foil to keep warm. Repeat with the remaining batter, adding more butter to the skillet as needed. 6. Procedure for adding fruit to pancakes: Once the bubbles break the surface of the pancakes, scatter the surface with sliced or diced fruit, or chocolate chips, nuts, etc. Flip with a spatula and cook for 1 minute more, being careful not to burn toppings.
SinisterSalt :|;-;I swear I had money in my wallet...
Fedora Tipper <3;-;The story of every TF2 player ever (Based on a True Story): Your first day: You just started playing this cool game called "Team Fortress 2". You don't know much about it but you think it's pretty neat, with all these cool hats and accessories. A week later: You found a hat called "Ghastlier Gibus", and It's pretty awesome! But for some reason, anyone who sees you with it call you a total noob... Month 1: You just became premium! Yay! And you think you're starting to get this whole "trading system", but you don't exactly see why it's so important to everyone. Months 2-6: You are addicted to trading, more than playing the game itself. You have countless hats, stranges and keys, and anyone you trade with and all your friends admire how extremely rich you are. Months 6-12: You've just changed your name to (xxxxxxx) #RoadToUnusual. You really think you can make it as a big time trader. (A bit scamming, of course.) 1+ Years: You have 5 unusuals, and countless earbuds. You love your inventory more than anything else in the world. Your profile showcase is an exhibit of your coolest items and achivements in TF2. But then, one day... You come home from school, toss your backpack on your bed and wait for you PC to boot. You open steam, as well as TF2Outpst, looking for cool trades. You see someone selling a cool unusual you want, so you send him a trade offer. But when you open "My Inventory", It's empty. "Steam must just be drunk again", you think to yourself. But not this time... not this time. You slowly, trembling with an odd sensation of fear, anticipation and rage open your inventory history to find out that some scumbag named "Green Lantern" stole all your items. -Unusual Counterfeit Billycock -Unusual Shooter's Tin Topi -Unusual Team Captain -Unusual Bonk Boy -Unusual Towering Pillar Of hats -Earbuds -Earbuds -Earbuds -Earbuds -Earbuds -Earbuds -Earbuds At that very moment, hundreds of suicidal thoughts cross your mind. You throw up all over your keyboard, and start screaming. Just screaming. You break down on your knees, start crying like a little girl and let the tears flow all over your red, sweaty body. You go to sleep, and dream all about your inventory. The purple of the unusuals, The green of the genuines, The blue of the vintages... And you forget all about it. This review is %100 accurate, I went through it myself. 11/10
President Plant;-;The amount of hours I have sunk into this game should be a recommendation in itself. Or a sign to stay as far away as possible. Either works.
Green Paul :3;-;I need a life.
GoldenKeyboard;-;How to play Team Fortress 2: Be polite, Be efficient, Have a pan to kill everyone you meet.
Lennon;-;I spent all my money on virtual hats. 10/10
m'$ koriel;-;I just spent $20 so my gun could flash a color for half a second whenever I got a kill with it. I have played for about 2500 hours. This game killed my wallet and my social life. 10/10
Worst Soldier in History;-;A scottish black man killing a Russian with an high explosive grenade launcher and then dancing like there is no tommorow. 10/10 will rekt again
Lairotut;-;DO NOT UNDER ANY CIRCUMSTANCES BUY THIS GAME. Seriously, look how many hours I've played: Over three thousand. People make fun of FPS players because they spend so much time working for imaginary goals, but at least they're hanging out with friends and collaborating. I've just been sitting here alone in my underwear in the dark. FOR 3000+ HOURS. I used to be like you. I had friends and family, hobbies and interests. I used to cook for myself and clean my apartment once in a while. I used to have a social life for god's sake! I thought becoming PREM/INVITE would take a week or two of gaming sessions at most. I WAS WRONG. Please, if there's anything you value in life, don't waste time on this game.
SirSketcy Liu #[ VACATION ];-;I was only 10 years old. I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. Then I got my first hat, The gibus. Suddenly everything changed. I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. I had so many hats, I loved them all. But then someone traded me, I accepted. They offered an Unusual for all my hats. It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. But no Unusual, He scammed me. I lost it all. I was so sad I cried for hours. Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. I went to bed after praying. I felt warm. I looked behind me, It was Gaben! He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning Team Captain. Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning Team Captain and I was naked. I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. Hats are love. Hats are life
KoalaElf;-;Ruined my life, and stole my money, 10/10.
Sparkz;-;TF2 in a nutshell: Gibus= F2p F2p= Screw Lord Gaben! P2p= Praise Lord Gaben! Unusual= Gods of hats Australium= Gods of weapons Cosmetics= Swag Headshots= Hacker Bodyshots= Noob Facestab= Noob W+m1= Noob Gunslinger engis= Troll Hoovies= "pootis" Scoot= "Neda dispencer her!" Pyro= W+m1 skillz Demoman= Da only black man in da game Engi= Fat funny  Snip@rs= "God shave da queen!" Spai= Awesome (   ) Soldier= "Maggots!" Medic= "Who that? Never heard of it." Team Fortress 2= Hats simulator 2015 Strange= Counts the number of people you have rekt Killstreak= Rekt-um streak Specialized- Oww... Shinyyyyyyyy! Professional- F#cked up eyes Vintage= Old school Taunts= Something that says "Get !" after killing someone and/or "Party!" Unusual taunts= Gods of taunts Microphone= "screw 10 yeer olz" / "That guy must be a youtuber!" Sprays= 'Boobs' Maps= Battlefield Jarate= Sniper's  Sydney sleeper=  gun Backburner= critz from back, SAME damage but without crits from front. (LOGIC) Baby face blaster= Flash from DC in tf2! The Enforcer= Give the finger to them w+m1 pyros Phlog= Give the w+m1 to them mercs Neon annihilator= 2Fort Sharks! Wrangler= Aimbot Righteous Bison= "what's dat?" Weapon stats= "Dunt reed dat, itz uselez"- F2ps 2015 Fat scouts= "pootis! pootis! pootis! pootis! pootis! pootis! pootis! pootis! pootis! pootis! pootis!" Friendlyz= CONGA! Tryhardz= TRY HARD! Bugs and glitches= "Welcome to Team Fortress 2. After nine years in development, hopefully it will have been worth the wait." Updates= BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!! BONUS DUCKS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Sanvich= Just a Sanvich bruh..... just a sanvich... Bonk! Atomic punch!= Red bull. Trading= "I TROOD 4 GIBUZ!" Crits= Something you love when you have it but others hate cause they don't have it but you hate it when you don't have it and others love it cause they have it. Mini crits= The younger brother of crits. Red-tape recorder= "Haha you have a sentry! now you don't..." Pybros= "Mhmmhmmhmhmhmmhmhmhhmhm and hmhmhmhmmh." Crates= Another Money taker! And much, MUCH MORE which i can't even sum up! "11/10 would gabe again"- IGN But hey.. at the end of the day, it's the good' ol Team Fortress 2 we always love and play :) Thanks and have fun.
tarpet;-;> I was only 17 > I loved MvM so much, i had completed all the tours and had all the botkillers and robotic hats. > One day, VALVe released a new tour, "Two Cities" , there was a chance to get an Australium weapon! > I spent all my money on Tour of Duty tickets and started playing. > Wasted all tickets, no Australium. > I went to my bed crying. > Suddenly, i feel something move towards me. > It was Saxton Hale. > I don't remember anything from the shock. > The next morning, i woke up naked and saw Australium weapons scattered across my room. > I look out through my window, infront of my house was Saxton Hale. > He looks back at me and winks , then he flies away. > MvM is love , MvM is life.
Mr.Darkling;-;I've said I'd quit this game about 4 times now, send help.
Nebulous;-;This game helps me forget about my  life and therefore stops me from killing myself. So it's pretty good then, I suppose.
Defender of Sexyness;-;Ruined my life. 10/10 but seriously though. is good game :) best multiplayer shooter on the market. I wouldn't have played this many hours if it wasnt a good game.
TheUnknownenom;-;There's a point where I can write a review that can be both amazing yet bias at the same time; I hope I don't try to influence anyone by this review alone. When I first got Team Fortress 2, it was an experience that can't be beat. This first-person shooter can't go to say that this is probably the greatest in gaming history. From trading to crafting, this game will keep you on th edge of your seat until you know it's ready to stop playing. There are 9 classes, each that is unique and makes the game fairly balanced, making th game experience even more fun. With all the updates, there are some positive and negative effects than can affect the Team Fortress 2 trading community as a whole, but the whole aspect is to game, have fun, and enjoy your time on this game. It's your decision to buy from the store. It's your decision to craft metal and hats. It's your decision to play, idle, or even be a teammate and balance the rosters. The community is just like this game: random. So if you wish to stop playing other FPS titles and take a break from imbalanced games, then your choice is this: you won't be dissapointed.
G_lad;-;Look at that hatty. Show me the hatty. Gimme the hatty. I want the hatty. Back up tha hatty. I need tha hatty. I like the hatty. Oh, what a hatty. Shakin' that hatty. I saw tha hatty. I want the hatty. Lord, what a hatty. Bring on tha hatty. Give up tha hatty. Lovin' tha hatty. Round hatty. Down for tha hatty. I want tha hatty. Huntin' tha hatty. Chasin' tha hatty. Casing tha hatty. Gettin' tha hatty. Beautiful hatty. Smokin' hatty. Talk to tha hatty. More hatty. (   )
Kel;-;Made me get excited by bread. 11/10
Nice Stalin;-;How to be pro. 1. Buy keys. 2. trade for buds. 3. trade for unusuals. 4. sell unusuals on market. 5. End up with less money. 6. Rinse and repeat
crim;-;This game has taught me how to wear hats.
garette;-;someone kill me please this is the only game i can play
Beanie;-;No kings, no gods... Only hats.
GibusGod;-;It's ok, i have only played a few hours but I recommend.
Vote-Kick Counter: 1;-;I could've spent that money on chairty. ... But instead I bought virtual hats. 10/10
Mio;-;I was so excited to load up Team Fortress 2, a cool wacky FPS that was team based and had many variations! Awesome! I said to myself. This must be way better than Call of Duty! As the download was running I sat on my chair eager to play the game, I started searching up some videos on the game and basic gameplay mechanics so I could get the edge on the competition, I learned many things that I could apply in battle! Before I knew it the download was complete! Awesome! I sat there as the game loaded up, eager to get into a server! I saw a map called "ctf_2fort" "That map sounds fun!" I exclaimed, I joined the server and was greeted with a class selection screen. I figured I should play the sniper since my experience in other FPS would help me through. My first ever spawn! I promptly walked forward out of the doorway and was greeted by a demoman camping spawn with his stickybomb launcher. I died. 10/10
-AoG-SHARKE BYTE [FYG];-;If you are scared of hats dont play this game.
Ammy;-;It's certainly a game.
[Private] @Will Smith kys;-;spent over 200 unneeded USD on the game and lost multiple friends I suggest you get this game Update: Spent over 500 dollars. Watched a friend, who has been playing this game for less than 3 weeks, unbox his first unusual from his first crate. Scammed it out of him giving him a strange fire ax and a 12 cent CSGO skin. Lost 6 more friends, almost when hatrupt, lost 12 hats, and sold half my weaps and miscs. gibus/10 would honestly still play this game.
Captain Blades #TF2ArmsDeal;-;I should have probably written a recommendation for this game a long time ago, as it is literally the most fun Ive ever had in an online game. Playing with, or without a team of friends, competitive or casual, this game delivers consistent fun that never really gets old. The dynamics and balance of class-based shooter gameplay that exists in this game is unparalleled anywhere else that Ive seen, with no one way to play being superior. The pay-to-advance mechanics in other freemium games aren't present here, as aside from a few utility unlocks and different play styles, the stock weapons are largely the best for every character, with the microtransation and trading economies being largely cosmetic and for non gameplay-affecting in nature. The support for competitive play is amazing, with all levels of skill supported, and many servers dedicated to skill improvement, in addition to casual gaming. The community is also amazing, with no shortage of community content, media, artwork, and a plethora of gaming networks that bring the TF2niverse to life outside the game, and into the rest of the world. (Still waiting for the civilian bobblehead from Meet the Sniper) There is also a virtual macro economy, with Valve's random item distribution system leading to a diverse market for all things TF2, within TF2; hats, specialty weapons, memorabilia items, that can all be used in-game to customize your character and add depth to your actions in-game and within the steam community. The bugs due to lack of optimization, and occasional grief caused by players abusing vote-related moderation systems are the only two things that I can complain about with this game, as it's good, wholesome fun regardless if you're just starting, or are a competitive pro. Even though this game is nearly 7 years old, the community that plays it really brings it to life once you get into it and with the nonstop fun that it provides, Its one of the genuinely few online games that I can wholeheartedly give my seal of approval to. Do i reccomend this game? Of course. There's no boring tedium of waiting around for your opponent to act, and hard-set roles and proceedures that needs to be adhered to, lest your team's fun gets ruined thanks to one person slipping up like in many of the other games these days. (heck, you can charge at a rocket launcher-wielding enemy with a claymore sword, and kill him if you pull it off correctly) I think it allows for more personal expression and playstyles than i think exist in a lot of games. 9.5/10 for doing everything right that can be done in an online shooter, and actually listening to the concerns of the community. Also for providing not just something fun to play, but a universe to be part of.
Mrs.Dash;-;Worst call of duty sequel ever.
xander_168;-;#1 bread-based hat simulator available today. 11/10 would spend hundreds on again
Comrade Plotchy;-;>Free to play I spent over 100 dollars on keys alone, im pathetic
Luckane;-;I need a life please.
Nuko;-;Before I played tf2 I thought playing a game for 100 hours or more was insane. Look at me now.
() Emily Vasquez;-;You get to wear hats and feel pretty. Perfect game.
Sassy Bandit;-;It's like Call of Duty but instead of Doritos you have hats.
Genesis;-;I used to love going to the malls and try on different hats. But I wasted so much gas and my parents would get mad at me. Then one day my friend told me about a hat simulator called Team Fortress 2where you can try on billions of hats. My hat addiction has finally been fulfilled, thanks TF2. 10/10 best hat simulator out there.
SubMachineFun;-;This game plays just like Team Fortress 2
Toroi;-;My hours. help. I wrote something for real! These hours are legit, I played this game a lot in the past to avoid some tragic stuff in real life. I was young and didn't really have my gaming consoles anymore because of my brothers and I had a really bad pc, which i still own. TF2 was one of the games i could play pretty well on this pc but with horrid graphics, but it was one of the more fun games I installed. I met some real cool and nice people on this game as well as people who i plan to keep by my side. The community back then was more humble compared to nowadays. You have competitive gamers who spam their bind keys with unfunny/gross jokes and very obnoxious people who are either yelling at you or telling you to do specific things to win the game. When really, it doesn't even matter if you win or lose. However, you also have those people who are really awesome and you may meet some nice friends along the way! Although you never know what kinda person you're going to meet on this game. In my honest opinion, if you want to have a game to just waste time on (and money) or just mess around with people you know (which is what I do now), this is perfect. Esspecially the mann vs. machine co-op. I mainly play that now. Although to me, the game lost its touch, update wise, and I moved onto other games. I believe it's worth a shot to try it out but other than that, I'd keep it as a casual game. I don't think the competitive scene is worth getting into anymore because it's being flooded by crude people. Atleast from my experiance after over about 4+ years of playing it just got worse and worse. You will eventually be tied into drama even if you try to avoid it. You'll be more stressed than actually having fun, I'll tell you that! Although in all seriousness, this game is losing its touch and probably isn't worth making it your main game MAINLY because the updates they've been releasing are becoming very dull and not as great as they used to be. BUT, it's a great game to just play to pass the time and have fun! All you'll really notice nowdays is...people really love to trade more than actually play. Living off as a free to play would be very tough and you'd need to be patient with items you would want, unless you got that MONEY! Hope this helps. One last thing, I am not saying this game is bad in any way. I am saying that it's worth trying and playing with friends, or even meeting people! Although there are some downsides that you won't like, such as some stuff I pointed out above. Strictly towards the community. I personally think you should have this game as a side game rather than your come home to play sorta thing. Have it as a once in a while game, because it's nothing to be big about, unless you really do not like most of the millions of other games out there. Just give it a shot and see what you think! Have fun <3
Vale;-;Can you name any other unmodded First Person Shooter that lets you play as a cocky and fast Bostonian that can slap the hell out of urine throwing Australian campers with a fresh atlantic fish wrapped in fine christmas lights, eat a bucket of fried proccessed poultry over their corpses, and then get hit with an exploding cannonball launched from an African-Celtic one eyed alcoholic who can leap yards into the air from his own explosives while weilding a mystic ancient talking ghost claymore? I thought so.
A bLuE cOw;-;If you bind forward to a button on your mouse, you can play pyro and eat at the same time
UnfunnyName;-;The vicious cycle of Team fortress 2 First when you'll arrive in the game, you'll want Weapons, tons of them. Then you'll see that everyone has hats, and you'll want these, a tons of them. Then you'll realize that hats doesn't matter, only skill count, so you'll want a lot of skills, tons of them. Then new weapons will be added, and you'll want them, all of them. Then a new hat will be added and you'll want it, cause it'll be fancy on your main class. Then you'll realize again, that you don't give a damn about hats, all is about is skill. Then when you have waited for 3 years, new weapons will be added, and you'll want them. And then you realize that you spent like 2000 hours of your life for this, met great friends, and you'll have a server where's you feeling like home, and you discovered so much things via the community, it learnt you so much. Then the rude reality of life, bring you on earth, and this game is here, Waiting for you to play 1,2,3... hours, and you'll be happy to see that all your good friend are still here.
[CotC] King Conga Gandhi;-;Oh, and if you're wondering, the new update, Gun Mettle, did NOT ruin TF2 for me. I actually find it a LOT more fun now! I think Jerma summed up this game pretty nicely... "Maybe you got like two Pyros that just installed the game ten minutes ago. They don't have any hats, they're spraying  and they're having a blast. They might even be at the wrong point. They might be going backwards to the point that's already been capped. On the same team, there's a Scout with a Hale's Own Scattergun. He's got 18 kills with a 17 killstreak, he just got 18. He's going 'I just got 18, sick!' He runs up the stairs, he's trying his  off. He's get *beeping noises* dodging the 'Oh, the sentry almost got me!' He looks up to his left when he gets up the stairs on Gorge and there's two sandwich Heavies having a ing picnic. So he stops for a second and goes, 'Two... nnnggh!' so he walks forward and gets blown up by a soldier's rocket next door... ...The two sandwich Heavies then decide to move their picnic. There's ants. 'There's ants here, honey. I wanna get out of here.' So they get up, they pack their sandwiches, pack up their lunches, and their breakfast, and whatever the  they're eating. They get up and walk toward the door to go to RED because they think, 'That spot near the A point for RED is pretty good.' They walk out the door, and they see four Level 3 Sentry Guns pointing at them. They get shot a million times and blow up, and there's like nine Engineers swinging their wrenches in random directions. The BLU Scout, at this point, respawns, and walks by the at least 3-4 statues because we all know there's four people AFK when you play this game, you go by the museum of people standing still. He walks out the door and readies his weapon, he's ready, 'I'm going to get another 20 killstreak, just you watch Gaben, I'm going to praise Gaben!' And he goes forward and starts shooting, and he gets backstabbed by a Spy that has been sitting with the Cloak and Dagger in the corner for at least the last 68 seconds." Normally when I do reviews, I turn into a critic and start to examine that game, pointing out every little flaw and pro and determining a final score. However, Team Fortress 2 (or TF2 for short) helped me make so many memories that if I actually tried to make a fair review on it, it would still be way too biased to consider a valid review. Team Fortress 2, is, obviously, an amazing game. The teamplay is necessary and going out and attacking solo may be difficult. You need teammates in order to survive and win. The graphics are unique to a shooter game and really makes it a special game. I'm not here to explain the gameplay or graphics or whatnot. I love this game because of its charm. The game has such a unique and diverse cast of characters, you can't help to love all of them at some point. Scout is cocky and overconfident. Spy, another one of the characters in the game, is technically Scout's father. Soldier is a crazed WWII American patriot. He never actually joined the Army, but instead, he had his own personal Nazi killing spree. His roommate was a magician named Merasmus, who grew to hate Soldier. Pyro is mysterious, but portrays the world as one big happy paradise, known as Pyroland. Demoman is a Scottish alcoholic who, due to Merasmus, lost his eye that is now haunted. Heavy, although he appears to be dim-witted, is actually very intelligent and looks over three sisters. Engineer is very intelligent as well, and his grandfather was a major contributor to keeping the war with RED and BLU continue. Medic isn't fond of normal forms of medicine, but is still an important member nonetheless. Sniper is from New Zealand, but was raised in Australia. He prefers working from a distance and his backstory is very similar to Superman's. Spy is the master of disguise, and is technically Scout's father, as said before. Of all the characters, he appears to be the most "mature" and appears to be the ringleader at many times. Not only that, but the game has an interesting story. I would not like to get too detailed with it. However, it makes little to no sense but is still funny, engaging, and gives TF2 much more depth. There is also a storyline that takes place a few years later where Mann Co. is being attacked, so the mercenaries have to defend it, called Mann vs. Machine. This game mode ties in with the TF comics, which explain many characters' backstories and is currently still in the works as of this review. The other comics (all of which can be found on TF2's official website) are all funny and charming in their own way as well. The community has been quite debatable on how nice it is at many times, but in the end, it's still an overall great community. I've seen people give out stuff, others mentor some of the newbs (something I do as well) along with much, much more. Yes. the game is considered a "pay-to-win game" but it isn't necessarily a pay-to-win game. With lots of patience, you will get what you want from the game, whether it be hats, weapons, or whatever it is you want. The game has a learning curve that isn't too steep, but become dedicated and you'll fall in love with it. No matter how many times you rage to a W+M1 pyro that destroyed your 16 killstreak, or cheer when you unbox an Unusual, or maybe discover a few friends or learn a few things, Team Fortress 2 has been a huge part of my PC gaming life and without it, I would be as bored as hell. I cannot recommend this game enough, and I hope that many more memories are made on here. Valve may be cash cows, but you can't help but admit they are amazing when it comes to making games. Portal, Half-Life 2, Counter-Strike, but this game stands out from the rest to me. Do I recommend this game? Yes, yes, yes, YES.
Nerd House;-;Team Fortress 2. Being ranked as the third most-played game [steamcharts.com] on Steam, Team Fortress 2 is probably one of the best free-to-play games we've got. Why is it so popular? Let's take a look, shall we? First off, the obvious: It's free. 100% free. This means its accessible to everyone on Steam. This is just the icing on the cake though. What really shines about TF2 is the game itself. Team Fortress 2 usually consists of two teams (Red and Blue) going head to head against each other. Sometimes fulfilling certain objectives or just downright killing each other. There are many, many maps and modes, such as Payload, Capture Points, and Mann VS Machine. But the general idea no matter the map or mode is to KILL EVERYTHING THAT MOVES! And my god, is it fun to do so. The game has 9 playable mercenaries, each actually being a certain "class". Each class is divided into 3 different roles: Offense, Defense, and Support. Let's go over each role and class. Offensive roles specialize in dealing damage to the opposing team. These are your main attack force. Scouts are the speedy hit and run class, with the ability to double or even triple jump depending on equipped items. Soldiers pack a bit more firepower with their rocket launchers, which gives them not only power, but mobility due to the ability known as "rocket jumping". The Pyro is great at setting the opposition on fire, as well as extinguishing burning teammates using an airblast. Defensive roles serve to inhibit enemy access and to hold enemies back from vital points on the map. Overall, the defensive group has the most firepower of all the groups. Demomen can safeguard areas with stickybombs that they can detonate when enemies come by. Heavies are great for mowing down incoming troops and pushing back forces. Heavies can also keep enemies in an area while whittling their health for teammates to finish off. Engineers can build Sentry Guns for effective area defense, as well as build Teleporters and Dispensers for logistical support of the team. Support classes cannot hold the fight on their own, but their specialized abilities can tip the balance in their team's favor. They offer the offensive and defensive classes an extra edge in battle and can help turn the tide of the game. Whether crippling the enemy advance from behind or keeping teammates healed, the support classes are always handy to have around. Medics are the team healers, capable of providing numerous buffs depending on their equipments. Spies are great for sneak attacks or eiliminating key threats. Snipers excel at long range, also eliminating key threats, as well as extinguishing burning teammates with jarate and providing a damage boost to teammates. Next, let's look at the presentation. TF2 has a very unqiue art style. It's somewhat cartoonish, but very appealing. It's simple, and un-complex. But it doesn't need to be complex. It's simplicity is it's strength. Everything is detailed enough to where you can easily tell whats going on, what a specific model or item is, and they all stand out. The soundtrack is also very appealing and catchy, especially the main theme. I personally have it as a ringtone/alarm tone on my smartphone! :) One of the best aspects of TF2 is the Steam Workshop. Users can submit designs for items and weapons, and possibly have them added to the game! A very lucrative sub-market has also emerged from this game in the form of the Crate Keys. That's a whole different ballgame in and of itself, so we won't get into it here. During normal gameplay on most servers, you can obtain random items, weapons, and sometimes crates, and taunts....through the item drops system. You can only receive so many drops per week, and you will get them randomly as you play. You can use these items and weapons to customise your mercenary's loadout, or you can use them to craft other items, hats, and weapons. You can take multiples of items and craft them into Scrap, then Reclaimed Metal, then Refined Metal. You can then use these metals to craft specific class weapons/items, among other things. The crafting system is simple yet robust, with lots of possiblities. Some of it is very luck based. You can take some very common items and end up crafting a super rare hat or gun worth a lot of moolah on the Steam Market! All-in-all, Team Fortress 2 is just a very fun game. Endless entertainment awaits when you start up this game, especially if you play with friends on your favorite server. Probably the best free-to-play game on Steam. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=383235670 Highly Recommended Be sure to check out Nerd House Gaming for more reviews!
Mr Squiggles;-;How to play Team Fortress 2: Be polite, Be efficient, Have a pan to kill everyone you meet.
pacsomepuppes;-;> I was only 10 years old. > I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. > I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. > Then I got my first hat, The gibus. > Suddenly everything changed. > I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' > I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. > I had so many hats, I loved them all. > But then someone traded me, I accepted. > They offered an Unusual for all my hats. > It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. > But no Unusual, He scammed me. > I lost it all. > I was so sad I cried for hours. > Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. > I went to bed after praying. > I felt warm. > I looked behind me, It was Gaben! > He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning Team Captain. > Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning Team Captain and I was naked. > I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. > Hats are love. Hats are life. TF2: 11/10 Best hat simulator 1981 Overall, I'd give this game 9 out of 10 Gabe Narwalls Shoutout to ObsidianObelisk17 for making a youtube vid of this Showout to TheDisableBore for making a comic of this I cringe re reading this :smug:
Flexi;-;Ruined my life and cost me over 500. 10/10 would recommend to friends and family
Special;-;Team Fortress 2 is the most realistic hat simulator created to date. There is absolutely no other simulator quite like this one. The first time you start the simulator, you join a server where you can play a minigame where you show off your hats and items. If you kill a person three times in a row in the minigame, you get your very first hat: the Gibus. This is where it really starts; To play the simulator correctly, you have to spend money in the market place, made by Valve. After that, while you play the minigame, you can find hats which you can trade for, or collect! There is many other people who wants to collect and trade hats, just like you! After you collect enough items and/or hats, try joining a trade server! There, the REAL fun begins! Good luck, and beware of ending up poor!
BOX OF CHEESE;-;Have traveled across the country to meet the a few of the friends I have made in this beautiful game. Even moved 700 miles to live/date one. Best game ever hands down.
GarneT~;-;I've only played a little so I don't really have much to say.
Nexiu;-;The best hat simulator of all the time.
RubberRoss;-;Not a blanket fort simulator, was very disappointed.
[FP] Soof (vaca);-;TF2=hats CoD=no hats TF2>CoD
Pkms;-;Bread Edit ~ Ducks
Simmer;-;you can hit people with shovels
Catbug;-;Hit a guy with a dead fish 10/10
hobnobs;-;An absolute waste of time.  3200   4000 hours to be exact.
Yndoril Fakelastname;-;Story: Hats Gameplay: Hats Graphic: Hats Music: Hats "It's like skyrim with hats." - IGN "I once bought a hat, I regret it as soon as I realized that I've just spend my money for a virtual hat." - My friend "Spy, the class nobody loves, but everyone wants to play." - Honest Game Trailer "You're adopted" - Dad "I used to be walking like you, then I took a rocket in the knee" - Soldier "I have to stop playing this game and get a life.... *launches TF2*" - Me TL;DR 10/10
{P} Jazz;-;Ruined my life. Wasted countless hours of my life in this. I'm addicted and in rehab. It ruined my family and social life. 10/10 Best hat simulator ever.
Fawful's Minion;-;Multiplayer friendly, fantastic gameplay, always someone playing, and a TON of customization. Too good of a game to pass up. Best Steam Game by far.
Sol4R;-;Learned how to cook a tomato with a toaster
WASH;-;Team Fortress 2 is not just a really fun, free to play, first person shooter with a very large variety of game-play styles, an awesomely distinct art-style and rather comedic storyline. It also breaks a lot of conventions in the genre and has continued to be a proving ground for what a game is truly capable of. For the past five years or so TF2 has consistently evolved through a series of major updates introducing new game-play elements(minor patches for bugs are issued at least bi-weekly), and, occasionally, festive seasonal updates that make TF2 more eventful. Unlike a lot of FPS out there, Team Fortress provides plenty of things to do other than just "shot bullet". TF2 has a really nice replay feature which you can direct, star in, edit, and render in ber quality(regardless of system specs) your own wartime films that can be posted to YouTube via in-game function. TF2 was also one of the first FPS to have a tradeable item drop system which has produced a very large and viable trading community and market where loot found or crafted in the game is exchanged for other in-game valuables like fancy apparel, rare Items/Weapons, games from the steam store, or even real world $ on the black-market. This micro-economic meta-game is what will essentially help support the game indefinitely, and rewards players for there time spent playing the game, and making it a worthy investment for learning the game. The only downside I can note about Team Fortress 2 is that it is currently over 12 gigabytes in size and it will eventually get much larger if it continues on this upgrading trend. Being the king of free to play games, I give Team Fortress 2 a perfect score 10 out of 10.
Cosairen;-;this game makes me hate myself more and more everyday. 10/10 you should play it
|254|CaptainLulz|;-;Sometimes you just want a game that doesn't need too much thinking. Other times you just want a game where winning and losing the round means nothing but the fact that you've just had loads of fun and a good laugh. And there are still times when you just want to play something that washes away all the  you've taken all day. For all these times, you need TEAM FORTRESS 2!!
Monkey King;-;Open Steam, pick your class Saddle up to kick some ! Yer multiplayer dreams come true When you play Team Fortress 2! Well, the heavy spins a mini gun The scout cain't do much else but run Side with RED or side with BLU When you play Team Fortress 2! Well, the Snipers and the Pyros might make you wanna ragequit Make sure they ain't a spy though, 'cause spies are f*ckin' b*llsh*t The Engineer can build cool stuff And Demoman can blow it up A helluva good time waits for you Right inside Team Fortress 2! If the soldier gets a decent shot, he'll knock you out yo' pants And the heavy and the medic share a legendary bromance... Work together as a team Download d*uchey hats on Steam The doors are openin' that's yer cue... Time to play Team Fortress 2! Brentalfloss: /watch?v=UbaGodU_Gkw (subscribe!)
karma;-;1. Download some free cheats. 2. Open your cheats. 3. Open TF2 4.Play the game. 4. VAC Ban. 10/10 IGN
nick;-;Worst call of duty ever made
Dirk Beefhammer;-;I've played it so much, I forgot to feed my kids. Now that my kids are dead, I can play more TF2
DeliciousHotSchmoes;-;Team Fortress 2 Review by: DeliciousHotSchmoes -Release date: October 9, 2007 -Genre: First-person shooter -Developers: Valve Corporation -Platforms: PC, PS3, Xbox 360, OS X, Linux The Review All the way from 2007 and still going strong. When I say ''going strong'' I usually like to think so in the community workshop and hat section. But on a serious note, this game is absolutely sensational, fun and arguably flawless. So, what's the best of it now? Well, it's totally free and definitely worthy of the quote; ''The most fun you can have online.'' coming from the editors of PC Gamer magazine. The game has a wide and diverse selection of 9 different classes, ranging from their own unique abilities and strategies that can be performed against the opposing team. Similiar to a ''rock, paper, scissors'' scenario, where everything is fair and there are no ''over-powered'' classes. The fast, Boston-talking and even more fast running Scout, to the towering, minigun-wielding hulk of a Russian man, known as the Heavy. Every character class usually represents a soldier in a common FPS' of some sort. What I truly love about these characters is the fact that Valve has openly breathed life, vibrant personalities, characteristics and nationalities into this rag-tag bunch. I also enjoyed the customization of weapons and accessories, named after the witty puns, along with the slight ethnic slur and referenced culture of that said character. This really brings out the comedic flare within the game and shows that humour can mix amusement in along with entertainment the players from around the globe can express and relate to, depending on the gamer's nationality. When it comes to the plot of the game, the elements of storytelling isn't entirely shown into clear perception. It mainly focuses on the two, competitive industries of RED (Reliable Excavation Demolition) and BLU. (Builders League United) Who both subsequently conquer half of the world, known as the Badlands. Each corporation administers its half of the world with a multi-disciplined army of paper pushers. One of those ''paper pushers'' is you and your whole team, when playing this game. A fantastic thing to note in this game is the fact that it's holiday themed. Either new campaigns modeled after a specific holiday, down to the newly cashed in, fan made hats are launched to the public to bring in funds for both Valve and the original creator at hand. Halloween, Christmas, Easter just to name a few are a great example and addition to the game's growing campaign and community. It's also important to note that the game is getting updated at a steady pace, with the occasional UI updates and other fun concepts, such as poses and character interactions being frequently implemented to wet the appetites of the individual player's preference. I don't have much to complain about this game, other than the fact that majority of the servers you connect to, you'll most likely encounter 13-year-olds who constantly nag and try their luck to command the rest of the whole team, which sometimes resorts to foreign/eastern european person nagging about the 13-year-old's nagging, so it's not rare to see a big kick off between young kids and ignorant foreign kids going absolute bonkers on a connected match. It's more fun to not say a word at this point in time and just watch the ultimate climax between the raging two forces. I definitely recommend this game. Not just down to the fact that it's free, but because it still remains fun to this day and constant updates on campaigns and official hat accessories keep this game alive, making the game overall timeless...which, doesn't affect the game's mechanics at all but, only along the lines of taunts and so on and so forth.
ster;-;It's good.
Harkku;-;does going pyro in a trade server make you literally hitler
Cariss the Sniper;-;This game has made my life worth living. I live for the hats and conga.
tcct;-;lost my money forgot to pay bills forgot taxes exist lost my house my credit card locked had to type this review with starbucks' wifi gg 4/20 game would play again
Lord_of_Light;-;TF2, worst game ever Wasted my time and money just for hats 10/10 will keep playing On a more serious note, this is a wonderful and amazing game I've spent hundreds of hours playing this and I don't regret it at all. It never gets old because no two matches are the same, something will always be different as soon as those spawn doors open and you run out onto the front lines. There are many fun and interesting weapons that you can combine together that suit your play style and strategies, along with finding the perfect class or classes that just fit your style of play and keep you coming back for more. There are are many fun game modes, official and custom, that you can play. As well as tons of fun official and custom maps to enjoy. My personal favorite game mode would by Capture the Flag on my favorite map 2Fort. Even though TF2 is 7 years old its still very active and keeps getting update with minor as well as major updates which add all sorts of new content. Usually the major updates are pretty good, but there are times when they can fall flat. But that doesn't happen too often. BONUS DUCKS! And of course I wouldn't dare to end this without mentioning the hats. The many hats and misc items for every class allow you to stand out among your fellow players and make you look unique. There are tons of unique, interesting, and ridiculous combination you can make by combining the wide assortment of cosmetic items and I simply love it! This game is awesome and overall unique compared to the other multi-player FPSs I have played and that's what makes it so great, it's different and that's the way I like it. Also, the Pyro is a light bulb until proven otherwise, and even if he is proven to be otherwise, disregard it and continue believing he is a light bulb, because he is a light bulb. Thank you
Rapid;-;13/37 best game 2014(and evry other year) MOUNTANDEW FAZE CLAN DORITOS TM. I HAVE OVER 9000 HOURS ON THIS GAME AND IVE NEVER BEEN BORED. 420 B.A.S.E IT FIGOT XDXDxdxdxdXDXDXXdD. GIT HATS OR DIE TRYING. TF3 CONFIRM Xd WOW SO BREAD AUSTRALIUM GOLD UNUSUAL GIBUS. POOTIS BEST GAME HERE OF THE YEAR HERE. LELELELE SELLING UNUSUAL PUMPERNICKLE FOR 3 PRETZELS PURE. THANKS UBER-BAMA, SHOULDA VOTED FOR CRIT ROMNEY. VALVE PLS AD THIS GAME IS SUPER EPEK -RAPID
Dr. Rockzo;-;i own a gibus edit: here proof http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=254003950
The Happiest Little Bucket.v;-;It's ok.
AIMB.ThePresident;-;1. Install the game. 2. Play the game 3. Get items 4. Sell items 5. ??? 6. Profit tl;dr Get paid by playing a fun free to play game.
trist;-;i totally hit that guy wtf
r u x S> Black Executioner;-;hats 11/10 would hat again
india;-;has an amazing campaign mode
[PSI] Garrus;-;Do you like to simulate wearing a hat? Because Team Fortress 2 is how you simulate wearing a hat.
maxxspeed;-;This is a good game. You should play it.
Humen;-;"America's number one hat simulator"
Nilesy;-;Team Fortress 2 is a really stupendously addictive and fun FPS game. The game revolves around a set of 9 classes, each of which have strengths and weaknesses and counters, whose duty it is to conquer the opposition. The thing about TF2, at least for me, is the artstyle. The comic cartoonyness of the characters and world is incredibly fun and light. It's the perfect game to blow off some steam and relax after a long day. The players, at least in my experience, are all generally really nice. I feel this is because being "bad" at TF2 is not really a factor. Regardless of your skill level, how much time you've spent on TF2, or how much money, everyone can contribute and everyone can have a great time. One of the strongest parts of the game is that losing, dying or being killed doesn't lead to hate or anger or frustration. A game in TF2 can last from 3 to 10 minutes, and these short rounds contribute to a lack of concern if you lose. Not in a bad way, not in a way which results in you not caring about the game in general, but in a way where if you lose you don't blame yourself, or your team mates, for the loss. It's refreshing and fantastic. Hugely recommended from myself. I've spent about 550+ hours in the game, am in no way a master, half-decent maybe, and I have no reason to stop playing. The game is consistently updated with new maps, items, lore and content and I look forward to many more hundreds of hours of gameplay. Nilesy
Violet | Away~;-;~Lost my money to this game ~10/10 has conga ~I pray to Gaben every night hoping to see if he'll release a good tf2 update eventually ~Gibus is OP, plz nerf ~It costs $400000 to feed Gaben for 12 seconds ~Spycrabs ~Genuine Spycrabs ~Sandvich eating heavies ~Phlog still has yet to be removed from the game ~Sleep? Who needs sleep when you got tf2? ~Merasmus needs to get the bonus ducks back cause ducks are awesome ~Hats which makes you 10x better at the game Overall: 7/10 not realistic, can't aim down sights, can't noscope headshot, soldier's helmet doesn't protect you from headshots, and pistols don't instant kill an enemy when aimed at the head, so in conclusion, it's an okay game~IGN
[fireflame988];-;I was only 13 years old. I loved TF2 so much. I was always at the bottom of servers. I pray to Gaben every night, hoping I would get a hat someday. "Gaben is love," I said. "Gaben is life." My dad overhears me and calls me a wm1. I know he's just jealous that I got recruited into FaZe clan. I call him a bodyshotter. My dad airshots me and sends me to my room. As I feel my numb face, I turn on my PC and log into Steam. My hands are shivering as I click on the "PLAY" button to open up TF2. "I'll show that airshotter," I said. I open up the Steam Market Place, and purchase 20 Half Life 3 Cases and Keys. 10 minutes have passed by, and I've unboxed 19 Strange Neon Annihilators As I move my cursor over to the final case, I click and select "OPEN". My cursor moves even slower as I move it towards the giant, green "USE KEY" button. I click the button. "I can't look," I said to myself. "My dad will bodyshot me when he see's that I've spent six grand on super exclusive and rare Half Life 3 Cases and Keys. I close my eyes and listen as I hear Gaben laughing over me, as if I am almost certain that I did not get a hat. I open my eyes. A large clump of feces leaves my  very quick, as my eyes look at the item I have just been given by the Holy Gaben himself. Another clump starts sliding out as I stand up to run to my dad to tell him that I've just unboxed a Ghastly Gibus. My dad cries as he suddenly gets his Steam account hacked by OpTic. I wear my new hat and noscopes his face. I then walk into my room, take my pants off, and thrust my pelvic region into the air, imagining Gaben with me. "Gaben is love, Gaben is life."
noq;-;Never played it, but I heard it's okay.
Zypher, sleeping farming cards;-;This game started as a class-based combat simulator, capturing the control points, stealing the intelligence from the enemy, moving a bomb-holding cart. Then, it moved onto a hat simulator game, only hats mattered, it was a competition to see who had the best hat. Recently, Team Fortress 2 transformed into a Bread simulator, you could spawn bread with a teleporter, bread was amazing, even bread weapons were released... But now, it is a conga simulator, one conga is enough to ruin a server. 10/10 must conga harder.
The Pampered Chef;-;There is pretty much a reason for anyone, and I mean anyone to play Team Fortress 2. Let's review. If you like to play with fire, and not have to seek professional counseling. Team Fortress 2 is a game for you. If you like to stab people in the back while smoking a cigarette and speaking in an outrageous French accent. Team Fortress 2 is a game for you. If you like to run around and hit people with a bat, while talking like a cast member from "Jersey Shore". Team Fortress 2 is a game for you. If you've ever said to yourself: "I want to build guns, but I also have a life long dream to beat another man to death with a wrench,". Team Fortress 2 is a game for you. If you've ever wanted to pretend you're an obese Vladmir Putin while simultaniously firing an ridiculous machine gun. Team Fortress 2 is a game for you. If you've ever wanted to behead people while in a drunken Scottish rage, Team Fortress 2 is a game for you. If you've ever wanted to sound like that one kid's dad who told war stories and never shuts up about America, and shoot people with a rocket launcher, Team Fortress 2 is a game for you. If you want to prove that the plural of the word "Sniper" is "Too damned many", Team Fortress 2 is a game for you. If you've ever wanted to pretend you're a Doctor that barely escaped trial at Nuremberg, Team Fortress 2 is a game for you. Finally, if you like hats...be they fancy, or shabby...Team Fortress 2 is a game for you.
Trolling Saruman;-;<Insert joke about life being ruined here>
VeryDoge12#Back2Trading;-;REAL LIFE General's hat - 15$ Burning general's hat - 0$ TF2 General's hat - 0.75$ Burning general's hat - 15,615.99$ - Gaben sprays - Just played it for a bit - Spookwaggen - NISLT - Spycrab - P2P < F2P - Gaben ate my wallet - 10 year olds - CoD kids - More Gayben 42/0 - IGN (   ) (   ) (   ) ( ~  ) ( o  o)    - (      ) (      )    ) (    ) (  ) [   ]  ( o  o) {   } (  V ) ( ^  ^) ( ) (  ) (  (   ) () () .() ..() () () ..() .() () .() ..() () () ..() () ()
flimminator;-;> I was only 10 years old. > I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. > I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. > Then I got my first hat, The gibus. > Suddenly everything changed. > I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' > I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. > I had so many hats, I loved them all. > But then someone traded me, I accepted. > They offered an Unusual for all my hats. > It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. > But no Unusual, He scammed me. > I lost it all. > I was so sad I cried for hours. > Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. > I went to bed after praying. > I felt warm. > I looked behind me, It was Gaben! > He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning TC. > Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning TC and I was naked. > I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. > Hats are love. Hats are life. TF2: 11/10 Best hat simulator 1981 lol
Beckie Pleb;-;You like hats? This game has hats. 10/10
Neutron [SC-];-;it's nice
Jbace Bjam;-;An interactive Monty Python sketch with guns.
aeth;-;Ruined my Social Life What is Love? 10/10 would recommend to people who dislike the Sun.
Destroyer;-;It doesn't matter how many hours you play It doesn't matter how many hats you have It doesn't matter how many kills you have on your stranges It doesn't matter how good you are... You can always die to a random 10fps m1 + w pyro... He doesn't even know what he did... Anyways This Game ROCKS!
Shadowkitty;-;"Hats are love, hats are life" - Valve
hlep #c's away;-;In no other game can you suffer from a multitude of less than gracious deaths such as: being burnt to a crisp shotgunned blown off cliffs riddled with pistol and mini-gun ammunition having meat cleavers embedded in your spleen soddened with expired milk and urine bludgeoned over the head by fish, bats, lollipops, crossroad signs, candy canes, guitars, wrenches, cooking utensils - the nightmare doesn't end! curve balled blown to smithereens by rockets and grenades zapped by ray guns crushed by tanker boots shoveled pick-axed whipped decapitated by various medieval instruments of death incinerated by flare guns pummeled by a postal box mauled raked batted out of arenas hadoukened suicide bombed engulfed by an Armageddon killed by a cripple and a drunk - can't get more embarassing gibbed by a volley of cannonballs charged at with shields glassed bashed by pugilists sentry gunned stabbed with concealed weapons sniped fenced ham shanked overdosed on syringes and many other indignities I dare not speak of.
Vap;-;it's ok
Mr. Bob Ross;-;"I'm not a crazed gunman, dad.." 10/10 Would throw my urine again
Lffy;-;The only place where you can legally blow up, shoot, chop up, and/or immolate 10-year-olds! Also, HATS! :D Final score: 9001/10
Rick Dagless;-;played game for long time- here are tips tip: tuxedo terrorist man goes LOBSTER when using pencil bag and SkyWatching tip: texas nerd go build tiny shooter when useing robot arm tip: use fatty at long range when fighting australian longshooter- his gun name of SAZA shoots much faster tip: the tiny one is very hard to use b/c is too fast- reccomend walk by using CONTROL BUTTON so you don't hit walls b/c you are too fast tip: having trouble fighting flamer? try demonstrations man. volve computer software designed him to DEMONSTRATE (ha, i get it) how fighting FIRE WITH FIRE (irony). Get very close to flamer with Grenad. Launche. (this means Grenade Launcher, I use abbreviations b/c i am a pro player), and fire away. if you are close enough, you should be damaged by these explosions. you might think "huh, why am i damaged by explosions"? very good question, let me tell you- volve realized that demonstrations man was too OP and very dangerous, so they design him to explode after shooting so he can only kill flamer but not the other ones. this game is very clever, too- remember Cold War? you might know of tiny little thing name of "mutuali assured destroction" (if this is too complicated for you it is OK to stop reading here B.C/ all im going to do is explain this and then be done with review) here is the very clever part- remember when i tell you about how demonstrations man explode when shooting flamer too close? volve make him explode to remind us of Cold War and say "science is gone TOO FAR, don't let the explosions get us all" volve is very funny. i know he is not real (im not a tiny baby boy anymore, jeez) but i like to pretend is real sometime.
firework;-;So after 2 years, 2800+ hours of this game, I guess I will make a review. Okay, here we go.... review incoming... TO SUM THIS GAME UP hats guns crazed gunmen angry people wasting your entire paycheck on virtual items instead of charities, food, or products you need to live hats on fire people yelling hats with green fire children screaming aimbots hats with REAL ANIMAL ABUSE (FLAMING BATS) flying around them hats with random f**king things in general floating in or around them phisers trolls spending 2000+ hours on f**king shooting people and wearing F**KING VIRTUAL CLOTHING THAT MAY OR MAY NOT BE ON FIRE let's not forget f**king conga conga congacongaconga and some other sh*t i forgot to mention so i hope this helped you understand tf2 gg, no re *EDIT: I FORGOT CRATES. CRATES TOO AND BURNING CONGAS AND SUNNY CONGAS AND CONGAS WITH HEARTS oh, and micspammers gotta love 'em and gibus gibus4lyfe
Spoderman;-;Uh Not too sure what to write here so here's a recipe for Pancakes instead Ingredients: 1 1/2 cups all-purpose flour 3 tablespoons sugar 1 tablespoon baking powder 1/4 teaspoon salt 1/8 teaspoon freshly ground nutmeg 2 large eggs, at room temperature 1 1/4 cups milk, at room temperature 1/2 teaspoon pure vanilla extract 3 tablespoons unsalted butter, plus more as needed Now to make it 1. In a large bowl, whisk together the flour, sugar, baking powder, salt, and nutmeg. 2. In another bowl, beat the eggs and then whisk in the milk and vanilla. 3. Melt the butter in a large cast iron skillet or griddle over medium heat. 4. Whisk the butter into the milk mixture. Add the wet ingredients to the flour mixture, and whisk until a thick batter is just formed 5. Keeping the skillet at medium heat, ladle about 1/4 cup of the batter onto the skillet, to make a pancake. Make 1 or 2 more pancakes, taking care to keep them evenly spaced apart. Cook, until bubbles break the surface of the pancakes, and the undersides are golden brown, about 2 minutes. Flip with a spatula and cook about 1 minute more on the second side. Serve immediately or transfer to a platter and cover loosely with foil to keep warm. Repeat with the remaining batter, adding more butter to the skillet as needed. 6. Procedure for adding fruit to pancakes: Once the bubbles break the surface of the pancakes, scatter the surface with sliced or diced fruit, or chocolate chips, nuts, etc. Flip with a spatula and cook for 1 minute more, being careful not to burn toppings.
FluffR;-;ruined my life. 5 stars.
=T$E=SpaX;-;I killed a 10 years old Russian kid with my minigun and killed his medic with a frying pan 10/10
=(yIFF)= guacamole fiend;-;A long time ago, I told everyone who asked me to play TF2, " You're never going to see me play TF2. I will never play TF2 with you. " But one day, one of my friends was feeling down, and he's really into TF2, so I offered to play with him. And it made him happy and not sad and that was good. Then another one of my friends told me that if I played 70 hours of TF2, he'd buy me Skyrim. I don't have my own money to buy things online with; all the money I make online goes to my friends' PayPals. So I said yes, and I started logging hours. It was slow going at first. I said to him, "It's a good game, but I'm really bad at it. And I guess that's okay - everyone's kinda bad at it. But I'll never be like you and my other friends who play this. You won't get me addicted to TF2; I'm doing this for Skyrim." After I got Skyrim, it became my bae and I was the clingy girlfriend. As my burning passion for being a male lizardbeast died down, I started playing TF2. Mostly because, being F2P, many of my friends played and still play it. So we played TF2. It was gradual, my downfall. But it was inevitable, and in hindsight, even predictable. I want to say I'm not addicted to TF2, but then I'd be lying, because once I played for six hours straight to achieve a score of 420 and I didn't stop 'til I hit that eight hour mark. I played TF2 for more than six in' hours, man. I could've stopped at 420. No, I could've stopped an hour or two in. And yet I didn't. I started playing TF2 regularly, sometimes for long periods of time. I won't say that that was my aforementioned 'downfall'. No, it would have to be me being around TF2 bloggers on Tumblr. I watched and learned about other fans and their interests. But let me just say. Playing TF2 is one thing. Playing TF2 often is part of that one thing. But reading and writing shipping fanfiction about TF2? Getting innocents into shipping fanfiction about TF2? Well, I wish I didn't fall into this black hole of gay, but it's too late now. I'm sorry. Play TF2. But do so carefully. So as not to become what I have.[/b]
|eXtv| Lucky Luke;-;It's sort of the reason I have a job I like.
Curvy Brace;-;Team fortress 2. The only hat simulator that will allow 23 people to drop their weapons and start dancing their heart out until a short texan in a crooked tophat comes along and murders everyone with a wrench, to which confetti, a thropy and a guitar riff will appear above his head. He will then deploy a sentry gun, hit it with his wrench a couple of times until someone destroys it and kills him. He then respawns, walks around in circles and leaves the server. Only in tf2. Good game.
Cpt.BlackAce;-;Once upon a time, in a server far away There was a blue Scout that shouted "Bonk!" when he hurt people. This Scout was facing a dilemma. The Scout shouted, I need a dispensah over ere! However, the Engineer was facing problems of his own. A Spy is sappin my sentry! The Engineer shouted back. The Scout could see no red spy. Unfortunately, this lead to his downfall as the Scout was then backstabbed by the Spy. Before the Scout completely died, the Spy whispered into his ear, I did your mother. As the Spy walked out of the room, he disguised himself as the recently fallen Scout. Until he got hit by the Sniper's Jarate. This drew the attention of a red Soldier "I think his mate saw me." The Sniper whispered to himself. A rocket to the face only proved that fact.
k...;-;The biography of the TF2 soldier: A Highly-Trained Weapon Specialist Soldier that went on a killing spree in WW2 (World War 2) that presently wields an RPG FOR A PRIMARY WEAPON joined a team of mercenaries to defeat another team of mercenaries exactly like them, soon, became roomates with A WIZARD that can spawn PUMPKIN HEADED HEADLESS HORSEMANS, A GIANT EYEBALL that shoots exploding miniature eyeballs, A magic book that CASTS BOMB SPELLS, soon turned against the soldier. And one day while on a camp fire he saw a comet that literally landed in front of him only to see that inside the "comet" was AN INTERDIMENSIONAL PARTICLE SMASHER that he soon used as a weapon. And also one day a crazed man built an entire ARMY OF ROBOTS to take down the mercenaries exactly in the likenesses of the mercenaries themselves, so technically... he can defeat his own self with his own weapons but in the form of metal, batteries, and also probably about 5 TIMES HIS OWN SIZE. Oh and he also survived a winter cold day COMPLETELY NAKED WHILE WRESTLING A BEAR WHILE HE IS COVERED IN HONEY, and when I say completely naked.. I mean COMPLETELY, INCLUDING NO UNDERWEAR. Oh and also he shoots his own rockets at his feet to propel himself in the air. Have you ever heard of him surviving being under fire, comepltely filled with LED bullets WHILE COVERED IN URINE, yes, covered IN URINE. And also he used a shovel to fight a fat man holding a minigun point blank while the soldier is in mid-air who won? Obviously the man with a shovel. I think thats probably nuff said... Theres still more buut I'm gonna stop here.
SteveTF2gamer620;-;Team Fortress 2 is the BEST FPS that I EVER PLAYED IN MY LIFE!!!!! This game is a MUST-PLAY!!! The cartoon feeling combined with the combat makes this game a different one from the other FPS games. What also makes TF2 also a unique FPS is that it is a Multiplayer only video game. TF2 is one of the games that you don't have a pro to enjoy the game. For other FPS games, such as COD , you would have to be a pro at the game in order to get the other weapons. For TF2, you just have to play a certain amount of time and then later you will acquire some new items! If you're lucky, you could get a misc or even a hat. There are many different qualities for items and weapons in the game. They are Normal, Unique, Strange, Vintage, Genuine, Unusual, Haunted, Collector, Community and Self-Made. There are 9 classes which are the Scout, Soldier, Pyro, Demoman, Heavy, Engineer, Medic, Sniper and Spy. These classes are divided into 3 categories. They are Offensive, Defense and Support. Each class specalise in a particular area. The Scout can double jump and is the fastest out of all class which means he can escape from danger with no diffculty. The Soldier can rocket jump to get into higher areas. Pyro can burn enemies and can do compression blast which blasts projectiles away such as rockets and grenades. The Demoman is able to make traps for enemies. Heavy is able to take a lot of damage and has the most health. Engineers are able to construct buildings such as a Sentry Gun to defend points and support the rest of the team. Medics can heal fellow teammates so they are able to survive in battle longer. Sniper can do a significant amount of damage with sniper rifle. Spy can disguise as the enemy team and can sap Engineers' buildings to disable them. As you start Team Fortress 2, there are detailed tutorials that teaches you how to play the particular class efficently. When you finished these tutorials, there is a "Training" Mode which enables you to sharpen your skills on bots. Training Mode also has several diffculties. TF2 has many gamemodes. Some examples are Capture the Flag, King of the Hill and Payload. Each gamemode has a certain objective and requires everyone in the team to contribute. Team Fortress 2 is one of those games that requires a lot of teamwork. If there is no teamwork, the team is unable to advance to the next point. A unique gamemode called Mann Vs Machine is when 6 players work as a team to prevent waves of invading robots deploying a bomb at a certain point. As you advance through, the waves of robots begin to get increasingly more diffcult. There is also a "Mann Up" version. This is the official version of Mann Vs Machine played on offical Valve Mann Up servers. In order to get into these servers, you would need to purchase a "Tour Of Duty Ticket". After you complete a mission , you earn a pile of loot which you get at the end when it is "Victory" Time. When you complete a Tour Of Duty, you would get normal weapons, Botkiller weapons, Killstreak Kit, an Australium Weapon and many more. TF2 has also many custom mod servers which consist of unoffical gamemodes. Some of these mods are TF2ware and Versus Saxton Hale. The best feature of Team Fortress 2 is that there is always update which contain new items, weapons,weapons changes, maps, gamemodes and THEY ARE ALL FREE OF CHARGE!!! This says when you go on Team Fortress 2, there is always new content to enjoy. TF2 also celebrates special events such as Halloween and particular maps change their looks to match the event. In these events, they are special event only items that you can acquire. Team Fortress 2 are just those games that get very hard to bored of. They can get so addicting that you would just play them all day. NOT TO FORGET, IT'S ALSO ABOUT THE HATS. TF2 is an absolute MASTERPIECE!!!!! I give this game overall 1,000,000,000/10!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
nice meme;-;Dis game 2 gud. u shuld get, install, nd pley. rate dis yes if it help u
Snipars;-;it's also k
Sprigglez;-;3000+ hours, please send help.
Poopman;-;This game......... I've lost family and friends to this game, its taken over my life, it's not just a game to me, its more than a obsession, its a drug, a way of life to me. I sold 1 of my kidneys, my body to science, shoes, clothes, worldy posessions just to feed my addiction to buy hats and weapons, ive gone so far as to morgage my house, not feed my children, miss countless days of work, FOR THIS GAME "father, we're hungry, these year old saltines hurt our tummies" "Sorry, but i really need this hat" The time i spend playing this game, i could be using to better my self, not just for me, but for the loved ones around me, but i keep getting pulled back into the same habits. Do i recommend this game? yes, i do. Do i recommend you neglect your family and friends, just to play this game? of couse I do. Do i recommend you give up your life like i have, down to my last 100$ and pack of top ramen, using newspapers as diapers, feeding off compliments that i get for my hats? I think you know the answer to that question. GET.THIS.GAME  Jk about all of that, its a pretty good game, i highly recommend it, get it "I dont want to spend the money" ITS FREE! or is that still to expensive for you?
jane doe;-;awesome dress-up game
Trixie | On Vacation;-;You can make Weeaboos scream in the mic 11/10
DragonLore;-;Gentlemen, This is a review.
MusicalEclipse;-;The best hat simulator around.
Troubleclick;-;I really don't like playing F2P games. That's probably because you must pay every time you want anything. Team Fortress 2 is not like all these pay 2 win games. It's really fun playing it and you don't need to spend 1000 $ per month to have fun from killing other players. For me - it's best Free 2 Play in the world. <3
WuT TeH SeaNBuD?!;-;Conga Fortress 2
therealKx3D;-;"I mean, it's ok... " -IGN 11/10
mooks.ppt;-;Because: hats!
Mattscreab;-;16:48 tried to join MVM Official Server - got kicked w/o reason 16:51 second atempt - got kicked because i had "bad hats" 16:56 got kicked w/o reason 17:08 got kicked because wearing gibus and gone writing this review 17:14 met the same guys on the first server (they still were on 2 wave) *butthurt intenstifies* Amazing game but i need moar hats
GibusMcNoob;-;-Use a fish to beat down a fat guy with a minigun -Set fire to a Frenchman, just to pull out mailbox and kill him -Oogle at hats -Play rock, paper, scissors... to the death -Smash a guitar over your foe -Use a little knife to kill the entire enemy team -Get lucky and shoot a big, glowing rocket that kills everything in sight -Stick an arrow in a doctor's stomach -Envelop the other team with a flurry of rainbows, and give them a lollipop to top it off -Turn a Frenchman into a fat Russian with the power of a cigarette -Shoot your teammate in the head with a crossbow to heal him -Eat a sandvich -Eat a chocolate bar -Eat a Steak -Run into enemy team, metal fists blazing -Throw  at people -Shoot  at people -*Successfully* waste your life What's not to love?
Meldorac;-;Will cause you to lose your money and social life, as well as respect for players wearing the ghostly gibus and/or pyrovision goggles. /Hats, would recommend Seriously though, this is the best first-person shooter and one of the best video games i've played. If you haven't played it yet, what are you reading this review for? Download and play it! IT'S FREE! Except for the hats. Now excuse me, i have to go and spend another 20 euros on keys.
Benny, the booty inspector;-;It's ok.
frank what is this?;-;Ruined my life since 2011. 11/10 would play again
Evidence;-;Pros : - Fast action - Many classes to play - You can choose if you want to be tactical or raw - Simple gameplay and friendly-user interface - Needs teamwork - Frequent updates, improving perfomance and adding new material - Free - Events - No Pay-to-Win - Strong Community - Nice cartoon-like graphics Cons : - It will drain your soul slowly and painfully, if you decide to play for serious.
Calzetines;-;Ok so I had this mad hat and through the fire and demos I ran into the capture point, because you know, that is what you do in doing the game playing of this game. You kill the annoying spies that kill the campers snipahs and avoid the pie-rews' flame. All in the days job. Tick tock. Time goes by and I relise havent eaten any food for 8 hours. Sleep. Eh, who needs it. I am really hungry though. A sandwich would be nice. *bonks head on monitor*. Maybe I should buy a new hat. Wait killstreak my Scottish Resistance. Oh em gee. Yes. Oh noes. Out of real world moneh. Gawgdanngit. I would say stay away from this game like the thing that you stay well away from but I am gonna say get on the point ya half wit! Ehhhalbeegit! Drunk +1 rekt mishun beguns in sexty seconds yoo
SOLID_VAPOUR;-;Took me a lot of will power & courage to get away from this game. It was eating away my social life. Now I feel like a relieved man. I'm thankful for every minute that passes now without this game. Getting away from alcohol and cigarrete would have been way easier. 10/10. Still in rehab. "New hats in town." . *Self-Control. Self-Control. Self-Control. Self-Control.* Self-Control? Sounds interesting.
fireballkatana (Max M);-;I recommend this game to anybody who has a letter from the alphabet in their name.
Ejruss25;-;This game has destroyed my life. I don't buy games anymore. All I want to buy is hats. I've spent countless dollars on this game. I have a serious problem. I just keep needing hats to fill the void. This game consumes your soul and replaces it with a rabid craving for earbuds and keys. Send help. 10/10 Would recommend to random hobos on the street
:);-;THAT HEAVY IS A SPY I'm not 12 and I still enjoy this hunk of a game 9/10 would bang. I would like to push forth with my in-game friend and capture the flag then return it to our home base to be rewarded with critical hits. If you haven't played this game for at least 500 hours you're probably a virgin in real life and I most likely hate you. Enjoy!
Vallinek;-;Team Fortress 2 is a FPS with cartoonish graphics and heavy reliance on teamwork. It used to be paid, but it went free to play in 2011. The graphics, despite being a bit old already, still look good and stylish. The maps are usually well-designed and interesting to look at. The gameplay stands out from your other FPS games for being very different than conventional shooters out there. You can pick from nine different classes: offensive (Scout, Soldier, Pyro), defensive (Demo, Heavy, Engineer) and support (Medic, Sniper, Spy), each with their own unique tools, style, strengths and weaknesses. This forces you to work with your teammates to cover each other's weakpoints and emerge victorious. There are two main gamemodes: PvP and MvM. The former has a lot of sub-modes, such as Payload, Control Points, Attack / Defense, King of the Hill, or Capture The Flag. The latter, on the other hand, pits a team of six players in a co-op tower defense mode against hordes of bloodthirsty robots, with the objective of preventing them from delivering a bomb to the end of the map. There is a lot of unlockable weapons, which allow you to customize and change your gameplay style, as well as a ton (and I mean a ton ) of cosmetic items, which serve no purpose besides looking cool. The music, while it can't be heard outside of main menu or promotional videos, is very good and fun to listen to even outside the game. Unfortunately, this game also has cons. Due to the amount of hats content, the game is very heavy, so computers that aren't brand-new might experience some performance issues. Also, due to it being free to play, pub servers are often filled with noobs who have no idea what they're doing, which can destroy your gaming experience considering the game is teamwork-reliant. Multiple Snipers and Spies is a common occurence. The community is also... well, not the worst, but one of the worst. Just a quick glance at the forums reveals a ton of unusual and Australium-toting "git gud" elitists who aren't very pleasant to talk to if you're new... or in general. However, that doesn't mean there aren't any people who are actually helpful towards newcomers. Overall, I highly recommend this game to everyone. FPS veterans however should be prepared for a drastically different experience.
MLAnonymous;-;Good afternoon, dear gentlemen and gentlewomen It is a pleasure to perceive that one such as yourself would partake in my review of this most splendorous game. I say this for it is the most honest and veritable truth. Quite close to the objective Idea of Truth, to estimate it properly. At first I held the opinion that Collective Fortification II was merely another dull, boring and uninteresting ludum of the general significance and craftsmanship as Summoning of Obligation. However, this was in advance of the actual attempt at undergoing the experience of Collective Fortification II, which is, in hindsight, presumptuous and bold. Contrary to whatever estimation I conferred to Collective Fortification II in the past before, mind you, partaking in the adventure that is Collective Fortification II, I must declare with due expertise that this ludum is marvelous! In this ludum one will find a most engaging experience worthy of eternal estimation in the irrefutable and absolute realm of Do Desire. Certainly, anyone who would claim that this ludum is not worthy of said realm would be a scoundrel, a fraud and a lout. Yes, the sheer dilly-dallying that is facilitated in this ludum is thus charming that one such as I, one who could be described as paresseux comme baise, would scribe a true pinnacle of summitous apexity in the latitudes of criticisms. And thus, at the decisive terminal of this criticism I would implore you, my venerable gentleman or gentlewoman, to amuse yourself with this ludum of exceptional excellence. Now, my treasured asinine, experience the wonder that is Collective Fortification II with your personal senses by embarking on the quest that is this ludum! Godspeed and have a good evening by now. Best regards, MLAnonymous
Sensei Slouch;-;teem futres too is gaem abut shot man w/ gun. wen shot gun bollit cums out of gun and kils man. 9 man u can play in teem futress too. gud gaem play w/ frends. teem futress too fun gaem shud play.
Gorror #VacationAgain;-;This review is very lengthy, as I have a lot to say about this game. So sit tight, you are in for a long ride. Let's get the verdict out of the way before getting to the real talk: I recommend this game. I have spent hundreds of hours and thousands of dollars on it. Is it worth playing? Yes. Is it worth investing your time for a deeper experience? Probably not. I already predict a lot of hate for this review, but I need to get it off my chest and explain the issues I have with this game. Once again those are my own opinions that a lot of people happen to share. It is completely fine if you want to argue against it, I will just ask you to be honest and less defensive because TF2 is in a critical state. First of all, I'd like to point out that I've spent 1780 hours, which might be low for some, high for others. I started playing in late 2009-early 2010 in intervals of several months between late 2010 and early 2012. I enjoyed this game a lot since it was a fresh change from the FPS games I used to play back in the days (CoD 2/4 or CS). It was extremely fun, and trust me, I do not regret a single minute I've spent on this game, before early 2014 at least. I'm not really the Shakespeare of game reviews, and English doesn't happen to be my first language, but I'll do my best to explain my points clearly. I'm going to spend some time explaining each major part (IMO) of TF2: Competitive, Trading, Community, and Updates. I - Competitive: Why do I want to list this subject first? Simply because this will be a quick talk: Competitive TF2 is basically the best place where you can fully enjoy TF2. The competitive community is mostly made of good and helpful people. You will play the game the way it should've been played, whether it's a lobby, pug or a UGC match. For my part, I didn't really want to get into UGC because unfortunately I was already getting into CS:GO and couldn't get the time to look for a team, even though I played pugs with and against silver/gold teams. II - Trading: We had the good part, now the not so good-decent part. Barely spent anytime there. I never got interested in it mainly because I'm not patient, and I can get the thing I need directly without spending 3 years working for a bigger backpack. Most of TF2 is usually into trading, whether they spend 1 hour a month or 23 hours a day in a trading website/server. The trading community is really mixed. It has good people in it, but it also has scammers and some self-centered losers. Yet, this is where I got to meet a lot of good friends, and where I've been amazed by a lot of idiots thinking they have the networth of the 1% in their inventory. At the current state of the game, according to many professional traders, unless you have some insane item, you won't make any profit. With all the useless hats added, the supply of cosmetics is insanely high, the demand is scattered and the value the currency holds keeps dropping, dragging everything down with it. In short, trade if you want, but watch out for scammers and sharks and stick with the good people. There aren't many, but they are out there. Trading would've been one of the strengths of TF2 if Valve and the heads of some communities didn't ruin it. III - Community: It's really mixed. You can find good people if you go to the right pubs, as well as s who will instantly kick you if you aren't a "friendly heavy" or "ruin the conga" or w/e. I wasn't lucky with Valve servers as well. Most of the times I played in those servers I was left with autistic meme spouters, 300 ping brazilians or  who will call you a tryhard if you simply try to play the game as intended. Some people also blame bronies or furries for making it worse. I honestly don't care about both, I had to witness a lot of pubs with regulars I've enjoyed playing with dying, and if there is something to blame it is not one of the game's communities such as the ones cited above, but rather the direction the game is currently taking. IV - Updates: The game is making a terrible turn. It went from a game that could've been a success in eSports to a casual cash-grabber made to attract more people into Steam. They keep on adding useless lore-breaking cosmetics aswell as useless weapons that keep on making the game worse. Many want Valve to add more weapons to the game - I don't. You have to understand that the point of unlocks are, or were to be very situational items and could also act as a costly alternative such as the Gunboats. Some weapons now are either completely useless such as the new grenade launcher or the Back Scatter or completely random such as the Base Jumper or the Tide Turner. Many people are complaining about EoTL for being one of the worst updates possible to the game. It was overhyped by you guys because you couldn't understand that this was the way Valve wants the game to be. Don't blame those who made EoTL, the ones to blame are those in charge of TF2. They had then to throw in a broken  game mode that seemed to be coded within a day, as well as a couple of useless weapons or taunts to calm the community down after the disaster.The sad part is that it worked. The game is now 8 years old and still a success for the wrong reasons; but how long is it going to last before more and more people get tired by the way Valve handles the game? Once again, most of these are based on my opinions as well as the opinions of others. I hope this might be useful for some. I had to write it to unleash the anger I had against the incompetent team supposed to replace the original developers. So go ahead, enjoy the game, play it as its fullest. If you've never played this game you are missing something, so do it now while it lasts. Thank you for your time.
miris iekspuse;-;4288 hours, help me ;__; i can't live w/o tf2 but its a  game
ady uri;-;TF2 is where I can throw a jar of  at someone and not get arrested for it. 10/10
Nanori;-;TF2 Is that unique type of FPS that rarely comes around, more of like a one of a kind, it's a extremely different type of FPS, instead of rehashing content like certain other series, TF2 mostly gets updated with brand new content a few times a month, or even hints to upcoming updates, which makes it ALOT more mysterious/fun, TF2 at it's core is a very balanced/simple several-gamemode game, with all the classes ranging from Scout all the way to Spy. They all show ALOT of personality, almost all of them unique, from the Insane Medic, all the way to the Baby Yelling heavy, It's modding community is VERY well known aswell. Sick of the default gamemodes?, Try some community ones such as Parkour Fortress, Zombie Fortress, Dodgeball, Prophunt, Hidden, Freak Fortress and so much more, "But what's the catch?" i hear you say?, None really, but there are some downsides such as some of it's community and some if not most competitive players that scream at you for bodyshotting them, or mocking you because you are a F2P, all in all TF2 is a one of a kind gem by Valve Go play it. It's good.
Cody*;-;Most addicting game since Runescape
Wario_16 Checking out update;-;Ah, tf2. Best game I've ever seen in my life. When I started playing tf2, I only played it for the gameplay. It was (and still is) real fun to play. But after some months, I discovered trading. The wonderful trading. After months of trading, I learned a lot about it. And now, I do it almost every day! It will always be my hobby. c: It's even a great way to earn money! :D I have to say, there aren't that much weapons. There are more cosmetics then weapons. I'm not really a fan of cosmetics, I prefer have weapons (that's why I almost have them all, except 5). And when there comes new items during an update, then that are only cosmetics/reskins of weapons/weapons in an other quality. For now the qualities that are coming more of: Strange and Collector's. Collector's is a new, and pretty expensive quality, but not really diffirent then the 'unique' quality. And Strange is a quality that counts kills/points/etc that you made with the weapon/misc that's in this quality. I'm a truly fan of Strange weapons, and I own 41 out of 120 (this is except Australiums, Botkillers and Festives, because that are 'just' reskins) Someday I'll buy the rest of them too :D Alright, I told pretty much I guess, and I hope this review was useful for you. Thanks for reading and enjoy playing tf2! - Wario_16, 2014.
Catt;-;Team Fortress 2 is a weird game, and it is not only a FPS game anymore. I would describe it more as a social hub for people to hang out. This game have two teams that are supposed to fight each other, but only in Team Fortress 2 with two people of the opposite team giving each other high fives, stop fighting during the game and walk around crouching, or dance together! There are nine classes divided into three groups; offense, defense and support. But Team Fortress 2 have changed so much since release that it does not really mean anything anymore. Pretty much every class can function as any of the three groups with the right loadout, but they are still very different from each other. You got a fast Scout with little health, and a slow Heavy with a lot of health, and anything inbetween that! There is no way you will not find a class you prefer sticking to. Valve never added a new class, but they added tons of weapons! Some of them are really silly (punch an enemy in the back to make him stop and laugh, a great way to get silly taunt kills!), while others generally are a big improvement over the stock weapons (like the Degreaser). However most of the weapons are very situational and I prefer the stock weapons. There are many game modes to play. Capture the point, capture the flag. Payload where you push a cart through the map while the other team try preventing you from doing it, and if you're a fan of tower defense, you will enjoy Mann Vs. Machine! You're a team of up to six people who are supposed to kill a huge army of robots before they move their bomb to your base. Some of them are small, others are big and really hurts, and others are big and runs fast. But what really makes this game mode different from the more traditional Team Fortress 2, is you can upgrade your weapons. Fire speed, damage, reload speed, damage resistances, running speed, jump speed and so on. It is really fun, and if you are lucky you can win a huge prize for completing a Tour! Cosmetic items are a huge deal for many people. Hats! There are so many hats in this game, and they are all so different. There is no way you are not going to find one you like and will wear and be proud to wear every time you play. Many of the cosmetics can also be painted into your favourite colour! Team Fortress 2 is free to play. Is it pay to win? No. All the weapons you see in the store, are weapons you can get simply by playing, or you can use items to craft the weapon you want. If you buy premium you will receive weapons faster, your backpack will be larger so you can keep more items, and you can trade with others. Trading is a good way to get the weapon you're looking for. It is a lot of fun! It is fun to play the actual game, or just hanging out with people ingame like you can not do in any other game. This is the game where you make friends! ^____^
Egg;-;Hats = Skill Going outside or spending less than 25 hours a day playing = F2P Being a  with other players and bragging about your expensive ugly hats = Pro If you have no money to waste on virtual crap, you suck at this game and should quit it forever. Shitbuckets recommended for a better gameplay.
Hay-wee;-;This game was the 2nd game I got when I first got steam. It is the best game and I am always laughing while playing. It may be an old game, but it's still my favorite. 10/10
FATHER OF FURRIES;-;(Insert your hat joke about TF2 here)
BLCK-Rec.;-;Team Fortress 2 is by far the most fun you can have online , a whole new micro universe of gaming experiences and endless possibilities. Basic info. Genre: Action Brief summary In Team Fortress 2, the player can choose to play as 9 different character classes, all of which feature a unique set of attributes, customizable weapons and special equipment, join a team of other players and either compete with an opposing team for a principal objective or cooperate with their teammates against an AI. Critical commentary | Essential value: Pros & Cons Pros: It's an examplatory multiplayer FPS game. It's F2P. The cartoon-like in-game graphics are cool. The soundtrack is really amazing. It's an excellent way to get socialised and to meet fellow gamers, since its community is gigantic and evergrowing. There are at least 2-3 major updates per year, including annual Halloween and Christmas events, and several bug fixes once in a while. It features 500+ well-made Steam Achievements. It provides the player with the ability to adapt the characters' loadouts to their personal combat preferences and capabilities by fully customizing them, as well as to dress their mercenaries with several cosmetic items. Thus, they are able to create an ideal combination of items that will maximize their potential. There are multiple types of game categories (including Capture the Flag, Control Point, King of the Hill, Payload etc), as well as various maps and levels, and as a result it's almost impossible for the player to get bored. Cons: It requires money in order to upgrade your account to premium, to buy most of the fancy, nonetheless useless and unnecessary, gear and, in general, to take part in the main economic system. At the beginning, it seems difficult and complicated due to the vast variety of weapons, equipment and cosmetic items, maps and locations. However, the more you play the game, the easier and the simpler it becomes. It may become extremely addictive. Scoreboard | Overall score: 95 out of 100 Analysis Total score Concept Story   Characters 9 out of 10 Technical execution Controls   Mechanics   Functionality   Menu & Options 20 out of 20 Presentation Artwork & Cinematics   In-game graphics   Music & Soundtrack   In-game audio 18 out of 20 Context Community   Developers 10 out of 10 Misc. Duration   Replayability   Special features 18 out of 20 Critical judgement General experience & impression   Amusement   Emotional stimulation   Essential value 20 out of 20 Update history March 21, 2015 Posted review. April 9, 2015 Renewed the review layout. April 11, 2015 Added a characterisation about the soundtrack. April 21, 2015 Added a characterisation about the graphics. April 22, 2015 Renewed the review layout. June 17, 2015 Renewed the review layout.
Skell*;-;The Second Fortress of Team is a roleplaying rpg. If you can see around this game's high price, I'm sure you'll be able to enjoy the stunning, photorealistic and colourful graphics this game gives. Based heavily on realism, Second Team Fortress is a very tough game to learn with all of the realistic gun mechanics. It improves on its strick mechanics by allowing the player get killstreaks after a certain number of kills. I give Call of Fortress 2 a Treyarch of an Activision.
Poi :);-;The best game ever
Radishboy;-;Whipped a 10 year old kid to death while dressed as Santa, then blew up his friend and didn't get arrested 10/10, It's alright.
ZombieTaco[];-;the economy is more stable than most real life countries...
kicking_cat;-;In this game helping your team (collect hats) is vital to ensure victory in the (tryhard) battle field full of (F2Ps) death and dispair (hats). With all 9 classes (9001 hats) to choose from, the gameplay (hat choice) will most definitely be different from the first time you played (wore a Gibus) as your skill (backpack value) goes up in the ranks of battle (unusuals) in this Free to Play (Free2Troll) funfest (Gabefest). I give it a dan outa dan.
Nik *BACKPACKING;-;A "must have" for every Steamuser!
Hydrogen Buns;-;It's alright.
Azary ~;-;This game is like Jumanji. Once play this game, you can be stuck in it for the next 26 years.
Pasta;-;a guy with a brony username got vote kicked off the server. 10/10
mostly nice;-;one of few games that has stood the test of time and been tended well by devlopers. maybe if everyone just abandonded this we'd get HL3 already though. I suppose Valves thinking on it is "well we have one successfull game still, why bother making another. We use to make games, now we just make money"
Sickologist;-;Turns bad people into trolls, and good people into raging alcoholics. 10/10
Essoplerck;-;I agree, This is the best Hat simulator ever!
pyon;-;you shoot people with hats.
Zytan Vinkol;-;Like Call of Duty: Bad Company 1776, but with hats.
Adam;-;Take a look at my hours played. Now, take a look at the hours of the countless other reviews on this game. Many are well over a thousand, yes? Take it as two things: this game is really fun and worth playing, and a warning about your inevitable future of wasting your life on this game like we did. 10/10.
Wolfy;-;Killed a Kid with a Frying Pan, Than Shot his friend in the Face 11/10
Akame;-;My money... :'(
Ivy "MooMoo";-;I actually like this game alot. Most people think of TF2 as a shooter game where all the players eventually get sucked into the world of hats and unusuals and strange weapons. That is very true. I've been addicted to collecting them since I started. Still don't have an unusual, but I just got my first professional killstreak weapon and I'm going to use only it for the rest of my life. :D
Foamy the Austrian Fear Machine;-;Team Fortress 2 is a great game for a wide variety of gamers: it has a diversity of fun and original characters, each with their own playstyle, and even within each class you can attune the items in your loadout to your preferences. The game combines competitiveness with silliness in a very balanced way; the characters insult their opponents upon killing them in such a facetious and amusing way they can barely even be considered offensive, and yet they can drive your mind nuts about that one scout that is just too fast for you, that spy that keeps sneaking past your offensive front or that soldier that lands on your head outta freakin' nowhere! What tops this all off, is the Domination/Revenge system which induces a sharp focus on killing tough opponents, granting great satisfaction whenever you get your revenge, or better, when you get to dominate that pesky little pain in the behind that keeps bugging you throughout the round! Pros: - Completely free to play; you can make it as expensive as you want, though - Original, witty and funny characters with GREAT voice acting - Silly, yet competitive in a very balanced way - Wide variety of playstyles to suit everyone's preferences - A LOT of different weapons, WHY CANT I HOLD ALL THESE WEAPONS - Weapon qualities that give specific properties (Strange weapons that count kills, strange parts that count other achievements with a weapon, killstreak kits with an increased showoff-level etc) keep the game interesting and always give you a target to play for - Great graphics and animations! Simplicity suits this game perfectly - HATS! HATS EVERYWHERE! - IT HAS THE CONGA. I LOVE THE CONGA! need I say more? Cons - too damn addicting! - votekick system bugs, which allows trolls and cheaters to throw off an entire game (luckily only happens seldomly) Overall rating: Solid 10/10 would hat again So if you're bored and looking for something cheap and fun to play: don't look any further - Try TF2! It's free, so you have nothing to lose (except for your free time once you start :D)
Money Crabbere ;);-;Probably the worst FPS of all time, where your chance of winning is decided by the amount of headwear one can use. And as the heavy's head is the biggest, he is obviously the most op class. Scout is a manifestation of post-marxism homosexual propaganda masked with a Boston accent to calm the Italians. Soldier does not only suffer from heavy mental retardation he is also a extremely nationalistic American, basically male Sarah Palin. The Demoman is a anti-stereotypical to the point that it becomes offensive, trying to detract from his african american origin as much as possible. The pyro is the gimp from Pulp fiction with a flamethrower, not only is that copyright infringement but also damaging the image of latex fetishists all around the world. The sniper is the most incorrect character since 1. He is not a kangaroo and 2. He isn't upside down. The Medic is a nazi. The heavy is a false display of an incredibly overweight Putin with an insuffurable amount of brain cells. The spy is a meek attempt at poking at the french which fails by him not actually being offensive at all. 10/10 best game ever.
Kythan;-;There are two things you need to know about Team Fortress Dos 1.) No hats = no skill 2.) DONT KILL THE FRIENDLY SANDVICH HOOVY!!!!!!!!!!! 10/10 great platforming
Metatron;-;This game is fascinating. I remember I tried playing it a year ago but I sucked , so I gave up on it, even though I played for about fifteen minutes. I tried it again this year, because I read the reviews and everyone seemed so fascinated, claiming the game ruined your life because it completely consumed you, some people going as far as saying that something as simple as the whole hats deal was addictive. I'd laugh it off, thinking "It can't be that bad". After almost two months of playing, I can confirm; yeah, it's that bad. Perhaps worse. The first few weeks the liking was soft, I liked the game, the "Meet the" videos were amusing and really drew me to the game, but I was extremely bad at first, "15 kills, 10 deaths" type of bad. I dominated just one player every two rounds; and I even got really excited when I got a revenge (Jesus, it's embarrassing to admit). That's how bad, and even n00by I was. I was coming back to online PC gaming after six years of sticking to console, so that wasn't helping. But then, when I started playing a little bit more... when it was a domination after domination, when I'd become friends with my pocket Medics or the people I was a pocket Medic to... Life changed. This game literally consumed me. I wanted to use a portion of my birthday money to buy myself some cosmetics *just* for my Medic, make him beautiful ya'kno, and I ended up spending all of it in cosmetics for many of the classes. I'd stay up extremely late at night playing, sleep little, to then wake up early to play again. Now it's gotten to the point in which I've played 12 hours straight of TF2 with little rest in-between, two days ago it was *fourteen* hours. With a lot of effort I got up my  to work out today just to not be too sedentary, and it was exasperating because I wanted to play. The game's just special like that, ya'know? It's fun. It's unique, creative. And I love the small details like the angry faces the classes make when they're shooting or fighting, the happy faces on the partner-taunts, the faces of agony when they're with low health; details like that make it special. And it's just generally very addictive. My point? This game is f*cking terrible. I don't give a cr*p if it's free, DON'T INSTALL IT. IT WILL CONSUME YOU AND RUIN YOU. F*CKING RUN. RUN WHILE YOU STILL CAN!!!!!!!! (I still recommend it, though. Just because you'll have a lot of fun) Now, if you'll excuse me, I'll get back to playing.
Kaneki Ken;-;Team Fortress 2 is definitely one of the best FPS ever made; This does nothing but confirm the supremacy of Valve Software for this sort. Although many people think that the lack of interactivity and respect of physics in the game can be a big flaw, ultimately would prove to be an important aspect for all gamers who want to have fun without too much energy
Broconut;-;Easily, and I mean this, easily, the best comedic FPS there is on steam. You can play from a hyped Scout kid that seems like he's on coke, a dumb in the head soldier, a crazed Pyro who thinks burning people is like spitting rainbows at fairies, a drunken demoman, an adorable yet horrifying heavy, a chill engineer who drinks on the job, a crazy headed medic who does live surgery, a professional sniper, and a classy spy who gets the job done. Point is, this game is very well developed and has had a lot of effort put into it. Though there are only 9 characters, there are hundreds of weapons that you can use too. Once you get further into the game its more addiction and entertaining, in the start it may seem boring but you just have to get a bit further into the game. You may be thinking "How do you get far into a game without a Story..!?" well, I meant once you get more items and learn about the game. You can play many different game modes, lots of community made game modes on the community servers, and trade servers. Theres payload race, control points, Intel missions, prop hunt, death run, and many more missions. All this for a free to play game?! GET IT
Kutar FOX;-;PROS: - Hats. - Free to play. - Strong community. - Graphics and caricatures. - Bunch of user-generated contents. - Lifetime support and updates confirmed (it is Valve.) CONS: - Hats (sick of them.) - Lack of tribute to id and Quake. - More players means inevitably more kids and toxic players, too (statistically speaking.) Final Remarks: I pre-ordered The Orange Box back in 2007 and I have watched from the start how Team Fortress 2 (TF2) evolved into something perpetual thingy and Valve's flagship of their both economically and experimentally successful multiplayer game (now of course DotA2 and CS:GO have risen to stand along and they all pretty much surpassed it.) Do you realize how monumental this game was (and seemingly still is) to gamers and even to Valve themselves? Steam Achievement and later drop system along with hats were first introduced for TF2. I remember when hat phenomenon was all over the place and everyone wanted Fancy Fedora so much. Here is one fun story about the game; A guy from SourceOP known as Drunken F00l got VAC-banned for making idling tool for TF2 and for cheating an event item known as Golden Wrench. Including him, people who used idling tool got their hats and items taken away meanwhile all other active TF2 players were awarded with Halo hats for not using the tool. But after sometime the ban on the SourceOP guy was lifted and he officially started working at Valve for his TF2 Backpack and something more. Well, that guy had talent and Valve definitely knew about it so they decided to hire him in spite of all violations of user agreements as a Steam user. It reminds me of the FBI hiring a genius financial fraudster and there is even a movie about it. So much drama over TF2, aye? You see, this game just has so many interesting stories to tell. When TF2 switched to F2P model, the community even got bigger and stronger than ever before and it is still growing even after many years have passed. All official updates and endless user-created contents enrich the game; more drops, more hats, more weapons, more maps, more Halloween and holiday events, more updates, more everything, and now skins just like in CS:GO; OMG VOLVO. And its market is being sustained on its own economy. Quite amazing. I personally no longer play this game anymore because I already played enough of it, but it is easily understandable why this game is still one of the most played games on Steam. . RECOMMENDED .
Noir PSi -ea-;-;Alright, little boys and girls of Steam. Gather 'round the campfire and let 'ol PSi tell you a story. It all began back in 2011, when I was but a young lad. One day, I heard multiple people discussing the game Team Fortress 2. At the time, what I heard was beyond belief. A game where I could ruthlessly murder the friends I didn't have WITH the friends I didn't have? Sign me up! Now at the time, my pockets were filled with nothing but air , lint, and broken dreams, so I was delighted to hear that this experience was being offered to me for the low, low price of absolutely nothing. Once the lengthy download was complete, I wasted no time learning the ins and outs of the game. I practiced for quite some time against bots, and once I felt I was ready to get murdered in style , I ventured out into servers filled with actual people, all of them hellbent on killing each other. My response? I simply picked up a sniper rifle, flashed a murderous grin, and uttered beneath my breath "Let's. Freakin'. Go." I then proceeded to get shot in the face 50 times before registering my first kill. Over the next 3 years, I was whisked away on a thrill ride that featured pyromania, robots, weapon nerfs, comics, bakery goods, and of course, hats. By this time I've spent well over 400 hours of my "life" playing the game and making my teammates angry by failing to snipe stationary Heavies. 3 long years without a single regret. What's that? You kids wanna experience what 'ol PSi's been through? Well I'm not stopping ya. Just head down to the Steam store, search for Team Fortress 2, and give it a download. You've got nothing to lose but countless hours of your precious little lives.
Royale;-;A great fun and addicitive game filled with hats, yes hats and not just hats but awesome ones to be exact. With so much offers in the store you're sure to find the right hat attire for you at a low price or even a high one. Besides the hats, in all seriousness here. Team Fortress 2 is a hilarious game to play and waste good time with and one that will keep you coming back for more. It may be the hats, or the weapons or both. Overall I give this game a 10 out of 10. Well time and money spent.
N9 Goomba;-;How to play Team Fortress 2: Be polite, Be efficient, Have a pan to kill everyone you meet.
Seddik [DZ];-;tf2 FTW!
Blake;-;Even 7 years after it's release, Team Fortess 2 still remains the best hat simulator out there.
Jetpacko;-;Game is fun and easy going. Lots of playable characters to choose from and they are all different in abilities. I like to play as support class and I am very happy that three support class characters are so different and so I can do different things while still playing support! There are so many different maps to choose from to play in that I am sure everyone would like at last one they enjoy. Lots and lots of fun and really good game that I can't believe is free. I have had to pay for games that were not as good as Team Fortress 2! I was not sure if I would give thumbs up or not because while the game is really good, I don't think player base is good. Maybe I have had bad luck but I have run in to very rude people that did not make the game feel like fun. This game is very fun when playing with friends but going to random server always ended to me with being thrown rude comments at. Comments about me being bad at game I could take because I have played so little that I can not compare to veterans but I think that does not need foul language or people calling me with rude names and going to personal stuff. I had to see others be treated rude too and rudest comments were always given to people who play offense. I recommend the game but I do not recommend the community.
MajorDirtymcnasty;-;I Giggled Suprise! https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fqyjOc3EpT4 69/69 Would  Again!.
Siniver;-;This jewish game took 3,5k hours of my life and about 500$ from my wallet. higly recomended
Mana Banana;-;TERRORISTS WIN
kaelan;-;This is the single most entertaining online FPS on the market right now. Team Fortress 2 is a free-to-play online class-based first person shooter which pits two teams of nine classes against each other in various game modes and challenges. Players can unlock weapons and cosmetic items by completing achievements or winning them through death (though this is random and has a limit which is reset each week). While some bonus weapons are borderline direct upgrades, the unfortunate Scout is still extremely powerful with his stock weaponry, for example. These extra weapons are more comparable to VARIATIONS than upgrades - most of them are designed as side-grades. The only example I can think that is really overpowered is the Medic's bersaw, but why the hell would you get close to a Medic anyway? His normal Bonesaw can tear you to shreds just as easily, if not EASIER . My point is that unlike other free-to-play games, you can have plenty of variety and do just as well as a similarly-skilled player with your normal or bonus weapons. Let's talk about the classes: there are 9 in total, with at least 3 weapons each. They are divided by 3 groups, the Offense, the Defense and the Support. But these groups are useless labels. I'll play by Valve's rules, though. Let's see... On the Offense, we have the Scout: the fast-as-crap, annoying wad who can kill you easily while up close. He can also double-jump! Meanwhile, he's borderline useless at long range. Next up, the Soldier: he has a rocket launcher. The rockets' damage degrade over distance, so long-range spamming isn't a huge deal. He is slow as  on his own, but since he can rocket jump, he is literally one of the most mobile classes in the game. Lastly, the Pyro: he burns you. A lot. He also can extinguish friendlies on fire with his flamethrower's compression blast, which is ALSO USEFUL TO REFLECT ENEMY PROJECTILES (not including bullets, of course). This is a huge feature that makes the Pyro really stand out. Educate yourself on the Pyro and he's far more useful than just his job of burning enemy spies. Let's check out the Defense. First off, we have the Demoman. As his name suggests, he is a demolitions man, and he can blow  up easily. He has a grenade launcher and a stickybomb launcher, and the latter needs to have it's projectiles blown up on-demand. He can have 8 sticky grenades (or "stickies") active at once. This class is really good at defending an area and blowing up buildings by the Engineer. Before the hardhat, we have the big tub of russian meat called the Heavy: he has a minigun which WILL tear you a new one up close. Boasting the largest default health pool in the game, he is a force to be reckoned with. However, by himself, just like anyone else, he is pretty useless. So don't get too confident. Now we have the Engineer, one of the most unique classes in this game. Aside from his Shotgun + Pistol, he has a Wrench and 2 PDAs for construction and destruction, respectively. He can build a Sentry Gun, a Dispenser and a Teleport Entrance/Exit. They all can be upgraded up to Level 3, which improves their peformance. Finally we have the Support classes. This is probably the least misleading label, because they ARE support classes, therefore, YOU DON'T NEED A MILLION OF THEM AT ONCE. Let's start with my favourite class, the Medic: Hohoho boy, seen as a pansy man of medicine, he has a syringe gun which can really hurt a careless someone and a bonesaw which REALLY hurts too. His greatest power however is the Medigun; with it, the Medic can heal a person up to 150% of their health, and once his Ubercharge meter is filled, he can turn himself and his healing target invincible for 8 seconds. He can also heal two targets quickly while deploying his Ubercharge to have them both invincible aswell, but the duration of the Uber will be decreased to 5 seconds. If you're even FASTER, you can have 3 people on godmode too!! But it'll be over so soon that it's not worth it. Now we have the Sniper: as his name suggests, he has a Sniper Rifle, the only stock weapon in the game that can Headshot people. I don't have much to say about this one. Just have good judgment, PLEASE. This class is nearly useless in some situations - if the situation demands it, swap. There are just too many sniper teams that lose so easily to teams with varied classes. Another overused class is the Spy, also a very unique character: He can cloak, aswell as backstab people with his knife for a guaranteed instant kill, given they aren't Ubercharged by the default Medigun. He also has a Sapper, which disables Engineer buildings and after a while they blow up. When used correctly and sparsely, he is an EXTREMELY dangerous fellow. Again, solo judgment please: if you already have more than two of these in your team (in normal 12x12 games), don't switch to a Spy. That takes care of the classes. What about the maps?! Oh good lord, there are so many official and custom maps that it'd be impossible to describe them all. There are quite a few official modes aswell: Control Points (CP), Payload (PL), King of the Hill (KOTH), Capture the Flag (CTF), Special Delivery (SD), Payload Race (PLR) and Mann vs Machine (MVM) In CP, it depends. There are Attack/Defense maps, which has BLU attacking the RED control points, and there are 5CP maps, in which both teams need to be in control of all of the control points to win. In Payload, the BLU team needs to push a railed cart into the RED base to win. Of course, RED needs to stop them. In King of the Hill, you have a central point which needs to be captured by one team and held for 3 total minutes. It's pretty much the same as KOTH in other games. In Capture the Flag, the team needs to go get the enemy's briefcase and bring it to their briefcase's spawn point. It's the same as every other CTF game, but the flags are briefcases and their returns are timed - you can't grab your own briefcase to return it. Special Delivery is a 1-point CTF mode, where one team needs to go get the briefcase somewhere in the central edges of the map and bring it to the opposite central edge. Like in normal CTF, the return is timed, and only one team can have control of the briefcase at a time. Payload Race is an absurd one. Both teams need to push their own cart while stopping the enemy from pushing THEIR cart. It gets pretty crazy and it's quite fun. In Mann VS Machine, you have one team against an army of ROBOTS based on the classes (and a Tank). They come in waves and it's the only mode where you can upgrade your weapons and have a special canteen to hold bonuses. There are custom game modes aswell, such as WarioWare Minigames, Surf, 1v1 MGE Training, Team Deathmatch, vs Saxton Hale (A Juggernaut/"1 versus Everyone else" mode) etc. Once you've gotten pretty good at the game, you can try out competitive TF2, where you'll learn a much higher degree of teamwork, coordination and combat in comparison to normal public servers! And the weapons? Good lord, there are so many that I'd lose count. Let's leave them as a surprise, yes? My only nitpick with this game is it's... optimization. It's not that well optimized. At all, actually. This is due to the over-abundance of updates since the last 4 years, but luckily, you can get custom configuration files to fix this problem somewhat. I've also heard if your game gets cluttered with custom content, you can reinstall it for a fresh new start and have the game running amazingly, but I have never tried it. Sounds like fun? I'm sure it does, and it gets better when you start playing. So, what are you waiting for?! Some final words? A numerical value?? SEVERAL ONES, MAYBE?? Fine, but I'll get you just one! Here's your damn score: TF2 gets a score of 9/10. It's extremely fun and it never gets old. It IS counter-intuitive at first, but when you get used to it, it's awesome!
Shibby2142;-;I heard this game was cool. Probably will check it out sometime eventually.
Sarah;-;Spies, everywhere.
Kazfish;-;Not enough hats
Steve5451;-;I played it a little, it's okay.
Dr. Nexus;-;Awesome game. Get your hat and get playing.
brule #beach!!;-;I'm new to "gaming," and TF2 is a fantastic venue for me to learn hand/eye coordination, coordination with team members, FPS tactics, and I can choose a different class depending on what I want to improve. Plus, it's hilarious, I've met some great people, and does NOT take itself too seriously. Thank you, Valve, for keeping this around for new players!
[DFS] TheWoodenDoor;-;TF2 2007: Alright new game, about war, this is nice! TF2 Now: HATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSNEWTAUNTHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATS
Lucky;-;TF2 is a free FPS by Valve. It is fun to play and it FREE is if you havent played it try it and if you dont like it all you have done is lose time rather than money. There is NEVER a time when I have not been able to join a game (after it had searched the servers). I never lag unless im downloading something while playing. If you like it all you have to do is spend as little as 0.03 in the steam market or buy something from the Mann Co store and you will be premium. (I also belive you can trade with a premium player and you can get premium). Sometimes it can be really annoying when the other team spawn traps or when a spy instakills you alot but apart from that the game is REGULARLY bug checked and there is NO HACKING unless your on a un VAC secured server.... Great game 9/10 pitty some of the items in the store are really OVER PRICED, and occasionally you into a "TF2 Proh" who thinks their "owsum" and your a ""
+ Youth Of Freedom +;-;GAMEPLAY : 10/10 Team Fotress 2 is an critically acclaim shooter that takes some of its formular from a fast-paced games such as Quake & Unreal Tournament. It is considered to be one of the best free 2 play games ever made next to Dota 2. Did i not mentioned that these two games is published by Valve ? Yup anything that Valve made is a masterpiece. The game had a total of nine classes. Ranging from sniper,demoman,scout,heavy,engineer,soldier,pyro,medic & spy. Each of the classes had their own role and different play style. Each of the classes had their own charming personality and likeable characteristics. You can also taunt to kill your enemy if you are lucky. The games provide a massive tons of modes and it rare to see in a first person shooter game. Just look at these list : http://wiki.teamfortress.com/wiki/List_of_game_modes You get numerous weapon,different parts of outfits as you play through many matches. There is also a crafting system where you combined different parts of weapon & scrap to obtained a much more powerful weapon. Each of the weapon provides different types of ability & stats. Most of it have their own pros & cons. The game requires a lot of teamwork sometimes depending on what modes you are playing. Also medic + heavy = OWNAGE. GRAPHICS : 10/10 For a game that come out in 2007,it age extremely well and still to these days the cartoonish artstyle impress me a lot. A lot of the texture are well details as well as the character models. Each of the maps provide different variety of background & well thought out level design. The animations perform from each character are well done and doesn't look like crap. This game also have blood & gore in it too and it is pretty well detailed too. AUDIO : 10/10 The soundtrack for this game is superb especially the main theme songs. All of them are done in an orchestral theme. While they don't go for a realistic sound effects since it doesn't fit in with the game theme,they go for a much more funny approach in making all of sound effects that really blend in with the feels of the games. The voice acting for each of the classes is excellent ( except for pyro cause he mostly mumble random stuff ). Each of them have their own unique taunts & quote. LONG-LASTING APPEAL : 10/10 This games provides more modes than any first person shooter game does along with an on-going update with every 2-3 weeks or so. There is a huge amount of items you collect during your gameplay sessions. Not to mentioned there is a bunch of custom map that you download & play on. It even much more fun if you have friends to play with you adding a ton of enjoyment into the game. You will never get bored with each of the class since there is always a challenge when dealing with certain type of situation. Not to mentioned the amount of achievement you can get just by playing the game is huge so this will keep you busy for a long times. FINAL VERDICT : 10/10 Really recommended for everyone especially to those who are not a fan of first person shooter game. Every game that Valve made have their own special moments,innovative gameplay & unique style. A truly masterpiece of arts. GRADE : S ( Masterpiece )
Jarr;-;Absolutely awesome game! A great range of classes to choose from. Scout is a fast running class that is mostely used for doing the map objective (capture the flag, pushing cart) and just generally annoying people. Soldier is a slow moving class armed with a rocket launcer, a shotgun, and a entrenching tool (shovel) soldier is one of the main damage dealers in team fortress 2. The Pyro is a masked psycho armed with a flame thrower, a shotgun, and a fire axe. Pyro is again a main damage dealer but instead he/she uses his/hers flame thrower to burn enemies alive. The Demolitions Man (demo man) is much like the soldier with explosive weapons instead a grenade launcher, a sticky bomb launcher (manually exploded bombs that stick to walls etc) and a bottle! The demoman is a main damage dealer aswell but used as a defence class because of his sticky bomb launcher to make traps he is also very drunk! xD. The Heavy weapons guy is as you guess, a guy with big  weapons! he carries a minigun, a shotgun and uses his fists to punch people! Heavy is the God of damage dealing, he can kill all the other classes quite easily, but be careful! Heavy is a very slow class and is quite vulnerable to take damage from behind! The engineer. The engineer is a defence class that creates Sentry guns to defend, he can upgrade his sentry 3 times. level 1 being a normal sentry, level 2 being two chainguns on the side and level 3 with a rocket launcher on the top! The medic is the support class healing his teammates who are in need of help, the medic is the second fastest class in team fortress 2 he also has a thing called Uber charge, which is you and the person you're healing have a few seconds of invulnerability. The sniper is a long ranged Damage dealer he uses a powerful Sniper rifle, a SMG and a machete the sniper can take out most classes in a quickshot however you can keep scoped in to fill a meter which makes your shots more powerful, when this meter is full you can take out a heavy in one shot in the head! The spy is a very different class... The silent assassin, the spy carries a revolver, a knife and a electro-sapper the electro-sapper is used for destroying enemy engineer's sentry guns although the engineer can destroy these sappers that doesn't mean that you can't backstab him! an important role in the spy is to backstab people with your knife to instantly kill your target the spy has the ability to make himself temporarily invisible and has the ability to disguise as the enemy team to fool them! That is all the classes in team fotress 2! I hope this review was helpful and i hope to see you on a server! Good bye -Jarhead
ceubie;-;Teem Fartdress 2 is gaem aboot hets. hets with war sometiems. dere ar 9 clesses in dis gaem, an i shell list dem hear: trout: spout is cless dat runn fest an kan jump not wonce, butt twice in da air so he is vary manooveruuble. he youuses a splattergun dat at closet range kill thing easy so is liek kalled a meetsheet. use da baby feces blastur for dem MLG mooves. soludur: someteims kalled sollie, soldir is klass that has big wocket lawn chair to kill other teem. rokets ar be good cuz dey r powderfull an can juggle peole so soldie is also klown. yoo cen also racket jamp tu greet hites an moobe arund da mep rely rely fest, so bee shure too go MLG racket jamp on da hi tower wiff ur meerkat gardnur. use da beggir's bazookajoe bubblegum launchawir to be eben MOAR MLG! asbestos suit guy: he sux dont pley her. kan refleckts rockests and udder tings but still sux demon man: he is one i, blak, scootish, dronk an has a gwenade lawn chair dat maek the sillder luk bad. da ebinman is liek da best clause in da gaem cus if u don think so u be racing or sumting idk. he also can use sword, and shield butt dont use da sheidl called the time turder cuz da tide churner ruins gaems go away tide detergent users. pls ban. also stick bomb lauwncher still OP. hevy: he fat, russkie, and has a minigun. scince he is russia, he shuld be playin dota not eating sammiches. eggsnear: man from texas, he build big big scawry gun dat has aimboot instelled so u jus has to relazx on ur chair an drinek bear wheil ur aimbutt does all da work. alsu if u use da gunswinger ur a kunt an shuld uninstall u ar scum. snipper: if yoo liek call em dirty, dan dis klass is for you. u kan 360 noescope an twrick shot but bee carful if u kill somene and u didnt get da head u r bad apparently but i tells dem to get gud and u shuld too. medick: german doktur dat has beem to heel your mates an kan maek dim shiny color and godmode. spy: also suk so stay away frum dis dirty franceman. also dere are many hat, so many hat is hard to count. hat is best class and if you dont have a hat you arr bad. go hear for moor revew: http://steamcommunity.com/groups/ceubiesreviews
Skronic | trade.tf;-;-TF2 removed by for being too confusing for new players -Got killed by a minisentry -Lost all my money and my house for playing spycrab -Traded my wife for scrap each -Praying to Gaben for a new update -Got a Gibus -BURN IT WITH FIREEE -Got a pyrovision -Was better than expected -Got an unusual -Died of a heart infart because got an unusual 11/10 Would waste life again, was ok ~IGN
SolarLight;-;TEAM FORTRESS 2 IS A PRIME EXAMPLE OF A SCRUB-REKING SIMULATOR (   ) MY FAVOURITE PASSTIME IS TO GO AWP SNIPER AND COMPLETELY WRECK ALL THE HARDSCOPERS I COME ACROSS LIKE THIS ONE TIME I DID A 2160 NOSCOPE AIRSHOT ON SOME CHEEKY MUG LMAO HE RAGEQUIT TOO I ALSO FIND ENJOYMENT IN LIME COSMETICS AND TEXTBINDS. MY FAVOURITES ARE AS FOLLOWS "meatshot 8)" "GET REKT U BOOB" "oy m8, get scatterscoped (   )" "scout is a difficult class and that kill took skill" "lol that kill's going in the frag video m8 (   )" despite it not being as ing masterful as call of duty, this game is still a quality experience for mlg players like me gr8 b8 m8 i r8 8/8
$layer #newmouse;-;Awesome game! Been playing for like 3 years now. Great trading and competitive community. Took me 50+ hours to get decent enough to like the game. Enjoy it! Best free game by far of all time!
Leafy;-;At first you'll join for the fact that it's free to play sandbox shooter..... But once you get in....... THE HATS YOU CANNOT ESCAPE THE HATS THEY ARE UNDYING, SEARCHING FOR SUCCULENT BALD HEADS TO SIT UPON NO HOPE TURN BACK NOW BEFORE THEY GET TO YOU NEXT YOU'LL BE HUNGERING FOR UNUSUALS IN NO TIME BUT LITTLE DO YOU KNOW THEY'VE ALREADY GOTTEN TO YOU YOU'RE WEARING A GIBUS RIGHT NOW IT'S THE STIMULATION OF MADNESS WELCOME TO HAT HELL, PAL. YOU'RE NEVER LEAVING, EVER. Hat Simulator 2014 10/10
Rock;-;You can say pootis!
BenZ;-;The most fun you can have online!
Styrk;-;This game ruined my social life, wallet and basicly everything else. . 10/10
Klink264;-;I have to say. VALVE YOU ARE SO AWESOME YOU DID A WONDERFUL JOB!!! This game has to be one of the best games I've ever played. It's just one of those games you don't play once and then give up forever. It's one of those games where you play it the first time and it just gets so addicting. I have to say this is one of Valve's greatest creations. From all the different classes, to the 9ish different game modes this game is a work of art that everyone deserves to see. I also am a fan of the gamemode, mann vs machine. It's something unique that I have seen in some other games, but all the other stuff added makes of for it. I guess the only downside of the game, is that the game is rated M and I'm not really a fan of blood. I did find a youtube video that lets you put in the code to turn off the blood however. I give this game a 99/100 for a new unique game that everyone deserves to play.
[Lazy] CABER;-;I joined a payload server, and stepped out of spawn, playing as medic. Two scouts lept over the nearby hill and starting beating me with fish, and I ran up to the nearest teammate I could find, and the scouts left. Two minutes later, I have full Ubercharge, find the same teammate, kritz him, and he's a spy and he shoots me in the face, then dances on my corpse. Then he got blown up by a random crit sticky. 10/10 would spend too much of my ing money on hats again
ZERO-RDX1;-;played it for a few hours, its alright
Terres;-;I heard so many reviews a time ago about TF2, in fact, since then and I'm looking forward to trying this game someday. And now I'm really surprised. Absolutely perfect and very enjoyable game. 10/10
Prim3 | trade.tf;-;My main source of income - 2012.
tanker;-;ruined my life
D3411;-;Hit the 1000 hour mark, lets do this. This game is great. The community isn't so bad yet there are some cheeky skrubs out dere tat test mai mlg 420 Blaze It skillz. A lot you can do in the game such as.. -Extinguish teammates with flameable gas -Wack a French guy with a pan -Hit yourself with a bat causing you to bleed -Dance -I TELEPORTED BREAD -Wear a gibus and a pair of pyrovision goggles and get called "noob" while you laff all tim as u 360 no scope dem cheeky skrubs This game is unique cause of the many characters and personalites. As well as that, the gameplay is quite fun and not like any other. That's it for mai revoove, kthxbai for reeeding n wast u tim. kthxbai D3411, 3+4+1+1 = 9, 9 = 3 squared, Illuminati has 3 sides, illoominarty comfurmed.
Dagothversur[FaZe][MLG];-;Valve, no more free tickets on christmas please
Perducci;-;I've put more hours into Team Fortress 2 than any other game I've ever played. And yet I can still pick up the game and have fun to this day. It's become the standard for online multplayer FPS games for me, and it's going to be hard to ever find a game that comes close to matching it.
22nd Sentry Gentleman;-;Radically different from the going FPS standard. A gem gameplay wise. It's free, there's no excuse not to give it a try. That was the short version. If that didn't convince you yet, move along. The mechanics the 9 playable classes are based on are remarkably creative and pretty unique: While one class is able to perform a Mario-style doublejump, another can literally blow back enemy missiles at their rightful owners' faces, and then there's a soldier whose playstyle revolves around surfing on exploding rockets' knockback - just to graze a third of the available characters. The variety in gameplay is still increased by unlockable gear for each of them. And believe me, whether you're going to fight your foes with a pistol or a glass of milk DOES make a difference. Talking about unlocks, a widespread disease of free to play games with unlockable content are those being "pay to win" options - not in Team Fortress 2. Owning more items than yor foe will not ensure you an advantage; either all their upsides are balanced by negative side-effects or they are purely cosmetic. This makes the game very beginner friendly because it prevents new players from being straight-down outgunned (additionally all of the gameplay-relevant stuff is easily obtainable for everyone; you recieve a free item every ~40 minutes of playtime) while it also allows advanced players to customize their characters to both, visually and gameplay-wise, better meet their taste. Combat itself too breaks away from the norm in many (positive) ways. There's a static health pool instead of the genre-established regenerative system, and although revolving around mid-ranged combat, this game shows a complete lack of assault-rifles of any kind. I guess the most noticable difference to other games of the multiplayer-FPS-genre though is that confrontations between players typically last significantly longer, with fights designed around the recieving party nearly always having a chance to react - which is something I greatly appreciate, for that's what I personally feel titles like Call of Duty are lacking. There's only few negative things to mention about the gameplay mechanics; minor annoyances such as the 'randomness' damage-modifier and an at times wonky melee hit registration (though, that's a flaw shared by literally every multiplayer game there is) are just that: Minor annoyances. Eventually they don't spoil your overall expirience. Although 7 years old, the game still is steadily growing and updated regularily, with bug fixes, balance patches, new maps, items and game-modes being released every month or two, ensuring you won't end up bored. So, to recap: Whether you are casually or competitively motivated, whether you like proving your skill against other players, or prefer fighting alongside them against hordes of robots, whether you like stealth, traps, mobility-based combat, or sniping, whether you want to beat your foes by setting up turrets or slapping them with fish, you _will_ find something to enjoy in this game. And yeah. The only thing it costs you is the time it takes to download. 9.5/10, would will play again.
Silly;-;I guess it's worth a few hours.
Emishly;-;i get to set people on fire and watch them throw  on themselves to put it out 10/10
Polaroid;-;Credit Card Simulator 2015
Gilgamesh - A great loss Iwata;-;Oh TF2, oh TF2.. We've come a long way, but everything will end eventually, no matter how fun it was. If you are looking for the game's details, read the positive reviews, I will have a little rant here. A few years ago I found this game through the famous "meet the series", after I started playing I was instantly hooked by the amazing variety of gameplay, even though I do not play anymore do to the reason I will give below I am still active in the community, some of you might know as Gilgamesh from OpenGriefing. The game: With the nine classes and huge amount of weapons that come with it TF2 is a game which you can play for days, even months! Each class has their own individual role which is completely unique to it, you can play in all sort of ways, and there is so much to do it rarely feels repeditive. The community is nice, and although most do not appreciate the sight of a new player, there is still a huge amount of nice people. I my self have taught 4 players on how to play TF2 whom I personally don't even know, and I had great fun in doing so, and there more people out there that do the same. The game has a series of cosmedic items which add a lot of life and color into it. You can dress the big muscle guy called the heavy with his huge machine gun up with a fairy custom, or you can turn the German doctor called the Medic into a WW2 German infantryman of the battle of Stalingrad, these are two examples of thousands of possibilities. There are many game modes and dozens of maps for each, which let you play the game for an unbelievable amount of time with out getting bored once. These are just the official maps. There are tens-of-thousands of community maps which also enhance the gaming experience. The community: TF2 is a very old game, yet it is one of the most played multiplayer games even today. The community is very committed and it was the community that made the game what it is today. Valve kept the game fresh by releasing updates that always added more content with which you could play with your friends and have loads of fun. With that being said, here comes the problem: As I said, TF2 has a very committed and loyal community even though the game is from today's standards as old as the bread crumbs that are left in a toaster that one day have the fortune of being vaporized, leaving the toaster as dust. Now, valve always showed their appreciation for this through out the year by adding fresh content. This however, has changed. Valve, like other companies, has noticed the potential of modern competitive games, one genre of which is MOBAs. It is also very obvious that they have grown old of TF2 and want to work on different things. Their plan to keep the game alive, while slowly leaving it was to let their loyal community take over, which I have to say is quite an honorable thing to do. However, they have completely failed at it. The problem is, the community may be able to handle parts of the game, but not the entire game it self. It is impossible do to many factors. By this I mean, the community might be able to add content like hats and taunts to the game, but they can not expand the gaming experience, the expanding the gaming experience is exactly what made TF2 a special game, every year there was always something new to try out and after doing that, the normal game was appealing again, and the loop continued. But instead of fixing the issue, they just want to pull it through till the end, like dragging a bleeding body to the hospital but knowing that it won't make it. Warning Rant: They also treat the community wrong, they have gotten to used to the community of TF2 treating them like some kind of divine council. They think anything will satisfy it. An example of this is the ing ducks. Some people complained that the "End of the Line" not including snowplow, with Valves' response being 'It is too complicated for new players", from what I have heard though, the did not include the map due to it not reaching their standards, which is fine by me. Also the lack of weapons that were promised by the creator of the animation did not appear, which was upsetting, but still bearable. What really shoved the middle finger up my  though, was the ducks. The ing ducks that cost 5 ING EUROS. FOR ING DUCKS! Is this some sort of joke? Was Valve thinking,"Ayy Lmao, ducks are funny right?" from Valve and the End of the Line team. Without the ducks, I would have nothing to complain about, but if they seriously think that DUCKS will satisfy their loyal community after they miss out on the promised weapons and a new game mode, then must have ing plumbum in their water supply, They tried making up to it by rushing 3 new weapons which are all useless and uncreative. The creativity is what counts, not the effectiveness of the weapon. Pre-access, now for TF2 also! Another issue is BETA maps, they adapted the method of their platform into TF2. They release unfinished , act like it is finished but still needs "fixing" and let the community do all the work, instead of actually using already made maps by the community OR getting of their asses and finishing them. The beta map Cactus has a ing holes everywhere! It is also so monotone, I cringe when thinking valve could even put it in the game. What they appear to think of the community: They take us for a bunch of clowns, juggling around in the circus with a red nose and wacky hair, riding on a one-wheel making "toot toot sounds". They put disclaimers on their ! "For expert players only" they write in captions under their new Pre-Access game mode. Who ever complained to them, that some game modes for too complicated? Someone with 0 neurons in their skull, succeeding at surpassing the stupidity of a pigeon?!? The game mode is just as "complicated" as the other game modes, there is nothing that could irritate new players, if you exclude all the unnecessary glitches. Hats: As it worked in the past, adding more cosmetic items usually was endorsed with a lot of positive responses from the community, this was because they added fun cosmetics, while adding more content for gameplay. It was a balance of a innovation and fun, always the right mix. But now, they just try to make us suffocated in cosmetics. This can be do to 2 reasons: 1. They just want to add more cosmetics to.. recreate Barbie simulator. 2. They realized that the game is dying and wana milk as much  out of it as they can before it goes downhill (same thing goes for ducks) Servers: I will try to keep this short. Most Valve servers, the servers I personally enjoy playing on the most. Have  BETA maps on them. Most TF2 servers went from TF2 to DOTA 2 and CS:GO. I remember always finding at least 3 full servers of a single map, for each map a year or two ago. Now I have luck if I find a single full server of a map. To end this: As I mentioned before; "They realized that the game is dying and wanna milk as much  out of it as they can before it goes downhill", the game IS in fact actually going down the . Look at all the TF2 youtubers! STAR_ and Jerma have stopped playing the game! Why? Because there is nothing new, and they have a bitter taste because of the recent decisions of Valve regarding TF2. "So what if two youtubers quit playing the game, it happens all the time." When a pretty much TF2 only channel with at least 90% of its subscribers being TF2 related, quits the game because the company is ing up, then it is very obvious that there is something wrong! This is not just YouTube, it is also on my steam friends list, I used to see at least 10 people playing the game at any given time. Now it is rare to see anyone at all play it, and look at the size of that list! With the majority being hardcore TF2 Players. This game is dying and Valve needs to seriously step in before it bleeds out for good.
Mr. uLLeticaL;-;Definitely a game you should of have played, since it's Free to Play.
King Daro;-;I will never understand why many people do Heroin when they can simply play Team Fortress 2 for free. Once you get a taste of the hats,you will never leave,ever. I got hooked in November of 2012,now look at me.
[LeMoNHeaD];-;gibus pyrovision achiev force-a-nature scunts, w+m1 pyros and butterknifing spies, what's not to like?
Nooki;-;Deer friends, pepholes end grills on urth. Dis geam is god like. It is basically a mmorpg allaround sonic race game. i bougt dis geam. 3 yeers to the back. 6 Daysl latr, i cry. Its like mixing chocolate and nutella. Chocolate = gud, Nutella= meh wich creates tf2 = cO Several days. If you talk abot the mexican metalfaper, i rthink about ebola. Australin, German 'non racismt) end Putin are in geam. Thx pece Pls listen 3 Aborted
retro!;-;hats are love hats are life 10/10
mlpcatwellingtons;-;hat
voobey;-;One of the best games
cheese.9898;-;This game is free and yet it is one of the most popular games on Steam. That says something. I definitely recommend playing TF2 or at least trying it out. However, I believe that to fully enjoy this game, you cannot play for a short period of time. My reason for this belief is that when I first started playing TF2, I played for around an hour and didn't really like it. However, I decided to try playing again around a month after my first try, and I slowly began to enjoy it. Over time, I began to understand how to play as each of the characters, and unlocked many game-changing items. TF2 is fairly easy to play once you get used to it, but when you first start playing, it's like entering a whole new world. TF2 is unlike any other game and it will take a bit of time to fully understand it, but once you do, it becomes one amazingly fun multiplayer game.
RetriButioN;-;Hat Simulator 10/10 - would pay 5000$ for a bunch of pixels anytime!
Cycles;-;I want to uninstall this game for stealing hours/money of my life but I love it too much to even consider it.
KISS i[M]r[E];-;One of the best + funniest multiplayer ever created. WARNING: addictive!
Delfy (Trade);-;This is the best f2p game, what ive seen.
Mari;-;It's so sad to be writing this, but the truth needs to be said. So let's start here: I had such a wonderful experience playing this game. Not ONLY because of the game itself, but because of everything it gave me; I can tell you a few things: 1. I met my first friend on steam while playing TF2, we've built a beautiful friendship: I consider him as my brother and he considers me as his sister. We live kinda far from each other, but we've already met in real life. 2. I got closer to a friend of mine that loves TF2. We had some discussions/problems in the past, then someday we started to play together and it feels like, nothing has ever happened. 3. It opened my eyes about a plenty of things on internet. I got scammed many times, people stole from me when I was noob, which made me learn more about trust. Those and more facts made me love this game completely, and now, I'm not recommending it. Valve stopped making people happy, by "people" I mean those who had even better moments while playing it. You see an update: hats/miscs/bugs/lag and that's it... OF COURSE I also wasted money there, I used to get so attracted by "beautiful stuff" 'till I realize what I was doing. YOU GOTTA BUY SOMETHING THOUGH! If you're F2P you don't know how to play, you suck! AND WOOOW they're putting more guns in the store: all banned from competitive for being too OP (or they're really bad anyway). I seriously would like to join a server now and have fun! Ah... Yeah, they're empty because people are in trade servers just to show how much "rich" they actually are. "The worst kind of blind, is the one that doesn't want to see". Why Valve? Why are you letting this happen to your game?! I wanna die from laughing with my friends again, I wanna recommend this game again and tell people how much it's worth! It's NOT a goodbye, I'll go back sometimes to see if I can have at least more 5 minutes of fun. In the same way TF2's marked my life, I hope it does for other people.
Siri;-;Team Fortress 2... first started as a team based shooter, now a heaven for hat trades. Even though the game looks nothing like it was more than a decade ago, it still feels similar. The game is good, the game is free, and it's not pay-to-win. It doesn't hurt to try.
Mr.Guns;-;you can put 2 sandviches toghther and make scrap metal 10/10 100/100 best game
(DLG)Lord Fedjuve Kinval [ITA];-;Best Hat-Collecting Simulator you can find on Steam! Also has a decent FPS mini-game in it, all for free! Also Conga 8/8
Alpha Wolf;-;shot rocket at ground and fly. 10/10 would rocket jump agen.
xTcR | Slapp Happy [TF-M];-;Pretty much the best Free To Play game I've played so far. The multiplayer on this game is awesome. It's all team based and fun, no class is more important then any other class. It's not all self based like Call Of Duty, you work with your team to win. Team Fortress 2 also has unique weapons that help you in combat. On the other hand, I HAD to talk about HATS. Some people play just for the hats, I play for usually both of them. If you're looking for a great F2P game, this is the game for you. Hope you have fun!
Who is name?;-;Once you get this game, you can just throw life out the window, YOU DON'T NEED YOU, YOU WON'T WANT IT, AND THE COMMUNITY DOESN'T EITHER. I have wasted over a year playing this game. Never gets old. Have to say, most addicting game I've ever played (help me). I love it so much (kill me), and I'm never letting go (there is a gun in the desk, just do it). So what do you say, want to waste some of your hours, weeks, months or even years in this virtual hat simulator, then come on in (RUN!). I really have to get these voices out of my head. Ah, Murica...
Foxyfluff;-;I'm trapped, in between two worlds, trying to get dough y'know when the dough get low the unusuals go. But never that, as long as fiends wear hats, I'll be on the block hustling counting my stacks. No doubt.
Jonny Taz;-;This shooting game where cosmetics are more important than weapons introduces the player to a world where two teams of mercenaries fight each other in various modes like King of the Hill, Payload Race and Capture the Flag. There is also the Mann vs Machine mode where a small team fights giant hordes of robots. Play as the 9 different mercenaries, each with their own abilities and personality quirks. No matter your skill or playing style, there's a class that suits it! You'll surely enjoy this game that never gets old thanks to the frequent updates that bring new content such as hats, maps, weapons and gamemodes. And the best part is that it's NOT pay to win, since the game is well balanced and you can get weapons for free fairly easily. Your only concern will be getting more cosmetics! Team Fortress 2 is pure multiplayer fun, and one of the best games I've ever played.
Moogle Voodoo;-;Every violent obessive collectors dream. Team Fortress 2 is by far the best point and click adventure game I have ever played.
Oxin;-;TF2 Chronology: 2007 - Best Multiplayer Game with unique Art Style 2008-2009 - Best Multiplayer Game with minor RPG elements 2010-2012 - Best trade simulator 2012-2013 - Best co-op mode 2014 - What next? 2017 - Team Fortress 3?
ThatHentaiLord_/ ~;-;Destroyed my life, lost 1500 in virtual hats, found my love for hats. 10/10 would do the Gabe again.
Grindor;-;I can't take seriously a game where a Frying Pan is worth more than my House. I can't take seriously a game where your Hat dictates how good you are. And yet I play this  and have fun. 9/10 needs more weapons.
Sir Peylo;-;I'd say this is the best hat simulator out there
R.I.P. Satoru Iwata;-;games pretty fuggin awsome yo.
jeff;-;THIS GAME RUINED MY LIFE. I NOW HAVE TO COLLECT HATS THAT COST $4,000 JUST FOR THEIR UNUSUAL EFFECTS AND OTHER COLLECTIBLE HATS. ALSO THE REGULAR, STRANGE, AND GENUINE HATS. YOU CANNOT FORGET ABOUT THOSE. ELEVEN OUT OF TEN STARS.
S A D O S;-;,  .        :)   ,   :3 Good game. Very cool and fun to play with friends :) All advise.
Princess Fuzz;-;It's alright, pick it up during a sale I guess.
The Tofu Guardian;-;"Would you recommend Team Fortress 2?" Oh please, are you breathing? The answer is that obvious! Yes! I love it! Almost every aspect of it is perfect. What more can I ask for? - Free To Play > I don't have to add on, do I? It's wonderful. It creates the rainbows in the skies. It makes my unicorn fly. BAM! - Noob-Friendly > I started out as a gaming noob, barely knowing anything about Steam, or Team Fortress. My friend recommended Team Fortress 2 as my first tryout and I got hooked not long after. > They have a training mode to shape you up in and out, even an option to request a coach . 100% human plox. They offer amazing training grounds , offline practices ... If you can't get a hang of Team Fortress 2 after playing it for a week, I'm judging you. Jokes! But it's really noob-friendly and I recommend this for first-time FPS players. > "You'll get tired of your first ever game easily."? False! I still play Team Fortress 2 and I'm loving it even more than when I just started out! - Sweet Graphics & Animation > Got a thing for realistic, not-too-gorey, and somewhat-cute graphics? Yo! This' the thing for you, bro! > As a first-time FPS player, promoting myself from Maplestory and being a scaredy-girl, I'm scared of extreme gore and blood. Team Fortress 2's graphics are awesome to me as there's just enough gore and blood , pretty much tolerable, and sometimes even funny! Also, if you're finding a FPS game with 100% no gore and blood... First off, I don't even think there's such a game. Secondly, you're not gonna have as much fun! *sad face* Lastly, it's an experience! - Various Types of Gameplay Plots (Maps) > From Payload Races to Capture The Flag, from Control Points to Mann VS Machine, there's probably as many plots as, or more than, the fingers on your hands! > Every plot has a different style of playing, strategies and players ! If you're good at finding something, and probably have a good way of running away, Capture The Flag is for you! Hate computers and how smart they are? Or if you just want to rage at multiple objects which are stupider than you, Mann VS Machine is there for you to cast all your sorrows! > Team Fortress 2 gives us so many choices, it's hard to stick to one. It's like reading a book, you'll get bored if you keep reading the same story over and over again, but you still love the writing style of the writer. Thus, you read the other books by the same writer! Same logic! - Various Classes > As someone who just popped in and promoted from Maplestory, I like the idea of having my character suited for different situations . For example, although the Heavy is great at clearing maps, it gets annoying when a Sniper from the other team takes advantage of your slow movements and spam kills you. What do you do? Change to a Scout and crash that Sniper's brains! > Different classes are great at different maps, it complements the gameplay to the max! - Multiplayer Features > There's a chat system for you to communicate with your teammates -- by typing or speaking . > "But people are so annoying!" No worries, you can vote to mute, kick, and ban players on Team Fortress 2! Thank God for this. - Character Customization > The Mann Co. Catalog. Fanciful, huh? > You can get different hats and weapons to customize your characters, and make them the way you want them to be ! Recommended for hipsters who are trying to escape the mainstream. To be honest, I feel more encouraged after I get a new look... Is it just me? - Market > You can buy, sell and trade for hats and weapons to customize your character. It gets irritating when you see someone having this awesome weapon you want, and yet you can't get the drop. There's the market for you -- buy it from the Mann Co. or the Steam Community Market. It isn't very expensive either, considering most of the items are roughly $0.99 . > When you have no idea where the spend your Steam Wallet and want to train your business skills. - Teamwork > Let's get to the social part, shall we? Team Fortress, like its name, strengthens players' sense of teamwork . I'm pretty sure your parents or teachers screwed into your brain how important teamwork is, so I wouldn't get on that. > Example time! You're playing Control Points and there's an Engineer from your opponent's team that has been building sentry guns for forever. He's wiping out anyone who steps near the control point so you can't capture it. What do you do? Conspire with a Spy to sap the Engineer's sentry and have everyone else rush forward to capture the control point! Teamwork at it's best. - Community > The community is fun to be in , and I'll just say the developer has a great sense of humour . Just take a look at their YouTube channel! I've never laughed so hard at characters from an online game. If you've ever watched "Meet The _____", you'll realize that the classes have their own personalities and their own backgrounds! It's very entertaining to watch and laugh at. > Team Fortress 2 has a wonderful amount of artists , take a look at the fan art! Some are cute, some are gorey... All just plain Amazing with a capital A. > Don't know how to play? Good heavens, there are so many guides written by the professional players! >  I may have missed out one or two points, but you get my point. Team Fortress 2 is far more than amazing for a Free-To-Play game. So I'll say, "9/10 will get it." *gives developer a hug and kiss*
Spookwagen;-;Pretty good.
Peashooter;-;I got the game along with the Orange Box back in 2007. Of course, Team Fortress Classic was, like Portal, just a side character where the protagonist was really Half-life 2 Episode Two. Before I begin on Team Fortress 2, allow me to spend a paragraph or two on its predecessor. (Skip the next 2 paragraphs if you are not interested) More than a decade ago, during the era of 56kbps internet and much frustration for both the internet users and phone callers alike, I bought a disc which contains a number of Half-Life mods, including the all-time famous Counter-Strike 1.5. I was very fond of this little piece of gem back then, as downloading a 500mb file is near impossible. Little did I know that I will be spending most of my time on something else that I have no idea what it as back then, a mod that goes by the name of Team Fortress Classic. Team Fortress Classic has one of the most versatile first-person-shooter gameplay back then when compared to contenders such as Counter-Strike. Although the original concept of Team Fortress is based upon the battle between two teams with nine different classes, I am more personally attached to the party-style gameplay which its custom maps have to offer. With over a thousand of maps to choose from, it is possible for me to find myself in the most peculiar yet fascinating maps and situations. I could be playing volleyball or basketball using rockets, or partying in a pub while trying to sneak pass a Heavy-Weapon-Dude-Bouncer; I could be roaming around Osaka or Sahara; I could be defending or capturing a point, massacring or being massacred by a heavy, or even laughing my butt off. Yes, it was fun, and it was hell of an epic party each night. That was more than a decade ago, and then came Team Fortress 2, sitting with its peers in an orange package. The question is not whether the game is good or not, but whether can it continue its predecessors legacy. It has been 7 years since its release and time did tell that Team Fortress 2 is more than competent in continuing its predecessors legacy, though the effect was not immediate. As with most online multiplayer server-based First Person Shooters, Team Fortress 2 started off as something that is quite weak and linear. The community for Team Fortress 2 was still building up back then and there isnt much community-made customizations back then, something that is very important in laying a foundation of a multiplayer game so that its longevity can be sustained. The only major improvements between Team Fortress Classic and Team Fortress 2 is that the later has an improved cartoon-like skin, which is more suiting for its party-like gameplay nature, and an item system which was pretty weak back then. The rest are pretty much the same. Time pass and the community grew as the old source engine becomes outdated. A larger variety of weapons begin to appear, and the community start coming up with a variety of mods. From Saxton Hale campaigns (boss fights) to Prop Hunts (Hide and Seek), and then to the official Mann VS Machine mods (Coop game-play), the legacy of Team Fortress Classic begins to take form within Team Fortress 2 at a foundation which is even more solid than its predecessor. Team Fortress 2 stood the testament of time and the size of the community surged. This is even truer when the game went free. Ive had my share of fun, laughter and tears (due to laughter), and I have met my clique of friends where whom I have remained intimate as we journeyed through different games while transcending beyond the boundary of Steam. Team Fortress 2 has came a long way, and, although the results might not be immediate, it sure is worth your investment of time. Oh and if you are wondering, hats are never my interest.
DemocrapCow | Trade.tf;-;WELCOME TO THE NUMBER ONE "WASTE YOUR MONEY ON VIRTUAL HATS" SIMULATOR EVER! Welcome boys and girls, you have heard me right! If you have ever wanted to waste your hard-earned money on virtual hats you have come to the right place! In TF2 you can waste all of your money FOR FREE! Not yet convinced to get TF2 yet? WELL WAIT UNTIL YOU HEAR THE SPECS! TF2 comes with ultra high quality squeakers! A smooth 1080$ flowing out of your bank account with no lag! And finally a TOP QUALITY addiction better than any drug you have ever been hooked on! Well by this time your mouth is probably watering after hearing all of this information, and you are trying to find the download button, well do not worry just click on "Play Game" (the green button which you can not miss), any way if you couldn`t find it do not worry. not everybody is a genius! If you couldn`t find it take some IQ classes. . SOME REVIEWS FROM VERY TRUSTABLE SOURCES Originally posted by Random guy from TF2 server : I like this game. Originally posted by Your Mom : Stop playing so much TF2 and go outside! Originally posted by Obama : To me this game is more important than America NOT YET CONVINCED? WELL YOU SHOULD BE! GO AND DOWNLOAD TF2 RIGHT NOW!
Wayward;-;I was gonna write a review, but I assumed it would be too confusing for new players. Instead, here's the wikipedia entry for Ducks: Duck is the common name for a large number of species in the Anatidae family of birds, which also includes swans and geese. The ducks are divided among several subfamilies in the Anatidae family; they do not represent a monophyletic group (the group of all descendants of a single common ancestral species) but a form taxon, since swans and geese are not considered ducks. Ducks are mostly aquatic birds, mostly smaller than the swans and geese, and may be found in both fresh water and sea water. Ducks are sometimes confused with several types of unrelated water birds with similar forms, such as loons or divers, grebes, gallinules, and coots. The word duck comes from Old English *dce "diver", a derivative of the verb *dcan "to duck, bend down low as if to get under something, or dive", because of the way many species in the dabbling duck group feed by upending; compare with Dutch duiken and German tauchen "to dive". This word replaced Old English ened/nid "duck", possibly to avoid confusion with other Old English words, like ende "end" with similar forms. Other Germanic languages still have similar words for "duck", for example, Dutch eend "duck" and German Ente "duck". The word ened/nid was inherited from Proto-Indo-European; compare: Latin anas "duck", Lithuanian ntis "duck", Ancient Greek nssa/ntta (, ) "duck", and Sanskrit t "water bird", among others. A duckling is a young duck in downy plumage[1] or baby duck;[2] but in the food trade young adult ducks ready for roasting are sometimes labelled "duckling".[citation needed] A male duck is called a drake and the female duck is called a duck, or in ornithology a hen. The overall body plan of ducks is elongated and broad, and the ducks are also relatively long-necked, albeit not as long-necked as the geese and swans. The body shape of diving ducks varies somewhat from this in being more rounded. The bill is usually broad and contains serrated lamellae, which are particularly well defined in the filter-feeding species. In the case of some fishing species the bill is long and strongly serrated. The scaled legs are strong and well developed, and generally set far back on the body, more so in the highly aquatic species. The wings are very strong and are generally short and pointed, and the flight of ducks requires fast continuous strokes, requiring in turn strong wing muscles. Three species of steamer duck are almost flightless, however. Many species of duck are temporarily flightless while moulting; they seek out protected habitat with good food supplies during this period. This moult typically precedes migration. The drakes of northern species often have extravagant plumage, but that is moulted in summer to give a more female-like appearance, the "eclipse" plumage. Southern resident species typically show less sexual dimorphism, although there are exceptions like the Paradise Shelduck of New Zealand which is both strikingly sexually dimorphic and where the female's plumage is brighter than that of the male. The plumage of juvenile birds generally resembles that of the female. You must pay $5 USD to continue reading
The Plastic Guy;-;i spent at least more than $150 on this game. gotta wear them virtual hats
(   );-;The best dressup simulator.......FOR MEN. with a mini-game that involves shooting and completing objectives
Neverx;-;Pros: - Great FPS shooter - Balanced classes - Fun maps - Great game modes - MvM is a fun - Trading is a lot of fun if you can get into it - Fair item drop system - Free to Play - Hats Cons: - None Final Verdict: Team Fortress 2 is one of the best games I've played. It's a super fun shooter that never gets old. With multiple game modes like KOTH, Payload, Attack/Defense, CP, and MvM it doesn't really get old. Trading is also quite fun if you can put some money and time into the game. I highly recommend everyone to try out considering it's free anyways. 10/10.
Kirito;-;I already reviewed the game, I won't do it all over again .-.
ArousedTaquito;-;Best Hat Simulator of all time 34/10
abandoned;-;This game ruin my life. Wasted over $100. 10/10 would recommend to your friends.
Cookie Bear;-;its a game But seriously, this game is great. +Charming style and design +Best class-based gameplay of all time +Awesome characters classes, each with a ton of personality +Seasonal events and items +A large part of the community is really dedicated to the game and helps keep it alive +Continued content updates from the devs, even though a part of the community have become spoiled brats and say that Valve doesn't care even though they have more big updates coming in the future... *cough* SPY VS ENGI *cough* +Hats And now, the bad stuff... -The community is getting assed by trolls, s (Gets kill, taunts and boasts about it like an ), butthurt players (Gets headshotted, every single time screams "HAAAAX HAAAX u cant headshot me without usin hax cuz noone can eva headshot anyone cuz thats just fukin imposibelz" and worst of all, The "I quit, so should everyone else" people ("OMG TF2 IS BORING IM NEVER GONNA PLAY IT AGAIN, YOU SHOULD ALL STOP PLAYING TOO, THIS GAME SUCKS , ITS DEAD, VALVE DOESNT CARE ABOUT THE GAME ANYMORE").
xKhaliD |;-;i love this game :)
Ank;-;Team Fortress 2 is a first-person shooter game from Valve. The gameplay is somewhat similar to Counter-Strike but with more variety of game modes, class based player, and unlike Counter-Strike, in terms of gameplay this game is more casual rather than competitive, at least for me. Everyone can play it, from kids, teens to parents, everyone can play. The game is very well balanced, each class has more than one unique abilities you can explore. You can get item drops as you play, and the more play, the more you can get. Items can be crafted for another better items too, or trade them for other items. And the best thing about his game is hats! Yes, hats. Most every damn people here on Steam loves them. You can show off your hats, craft it or even sell them! Many people make profit from it, many people collect it. Team Fortress 2 graphics is 3D but with cartoon style. Even though the graphics is cartoon, Team Fortress 2 still feature blood and gore effects. All effect from explosion, weapons fire, rockets, everything are cartoonized. This is great free to play game for me, I highly recommend it. Play it now! Rating 9/10
Skoomers;-;Team Fortress 2 is free to play as well as free to uninstall
KHFan20;-;I bought the game when it was still $20. It was the first game I had ever bought on Steam, and around that time in fall of 2008 there were only three characters updated with achievement weapons. Trading and hats weren't in existence yet, and the game truly was a "teamwork required" type of game. Every class felt balanced and fair, with each one having their own respective strengths and weaknesses. Even the achievement weapons brought a nice change of pace from the normal minigun and bonesaw. You actually felt accomplished when you did the achievements because you were rewarded. The community was surprisingly welcoming, and a majority of my Steam friends came from TF2. At the time, we had thought that Valve was going to update the rest of the characters with their own achievements and that would be all; and for awhile, we were right. One by one the rest of the classes got their own weapons and achievements, and by July 8th 2010 (Happy Birthday to me!), the Engineer was the last character updated. The game felt complete, three years in the making. Now... I think everyone knows what's coming next. Before I get into detail on the update that changed (or in my opinion, ruined) everything, let me just say that Valve had already put hats into the game months before, way back in August 2009. I was perfectly fine with the hats, they added a sense of personality to your classes and all you had to do in order to get them was play the game (a novel concept, I know). Hats were the only thing given to you as a random drop back then. I should probably point out that I took about a year break away from gaming at this point in time due to "real life." While I was away, the Mann-Conomy update happened. This update wasn't like any of the others, this update added tons of brand new weapons and hats, along with the addition of an in-game store and trading system to get them. When I eventually returned to TF2, the game wasn't about the objectives, or teamwork, or even being the best player anymore. All the game was about now was collecting the most hats and weapons you could get your hands on. The achievements didn't matter anymore because you could just buy whatever you wanted, or just find it as a random drop (since they updated it to more than just hats). The game that I fell in love with, spending sleepless nights for years, was all for nothing at the drop of a hat (quite literally). I'm not mad at Valve for what they did, from a business standpoint this is the smartest thing they've ever done. But whenever I see the game in my Steam library, I just get a deep feeling of nostalgia and longing for something that could have been. I hope that one day, I'll be able to relive those fond memories I have with Team Fortress 2.
KSorarito #RIPIwata;-;There's MANY UNIQUE things to do in this crazy FPS made by Valve, such as.. -Selling virtual hats for people. -Buy virtual hats from people. -Trade virtual items with people. -Make profit. -Lose money. -Brag to my friends about how much pixels I have compared to them. -Start conga lines and play rock, paper, scissors with random strangers. -Start killing mobs of people with a lollipop and hear them scream in their mics. -Uncrate $2.49 loot boxes and get $0.20 in return. -Complete contracts, get Battle-Scarred worned "unique" weapons that everyone has. .etc Also, there is this really cool feature in this amazing game, it's called.. -Actually play the game for what it is. Verdict: 10/10 -Too much water
dandy;-;it sucks
iN008 /inub/;-;Team Fortress 2 is Valves hat-sensation team-based fps, featuring great multiplayer and a stylized designed. TF2 boasts a fantastic community and steady economy for trading making it one of the best free-to-play games Steam has to offer.
merp;-;I have invested 2600+ hours into this game. I could have learned how to read and speak a new language. I could have volunteered at a homeless shelter. I could have improved my business portfolio. I could have watched all 551+ episodes of The Simpsons. Ten times. Mercury has orbited the sun in the amount of time I played this game. I played this game so you didn't have to.
RustyRick;-;Ah, TF2, one of the most well-known and popular FPS games out there on Steam, especially since it became Free To Play on the Steam Store. Ever since a friend got me into this game, I've been playing it non-stop for more than 200 play hours in total, and I would like to take the time to give my own thoughts on the game as a whole and some tips for newcomers to help them on their way to enjoy the game and not ragequit within the first 20 minutes of jumping right into it. First off, gameplay-wise the game is a typical multiplayer-based FPS game where the core goal is very simplistic: Hop on either the red or blue team and kill the opposing team and secure victory, however, the methods of accomplishing this range per match type, and usually good teamwork and class diversity are required to win the match. As for said class diversity, the game offers you 9 different playable class characters to choose from, all with their unique advantages and disadvantages, and it's a key requirement for any player to learn the limits and strengths of those classes in order to play the class effectively and to be of benefit to your team as a whole. Thankfully the game has a alright tutorial on a few classes, specifically the Demoman, Spy, Engineer and Soldier, but there are many tricks for a class that the game doesn't often directly tell you, but rather clues you in through the in-game loading screen tips section when you go to a match. Picking a class that suits your playstyle is often the first thing many new players struggle with, but the classes all range from fairly easy to pick up and play decently with, to far more tricky and fragile ones that require the player to be familiar with the mechanics and overall gameplay before they can effectively use them in combat. Such examples are the Heavy, Soldier and Pyro which in my opinion are some of the more easily accessable classes for new players to experiment around with, and Engineer, Sniper and Spy for the more experienced players when they feel confident enough. It has something for every kind of FPS gamer regardless of skill level, which is what I really like about this game. Atmosphere-wise, the game is very visually pleasing with alot of intricate map design accomodating the various matchtypes, and is designed so that players who are unfamiliar with the map and it's pathways are given visual cues on where to go, like if they're on the red team, a red arrow sign will point in the general direction where they need to head to, as well as various signs detailing a mission's objective and locations, like 'Intelligence' for the intel briefcase on capture the flag, 'Battlements' for the general middle area where most of the combat will take place, etc. The classes all have dynamic personalities that make them a blast to play as and you'll often chuckle at their lines regarding the situation, which really gives this game alot of personality. I personally really enjoy the Pyro because the character itself wears a gas mask which makes most of his lines almost inaudiable, but if you listen carefully you can make out a few key lines that he screams out. Besides the game's addictive core gameplay, there's alot of side content to it like customizable loadouts to your class' arsenal, cosmetic clothing and different taunts which you usually have to acquire through specific unlocking methods, crafting from metal which you get from turning additional weapons into metal which you obtain from random weapon drops during gameplay or trading with other players. Trading is one of the key mechanics of interacting with other players, and interacting with other players is oftentimes a good way of getting to meet a nice friend on Steam wether it's someone on your team, or someone you encounter while on a specific trade server, and who might be able to trade or even gift you some stuff if you're friendly to the player and and he/she is friendly to you in return. Just be careful of annoying or pushy players who are out for your items and will offer either nothing or nearly worthless items in return, though, if you happen to encounter those, just ignore them. There is also a Mann vs. Machine co-op game mode in where you get to work together with 5 other players being the limit against a horde of powerful robots trying to defend your area from a bomb they will attempt to deliver at all costs. This game mode is much more intense than regular multiplayer TF2 and you can earn nice cosmetic item rewards for your weapons in the Mann Up mode, but the Bootcamp mode is free to play and a good way for practice, but Mann vs. Machine is very tough and is not recommended for newcomers of TF2 to try out immediately. With that all out of the way, here are a few tips I would recommend everybody who's going to try this game out to follow if they want to have a pleasant experience playing this game in the long run: - Always stay friendly to other players and don't act obnoxious or self-righteous to others. The name of the game is TEAM Fortress 2, meaning that in order to win, you need to work together as a team, and not go out there, thinking you can take the entire team on yourself, which will oftentimes lead to you getting killed over and over again. Communicate with your fellow team members over the situation and what you're planning to do, or regarding plans or tactics that the enemy team is using through the default Y normal in-game chat and U team members-only chat window buttons. Your team members will appreciate it if you're friendly, and will be much more likely to co-operate alongside with you towards completing the objective if you do so. Sure the game can get very hectic and is easy to get annoyed over a supposed 'cheap kill' from a enemy player, but overall try to maintain a friendly atmosphere in the game. - If nessecary, do offline training on maps that you're unfamiliar with, and explore the maps so you'll know the shortcuts and side routes into enemy territory. This is a key factor into becoming a more skilled player over time, as there are many side routes that are often easy to miss or not pay attention to that the developers of the maps implemented in order to balance the game and make it possible for a team to overcome the other if they're being pressured or having difficulty breaking through chokepoints. If the enemy team is spawncamping, try to take a different spawn exit and flank them from behind. If the main route into their base is heavily guarded, look for a alternate pathway to take and inform your teammates about it. - Play classes that suit the current situation. This is a common mistake that I see occuring alot on many servers I play on, as quite alot of players seem to not grasp the limits of a class and oftentimes like to stick to one class only just because they like playing as that certain class and refuse to play anything else that the team might benefit more at that specific point during the match. Players need to observe the situation and pick classes whose advantages are required at the time. To give a good example, payload is a match type in where the red team needs to defend the bomb from being delivered by the blue team, and as such will be spawn-camping right off the bat during the start of the match. Yet alot of times there tend to be about 2 or 3 Spy and/or Sniper players in a team of roughly 9 to 12 players on blue. Those 2 classes can only take out 1 enemy at a time normally, and will be killed easily. You'll need a strong offensive class like Heavy or Soldier to pressure and kill the enemy team, and if your team doesn't have a Medic, be one. Medic isn't a easy class, but your team members will benefit from the healing so they won't have to retreat to the supply closet often. Class diversity and good communication about class choices mid-game can go a long way in winning the match. Thanks for reading this, and hope it was insightful. I definetely recommend this game!
Robby;-;If you like TF2 then you will LOVE TF2
Banter;-;kewl, temporary quit for 1 month and i back to like it, i just play for fun ;3 i don't care about rich backpack anymore, i just play for fun ;3
OlaCola03;-;Ruined my life. 10/10.
peach:*:;-;its okay - don't think i'll play more than an hour or two though, sorry.
chiken;-;Hat Simulator 2014 10/10 "Do as I command and open up your wallet. Do not worry, my child, it will only hurt for a second." -Gaben the Lord and Savior
Cannibal Corpse616;-;Do you want to know why I use a knife? You see, guns are too quick. You cant savor all of the littleemotions. In their last moments, people show you who they really are. So in a wayI knew your friends better than you ever did. Would you like to know which of them were cowards?
Spitfya - Squish Co;-;Many hats, gg. Addicting.
Viper;-;10/10 Team Fortress 2 is so different from any other FPS. It has a great sense of humour, it's really fun to play and never gets boring due to the never-ending content. P.S. I'm only doing this to level up my steam, I ING HATE THIS GAME. :)))))
[OpK] BadlyPk | GoneTill1stAug;-;Love it.
ZygfrydQ;-;Biggest and best MMOFPS since CS 1,6 ;)
[FP] Sun;-;It's ok.
The Seventh Devil | Ninelivess;-;Ruined my life. But at least I have some hats. 5/5
y0;-;Graphics are creative and funny, Controls are ultra-smooth and the game-play is FUN. FUN being the important word here. The game may look simple at first glance, but is a very complex shooter. Pretty much still a perfect game after all these years.
flurii;-;this game ruined my whole life. yeah,this game is like better than all fps games =3,you can do better noscopes in this game. make your character fancy with dem hats and cosmetics,its cool.
LV | DemiPixel;-;It's good.
Claireton;-;Sick of not being able to wear your overpriced hats in public? Are you looking for the next big clothing simulator with a little bit of fighting thrown in? Then this game is for you!
MPG;-;is rly good
Ross the cheeky;-;Hi Tom, I just wanted to let you know that you left your sprinklers on earlier today. I came over and turned them off for you so you can save water. Take Care. Ruby.
JillyBean;-;I don't really feel it is necessary to talk about what's good about TF2 on a wide basis, because we all know what is good about it. It's updated from time to time, it doesn't feel abandoned like most multiplayers and it has a large pool of creative fans. Plus custom game mods like Slender Fortress, Freak Fortress and Death Run make the game twice as better. So I'll just point out the negatives. Explosive spam. It is understood in a 30 player server that spam is existant and will forever stay that way. Kudos Short Circuit. It was fun while it lasted. Crutch weapons/shields and overall annoyance. Black Box/Concheror. Darwin's Shield. Reserve Shooter. Beggar's Bazooka. Vaccinator pairs. Degreaser combos. Despite naming these, I bet all of us use them anyway. So I guess you should all feel horrible about yourselves. Mini-sentries. It sets up in less than 3 seconds. The engineer has the ability to pick up his gear; why not force him to ulitize a push with his teammates instead? It's a server killer. When you're on a team that doesn't feel like destroying them constantly, it's dead. Melee system. You may run into some issues with hit registration not going your way, like hearing your melee weapon make it's hit sound, but no actual registration. Pocket medics. This can go both ways and it's understandable to heal just that one power class that's getting most of the dirty work done. We get it. But what you don't get is that you're gaining much assistance as well from the rest of your teammates that is providing much said and needed push. Do the team a favour. Heal everyone (at least those who respect you). People not understanding the difference between Boot Camp and Mann Up mode. The essence of Mann Up mode is to use the most effective loadouts, have a organized team of each class and to get through wave by wave. If you want to mess around, there is Boot Camp. Lag compensation. This takes the cake. Shots will seem off and you'll most definitely have those moments where you either got sniped through a wall or railed through the wall by the Heavy's curving mini-gun bullets. You thought you got past that wall, but you didn't on their screen. Seeing as I play Scout, it's something I notice on a daily basis, specifically against heavies. It's just all lag compensation. Curious to know more about it, I recommend googling it. Critical hits. It's either you get lucky or outlucked. If it's a issue for players, you'll have to search for those servers that host non-crit settings as the known popular public servers don't. There can be humor in it, but not when it's so frequent. Either way, critical hits are random pokes of not fun and it ruin the results of good matches. Servers not tolerating class balance. Not everyone wants to play in a server infested with engineers and mini-sentries/sentries all over the place. Or more than 2-3 demomen spamming stickies everywhere. Whatever the scenario is, this slides right into lack of teamwork and coordination. Things may never get done the right way, so your best bet is to probably just find another server. Try to get a fair team scramble going and all of the average to good players may quickly go to spectator mode to restack again. We are no angels to that. Who doesn't want to be on the better team? Closing comments... Although all of that is what's to dislike about TF2, you'll somehow just find a way to see pass through it all and enjoy the game for what it is. Make some friends, find a favorite server and avoid the awful memes if you can.
constant craving;-;Super fun game, if you're interested in solving crime this is definitely the game for you
Prussian;-;Leave me I've gone too deep just Save yourselves . The hats are lead by a eldrderrich hat god and will take your soul to fuel more hats so that it can fulfill its Destiny to turn everyone into hat accessories so that he can be come the most intricate hat in the universe and take his throne from his father and then systematically execute the other hat gods and add them to his collection and take peices from them to further perfect his final form. Save yourselves don't click that download button or your soul will become part of the hat god's collection.
Kakka Krabby Patty;-;still a better game than dota
ElderLolz;-;"Hate the player, not the game." is the perfect quote that describes my feelings towards this game and it's community. Oh wait, this is a review for TF2, I almost forgot the most imporant thing. *Obligatory hat joke* That should do it.
Littlepudintater;-;I have to thank Team Fortress 2 for leading me for several thousand hours of gaming throughout the years. I love all the friends I made along the way aswell, but something changed in tf2. The community has nearly been abandoned by all the "old" players leaving behind a community that comes off as toxic. TF2 used to be my favorite game while update and update have many asking what's the deal with all these let downs, VALVe has started giving TF2 the short end of the stick as CS:GO and DOTA 2 take the spotlight. As TF2 and the community is right now I don't recommend getting into it anymore, both the game and the community are now a drag.
KUAI;-;Best free to play game ever made hands down. TF2 is the new standard by which all F2P shooters should assess themselves by. All hail Gaben and his Gibus.
BundD (6=>);-;most fun online with friends!
T_BONe;-;You either die a hero or you live long enough to see yourself become the villain. I hate to admit it but the game defeated me. I used to not give a f*** about hats, killstreaks or expensive items in general. Then I traded my first hat, my first rare item. As time went, I desired more and more and more. Suddenly, it was not about playing but collecting pixels. The game got me. The joy was replaced with greed. I had to pull the plug. I had to escape. I have became ONE OF THEM. This is no longer a harmless video game. It is a dealer and you are the junkie. Avoid it or suffer as I and many others did. Your call.
King Shark;-;10/10 GOTY paid for my videocard :^)
@sph@lt | Busy (Holidays).;-;A game that will not only get you addicted to hats, but also hyped up about bread. Team fortress is the king of free-to-play games. In this multiplayer video game filled with humor you can choose a team (RED/BLU). The goal in this first-person shooter is to beat the other team in 8 different official game modes (king of the hill, capture-the-flag, push-little-cart). While in a team you can select one of nine classes with each class having its strength and weakness making sure therell be a game style that will fit you. You can also play co-op where you team up with 6 people to kill robots. Besides these official game types there are many others created by the community(such as a medieval, prophunt, etc.). But even if you ever get bored with playing you can always hang out and start collecting hats by trading, reason why its often referred to as the number one hat-simulator. Before this game I myself wouldnt even have considered playing any cartoon-like games. Im glad someone converted me. Its a game that will not get you bored easily. But more importantly, its free, why shouldnt you give it a try at least? Even if this game has been out there for a while, its still being updated on a regular basis. New game modes and hats created by the developers and community are regularly being pushed forward and major events are happening at Halloween, Christmas and Easter. There is only one downside I can think of: its quite large in size. So make sure you have enough disk space.
Senator Armstrong;-;You will laugh, you will cry, you will think you're just going to get one hat and then you have 400,000 dollas put into this game. also there are guys that call you a horseer. that's your cue to laugh. Fo srs Pros: Lots of variety for classes if you dont like playing a color swap military man with a different gun. One half of the community is nice and sees you with open arms(no homo) Art style is very good, Lots of community content for more variety with game modes isnt neccesarily pay to win, moreover its a "pay to get that medic to uber you and your fancy hat" MvM is good if you want to kill capitalist robits Cons: Other half of the community is a cesspool of rich s that will make fun of you for not spending 400,000 dollars on a hat with an orbiting benis spinning around it. Very demanding for a constant framerate. usually needs a config to get one. Pyros are F@ggots 4/5 Kill all the m2 pyros
webmube.com;-;First of all, I don't really understand why this game isn't as popular as for example CS, cause it's basically the same genre but TF2 disposes of much more diversified gameplay part where ingame scenarios are very variable due to 9 classes available for playing. Maybe some people don't like animation-style graphics but apart from this questionable part, it is perfect multiplayer FPS game I ever played or heard about, highly recommended for all CS nerds tired of "The bomb has been planted"
Mr. Stretch;-;Best game ever play. The end.
King Quarter;-;My name, My name, My name Is Loadsofhats L-O-D-S OF H-E-T-S What does that spell? LOADSAHATS Prob'ly... Made a right load of ref in hats this weekend Right lads, hats out for the Ladies! LOADSA', LOADSA', LOADSA'... HATS, HATS, HATS! LOADSA', LOADSA', LOADSA'... HATS, HATS, HATS!
Quill_AntiHer;-;Who would be stupid enough to spend 100 hours in this game?
Joniarty;-;I have no Life, I have a Strange addiction to Hats, Abnormal but acceptable amounts of Ponies. I love this Game.
yung fuckboy;-;Such a great game, it's so easy to have fun whilst playing on a pub, and with your friends. MVM is also a great place to have fun :)
Randy Krittz;-;Infested with Weeaboos and Bronies, would recommend not playing unless you deal to associate with these types of people Edit: I forgot about the furry population DO NOT ASSOCIATE WITH THESE PEOPLE, THEY WILL SPAM YOU WITH FURRY PRON
|LZ| Derpvo;-;It's a war-based first-person shooter that ISN'T a bloody Modern Military Shooter (henceforth referred to as MMS). What's not to like? Granted, the game has become overtaken with hats. But I'd say that's one of the reasons Valve decided to make the game free-to-play. They've received enough money from it thus far, and they don't need to rely on the money from every purchase to keep the game going. Unlike most MMS games, this one isn't re-released every single year with 1 or 2 minor changes and with a new name slapped on it. This game undergoes, just like other Valve games (and a lot of other Steam games for that matter), perpetual evolution without the need to be re-released. Sure, it has no single-player campaign. But there's the Portal and Half-Life series of games for that. It's a varied game with plenty of game modes that all run on the same sort of infrastructure but are different in varying ways. It's a good game. I'd recommend it.
Cookie;-;You get your first hat, then... BAM!! Your life is none existant. Great way to learn how to make sandviches and hats using basic alchemy.
Shotgun9009;-;HALO i am the shoe weapon the master of reviewings XDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDD so today we r gon review an old cod way over back from 2077 called ''team fortress 2'' thats wat most ppl call it cuz its easier to pronounce than its actual name which is ''call of duty: teams fighting each other while wearing hats and scamming in trades'' now this cod is very uniquero cuz it tryed to exist without hitmarkers which is weird but sum moders added hitmarkers cuz everyone knew that a cod would not work widout dem so this specific cod added the feature of hats adn enw wepons for ppl to find and/or waste real life money on kinda like all the cods these days except this stuf isn achully gaay so mor about the games u have 10 clases to choos from im gon list dem hear: 1. sonic the hellhog - refered to as scout in the game due to glitched text saying his name is scout when its achully sonic cuz he runs fast this class is used to run around drinking energy drinks by msot people its also important to note that sonics can capture objectives 2x faster than any other class tho nobody knows this cuz their too busy taunt killing with the sandman 2.the qUiK5c0p3r - ingame refered to simply as sniper so that jews who arent MLJ will know how to refer to him easily the qUiK5c0p3r comes from new zealand where he lived with his aborigeonee family together with kangaroos interestingly his wife is a kangaroo that he fugs every night after work so hes also an zooseexualist also u cant properly quikscope wid him cuz lazy infinity ward wont patch the game to allow it 3.the arrse-onist - ingame refered to as pyro for sum strange raizin wtfs a proy anyway lel jay developers so this guy is basically flamespam the class all u need to do is walk forward and hold the left fire button no other info needed 4.the Al-Quaeda insurgent - ingame refered to as Demoman cuz he blows shiit up with his suicid bombs he comes from pakistan and has been raised from the young age of 37 to be a terrorist insurgent thats y he olny hasd 1 eye cuz allah took the other one cuz he was bored also u can make him into a prehistoric mamoth hunter by changing his knife skins 5.the war criminal - ingame refered to as soldier or ''soulja boy'' hes basically a dude who fires rockets so similar to the Al-Quaeda insurgent but hes not black (thank allah) also he can rocket jump except noone knows how cuz when u shoot a rocket at ur feet u jus damage urself infinte words didn fix game agen fugin feegts 6.the Nazi - ingame refered to as Medic he comes from south africa the birthplace of nazis and fascism hes a skilled soldier and very useful in combat his pwoerful large caliber weaponry makes him easy to fight with always pick this class when first starting the jame cuz hes so op also he can heal teammates with this little robot thing all u have to do is walk enar teammates and they will automatically heal 7.the fat jew - ingame refered to as heavy cuz hes so fat his weight is large this guy is a pretty weak class low health and weak weapons but he has a sandvich which can be eaten throughout the entire round so ur teammates get hungry make sandviches irl and have more energy to fight 8.the redneck - ingame refered to as engineer his father and mother were brother and sister cuz hes from texas he can make these robots that walk around and shoot also u can get a KKK outfir for him which increases ur damage dealt against everyone who isnt white 9.james blunt - ingame refered to as spy cuz hes from britain and his codename is 007 what else wud u call him lol noobs LMFAO anyway james blunt has alot of health and can go invisible permanently but his invisibility is glitched so u cant attack while hes invisible agen quadarch hasn patched the game pl0x fix soon also james blunt comes from bristol and he has over 100 pounds in his bank account the game also features trading where u can trde each others worthles shiit like hats and crates but uc an also scam ppl and make money off of it like everyone else so this has been anjother review from the weapon thAt is capable of firing shoes as projectiles and another great cod game shlye guys XDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDD
Yui;-;+Hats DLC + Autistic Friendly community +Pootis 11/10 RIP in , Spookwagen sempai!
Designated Kitty 03-052;-;killed 3 deadringer spys and got shot by a default ghastly gibus pyro 11/10
Flying Pig;-;There's many reviews on how this game can destroy your social life and such , i can guarantee it's 100% true. 11/10
Rarky;-;*click* Noice.
[Ace] Reaper;-;Team Fortess 2 Is a great F2P game, For some simple reasons: Greatly optomized. Action. Multiplayer. Great Modes. Great Maps. Not pay to win. Somethings that arn't good: Trollers. Greifers. F2Ps
shadownine;-;Decent Got killed by a fellow m8 with a fish in his hands then called me a nurd i r8 8/8 "gr8"
Sanyo .. '';-;[10/9.1]             Game more than a brilliant if the game is free does not mean its bad
Honest;-;Team Fortress 2, a game long joked about being a war-themed hat simulator should be praised, and here is why. Team Fortress 2 is a game I believe can really fit with all kinds of gamers, from all kinds of scenes. Whether you're into MOBAs, already into FPS's, or just a general player of games, TF2 can find some way to work itself into your heart. Part 1: The Classes The classes in Team Fortress 2 are all well-balanced characters that fit into a special role of a team, their well-craftedness leaves the real struggle to the player to make the class shine above all others. The roles of each class don't even stop at what the class could really do. There are so many sub-classes and builds and weapons that change how the entire game functions, it's versatility expands far beyond just what it's labelled as. The classes and their wonderfully fleshed-out personalities with different backgrounds helps you to invest in them and really become a part of them, and possibly have them become a part of you. Part 2: The Weapons Weapons in TF2 aren't really improvements to the stock, which makes it different than alot of other games. They're another type of playstyle, another way to play the game. Want the Heavy to be even more of a damage dealer? Use the Brass Beast. Want a reward for all those headshots you're getting as Sniper? Use the Bazaar Bargain. The weapons help broaden the possibilities and types of play of the game, chances are you won't meet players with the same loadout, and even better chances you won't find them using the same kind of playstyle. All in all, I know there might be some sour apples in the bunch, but the range of weapons and the manners in which you can use them is spectacular, and helps others find classes they like. Part 3: The Hats You knew this was coming, admit it. The game's cosmetic system isn't all that there is, but it's one hell of a huge chunk. Ever since the first few hats were added, it changed the game. From the beginning, it was one for one, a hat for a hat, but soon, the seed of economy was planted. The economy grew and flourished, values were established. currencies were made, and the true spirit of the war-themed hat simulator came to fruition. The economy is a real shining gem in this game, while prices may seem absurd, it really is astonishing how a video game managed to grow an economy that easily translates virtual goods into monetary value with the unboxing of a crate. The community lives around this creation, molds it, creates it, they coexist peacefully and abide by one another's rules. Not only does the market shine, but the cosmetics themselves, too. Each piece can be equipped together in no specific order (aside from some restrictions with clipping, of course), meaning a bunch of combinations for your signature, unique look. This furthers the customization from weapons, and really helps to make you, you. Overall In the end, TF2's a flexible game. No matter what genre of game you're most accustomed to, TF2 will have a place in your heart. Interesting, quirky characters set in the middle of nowhere, fighting over who-knows-what. Plenty of methods of customization to make it fit you. A community that's pretty darn great, and a good bunch of pretty-looking hats. This game more than earns my 10/10, for as much as it counts. (P.S. It's flippin' free!)
JIGRON;-;This game could potentially be a life long friend of mine. Yearly Christmas & Halloween updates, large to medium content updates throughout the year, bugs crushed within weeks, and smaller updates sprinkled in. This game's longevity is certainly one of it's many strengths. As an FPS with so many weapons and features, it remains extremely comprehensive and balanced (Regardless of what most players say). Weapons are added every now and then, and current weapons' stats are always under inspection for balance issues. The control is extremely tight as all source games are, movement always seems fluent and never clunky. The skill ceiling for movement/mobility is extremely high and allows for lots of very tricky moves (eg. Rocket/sticky jumping, sentry jumping, strafing, etc..) Generally the skill ceiling for TF2 is very, very high; with almost 3,000 hours at the time of posting this i am nowhere near the skill level of more experianced players. The community is still strong and persistant as the game ages and brings in new players. An overall friendly and welcoming community awaits new players, as well as a thriving competitive scene in both Europe and the States. Not to mention the incredible fan-created artwork and short films on youtube and other sites. TF2 has an incredibly involved trading scene which was born from the staggering amount of hats and cosmetic items that you can get. The trading scene can be brutal at times, but nothing quite stands up to the feeling of getting a sweet new item after spending time trading up for it. (Oh and did i mention you can sell TF2 items for PayPal cash if you're advanced enough?) In summation, Team Fortress 2 is a game for the ages. This game has something for everyone if you look for it, and you'll undoubtedly meet some amazing people and make new friends.
Bag of Quack;-;The most funny graphics, and addictive multiplayer game. The FPS games have a new style of perspective now.
forger;-;A great prophet once said: The road to hats is paved with tons of spent hours, so it's never been that easy. 10 out of 10. Would put dispenser again.
mayhem dressed in a suit;-;i wasted 2,000 hours of my life on this game gg
Snazzy_;-;Very good game, has ruined my life. 10/10 would play again
Lelvis;-;The best thing since sliced bread. ..did somebody say bread?
3v1lcl0n3|Buying Cards for 0.11;-;Made me more money than anything i did in life 10/10
StingerRPG;-;Why it is recommended by me? It has Hats. Bonus that are hats with particles on it. Do I need to say more? Look at my game hours. Now install this game and play it.
GloG;-;Simply the best game ever.
HoldMyDrink;-;What could be better than TF2?
Graddus YB;-;Team Fortress 2 is the best free-to-play first person shooter in the world today. It's pure free-to-play, which means that everything is available at the beginning. You don't have to spend money on this game, except when you want to trade or buy cosmetic items. So what is this game all about? Well, you play in team of 1 to 12 (or even more) players and you try to beat the other team. TF2 features several gamemodes, Capture Point and Payload for example, and 9 'classes'. Each class has it's own pros and cons, and can be used for specific tasks. For example, the Engineer is a great defender and the Scout is very effective in capture-based gamemodes. TF2 is very n00b-friendly, since the game features Offline Training against bots and tutorials, as well as the cop tower-defense gamemode Mann vs. Machine. TF2 is a relatively simple game, you don't require a lot of knowledge to be good at it. The game also has a large economy of items, which you get by playing or trading. These are pure cosmetic, except most weapons, and don't give you an advantage towards other players. Verdict -------- This game is very enjoyable and funny, it's very different compared to other FPS games. It features several awesome gamemodes and funny classes. Some of the cosmetics are really funny, you can hit people with a mackerel and candy for example. An awesome free-to-play shooter you should play today. Your friends will not see you outside for at least 100 hours. If you become a "TF2 Trader" you will spend at least 400 hours on this game. Score: 89/100
the true 4chan kid;-;World's best war themed conga simulator.
Tritone;-;Best thing since sliced bread.. No, seriously. Fun in pubs and all, but once you start playing with others, talking, communicating, laying strats, executing them in the heat of battle, risking friendships ove petty discussions, Team Fortress 2 turns into more than just a cartoon shooter. I don't even see the cartoon any more, all I see is "overextended heavy, engineer is spy!, chokepoints and bombing soldiers"
Moysey89;-;Team Fortress 2 is deffo the best game i have ever playied! i hate to compare it to other FPS but this one has kept my attention for a long time unlike cod and others! you can tell valve put alot of work and effort into their games and it shows in the qaulity in thier work! valve always update the game and keep making it better and better, its 1 of my fav game's of all time!! :) dont waste any more time reading this reveiw, just download the game and i garrantee you will enjoy and love the game! what do you have to lose, its free to play!
[TS] Coffee;-;So you're looking at the Hat Simulator 2 reviews eh? TF2 is fine as wine..... An important point before we begin... Looking Good > Being Good With a few hours shy of 900 hours on this game it's about time I wrote a decent review for this black hole which has consumed my entire social life. Here it goes.... Now, you will most likely be eying up the Big three Valve games at the moment, Counter Strike: Global Offensive, Hat Simulator TF2 and Dota 2. All three are unique and have little in common but all great none the less. If you have tried the other two and looking towards TF2 you have definitely come to the right game. My personal opinion would be in favor of TF2 over CS, Dota and most other steam games, this is primarily because of the Game's community more than any other reason. The smooth and fun gameplay is also likeable. TF2 only has a tenth of the hackers, Private Profile scum, smurfs and Trollers than CS:GO does so a preferred choice if you are against any of the player types listed. The community is so clean Gaben must have used Flash professional floor cleaner on it... (I haven't played much of DOTA 2 so I can't say anything about their community besides the infamous stereotype of Angry, competitive Russians destroying the game....) Don't take this the wrong way though, TF2 does have it's share of Toxic players but nowhere as near as bad as CS:GO's 20 year out-of-date pickle jar level of toxicity. TF2's is more like a lukewarm glass of milk out in the sun. Sorry Counter Strike..... The atmosphere in TF2 is perfect. 80% of games are enjoyable and the entire team gets along well (or just doesn't fight.) This game is a guaranteed good time and you can leave at any time if it isn't enjoyable. This is another aspect which sets it apart from other competitive games, you will never be stuck in a game you don't want to be in...... In comparison, TF2 is very 'laid back' and games are comical and have a degree of stupid/crazy fun. If you aren't a very serious gamer FILTHY CASUAL this will most likely be your cup of tea. Also enjoyable for the more competitive among you as there are teams you can join and 'highlander' tournaments. (Sadly no ranked matchmaking). TF2 is well made and all weapons are balanced and unique Besides you fithy Lock and Load. 3 Pills? Gaben how could you? Don't get me started on the mini-sentry.... it can take more of a beating than an overhealed heavy . To be fair the game is more or less balanced and no areas of the game are off limits to the F2P scum players. Besides the almighty hats which everyone craves are the true core of the game. Some important commonplace rules of thumb could include: - HAT = SKILL - NO HAT = NO SKILL - UNUSUAL HAT = GUD PLAYER - GIBUS = NOOB F2P (unless it's painted australium gold, that makes you the swaggest of them all) - F2P + headshot kill = NOOB HACKER Those are a few need-to-know terms in surviving the pub chat. There are many more.... I can't mention them all. If played with mates there shallith by significant 'banter' and a good time. 10 / 10 - MLG snoypah clan (XxFiddyClarkFanbasexX#FaZe) Gaben plz bless my soul with gud unboxes. This review was terrible.... I will edit later. I'm sorry you had to view it in this state....
Regal;-;please help me i've lost my life over this game
ptsd_V1M;-;Full of s
Toroi;-;My hours. help. I wrote something for real! These hours are legit, I played this game a lot in the past to avoid some tragic stuff in real life. I was young and didn't really have my gaming consoles anymore because of my brothers and I had a really bad pc, which i still own. TF2 was one of the games i could play pretty well on this pc but with horrid graphics, but it was one of the more fun games I installed. I met some real cool and nice people on this game as well as people who i plan to keep by my side. The community back then was more humble compared to nowadays. You have competitive gamers who spam their bind keys with unfunny/gross jokes and very obnoxious people who are either yelling at you or telling you to do specific things to win the game. When really, it doesn't even matter if you win or lose. However, you also have those people who are really awesome and you may meet some nice friends along the way! Although you never know what kinda person you're going to meet on this game. In my honest opinion, if you want to have a game to just waste time on (and money) or just mess around with people you know (which is what I do now), this is perfect. Esspecially the mann vs. machine co-op. I mainly play that now. Although to me, the game lost its touch, update wise, and I moved onto other games. I believe it's worth a shot to try it out but other than that, I'd keep it as a casual game. I don't think the competitive scene is worth getting into anymore because it's being flooded by crude people. Atleast from my experiance after over about 4+ years of playing it just got worse and worse. You will eventually be tied into drama even if you try to avoid it. You'll be more stressed than actually having fun, I'll tell you that! Although in all seriousness, this game is losing its touch and probably isn't worth making it your main game MAINLY because the updates they've been releasing are becoming very dull and not as great as they used to be. BUT, it's a great game to just play to pass the time and have fun! All you'll really notice nowdays is...people really love to trade more than actually play. Living off as a free to play would be very tough and you'd need to be patient with items you would want, unless you got that MONEY! Hope this helps. One last thing, I am not saying this game is bad in any way. I am saying that it's worth trying and playing with friends, or even meeting people! Although there are some downsides that you won't like, such as some stuff I pointed out above. Strictly towards the community. I personally think you should have this game as a side game rather than your come home to play sorta thing. Have it as a once in a while game, because it's nothing to be big about, unless you really do not like most of the millions of other games out there. Just give it a shot and see what you think! Have fun <3
Vale;-;Can you name any other unmodded First Person Shooter that lets you play as a cocky and fast Bostonian that can slap the hell out of urine throwing Australian campers with a fresh atlantic fish wrapped in fine christmas lights, eat a bucket of fried proccessed poultry over their corpses, and then get hit with an exploding cannonball launched from an African-Celtic one eyed alcoholic who can leap yards into the air from his own explosives while weilding a mystic ancient talking ghost claymore? I thought so.
A bLuE cOw;-;If you bind forward to a button on your mouse, you can play pyro and eat at the same time
UnfunnyName;-;The vicious cycle of Team fortress 2 First when you'll arrive in the game, you'll want Weapons, tons of them. Then you'll see that everyone has hats, and you'll want these, a tons of them. Then you'll realize that hats doesn't matter, only skill count, so you'll want a lot of skills, tons of them. Then new weapons will be added, and you'll want them, all of them. Then a new hat will be added and you'll want it, cause it'll be fancy on your main class. Then you'll realize again, that you don't give a damn about hats, all is about is skill. Then when you have waited for 3 years, new weapons will be added, and you'll want them. And then you realize that you spent like 2000 hours of your life for this, met great friends, and you'll have a server where's you feeling like home, and you discovered so much things via the community, it learnt you so much. Then the rude reality of life, bring you on earth, and this game is here, Waiting for you to play 1,2,3... hours, and you'll be happy to see that all your good friend are still here.
[CotC] King Conga Gandhi;-;Oh, and if you're wondering, the new update, Gun Mettle, did NOT ruin TF2 for me. I actually find it a LOT more fun now! I think Jerma summed up this game pretty nicely... "Maybe you got like two Pyros that just installed the game ten minutes ago. They don't have any hats, they're spraying  and they're having a blast. They might even be at the wrong point. They might be going backwards to the point that's already been capped. On the same team, there's a Scout with a Hale's Own Scattergun. He's got 18 kills with a 17 killstreak, he just got 18. He's going 'I just got 18, sick!' He runs up the stairs, he's trying his  off. He's get *beeping noises* dodging the 'Oh, the sentry almost got me!' He looks up to his left when he gets up the stairs on Gorge and there's two sandwich Heavies having a ing picnic. So he stops for a second and goes, 'Two... nnnggh!' so he walks forward and gets blown up by a soldier's rocket next door... ...The two sandwich Heavies then decide to move their picnic. There's ants. 'There's ants here, honey. I wanna get out of here.' So they get up, they pack their sandwiches, pack up their lunches, and their breakfast, and whatever the  they're eating. They get up and walk toward the door to go to RED because they think, 'That spot near the A point for RED is pretty good.' They walk out the door, and they see four Level 3 Sentry Guns pointing at them. They get shot a million times and blow up, and there's like nine Engineers swinging their wrenches in random directions. The BLU Scout, at this point, respawns, and walks by the at least 3-4 statues because we all know there's four people AFK when you play this game, you go by the museum of people standing still. He walks out the door and readies his weapon, he's ready, 'I'm going to get another 20 killstreak, just you watch Gaben, I'm going to praise Gaben!' And he goes forward and starts shooting, and he gets backstabbed by a Spy that has been sitting with the Cloak and Dagger in the corner for at least the last 68 seconds." Normally when I do reviews, I turn into a critic and start to examine that game, pointing out every little flaw and pro and determining a final score. However, Team Fortress 2 (or TF2 for short) helped me make so many memories that if I actually tried to make a fair review on it, it would still be way too biased to consider a valid review. Team Fortress 2, is, obviously, an amazing game. The teamplay is necessary and going out and attacking solo may be difficult. You need teammates in order to survive and win. The graphics are unique to a shooter game and really makes it a special game. I'm not here to explain the gameplay or graphics or whatnot. I love this game because of its charm. The game has such a unique and diverse cast of characters, you can't help to love all of them at some point. Scout is cocky and overconfident. Spy, another one of the characters in the game, is technically Scout's father. Soldier is a crazed WWII American patriot. He never actually joined the Army, but instead, he had his own personal Nazi killing spree. His roommate was a magician named Merasmus, who grew to hate Soldier. Pyro is mysterious, but portrays the world as one big happy paradise, known as Pyroland. Demoman is a Scottish alcoholic who, due to Merasmus, lost his eye that is now haunted. Heavy, although he appears to be dim-witted, is actually very intelligent and looks over three sisters. Engineer is very intelligent as well, and his grandfather was a major contributor to keeping the war with RED and BLU continue. Medic isn't fond of normal forms of medicine, but is still an important member nonetheless. Sniper is from New Zealand, but was raised in Australia. He prefers working from a distance and his backstory is very similar to Superman's. Spy is the master of disguise, and is technically Scout's father, as said before. Of all the characters, he appears to be the most "mature" and appears to be the ringleader at many times. Not only that, but the game has an interesting story. I would not like to get too detailed with it. However, it makes little to no sense but is still funny, engaging, and gives TF2 much more depth. There is also a storyline that takes place a few years later where Mann Co. is being attacked, so the mercenaries have to defend it, called Mann vs. Machine. This game mode ties in with the TF comics, which explain many characters' backstories and is currently still in the works as of this review. The other comics (all of which can be found on TF2's official website) are all funny and charming in their own way as well. The community has been quite debatable on how nice it is at many times, but in the end, it's still an overall great community. I've seen people give out stuff, others mentor some of the newbs (something I do as well) along with much, much more. Yes. the game is considered a "pay-to-win game" but it isn't necessarily a pay-to-win game. With lots of patience, you will get what you want from the game, whether it be hats, weapons, or whatever it is you want. The game has a learning curve that isn't too steep, but become dedicated and you'll fall in love with it. No matter how many times you rage to a W+M1 pyro that destroyed your 16 killstreak, or cheer when you unbox an Unusual, or maybe discover a few friends or learn a few things, Team Fortress 2 has been a huge part of my PC gaming life and without it, I would be as bored as hell. I cannot recommend this game enough, and I hope that many more memories are made on here. Valve may be cash cows, but you can't help but admit they are amazing when it comes to making games. Portal, Half-Life 2, Counter-Strike, but this game stands out from the rest to me. Do I recommend this game? Yes, yes, yes, YES.
Nerd House;-;Team Fortress 2. Being ranked as the third most-played game [steamcharts.com] on Steam, Team Fortress 2 is probably one of the best free-to-play games we've got. Why is it so popular? Let's take a look, shall we? First off, the obvious: It's free. 100% free. This means its accessible to everyone on Steam. This is just the icing on the cake though. What really shines about TF2 is the game itself. Team Fortress 2 usually consists of two teams (Red and Blue) going head to head against each other. Sometimes fulfilling certain objectives or just downright killing each other. There are many, many maps and modes, such as Payload, Capture Points, and Mann VS Machine. But the general idea no matter the map or mode is to KILL EVERYTHING THAT MOVES! And my god, is it fun to do so. The game has 9 playable mercenaries, each actually being a certain "class". Each class is divided into 3 different roles: Offense, Defense, and Support. Let's go over each role and class. Offensive roles specialize in dealing damage to the opposing team. These are your main attack force. Scouts are the speedy hit and run class, with the ability to double or even triple jump depending on equipped items. Soldiers pack a bit more firepower with their rocket launchers, which gives them not only power, but mobility due to the ability known as "rocket jumping". The Pyro is great at setting the opposition on fire, as well as extinguishing burning teammates using an airblast. Defensive roles serve to inhibit enemy access and to hold enemies back from vital points on the map. Overall, the defensive group has the most firepower of all the groups. Demomen can safeguard areas with stickybombs that they can detonate when enemies come by. Heavies are great for mowing down incoming troops and pushing back forces. Heavies can also keep enemies in an area while whittling their health for teammates to finish off. Engineers can build Sentry Guns for effective area defense, as well as build Teleporters and Dispensers for logistical support of the team. Support classes cannot hold the fight on their own, but their specialized abilities can tip the balance in their team's favor. They offer the offensive and defensive classes an extra edge in battle and can help turn the tide of the game. Whether crippling the enemy advance from behind or keeping teammates healed, the support classes are always handy to have around. Medics are the team healers, capable of providing numerous buffs depending on their equipments. Spies are great for sneak attacks or eiliminating key threats. Snipers excel at long range, also eliminating key threats, as well as extinguishing burning teammates with jarate and providing a damage boost to teammates. Next, let's look at the presentation. TF2 has a very unqiue art style. It's somewhat cartoonish, but very appealing. It's simple, and un-complex. But it doesn't need to be complex. It's simplicity is it's strength. Everything is detailed enough to where you can easily tell whats going on, what a specific model or item is, and they all stand out. The soundtrack is also very appealing and catchy, especially the main theme. I personally have it as a ringtone/alarm tone on my smartphone! :) One of the best aspects of TF2 is the Steam Workshop. Users can submit designs for items and weapons, and possibly have them added to the game! A very lucrative sub-market has also emerged from this game in the form of the Crate Keys. That's a whole different ballgame in and of itself, so we won't get into it here. During normal gameplay on most servers, you can obtain random items, weapons, and sometimes crates, and taunts....through the item drops system. You can only receive so many drops per week, and you will get them randomly as you play. You can use these items and weapons to customise your mercenary's loadout, or you can use them to craft other items, hats, and weapons. You can take multiples of items and craft them into Scrap, then Reclaimed Metal, then Refined Metal. You can then use these metals to craft specific class weapons/items, among other things. The crafting system is simple yet robust, with lots of possiblities. Some of it is very luck based. You can take some very common items and end up crafting a super rare hat or gun worth a lot of moolah on the Steam Market! All-in-all, Team Fortress 2 is just a very fun game. Endless entertainment awaits when you start up this game, especially if you play with friends on your favorite server. Probably the best free-to-play game on Steam. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=383235670 Highly Recommended Be sure to check out Nerd House Gaming for more reviews!
Mr Squiggles;-;How to play Team Fortress 2: Be polite, Be efficient, Have a pan to kill everyone you meet.
pacsomepuppes;-;> I was only 10 years old. > I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. > I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. > Then I got my first hat, The gibus. > Suddenly everything changed. > I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' > I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. > I had so many hats, I loved them all. > But then someone traded me, I accepted. > They offered an Unusual for all my hats. > It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. > But no Unusual, He scammed me. > I lost it all. > I was so sad I cried for hours. > Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. > I went to bed after praying. > I felt warm. > I looked behind me, It was Gaben! > He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning Team Captain. > Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning Team Captain and I was naked. > I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. > Hats are love. Hats are life. TF2: 11/10 Best hat simulator 1981 Overall, I'd give this game 9 out of 10 Gabe Narwalls Shoutout to ObsidianObelisk17 for making a youtube vid of this Showout to TheDisableBore for making a comic of this I cringe re reading this :smug:
Flexi;-;Ruined my life and cost me over 500. 10/10 would recommend to friends and family
Special;-;Team Fortress 2 is the most realistic hat simulator created to date. There is absolutely no other simulator quite like this one. The first time you start the simulator, you join a server where you can play a minigame where you show off your hats and items. If you kill a person three times in a row in the minigame, you get your very first hat: the Gibus. This is where it really starts; To play the simulator correctly, you have to spend money in the market place, made by Valve. After that, while you play the minigame, you can find hats which you can trade for, or collect! There is many other people who wants to collect and trade hats, just like you! After you collect enough items and/or hats, try joining a trade server! There, the REAL fun begins! Good luck, and beware of ending up poor!
Spengy;-;the convict and scot are op. also bread 9/10
Sheila_Bear;-;NOT A SINGLE FORTRESS IN THE GAME. VERY MISLEADING. WAS TOLD GAME WAS A "HAT STIMULATOR." HATS REMAIN THOROUGHLY UNMOTIVATED. OVERALL VERY DISAPPOINTING. 2/10 WOULD NOT BANG.
flappyhook;-;i love this game.
JoJo!;-;A-At first I was scared of Spy-senpai. I told him to be gentle, But he was harsh and backstabbed me hard~
aaroncsn;-;It is a very fun game. Once you start playing it, you will never leave again.
L | Cpt. Jack Sparrow;-;Not even words can express the greatness of this game...
maz;-;Have you even wondered why does the pyro play the air guitar on his axe? Why does the medic pretend that his saw is a violin? What's up with the corny Texan guitar? Why the hell is there a Dance Dance Immolation achievement? That's because you are not in on the ruse. TF2 is not a shooter game. It's a rhythm game. You can have excellent reflex and aim and still get outplayed by a player with a better timing who through his understanding of the game mechanics and his immediate environment will force you to play to his tune. Someone who will forestall your attack and press on, intuitively and instinctively, without leaving you any room for action other than a panicked defense. This may sound familiar to a seasoned gamer and should not be surprising. In XVII century Miyamoto Musashi writes in The Book of Five Rings: "There is timing in everything. Timing in strategy cannot be mastered without a great deal of practice [...] Timing and rhythm are involved in the military arts, shooting bows and guns, and riding horses. [...] There is timing in the whole life of the warrior, in his thriving and declining, in his harmony and discord." The Book of Five Rings describes Ni Ten Ichi Ryu, or The Way of Strategy as applied to sword fighting. The focus of this school is a straightforward, thoroughly utilitarian style relying on timing, strength and throwing the opponent off-balance. Lets take a look how some of its techniques apply to TF2. Attitude No-Attitude: Whenever you parry, hit, spring, strike or touch the enemy's cutting sword, you must cut the enemy in the same movement. It is essential to attain this. If you think only of hitting, springing, striking or touching the enemy, you will not be able actually to cut him. More than anything, you must be thinking of carrying your movement through to cutting him. As applied to TF2, you should instinctively choose the right weapon to counter the enemy and make every ammo count. The difference between one well and one poorly placed shotgun shot is half of your life. Make sure it counts. Ken No Sen: Advance with as strong a spirit as possible, and when you reach the enemy move with your feet a little quicker than normal, unsettling him and overwhelming him sharply.  A good example is a pyro attacking with the powerjack or soldier with the concheror. Inexperienced players will panic when faced with such a threat. Tai No Sen: When the enemy attacks, remain undisturbed but feign weakness. As the enemy reaches you, suddenly move away indicating that you intend to jump aside, then dash in attacking strongly as soon as you see the enemy relax. Convenient in confined spaces. Feign retreat for a medkit, turn around the corner and renew your attack. Also relevant for triple-jumping scouts and stairstabbing spies. Tai Tai No Sen: When the enemy makes a quick attack, you must attack strongly and calmly, aim for his weak point as he draws near, and strongly defeat him. Or, if the enemy attacks calmly, you must observe his movements and, with your body rather floating, join in with his movements as he draws near. Move quickly and cut him strongly.  Important for amby spies and huntsman snipers. Dont panic, maintain your distance and aim for the head or go for a sidestab/bushwacka crit while timing your movement appropriately. To Hit the Enemy In One Timing: When you have closed with the enemy, to hit him as quickly and directly as possible, while you see that he is still undecided. The timing of hitting before the enemy decides to withdraw, break or hit, is this In One Timing". Note that this is not ambushing. This is about taking initiative automatically without overthinking when your enemy has not yet responded. The Body in Place of the Long Sword: According to the enemy's cutting method, you can dash against him with your body first, and afterwards cut with the sword. Do not use the melee only as the last resort. If your opponent is momentarily disoriented close in and attack with the melee to confuse him, then take a step back and finish off with a secondary. Using melee when possible also saves you reload time. Do not use against suicidal classes with explosive projectiles. Depending on the Place: Chase [the enemy] towards awkward places, and try to keep him with his back to awkward places. When the enemy gets into an inconvenient position, do not let him look around, but conscientiously chase him around and pin him down. Always chase the enemy into bad footholds, obstacles at the side, and so on, using the virtues of the place to establish predominant positions from which to fight. The use of environment is not just pushing the enemy off cliffs. Force the opponent into rocks, cactuses and other obstacles that will break the flow of his movement and give you the advantage. To Know the Times: To know the enemy's disposition in battle. Is it flourishing or waning? When in a duel, you must forestall the enemy and attack when you have first recognized his school of strategy, perceived his quality and his strong and weak points. Attack in an unsuspecting manner, knowing his metre and modulation and the appropriate timing. If you are thorougly conversant with strategy, you will recognise the enemy's intentions and thus have many opportunities to win.  A crucial element of each duel. Give it some thought. To Hold Down a Shadow: In single combat, hold down the enemy's strong intention with a suitable timing, and defeat him by forestalling him with this timing. Particularly important when playing Pyro. Use the airblast to counter the enemy advance and position yourself for a kill. To crush: In single combat, if the enemy is less skillful than ourselves, if his rhythm is disorganized, or if he has fallen into evasive or retreating attitudes, we must crush him straightaway, with no concern for his presence and without allowing him space for breath. It is essential to crush him all at once. The primary thing is not to let him recover his position even a little. Dont let a weakened enemy retreat. Consider that you have a much better chance killing him when he is weakened and retreating than after he returns healed. Do not let deadringer spies escape. To throw in confusion: Observing the enemy's spirit, we can make him think, "Here? There? Like that? Like this? Slow? Fast?" Victory is certain when the enemy is caught up in a rhythm which confuses his spirit. In single combat, we can confuse the enemy by attacking with varied techniques when the chance arises. Feint a thrust or cut, or make the enemy think you are going to close with him, and when he is confused you can easily win. Once again, force the enemy to play to your tune and abandon his usual approach. Airblasting or dodging projectiles, changing distance and switching to melee when appropriate is a good example. TL;DR Those techniques share certain common themes. To become a better player simply follow the Rules of the Way of Strategy: 1. Do not think dishonestly. (You wont become better if you dont face your enemy directly) 2. The Way is in training. (Practice your timing, counters and approaches) 3. Become acquainted with every art. (Know all your weapons and map geometry) 4. Know the Ways of all professions. (Know all the classes) 5. Distinguish between gain and loss in worldly matters. (Know when to retreat and which enemies to prioritize. Dont die blindly following one enemy) 6. Develop intuitive judgment and understanding for everything. 7. Perceive those things which cannot be seen. (Intuit into others intents, spycheck) 8. Pay attention even to trifles. (Listen carefully to the sounds, pay attention to your peripheral vision including kill feed) 9. Do nothing which is of no use. (Make sure your actions are purposeful)
sirgoodness;-;Team Fortress 2 has been regularly updated since its inception in 2007, after over nine years in development. Due to all these updates, the game has actually taken on several incarnations. In other words, I will be individually reviewing the following three separate games: Team Fortress 2 (2007-2010) Hat Fortress 2 (2010-2012) Dressup Fortress 2 (2012-present) But first, General: -You can regularly defy the laws of physics in too many ways to be listed. -Scouts can fly by flapping their legs. -A can of soda turns you into the Super-Matrix; you can make bullets dodge you. -Some pistols can make you jump higher or fully absorb the impact of falling at any velocity. -Coating someone in milk and then beating them up will cure your cancer. -Steel-toed boots make shooting rockets at your feet less unhealthy. -Whipping people makes them run faster. -A big Russian guy can survive as many direct hits from an anti-tank missile as a Russian T-72 tank can. -Blowing into a seashell can patch the gunshot wounds of everyone around you. -Flamethrowers can also shoot a powerful blast of air that can send people flying or rockets back to their maker. -You can beat people to death with a bottle of whiskey. -You can decapitate people with a golf club. -Harmless explosives. -Eating a sandvich will cure AIDS, mend katana wounds, and treat your erectile dysfunction. -Hitting a machine with a wrench will fix it, upgrade it, and resupply it. -Dispensers generate ammo for your weapon and pills for your back pain. -A remote control with one big red button can be used to destroy one of any four buildings of your choosing. -You can shoot up morphine with a crossbow. -You can use a beam of light to turn someones exterior skin and clothing into pure titanium armor. -Pretending to play the violin with a bonesaw used for amputation will cure the common cold. -Urine is more effective than a fire extinguisher. -Frenchmen with ski masks are incapable of stabbing their victims in the neck. When they encounter Australians with shields on their backs, theyll stab the shield first Making the shield disintegrate. -A pocket watch can partially absorb the damage caused by a rocket, create a deceased doppelganger of you, all while you become invisible and walk away. -If you backstab someone with an icicle, theyll instantly transform into a highly-durable ice sculpture. Team Fortress 2 (2007-2010) This was a team-based first person shooter involving two identical teams, differing only in color and artistic design, vying for control of various strategic locales around the world. You could play as one of nine cripplingly overspecialized classes. The various classes would have to pool their strengths together and cooperate in order to prevail over the opposing team. However, this was easier said than done as communication and teamwork were (and still are) generally foreign concepts. Teams would have to beat each other up and steal their briefcases, beat each other up and steal their stage lighting platforms, and beat each other up to push a high explosive bomb cart into a pit. Hats were just a cool side thing. Many people would stand around and do nothing on dedicated idle servers so that they could amass the metal necessary to craft themselves a new hat. Overall, Team Fortress 2 was a fun and highly addictive game whether or not there was a team or no team involved. Over 9 out of 9, worth the weight. Hat Fortress 2 (2010-2012) The Mann-Conomy Update, released on September 30, 2010, marked the end of Team Fortress 2 and the birth of Hat Fortress 2. Players no longer needed to idle to get hats. They could also buy them, trade for them, and even sell them for other hats. In addition, keys were also introduced, giving players the ability to throw away their parents or their own hard-earned money on opening virtual crates in the hopes of getting virtual hats. More often than not, they ended up getting worthless virtual guns. The Mann-Conomy fever quickly swept over Team Fortress 2, reducing it to a side game. Hat Fortress 2 was about accumulating as many hats as possible by any means necessary and then using the Team Fortress 2 mini-game to show them off to others. The free-to-play update in 2011 further enlarged the player base, increasing the popularity of Hat Fortress 2, its modes, and related fun mini-games. As Hat Fortress 2 was further refined and developed, new elements were added, including unusuals and non-hat cosmetic items. Eventually, so many new cosmetics came in that Hat Fortress 2 gradually evolved into another game. 11 hats out of 10. Dressup Fortress 2 (2012-Present) This is the current and ultimate form of Team Fortress 2. The game is centered on assembling a complete outfit for each of the classes that you play. You can acquire the components for your dream outfit by unboxing crates of all shapes and sizes and/or by implementing any one of the many trading strategies out there. You can show off your outfits, topped off with exorbitant unusual hats, in a multitude of ways. You can do the conga, hi-five other folks adorned with fancy and quirky outfits, play intense games of rock, paper, scissors, or play Jack Blacks guitar. You can also play whatever vestiges remain of the old Team Fortress 2. You could also play Mann vs. Machine and acquire stock weapons with robotic skulls hanging from them or perhaps even become The Man with the Golden Gun. If neither of those are satisfactory, there are a wide range of other mini-games to play, some of which have been around since the days of old Team Fortress 2. They include, but are not limited to: Versus Saxton Hale, Freak Fortress 2, Jailbreak, Balloon Race, TF2 Kart, magic spells in Halloween event maps, Slender Fortress, Surf maps, Jump maps, and TF2Ware. In conclusion, Dressup Fortress 2 does provide something for everyone, so I guess its alright. 11/10 iterations of Gaben. And my favorite class is the Spy. Thanks, and have fun!
AEJG;-;Enjoyable game for chillin
Kinson;-;This game is good look at how many hours i have on this game 10/10
ThySquire;-;- Bird headed mercs - Conga everywhere - Hats I've seen enough to know that nobody's wallet can escape now.
Abubuyoi;-;Wasted too much time on this game. I regret nothing besides spending my lunch money on TF2 ;_;
Ice-Y;-;Its simply the best
Kungmitsu;-;Five snipers on team Cart remains stationary Many rounds of this
Mr TF2 Hats;-;Best multiplayer game ever created!
KC;-;This simulator perfectly models an active economy. You can trade items of zero functionality for large sums of money. You can also meet tons of friendly individuals who want to "try on" your hats! I was also told that there was an easter egg located somewhere that turned this game into an FPS, where you could work as a team and accomplish objectives!
AlmightyTuna;-;Well,Team Fortress 2 is definitely unique FPS on market. With magnificent voice acting and animation Valve managed to put soul and personality in classes of TF2. Classes are divided in 3 groups ( offensive, defensive and support), easy to play but difficult to master. It really doesn't matter if you are completely new to FPS or avid gamer, from it's wide variety of game modes Team Fortress 2 offers something for everybody. Game is free to play so give it a try. ;)
Dr. Love Cat;-;Best game ever played.
Ken Setsu;-;Review made by Kurakao, who had 2,566 hours of Team Fortress 2 while writing this review on 5.10.2014 (DD/MM/YYYY) Includes: 1. TF2 from my PoV (Point of View) 2. About Team Fortress 2 3. Experiences & details 4.1-3. About game-modes 5. Competitive in a nutshell 6. Recommendations from it 7. My own experiences and why 8. TL;DR (Too Long; Didn't Read aka this whole thing nutshelled in a sentence.) 9. My rating 1. What can I say? This is the reason I downloaded Steam. Because I wanted so hard to test this game out. I saw this game everywhere and I was always wondering like: "Hmm.. What kind of a game this might be? Like Counter Strike mixed with it's own weirdness." And I was half-true. 2. Team Fortress 2 is like mixing the Quake games, Counter-Strike, and a bit of fashion and hats all the way. This is the reason TF2 is so fun; You get to do any kind of hat/misc combinations (cosmetics these days) and you can create your own individual looks how people recognize you from others. I remember using funny combinations, so people recognized me easily and were like: "Oh hey Kurakao! I just noticed you came in because I saw that awesome set of yours." 3. Team Fortress 2 is extremely fun, team-based (depends what style you play. I play DM (DeathMatch) alot, which is basically just killing with no point), somehow restricted with the 9 classes, but doesn't restrict enough to not be individually weird-styled, and it's extremely addictive . 4.1. I have never played anything as addictive as Team Fortress 2. This is extremely fun to play, and you can play any kind of gameplay you like: You can go either Saxton Hale (vsh_) maps to run away from the evil boss monsters that is controlled by a single player and he chases trying to kill you. 4.2. Then there's my favourite customs: PropHunt, which is the same as in GMOD; you disguise as an object and the enemies are trying to catch you. Firing your weapon decreases your hp so you need to be careful not to spam. 4.3. Then there are normal based maps; PayLoad, Capture Point, King of The Hill, etc. etc. which is hardly-based on teamwork and who plays what. It usually costs the team a victory if they are full-team Snipers or Spies or whatsoever, unless they are pro-tier players. But usually it ends up the team who has a better class-support, wins. ----You can stop reading here and scroll down if you don't want to know anything about competitive--- 5. Then there was competitive where I played some of my time. I was only Division 6 and I played as a Roamer. I had alot of friends who were either Division 6, or they were Division 5 or better, and some of them were as good as low-Division 2-1. Competitive is extremely fun, but it can be stressful sometimes if you take it too seriously. 6. I recommend taking it easy and having fun while having the pressure at the same time. This part requires great communication skills, and you need to have atleast a bit of social skills to learn to handle this. It's a great advantage if you play with your team other than in just scrims or officials. Play with them normally and chat often with them to link up a true friendship and that is what makes you indestructible. 7. I quitted competitive myself, because it was too hard for me, and I couldn't handle the "tryhard" you have to do in competitive. It also might take a long time to find a true team you want to play in, and NEVER underrestimate being a substitute spot, because that might be extremely crucial in some moments. -------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 8. TL;DR: Team Fortress 2 is extremely addictive and gives tons of good memories. Best game I've ever played myself. 9. 10/10
NoisySaber;-;Apparently, Hat is much more expensive than a Rocket Launcher. So, Yea. Hat is now confirmed as a ultimate weapon for World War 3. Ten/10
VCB;-;It's ok.
II;-;This game is so crap you can't stop playing it.
Hless;-;A game that will leave a mark on the history.
routemasters;-;First I time came across with TF2 was after I bought an Orange Box from the store, I was dying for HL2. Didn't know it was coming with this cartoon-like game called TF2, and interestingly I almost was going to ask Steam Support to remove this game from my game library after watching a clip on Youtube, seriously, I was like what the $$. But was too lazy for that. So time passes, looking to something new, I see this TF2 thingy again in my library, so whatever, let's download and give it a shot. Now, after a year, I wish I had submitted a ticket to Steam Support and got this thing removed from my account. Clocked 1000+ hours and I don't know where and how this will stop. There are two things you can't apparently clear, one is radioactive contamination the other one being addictive to TF2. Oh, and supposedly this game came free with Orange Box. Nice play, Valve, first fix is always free, isn't it?
youtube/happysedits | trade.tf;-;TF2 is love, TF2 is life Gayben is love, Gayben is life Hat is love, Hat is life Conga is love, Conga is lie Burning hat in real life = 0$ Burning hat in TF2 = 4654897712354874654$ And here is the recipe for Bourbon Pecan Chicken Chicken breasts are coated in a pecan breading, and fried in a skillet. Then a rich bourbon sauce is poured over them before serving. This is a fabulous recipe that my Mother gave me from a upscale restaurant in New York. It is to die for. ENJOY!! 1/2 cup finely chopped pecans 1/2 cup dry bread crumbs 8 skinless, boneless chicken breast halves 1/4 cup clarified butter, melted 1/4 cup Dijon mustard 1/4 cup dark brown sugar 2 2/3 tablespoons bourbon whiskey 2 tablespoons soy sauce 1 teaspoon Worcestershire sauce 3/4 cup unsalted butter, chilled and cut into small cubes 1/2 cup sliced green onions Stir together the pecans, bread crumbs, and 2 tablespoons of clarified butter. Spread the mixture out on a plate. Press the chicken breasts into the mixture to coat on both sides. Heat the remaining 2 tablespoons of clarified butter in a large skillet over medium heat. Place the coated chicken breasts in the pan, and fry on both sides until nicely browned and chicken meat is cooked through, about 10 minutes per side. In a small saucepan, whisk together the Dijon mustard, brown sugar, bourbon, soy sauce, and Worcestershire sauce until smooth. Bring to a simmer over medium-low heat, then remove from the burner, and whisk in the 3/4 cup of unsalted butter one piece at a time. Do not return to the heat. Arrange the chicken breasts on a large serving plate. Pour the sauce over the chicken, and sprinkle with green onion. TF2 2007: Alright new game, about war, this is nice! TF2 Now: HATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSNEWTAUNTHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATHATSH
ACid;-;You had a bad day? Too much work? Not much time to play? Play a match of TF2 for 20-50 mins and refresh your mood. It's Fun. It's casual. It's entertaining. It's refreshing. Best of ALL? It's FREE.
|RH|;-;TF2 a.k.a Team Fortress 2 is a great game in my opinion. It has 9 classes, Pyro, Engineer a.k.a engie, Demoman a.k.a demo, Heavy, Spy, Scout, Medic, Soldier, and Sniper. I liked that the game has lots of diffrent maps so it never gets boring! I recommend this game to anyone who likes animated games and people who also like the game Half Life and Half Life 2.
Masskiller;-;Team Fortress 2 has to be one of my favorite hat simulators of all time I wasted nearly 100$ on this simulator Help me please
Max Box  ~ Back July 16/17?;-;Funny thing is, this game has a secret function where if you slip it $20 you get to become a god.
A Fancy Horned Mammal;-;Great game lots of fun
UrethraFranklin;-;You can not call yourself a person without this game, I mean come on, its free.
[GmT] GamerButters;-;Team Fortress 2 is cool and i like it its so good :)
MediMuffin;-;One of the best games i've played!
alex;-;Team Fortress 2 was one of the best games I had ever had the privilege to experience, a few years ago, of course. TF2 is no longer the unique, team-based game it used to be. It has been narrowed down to an unfair, unbalanced mess of "who has the shiniest pink hats on trade_minecraft," "how fast can you get kicked from every valve server because some stupid kids think it's their private achievement server." and "how to get outskilled by someone using a more broken, overpowered weapon/class." Team Fortress 2 also hosts one of the nastiest communities to date, right below Garry's Mod and DayZ. I guarentee you, every server you join, you will be greeted by several bronies and furries spamming lenny faces, stupid Shrek memes, and pootis. If you like getting penalized for simply playing the game, this is the one for you. If you're 10 and still think memes are funny, this is the one for you. If you like having an overall bad time, this is the one for you. Team Fortress 2 also suffers from a severe lack of content updates. Every few months that go by, they will add more cosmetics and taunts to ruin the game and community even further. They DO NOT add balanced maps or weapons. They DO NOT balance the current game mechanics such as pellet/damage spread and random crits. They DO NOT Penalize those who are literally unable to play the game at an acceptable level. For example, if you get a team full of idiots who installed Steam the previous day, they get to stay with their 300-700 ping, slimeball community avatars, and inability to speak English in English servers. They will also vote kick you. Usually selecting the "No reason given" option, for they cannot speak English. Overall, if you are really looking forward to making your day a bad one, play the steaming pile of  that is Team Fortress 2.
Shinobi no mono with standards;-;TF2 has changed...It's no longer about skill, stealing intelligence, capture control points, fun or even hats. It's an endless series of taunting and dancing of conga, performed by players and bots. TF2 and its consumption of life, has become a well-feeding machine...TF2 has changed...Strange people carry strange weapons, use strange hats and mics. Servers control. Trading control. Statistic control. Everything is monitored and kept under control. The age of deterrence has become the age of control. TF2 has changed... When everything is under control, "fun"...becomes routine.
g 64;-;bought this hat simulator back in late 08 early 09, i dont ing know, the game's been good since, aka Hat Fortress 2: Hat fortress harder.
][-WarPig;-;Being an old school player of the Fortress genre I have completely fell in love with the way TeamFortress2 handles now. I was here during beta / Launch and experienced the first year and realized it was good but needed more time. I took 5 yrs away came back and the game is 100% amazing and probably one of the best Free 2 Play games out! CPU specs can be sub par and still playable and the overall community is generally nice/ friendly.
Jim the jackal;-;Have you ever had the craving to buy a strange weapon then spend all day leveling it up so your friends think you are cool? Then this is the best game for you! First job, get a strange either by wasting your money on uncrating, crafting all your hard found weapons to buy a strange from the overpriced scumbags on Tf2.Outpost, or better yet be a scumbag yourself and scam a newcomer who has just had this misfortune to uncrate and give him/her a scrap for his/her recently unboxed strange. Step two, locate a strange level up sever don't worry they are very easy to find due to the sheer amount of people wanting to level up their stranges so badly. And final step go and kill some idle people on the strange level up sever. Now all your friends/eniemes will think next time you kill them WOW they got 16854972 kills in one day? Defiently didn't go on a strange level up sever. 10/10 Best game
Taste The Painbow_;-;Ruined My Life. 5 Stars.
Jack of Blades;-;Wait, what happened to CS:GO? Where's my Karambit? Why are the graphics different? Where is Dust?!
KENSINGTON;-;Get it, love it.
Harakant;-;English Review Interesting free game for entertainment and fun. You might tell yourselves, it 's the same as the other actions games (shooting games), where you can play through servers with different players, by the choice of a hero etc. But TF2 has something very interesting (some improvements and special stuff). Selection of 9 heroes, while every of them is somehow specialized and has different inventory to choose. And every chosen unit has it 's own statistics. Unbelievable 500 achievements will get you and surprise you, meanwhile for comparing with other games it 's a big shot. Chance of gaining equipments to inventory of your warrior or any bonuses which are going to be very useful in the game. It 's important to point out that there is a possibility of playing as single player or cooperation or any other methods, but it's useless and needless. And about graphics  it can't be compared with current class, but if you're searching for relaxing and getting crazy, then TF2 is made for you. Fory ou, it will not lose its attraction. Rating: 8/10 Slovak Review Zaujmav free hra pre pobavenie a zbavu. Mono si poviete, e je to to ist ako in akn hry (strieaky), kde mte hra cez servery s inmi hrmi, vberom hera a podobne. No TF2 m nieo do seba (ist vyleenia a zaujmavosti). Vber z 9 hrdinov, priom kad z nich je inak pecializovan a m na vber in bojov invertr. K tomu kad vybran jednotka ma vlastn tatisku. Neuveritench 500 achievementov Vs dostane a prekvap, priom pre porovnania s inmi hrami je to riadna plka. Monos zskavania vybaven do inventra Vho bojovnka i rznych bonus, ktor bud vemi npomocn v hre. Treba podotkn, e je monos aj hrania single player i kooporacie alebo in mdy, no to je len na okraj a asovo zbyton. o sa tka grafiky, ned sa porovnva s terajou triedou, no ak hadte odreagovanie a vyantenie sa, tak TF2 je na to ako stvoren. Len tak ahko Vs neomrz. Hodnotenie: 8/10
Jaek;-;10/10 got attacked by a hoard of spies and they all fell in a hole and died
Yamzee;-;I wish it were 2009 again.
Arctic;-;Pretty good.
Czeslaw Meyer*;-;My playtime speaks for itself.
Y_No_Luv;-;Team Fortress 2 is a side scrolling platformer from the mid eighties that stars an over zealous racially stereotypical Italian plumber out to save his monster aphrodisiac princess/lover/doubles partner. Using the power of the Thu'um you must defeat Alduin the Dragon and bring peace to the land. The portal gun is your only defence against waves of incoming undead. Boasting game modes like Prop Hunt, Dark RP and Trouble In Terrorist Town a variety induced coma will likely ensue. "It's like Die Hard in space!" - Alex 'Take Damage Ever, Please' Memories 2014 "I am a silly goos" - Chainz the goos 2014 "Team Fortress 2 is amazing, but i hate those gosh darn pyro's" - Sir Winston Leonard Spencer-Churchill 1952
The Ace Of Spades;-;My favorite game! Such well planned characteristics and weapons for classes.
GoG|flogger;-;yep its very good
/0GS/ Darak -TPF-;-;Valve is one of the best companys ive seen cuz its the ONLY company to make you hype over bread
S4RTH;-;TF2 is a truly unique game. You would never have imagined that you were going to install this free to play game to then start spending all your money and time on buying and selling hats. And that social life you use to have? Say good bye to that old thing and welcome TF2 into your life. Because remember, hats. One more thing.....hats. -Sincerely Hats
Kage;-;One of the best games on Steam..don't even second guess, just download it.
Dunkle;-;Why would you play another game?
Fester the molester;-;You can wear a flaming hat and a hat whith electricity, whilst killing people with golden weapons then laugh at them whilst hearts come up from the ground. 10/10
Pussy Liquor;-;As Forrest Gump would say: "This game is like a box of chocolates, You never know what you're going to get." I would agree. Also the community is probably my favorite part about this game....Besides the annoying FTP 10 year old squeekers. 9.5/10
Imagine Hoovies;-;Great game. There are quite a few glitches after big updates, but its still a good game. This game ruins people, these hats ruin people. I recommend any new person coming into tf2 to NOT focus on hats or the economy, most of you will and you WILL REGRET it. Just trust me, there is way to much price manipulation going on. And if you do get into hats DO NOT get into unusuals. They will make you question everything you've ever done. Just dont do it. Dont go to the hat side. Anyways, just based on the game (not hats) i'll give this game a 10/10 will swag again.
KelLostTheGame;-;Much hats, many wow. :3
[RCB]Vetkei;-;Wasted more then 150h of my life on this game already 10/10 would waste again
<GBU> Fancy Bear;-;Team Fortress 2 is quite a game with a history. Originally a pay-to-play game, Tf2 became free! Upon so the number of players skyrocketed. Team Fortress 2 is a game where Reliable Excavation Demolitions (RED) usually defends from onslaughts of Builders Leauge United (BLU). You, the player, are given the choice of 9 merchanaries. The fast, cocky and furious scout, the patriotic brawler soldier, the mysterious hellborn that is the pyro, the scumpy-drinking, one-eyed black cyclops demoman, the comical and brutually large heavy, the whimsical engineer, the funny german medic, the cool, calm and collected sniper and lastly the man who perfers brains over brawn, the spy. What makes this game so entertaining is that each of the 9 mercanaries that you can play as all have such a distinct personality, looks and playstyle. If you're a player who likes run-and-gun, Scout is for you. If you like big guns, Heavy calls your name. Stealth? Spy is already right behind you, waiting for you to play as him. Who can forget the loveable pyro who sets everything ablaze. This game is also very rewarding to both new and experienced player alike, as item drops are given not for getting a certain amount of kills, but for just playing the game! However if you want to truely experience the full greatness that is Tf2 I reccomend paying anywhere from 50 cents to $90 in the Mann Co. Store to get prenium so you can truely have a great feel for the game. However if money is tight or if you're not sure you'll enjoy this amazing game, you are not truely penalized for being a Free-to-Play, unlike most other games of this kind. Overall Team Fortress 2 is a great game that doesn't require a supercomputer, and I'd honestly reccomend this game to anybody who asks so.
Whisper;-;It's just... not the same.
Babala!;-;I used to be an mercenary like you, then i placed a hat upon my head! Wait what game is this again?
JakePotter480;-;If you like guns and hats, this is the game for you.
Dead =RIP=;-;Listen am not much of a reviewer, so i can only say so much about a game but *flips table* this game is freaken amazing! i wish i never stopped playing it or got rid of my items. HOURS maybe YEARS of replay ability. the game modes that come with it are fun and great moding community. easly first PC game you should play if your a FPS fan.
rap;-;It's ok I guess.
pizza bear;-;Hat Simulator of the year all years
ihawki;-;It is very nice game for players that like in game economy
Hex Maniac;-;This game is better than sex
Tabajara;-;Got this game in 2008 on "The Orange Box". Sometimes, you will play for the entire week of how this game is/was awesome playing. Then you'll start to be bored of the current gamemodes/maps you have already played. You'll get that long break, after some months, you will start to play the game again. It's a fun FPS, still popular, gets good updates from Valve and be sure to always invite your friends to play with you; the good part of this game that is free! 9.5/10
Nigginator;-;i write this because i'm bored spend (only a guess) 1000+ euros on this lovely game, so it must be good. Recommended if u don't mind stealing ur parents money or if ur familiar with scamming
eX. wickEd_ | i55.tf;-;hats?
Youmu Kompaktu;-;I can not recommend this game enough! I've played it for a really long time, and it has never even once become boring. There may not be many updates to it, and it's glitchy as hell, AND the developers don't care about it as much anymore than they used to, it still is an incredibly fun game that you can just jump in any time you want. It might be a bit hard to get in due to all of the different weapons, classes, stats and what not (tons of stuff to remember), but once you got into it, oh man. The community isn't that bad, either. Had worse experiences in Dota 2... *shivers*
Pertinax;-;Team Fortress 2 is the pinnacle of artistic expression in video games. I can think of no better artistic representation of the failure man has made out of civilization than the Heavy Weapons Guy. Think about it for a second. He's morbidly obese, a communist, and requires no natural ability to use effectively. I also like how the most-fragile class, the Spy, is French. Highly recommended
lunar;-;Virtual hats with particle effects. 11/10
thetechguy95;-;It's Great!
d0nK!;-;this game is fun but I hate my parents
Jaz;-;Play it for fun! its Free to play!
beaker;-;Best Online Shooter, Unstoppable Juggernaut, Hats! Take my money.
Poppin';-;TF2 is the minority sweatshop I've always wanted to work for. Over 1K hrs crafting apparel. Would suffer through unethical working conditions again!
sitebender;-;Team Fortress 2 is a fantastic multi-player online first person shooter with 9 classes that all have unique personalities. Each class uses a primary, secondary and melee weapon. The Heavy has the most health, takes a while to fire, but can do the most damage per second with no reloading, but he moves slowly. The soldier shoots rockets, has the 2nd most health and and is the 2nd slowest, but experienced players can rocket jump. The demoman is a defender, using stickybombs to lay traps and grenades to roll forward, he can sticky jump with some practice and can also be a proficient melee class. The Pyro is a defender, lighting enemies on fire, causing damage for an amount of time, air blasting projectiles away and bringing good cheer and derpiness to any team. Engineers build teleporters, sentry guns and dispensers to defend the team and keep them healthy and supplied with ammo. The spy is elusive and backstabs people while invisible cloaking or disguising himself. His sapper can also disable and destroy the engineer's buildings. The scout runs fast with a double jump and shotguns people, he also captures at twice the speed of anyone else. Snipers snipe from far away. Medics heal and make people invincible at times. As for the modes, there are traditional capture the flag, king of the hill and less traditional payload, where blue team will push a moving cart, while red team defends it. The more blue players next to the cart, the faster it will go. If a red player is next to the cart, it stops moving. It is a great dynamic that makes the game really stand out above the rest. There is also payload race, where two teams push their carts, and control points where the goal is to capture all of the points (3 or 5 points instead of just 1 like King of the Hill). Teams for both modes are mostly 12 vs 12. Each mode has quite a few maps and maps are continually added over time. The newest mode is Mann vs Machine, where six players take on wave after wave of robots. There is a free version of Mann vs Machine called Boot Camp and a non free version called Mann Up that costs a Tour of Duty Ticket ($1 in the store). The ticket gets used if you complete a MVM mission. If you don't complete a mission, or if you complete a mission you've already completed, then you keep the ticket. A Mann vs Machine tour is composed of several missions across a few maps. What do you get for completing a tour? A random strange weapon and a notch in your belt! The maps in Team Fortress 2 stand out for their paths, there isn't just one path through each map, but there are usually several routes to get around a herd of foes. There is a lot of joy and satisfaction flanking opponents and killing an entire team from behind. Sure this game is free to play, but there are a lot of things to buy for real money! Hats for $5, keys for $2.50. Keys are like legalized gambling, you buy a key to open a crate, if you don't get what you want, you can always use Steam trade to trade the item for something you do want or just use another key! There is a whole micro economy in the game with trading. The game will drop you weapons as you play, then you can craft two weapons together to make metal. 18 weapons will make you a refined metal. That's the basic free currency of the game. When you have three refine, you can craft them together for a random hat. Most people prefer to trade their refined for keys, but well refined metal will always generate from dropped weapons, keys will always cost $2.50. You can also buy and sell keys in the Steam market for Steam wallet money to buy Steam games. The items you pay for are cosmetic if not strange weapons that count your kills. So it is not pay to win, even though you can buy in game weapons, but every weapon is a side-grade, not an upgrade, with pros and cons to each weapon. Since this is a multi-player game, nothing will overpower you. It is all rock-paper-scissors. Heavy can kill anything, but a spy or sniper can take out a heavy. A pyro can easily take out a spy. Stuff like that. Team Fortress 2 is updated regularly and has implemented a lot of community created items, maps and Halloween events. The Halloween events feel pretty special, but for the most part, they're just Halloween versions of normal maps. The community items, while cool, seem to be mostly cosmetic items with a few new weapons. There have been community maps made and maps are always free to play on. It is an exceptional game. Diverse weapons, maps and it is buckets of fun and free to play!!!! FREE!!! You get weapons dropped to you over time or you can trade them. It is such a good game even if you're like me and hate multiplayer this is fun multiplayer! Or single player against bots! It is a must play for any fan of first person shooters. The game is smooth, the 9 characters and weapons are very balanced and very different. There is a diverse array of modes.
DippyDerps, Red Slime;-;Hats. Enough said. 10/10 Would recommend for Gaben.
Mammoth;-;I would complete this review but even after the hundreds of hours spent I still have not completed the campaign by getting my burning team captain.
BOBOUDA;-;Best f2p I've ever played (and best I'm ever going to play probably). First of all it's very fun: great gameplay, funny characters, awesome community made items... perfect to play with friends. It's really skill-based and has also some good teamplay elements too. One of the best thing about it is also that it's a very balanced game (the classes are, the player distribution in teams never is, even after 84567 "scrambling the teams"): the class you select is always gonna have a lot of pros and cons, be effective against some classes and be an easy target for others. After some time you'll probably end up having favorite classes and some that you like... a bit less :D [i.imgur.com] (f**king spies !) There's an inner story to the game and it's characters, but as often with Valve is not really explicit, actually even less than Portal or L4D2. So take a look at the comics [www.teamfortress.com] to know more about it ! After 9 years in development, it's been worth the wait !
PantslessPerson;-;I can honestly say, this is one of the best games i have ever played, i have been playing for 3 years now, and i have yet to get bored, it seems there are always new things, not only does it have a great weapon system and diffrent uses fir diffrent weapons, it has a beutifal customization system, hats miscs, its amazing, and it has a personality for each class and i love it, not to mention it has that classic game sort of feel, it brings health packs into the game, a use for each class, i really recomend this game to people who are tired of call of duty, and battle field, not trying to say that those two are bad, i played them, but it reapeated, nothing much new, so if you are looking for a good game, i higly recommend this =)
Nurwhallllllllllllll;-;Once you hat you never go back.
spaghetti junction;-;http://rule34-data-000.paheal.net/_images/44120f0ae1cc13f3a00abaf493fbf882/485526%20-%20Demoman%20Engineer%20Heavy_Weapons_Guy%20Medic%20Pyro%20Scout%20Sniper%20Soldier%20Spy%20Team_Fortress_2%20katya%20prawnsy.jpg
Jon Irenicus;-;This review/rating can be divided into two sections pre/post F2P(June 23, 2011). It is very important to distinguish between these two because they are really two different games. Pre-F2P TF2 (10/10) - For the first few years of TF2's existence, the game managed to have an absolute killer dynamic with a great playerbase that relied heavily on teamwork and a great community fostered by Valve's friendliness to the modding community. Valve really worked with the community to create new scenarios, maps, and weapons these first few years that helped vastly improve the game. Post-F2P TF2 (5/10) - The easiest way to describe the state of the game today would be a male dress-up Barbie simulator. I don't fault Valve for trying to capitalize on a game that is at the time of this writing over 7 years old, but the best times for this game are now well past. There's just too many new hats and new weapons to choose from, from which the majority are useless. Sure there are still plenty of servers to play in, but the majority of the servers are devoid of players with skill, microphones, and teamwork. There's still a few fun servers (see the No-Heroes servers) but donating is about the only way you will be able to see the inside of one of these servers when its full. The only bright side is that Valve is still adding new content with multiple updates a year.
Skapperzz;-;Wasted a large portion of my life on it. 10/10
Prince Sawyer;-;Once you start, you just can't stop. Never before have hats had more meaning in my life.
Ajay;-;This could be the best mmo you will ever face. Its just perfect, every Role is nearly perfect balanced, maybe the Pyro is a bit to strong. Get Items you can sell. A great Community who will not hate you when you are bad, they will just leave you alone.
Harlack;-;Hey, have you heard of this game "Dream For Dress 2".It's all about going to class and dressing up. It's great.
Dan [greuceanu];-;You will learn the meaning of TEAM, playing Team Fortress 2. Bloody fun!
FrostyHoneyJuicy;-;Team Fortress 2 aka TF2 is a "Free to Play", Multiplayer, First Person Shooter (FPS), and a Hat (Cosmetic) Simulator. A very fun game. Especially, very addictive and good for relaxation, but it depends how good you are at the game or on your picked class. Classes & Teams: There're about 9 classes in the TF2 : [Offensive Classes:] Scout, Soldier, Pyro, [Defensive Classes:] Demoman, Heavy (Weapons Guy), Engineer, [Support Classes:] Medic, Sniper and Spy. Each class has it's own strength and weakness. For example, Spy has a low health, but he can kill can instantly by backstabbing you. TF2 has 2 teams: BLU and RED. They hate each other, and they attack each other. Nothing interesting. Maps (Levels) & Gamemodes: Maps can be different (pretty obvious). But unfortunately, maps can affect the gameplay, because like I said before, each class has it's own weakness. For example, Sniper can kill you pretty easily in a very wide map, and you can get annoyed. Each map has it's own gamemode. Here is a list of all official gamemodes: Capture the Flag (ctf) Control Points (cp) Territorial Control (tc) Payload (pl) Payload Race (plr) King of the Hill (koth) Medieval Mode Special Delivery (sd) Mann vs Machine (mvm) Robot Destruction (rd) Arena (arena) Mannpower And here is a list of unofficial gamemodes: Highlander (TF2Center.com) 6v6 (TF2Center.com) Saxton Hale Mode OR Freak Fortress (vsh) Randomizer Slender Fortress (sl) Prop Hunt (ph) Dodgeball Zombie Fortress Surfing (surf) Jail Break FortWars And many more. Hats/Cosmetics: You don't need them to play a game. Players usually care so much about cosmetics, because they want to look good and feel good, while they play a game. Most of them, spend about $500 on the game, only because of the hats. Players also care about the "qualities" of the items. Some qualities can be very expensive, so I don't suggest to spend money on crap. However, hats are not the only ones. Players also waste money on weapons, due different qualities or reskins. IF you really want to get hats, then I suggest you to read this guide: http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=248435114&searchtext=Free+Hats IF you want more hats, then I suggest you to understand, and learn some basics about the TF2 Trading Community, and about trading itself. Here is a guide: https://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=158754458 Major Updates: There are 2 different kinds of TF2 updates: Official Updates and Community Created Updates (they're official, too). What's the difference, you ask? Well, it's pretty simple: Official Updates - Are created by the main creator/company called VALVe. In their updates, you can find new gamemodes, new weapons (which are usually made in the summer or in the winter), new maps, bug fixes and especially there is a 90% chance that VALVe is going to add new hats, made by the community from the Steam's workshop. Community Created Updates - VALVe usually cares what community makes, but they don't allow community mess with the balance of the game, meaning VALVe doesn't allow us to create new weapons, which can have different stats, and especially add new maps. (However, VALVe added community maps only in the beginning, when TF2 was still new and fresh. But now everything is different, because in nowadays TF2 became as a very popular game.) So like I said before, VALVe actually cares what community creates. So VALVe likes to add new hats and new weapons (just models) created by some talented people from the community. But majority of the community hates to see, that every new update has a new hat. And to be honest: It's normal. If you didn't know, there was a big over hyped update called "End of the Line", and it was actually the most useless update in the TF2. It had tons of cosmetics, a new taunt, a new weapon, which is a actually a reskin with no stats. Before an update arrived, the community really hoped to see a map called "Snowplow" with the new gamemode, but when the update arrived, the map was canceled by VALVe. VALVe said, that the map is too confusing for new players . Later, that sentence became as a meme , because other maps made by VALVe are more confusing, than a "Snowplow". Anyways, let's move on: Unbalanced Gameplay & Weapons: TF2 has 2 kinds of players: F2P (Free to Play) players (aka noobs) and P2P (Premium to Play) players (aka experienced players). Imagine BLU team full of noobs, and RED team full of experienced players. Is this a balanced match? Heck no. REDs would win every bloody match. However, in VALVe servers you may find a voting system, which allows any player to vote something. Here is a list current voting types: Kick Player Restart the Match Change Level/Next Level Scramble Teams Disable Team Autobalance Eternaween (Allow Halloween-restricted items for two hours. Player must have an item to enable this voting choice.) So imagine again those 2 teams again: Imagine, that you joined the BLU team, and you see that the teams are not balanced at all, and whenever you come out of your base - you always die. So you decide to vote to "Scramble Teams". So what do you think what's going to happen? The voting will fail, because your enemies are having fun AND because your teammates (noobs) doesn't know how to vote at all, or just completely ignores the voting. Now let's talk about weapons, shall we? Nah, let's not, because VALVe finally fixed all those unbalanced weapons. I could mention them like a long time ago, but now it's not worth it. I will still save this title, just in case. The Story: Well there is a story in the TF2, but unfortunately you can't find it in-game. You can only find it in the official TF2 comics. You can find comics in the Official TF2 Website, right here. [www.teamfortress.com] The Community: The community was great, until TF2 became for free. Right now, if you go to any official VALVe server, then you may hear some screaming or crying children with microphones. I hope your ears doesn't explode. To be honest, TF2 community is still great. It depends where you live. Usually, I really love to play with Americans. I never loved to play with Europeans, because they love judge each other, and sometimes they're so speechless. How cruel! What is a Premium Account? Premium account means an Upgraded account. In the beginning you can only have 1 backpack slot. If you buy something from the Mann. Co Store (in-game store), then your account will be upgraded and you will have 6 slots in your backpack. It's very important to have a Premium account, because 1 backpack slot if not enough for you. I suggest you to buy a Mann Co. Supply Crate Key . Once you bought something from the Mann Co. Store - don't use it again. Use it only to buy keys. Once you understand all basics about trading - you will know what to do with your bought key(s). (Just trade your key for the metal, and then buy tons of hats and weapons, as much as you want!) Overall, my rating is 7 out of 10. Remember: Once you start to love this game, then there is a small chance, that you will leave it. Everything depends, what you like or love, or how (quickly) do you understand things. Also, I am very sorry if I was very rude or mad in this review. It's because sometimes, TF2 can make your feelings hurt, especially your sanity. If you don't want to risk your life, then simply don't play this god damm game. Have Fun! ^.^
Plutie ( ~ )~;-;This game lets me eat virtual chocolate as much as I want and I don't get any fatter than I already am. 10/10 Would eat virtual chocolate again.
Coylie3;-;This game used to be fun. Team Fortress 2 used to have the friendliest community, where people would help eachother learn how to rocket jump and give an Engineer tips on Sentry placement. Now its got hordes of lime green and pink Scouts running in, killing everything that moves, and putting "git gud scrub" in chat with a keybind. This game used to be fun. For some it may still be fun to play, for others its a way to pass the time, and some people only still play because it has become routine to do so. And for many the in-game economy has actually become a job, a business, even if they don't work for Valve or any other software developer. If Valve were to remove metal and cosmetics entirely, many people would lose hundreds or thousands of dollars. This isn't even a game anymore. People who play TF2 say that many aspects of this game need fixing. "Why would you nerf the Heavy and not the Demman?" I would say that the whole thing needs fixing. Specifically the community. This game used to be fun. The community used to be fun to be a part of. A few months ago it has become just as bad as the Call of Duty fanbase and community. You may still find it fun to play this game. You may somehow find the patience to deal with another toxic community. My patience is shot, I can deal with no more. If any of you need me, I'll be playing a single player game. I can actually play those without being told "git gud, noob" or "get rekt, scrub" after every death. The NPCs of a Singleplayer game like Fallout or Metro are certainly friendlier than the real people who play Team Fortress 2. EDIT: After about two months to think, I believe I've put too much into this game to simply give it up entirely. I believe I've found a little sub-community that's still got the kindness I missed. My opinion still stands, as there are a multitude of sub-communities that promote behavior like this in exchange for donations. Looking at you, Saigns and NighTeam and your pay to win admin slots. I've also found a way to make sure that I don't get hit by phisher and scam bots. Play with the community that I trust, and stay away from quickplay. Every friend request I get now, I also tell them to prove to me that they aren't a bot.
K.O.T.A Twitch73;-;Good game to meet people and just have fun.
Grodor;-;If u like 3 year olds raging quiting this game is for u
Sneeza;-;Well I made a website dedicated to it, so it must be good.
THE HLF-LIFER;-;Simply Amazing multiplayer game.. with hats
Spannzer's in pain, leave me be;-;I want my life back. In all seriousness the game is amazing. I recommend putting around 100-200 hours into the game, finding a class or two to main and then head over to http://playcomp.tf/ to get into competitive TF2. It's a lot of fun.
ShanE;-;This game is the best FPS game I've ever played. It's so fun! Everything is balanced. Nothing is 'OP'. There are plenty of weapons to choose from (most of the time stock is the best) It's a very fun/goofy game but still has great gameplay and also great graphics! Another bonus is you dont need the greatest computer in the world to run it. and if you are a person who loves hats. this is the game for you :D My favorite game....ever
LeeAm;-;This is a Great Game XD
SuperOnlineGamer S> BP pg.7;-;EDIT: To all the people who are complaining about the new update, you wanted a new update, you got it. So what, a couple of skins, some crates, and some fresh gameplay mechanics, big deal. Leave your negative reviews to yourself, no one cares. =================================================================== Team Fortress 2, here I go. Looking for a game that's free to play, a first person shooter, and down right fun as hell? Well, you've come to the right game! All 9 classes add for a diverse choice of playing styles, but that's only part of it. Weapons, lots of extra weapons. The large universe of weapons can assist you in your play style or just change it completely (I'm looking at you, gunslinger) . The large selection of weapons allow for a diverse and quite unique experience for the first person shooter genre, and there's still not something that can match up to this game. But, the main reason most people play Team Fortress 2 is for it's 1 of a kind trading system. While is is sometimes unrelliable, trade servers and all, Team Fortress's 2 trading system is a game changer. You can trade hats, miscs, and weapons, and trust me, you're better off having hats, because in this game, your generally considered "a better player" for having loads of hats and unusuals. Ah! Unusuals, almost forgot about those things. Unusuals are basically hats with special effects like flames or a snow cloud over your head or on your head. They are obtained through purchasing Mann Co. Supply Crate Keys (and many more types of keys) from the Mann. Co Store or the Steam Market or other sources, and using them to unbox a crate that corresponds with that specific key, generally reffered to unboxing or un-crating. Players have a very rare chance to unbox these "Unusuals", but when you do, consider yourself "Done with trading" (unless you unbox a less valuable unusual) . That's Team Fortress 2 in a LONG Nutshell. I'm SuperOnlineGamer, and I approve of this game!
Sakuya;-;Avoid trading, you can lose your soul with it and hurt people you love. If you can play a minimal amount of time and enjoy it with friends thats good, TF2 is realy solid team based shooter. Never get into trading.
(HR) Ineffable Cupidity;-;TF2 is a casual free to play first person shooter. On its own, that doesn't really translate to much, but with a wide variety of game modes, incredibly high skill-cap, and diverse classes with a variety of weapons to cater to a large amount of playstyles, TF2 does stand out as being a cut above the rest. Balancing unfortunately, isn't as strong as it could be and there are a few legitimately overpowered weapons, and not all classes are equal in usefulness. However, with the lack of cash shop based game stats, and the default weapons generally being the most versatile and reliable in the game, on top of the skill-caps of the classes; Keeping in mind the casual nature of the game, any issue with balance is minor enough that it can be worked around through player skill and team-coordination. Their business model only requires a single item to be purchased from the in-game store--or to be gifted a premium upgrade package--at which point, any cosmetic weapon, or upgrade can be found through playing the game, crafted, or purchased through in-game resources. It's a very fair game, with one of the best free to play models in the market. The primary difficulty you'll find with the game is starting it. With a lackluster tutorial, un-cordinated public games, and little assistance in the relatively deep tactics and game mechanics for the various classes, it can be hard to become skilled enough to coordinate in solo-play. Playing with friends, and doing some research into the game is highly recommended, as TF2 won't do it for you. TF2, on it's own is highly mod-friendly, and has a variety of community made servers running custom game modes. With a bit of searching, you can find hangouts, mini-games, training servers, custom maps, unofficial weapons, and the like. On top of the official game, and fairly friendly community, it's not especially difficult to get hundreds of hours of enjoyment out of the game without any issues, or requirements to invest money. It has its problems, but ultimately they are minor. What TF2 offers is a rich FPS experience, with enough community support to satisfy a variety of tastes. So I have no issues recommending this game to any FPS fan looking for a team-focused, objective based shooter.
- Floppy -;-;TF2 has been out for over 6 years and it still hasn't gotten old. You know why? Because Valve will never keep it the same thanks to frequent game changing updates. If you like shooting people, you'll like it. If you like blowing people up, you'll like it. If you like hats, YOU WILL LOVE IT. Just get this game. There's no reason not to.
McHammered;-;After all these years, TF2 is still one of the most balanced and dynamic shooter games out there. The art style is a refreshing break from the usual quasi-realistic-grim-tactical asthtic of most other popular shooter games. The action is fast paced, there are always new stratagies to try, and this game is great with friends. Whats not to love?
Boku No Daft;-;It's TF2.
SquareOFortune;-;I love this game so much that 7 years after its launch, I spent over 3 months of sweat and first-world hard labor to put together a love letter in video form: "Why Team Fortress 2 is STILL my favorite FPS in 2015" https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=P5woXxmTwH8 There's no class-based FPS that combines hilarious and genuine character with unending gib-fests and an unstoppably addicting skill-ceiling for every playstyle the way Team Fortress 2 does. I'm not sure when I'll stop playing TF2 for good, but it won't be anytime soon. My original review from May 22, 2011: I stopped playing StarCraft II an hour into it's launch-day premiere so I could play a (then) three-and-a-half year old game I've never quit loving: I had to get my Team Fortress 2 fix. If that doesn't tell you anything about this game, I don't know what will. Launch after launch I play new gamesthat cost 5 times what TF2 cost meand I enjoy 'em like anyone else, but at the end of the day, I get bored of the lot and find myself back in the action of this chaotic masterpiece. Team Fortress 2 has been a constant source of entertainment and skill-sharpening throughout the years, and--in all honesty--I just wouldn't call myself a PC gamer without owning this hilarious, bloody gem.
bronzeParadox;-;Someone who jacks off to a cartoon horse told me to kill myself for playing the game 10/10
Multi;-;Only one good map, Sawmill, played it for 200 hours straight and still not bored. Best F2P game in existance.
Garbo;-;Best dress-up simulator ever created.
TerrificBoostAvacado;-;Team Fortress 2 is a very enjoyable game whether your in to have some fun or for the competition. (Or whenever you find yourself bored)
Mr Frstie;-;Yes, I like this game.
tuskis;-;I recommend disabling in-game voice chat before playing on public servers. Do not test me.
Rovan;-;it's worth a few hours of fun at least
Kris18;-;I don't even know where to start with this. This is only an FPS by definition as it stands out from all the rest. After thousands of hours of playing this game, I can't praise it enough. The game play is fun, the characters are likeable, most maps are well-designed and enjoyable to play on, the game can be modded serverside (either minor tweaks or major game-changing overhauls) or played vanilla (which is amazing in its own right), and there's many class/weapon combinations to keep things interesting. The game is entirely free but you may want to buy one item from the store to get premium so you can trade items (which you get randomly anyway), but it's only a dollar or something for the least expensive item. A small matter of convenience and cosmetic, really. There are only two significant problems: most servers have random critical hits enabled (it's by default) that basically means you're screwed or dead simply because by random chance, you're gonna take 3x damage from a hit; the other major problem is that some weapons are unbalanced or unfun to play against, but it's not a huge problem in this game. If you got a free night, check the game out. You may just be hooked for a long time. Easily the best game I've ever played and the one I've played most by far. And it's FREE.
Fliedel (Takalisky);-;I spent more money buying virtual cosmetics than actual clothes. 8.5/10
d0 (   ) | #ScammedByWayne;-;Best free FPS game with a twist.... and hats.
= ocu = OfferBot27 (Beta);-;Cool game :D
robertchan;-;good. end of story.
loligoat;-;I have wasted more than 50$ in this piece of  and bearing trying to kill that one guy that presumes his better hat at me 195/10 would critical hit review this again
Yeshu;-;I Love Team Fortress 2 I Hate Team Fortress 2 I Have lots fun with this game! This game pisses me the hell off... I am good with all classes! I suck at all of them... I dominate alot people! I get dominated alot... I get called annoying, , , piece of ! I call annoying, ,  and piece of  to alot of people... I have tons of hats! I dont have enough hats... I taunt after killing some people! I get taunted after some people kill me... I complain about people talking in skype because of pockets! People complain about me for talking in skype with pockets... I vote kick because people are being annoying! I get voted kick because I am being annoying... I rampage about how people spawncamp! I cant avoid to spawncamp in Nucleous... I say that my team sucks! I am Conga in spawn with my team.,, I hate this game, but i love this game, its my way to relax a bit after a long day of work and i wouldnt want it in any other way. This is Team Fortress 2.
[] Vandal;-;I like this game. Honestly, for all my complaints about it, I really and truly love this game. But, it's a sinking ship. Now, don't get me wrong, there's a lot good with it. Tons of ways to play, loads of weapons, hundreds of maps, and it's easy enough to learn. On the other hand though, it has it's fair share of issues. The community is pretty much the number 1 problem. Ever since Valve made it F2P, hordes of idiots no longer hindered by the issue of paying for it joined the bandwagon, meaning that even people who shouldn't be able to contribute to the experience now can. Through this, any potential good people see the way that the masses play, and adopt the 'strategies' {W+M1ing, 'nade spamming, healing only heavies, etc.} for their own, leading to an endless spiral of stupidity. Additionally, every single time SPUF throws a temper tantrum over something being 'op' {OMG vlve git rd of sandman!}, Valve caves in and nerfs the offending material, so expect to have to relearn to use your favorite weapons every other month or so. As a final aside, apart from a few servers here and there, rest assured that almost every server you visit will be a mish mash of imbeciles who should still be training on bot servers {and should probably never leave them}, people who are leagues better than you and only there to grind stranges, traders who are only there to idle/spam trade requests, and the occasional troll. Very rarely will you find a server where everyone is polite, actively playing, halfway decent, and more or less on your skill level. The same issues also plauge co-op mode {Mann vs Machine, or MvM}. You'd expect to see the usual pub filth in Boot Camp {and you do}, but not in Tour of Duty mode, which is pay to play. Nope. You'll still see the normal assortment of trade spammers, caber demoknights, gunslinger engis, people that call for kicks after you miss a single piece of cash/die too often, and really just a general lack of common sense. After the community, I'd say Valve themselves are the next biggest problem. Everytime you turn around, there's a new hat, a new misc item, a new kit to make your weapon fire glowy pumpkins and set your head on fire after a few kills, and so on and so forth. New weapons though? Been almost 2 years if I'm remembering correctly {EDIT: Finally Valve. Although even this update only gave us 4 new weapons, with the others being reskins, and the rest of the content being, guess what, misc items. And taunts.}. Tons of reskins though, including the stupidly rare golden ones, and that stupid frying pan that goes for over $4k {in a f2p game, no less}. Although to be fair, weapon stats are changed so much that we technically get new weapons every now and then. This game has gone from "Capture the point and kill all enemies in your way" to "holy wow guise stout shako 3 ref trade me up!". It's no longer an fps, it's a dress up game with murder as an optional sidequest. Valve sadly seems to longer care about making the game fun as much as they do fattening their wallets. EDIT: The Halloween events of the last 2 years are all but proof positive of this, where the new gameplay elements more or less amounted to "pick up this item and mindlessly spam instant death beams" and dozens {yes, dozens} of misc items being released, the majority of which can't even been worn once the event ends or outside of a full moon. Truly, the golden age of this game is over, with any competent players bound to permanently rage-quit sooner or later.
RADKILLA[420];-;best rpg ever!awesome characters of cats,funto play with paper.great puzzles.too bad no-one plays this racing game anymore.mike tyson looks young as ever.i was sick last week.and i got drain bamaged so half life 3.
You're a stupid now;-;I only played a little but it was fun.
Xerniv HuN;-;Mindenkinek ajnlom! Nagyon j jtk! I recommend it for all fps gamers, its a really good game!
YoloSapiens;-;The best F2P that exist, endless hours of fun. Why are you reading this? Download it!
Moose Knuckles;-;This game, one of the top shooter games that i'll ever play. I'm usually an rpg fanboy but this shooter, really takes the cake for me. I love just spending all my time on a few multiplayer maps, gradually getting good at them. Heck, this game is what made me get into the fps genre. This is a must play game by any fps fans out there. It's such a unique shooter, almost as much as Borderlands. This is a must play. It's also a free game so don't worry about money. 9/10
Jay.;-;You'll think this game doesn't look appealing because of it's graphics and gameplay? Well i'd tell you this; you've got to give it a chance by playing it for like 5 hours, try out all the game modes and try out all the custom modes made by the community. After 4 years of playing this game is absolutely amazing. Not only because of it's high amount of comic and hilarious scenes, but also for it's original graphics, gamemodes, characters and much more. The 9 different characters in this game makes Team Fortress 2 so unique. For instance, it's tons of fun playing as the Spy character. This very unique character can go completely invisible against other online players. This one of the reasons I liked this game so much when I was 14. The ability to go invisible is one of Team Fortress 2's many appealing reasons to play it. By going invisible you can have tons of fun by playing around with it and using clever tactics with it. Are you bored after a few hours? No problem, you just switch to another character within a split second! Let's take the Soldier character, it's equipped with a huge rocket launcher on his shoulder which can obviously fire rockets. Something also very unique and great scripting is that you can 'rocketjump' with the rockets you fire. You shoot them at your feet, and you'll get launched away! This is just also very great and really amuzing! You'll spend hours and hours mastering those 'rocketjumps'. And is also a great reason to keep on playing Team Fortress 2. These were just 2 of Team Fortress 2's unique characters. These are all characters other First person shooter games don't have. This is one of the biggest reasons to try out this incredible game. Also something every First person shooter doesn't have, is that all the weapons are completely free! Reason why is that you 'find' them all eventually! You just play with your stock weapon at first until a screen pops up and says 'You have found a new weapon!' And poof, you've got one of TF2's 1000 weapons in your inventory, all shiny and ready to get played with. All weapons have their unique ability which can be great fun and tactical. Besides shooting rockets, grenades, blasting out fire and shooting a billion bullets a minute, there is also a whole different part of Team Fortress 2. And that's trading your items. Team Fortress 2 comes with a very unique trading system. You can trade your weapon you just found for something else via another online player. Beside weapons there are also a thousand hats for all your TF2 characters. So you can enjoy TF2 even more by dressing your characters either very fancy, scary, classy, funny or whatever you want! For anyone who wants a unique game, this is it. Free to play for everyone, so get it now i'd say!
[T4sTy]Chicken_Noodle_Soup;-;[insert joke about not having life here]. [insert joke about hats here]. #steamreviews.
Ay Dede;-;Very addicting fun game.
Nik The Greek;-;This game is the best free to play game ever in the planet. Fun and with good rewards!!! Extra fun if u play with friends, i recommend it to all of you. The rank i am going to give to that game is unusually one of the best :P 10/10 would play again with more friends and enjoy it all the time
Stouter;-;Ever since I bought this game, I have never put thought into doing a completly honest review. If you want to take a few minutes from your time, you can listen to my storyThe first time I played this, was around late december 2007 on my brothers old windows vista computer. It didnt have much on it; weapons, hats, unusauls, etc...I'd played it a few times over at friend's houses and watched it change. New gamemodes, servers, weapons, etc...and how that all Changed the gameplay balance. I didn't get my own steam till about 3 years ago, and I was only going to use it for garry's mod. Then I decided oh what the hell, I guess I'll download tf2 since it's free. I'd been playing it on the xbox 360 for about a year then (by the way it sucks on that.) And I remember my first game, feeling sweetness as I got an insane killstreak on 2fort...like 50 something kills in less than 7 minutes. I hadn't been using steam much at the time, but around late August 2012, I'd really started to get into things. I found out about trading, and the tf2 economy, and getting cool hats for your characters, and the new mvm update which I mainly play right now. Then, when my friend told me about unusuals in tf2, everything ing changed. In late december 2012, i was doing everything I could to get one of these so claimed unusuals. They had these like cool particle effect thingys coming out of them. Finally, from the help of a steam buddy of mine, I was able to get one. The very first unusual I owned was a steaming handyman's handle. Now I know you're thinking, "haha a 10 key hat? So what?" But at the time, I didn't care if it was worth jack squat. It just felt so good to have that thingy with steam emmitting out of it. Then soon after that I got earbuds, and a bills hat, and some strange festives. And then, around my sprnig break in 2013, I got scammed out of my unusual. My only unusual...And the guy who did it, I wanted to ing rip his head off I hated him so much. I will give his name out: balestorm1, although he's been offline for over a year now. He's a really interesting guy, Did a scamming spree of like 6 unusual hats. Back to my story now. After that I traded my earbuds for a second unusual hat. A stormy pith helm for solly. It looked pretty cool as well, I then started trading up to make profit, and by early summer 2013, I already had about $1000 worth of items. A whole summer went by dedicated towards making profit and spending more of my money on unusuals/stranges, etc...but after reaching what seemed like my full mental capacity for trading, I started to feel sad, and lonely, and withdrawn from the everthing else (I'm not kidding.) I decided I should probably cash out of tf2 to get money and such for it all. I did end up getting around 500 u.s. dollars via paypal, but I still had a whole bunch of . After doing that...I traded towards an awesome burning Dapper's for soldier of which i favorited, then i traded and traded till in finally decided to spycrab what was primarily left of my backpack. Not alot, but something. ~4 buds worth of  I lost in multiple spycrabs on the MCT/Pink Taco's trading server. During all that, I was also taking a long break from tf2 as well going into several gmod communities, I even made my own server with a buddy of mine. That is a different story though. All the trading has put aside a focus for the core gameplay. I feel like this is how it is for many others who play this game as well. Several updates ago, I was getting really  at the game, and with this new Love and War, or Bread and Conga (lol not) update, It really  me off for multiple reasons. And for like the 6th time, I said "I'M DONE WITH TF2. I'M NEVER PLAYING THIS  OF A GAME AGAIN." But here I am, amidst all this chaos...Standing strong I prevail through all of this. I know, no matter what, this game, with it's mystery will be my all time favorite video game.
Avicii;-;10/10. This game is really addictive. The gameplay, the community, the fun, it's all there. There are lots on in-game items such as cosmetics, taunts, etc. These kinda ruined the game (what I think). But other than that, this game would never bore you. Recommended.
Prince;-;This is a well made, stylized, team based first person shooter. Teamwork is needed to win at higher levels of play, though lone wolfing is fine on lower skill levels such as on most public servers. There are 9 classes to choose from. Each class has unique weapons and abilities that allow each to fulfill a unique roll as part of a larger team. This provides for a challenging and rewarding experience when faced against opponents of similar or better skill levels. The game has an active dev team that continues to release updates to the game that add new content such as weapons or game modes. At the time of this review, there are two official modes of play: player versus player and 'Mann Versus Machine'. Player versus player is a mode where one team of players battles against another team of players. Within this mode, there are different types of maps. Each type of map has it's own objective or objectives for each team to achieve. 'Mann Versus Machine' is a mode where a team of up to 6 players battles against waves of bots. Players collect money from destroyed bots. The money is divided equally among players in the team and can be used to purchase upgrades and abilities for the next wave of bots. The pay to play sub-mode, "Mann Up", gives rewards upon completing a "tour". In addition to the official modes of play, there are several player made mods that introduce other modes of play such as 'Versus Saxton Hale', where a team of players battles against a player playing as a character named Saxton Hale; 'Dodge Ball', where two teams of players playing as Pyros must airblast rockets and other projectiles back and forth in order to stay alive; 'Zombie Mod', where a team of players must make it to the end of the map without dying to zombies that are played by other players; to name just a few of the many player made mods available. In addition to game play, players will randomly receive free items from the game. Some of the free items given out are weapons, hats and crates. Hats can be worn by a class to change the appearance of that class. Crates can be opened with a key. Keys can be purchased from the Mann Co Store or from the Steam Community Market or traded for from another player. Most crates will list which items can be found within them. The game has several communities for a player to choose from if a community is what you are looking for. The game is easy to pick up and play, either alone or with friends, yet has a depth of play that will keep you from becoming bored too quickly. The dynamics between the different classes, weapons, play styles, skill levels, modes and maps provides content for many hours of play. I have been playing since January 2015 and I still return to the game on a regular basis.
Devil Baby;-;Got ripped off by a scammer. 10/10 Would trade again.
Red_Pandaaa;-;As soon as i played this game i couldent stop, Its so addictive and fun to play with all your friends. You get to mess around with weponds you wouldent have thought you could fight with. The maps are AMAZING lots of choises to chose from. The design for the characters look amazing i couldent have imagined then looking any different.
N0RT' P PUMN !;-;...that Meet the Spy was leaked onto YouTube on May 17, 2009, two days before its intended release? ...that the SMG was originally intended for the Scout? ...that a telefrag will instantly fill the Buff Banner's gauge? ...that a Scout getting gibbed has a 1 in 100 chance of spawning a dove flying out of his body? ...that a #101 Golden Wrench and a #11112 Gentle Manne's Service Medal were given to the winner of a charity auction for Child's Play? ...that the Ambassador originally dealt mini-crits on headshot rather than full critical hits? ...that the Flamethrower could not originally perform airblasts before the Pyro Update?
Sir Merciless;-;This community is just horrible even in pub server you get voted kicked for no reason. They can't handle the strong players
Shoes;-;The best hat trading game around.
Almighty.;-;A wonderfully crafted cartoony arena shooter. If you don't already own this game, you are not a PC gamer. There are 9 classes to choose from: 1: The Scout - A Boston-born, rude, in-your-face, and speedy character that has a double jump ability. 2: The Soldier - A crazed patriot from America's heartland. He's versatile and a great starter class to get familiar with TF2. 3: The Pyro - A mumbling pyromaniac of indeterminate origin who has a burning passion for all things fire related. 4: The Demoman - A scrumpy-swilling explosives expert from the Scottish Highlands. 5: The Heavy - Hailing from the USSR, he is the largest and possibly most dangerous class in TF2. 6: The Engineer - Specializes in constructing and maintaining buildings that provide support. 7: The Medic - Provides healing for the members of his team and has a special ability known as an 'Ubercharge'. 8: The Sniper - From the Aussie Outback, this character provides long-range support with his trusted sniper rifle. 9: The Spy - This character can be rendered invisible and can disguise as members of the other team. There are also a plethora of maps, and weapons that can also be used to your advantage to gain control and defeat the other team. TF2 is definitely one of the best free-to-play games to ever be released.
Dr.death | trade.tf;-;I would recommend the game very fast-paced and humorous
Rigby;-;One of the best FPS games I ever played! Would recommend it to everyone! 11\10 For the humor!
m a g i c;-;You just can't get bored of this game. :)) After all these years still a great game!
Rena;-;The hats are good.
Syndrome Of A Down;-;is gouda goes pew pew 10/10 would recommend
iGamr;-;I doubt anybody really needs to be told why to try Team Fortress 2, especially with its reputation and lack of a price tag, but I suppose I should throw my 2 cents in anyway. Team Fortress 2 is a fun game that gives you fun options in how you want to play. You get 9 classes to toy with, each having an interesting personality and a unique playstyle. Then, as you play, you'll come across weapons that let you experiment within each class's playstyle. The more you play, the more stuff you amass, and the more options you'll have at your disposal. If you haven't already, take a dip into the world of Team Fortress 2. You're almost guaranteed to find something you like!
Kawaii-Demon;-;I sold $100 worth of my previous xbox games for tf2 cosmetics and other pro-pain accesories. money well spent.
Taizic;-;It's a game where people compete for cosmetics. Recommended for girls who love to dress up virtually.
DoubleMountainMann;-;Great game, although the balancing team seems like it's made up of monkeys. There are many complaints from the community about balancing classes and weapons that go ignored. Some of the updates, especially recent ones are lackluster. Sometimes, it feels like it's just Valve versus TF2 Community. Also, if anything happens, don't forget to blame Gaben. Edit: Some people also like to blame Jericho.
[AyyLmao] Mr.Turtle;-;I've been playing this game since 2011, i was free to play until my father gave me $5 to spend and i got 2 keys, and my free to play days were over. Ever since then I have fell in love with the game. The people, the maps, the items, mostly my friends is the reason i still keep playing this game. I would reccomend this game to anyone who has an open imagination. (Demoman is my favorite class, i love blowing  up :3)
Toast #Hoisin Sauce;-;game, never play it. Getting my (small)  chewed off by a manic piano is more enjoyable then playing this.
Thee Man;-;Nice online game for you and your friends to play.
reluctantNovelist;-;Hat Simulator 2: Hat harder, what can I say about it that hasn't been said already? It's fun, it's free, it's got cool stuff that is seriously underplayed, and the classes and asthetic are nearly timeless. But, you've heard that a thousand times. What of the meat and bones? The mechanics that everything is built on? Gotta say, hella good. The interplay of a lot of slightly different weapons and the drastically different classes combines well with the objective focus, but more importantly it makes you ask yourself silly questions. Like, "what if I ran a melee medic?" "or a melee heavy?" "What could make this more fun to play?" It is a great game, with great appeal, but most importantly the mechanics are fun. Plus who could argue with the price? Now if they would just do more with the magic spells, and medieval mode, and the bosses, then I would have no complaints.
Krauvando;-;Help, I can't stop playing this game.
Father Leon Horvat;-;my favorite game of all time
FilthySloth;-;Told 8 yo Kiddo to bind mouse1 explode .... He did it I told him that the way to solve this problem is to bind w explode .. he did it He was really angry and he was screemin in voicechat so i told him that the way to solve this exploding problem is to bind v explode. He did it :DD 10/5
pizza;-;vanilla pubs, mann VS machine, communities, trading, weird game modes, custom maps, competitive, source filmmaker, and a ton more. there's a little something for everybody
k;-;10/10 it's like Splatoon but with guns
anonym0;-;Hat fortress 2, oh sorry Team Fortress 2, is a multiplayer fps focusing on cooperating with your allies to complete objectives or stop the other team from completing theirs. At your arsenal you have 9 unique classes with hundreds of weapons of your choosing. You find "random drops" in form of weapons as you play, allowing you to try out new weapons and eventually finding your favourite combos. Unlike other popular fps games, TF2 focus on advancing with your team and fill in for your allied classes weaknesses. While a heavy class have great damage output, his slowness makes him a sitting duck. A medic class can keep him alive and together advance into enemy territory to do damage. In another example, an engineer class can setup a small base for allies to heal, refill ammo and have a few seconds of not being fired upon. Against a demolition class like soldier or demoman, he can just watch as his buildings are wrecked, however with the support of a pyro, their explosives can be turned against them. Some weapons are even specifically made to support another class in battle. The real gem of TF2 is however it's crazy customization. You can equip all kinds of hats, clothes and other miscs, making your classes stand out. And not only that, TF2 even got a huge economy, with thousands of other players involved into. Trade a weapon or a hat with a friend, profit on selling your rare misc or simply hoard it all! It's all up to you Pros: Crazy fun gameplay, badass costimization, hilarious voice acting, huge economy and one of the longest surviving fpses on the market. oh and FREE Cons: To avoid having to play for tons of hours to try out all weapons, the in-game store sells extremly overpriced items. Trading however enables you to get everything cheaper but new players will have trouble with this. To make your items tradable, you are required to buy a premium upgrade (which you can by buying the cheapest item in the store so not too expensive)
Iyal;-;Amazing 3D Game !!!!!!! Lots Of Fun A Lot To Craft And The Spy <3 <3
xAOx Monster;-;THIS MAY BE THE MOST AWESOME GAME IN THE HISTORY OF GAMES :O
endorphine;-;This game is at everything great! No costs (only if you want prmium with wich you can trade) nice gameplay. Many modes wich you can play from CTF; CP; Mann versus Machine; and much more! And you get random itmes wich you can for ever use! Great game just give it a try it will be worth!
Please Demote Me To Silver Juan;-;Great Game!
Mikitan;-;Most hours spent in my gaming life. There isn't supposed to have a storyline. However, each character has its unique personality and is very lovable (ref: Valve's video clips). Those characters are not just for visual graphics. Each toon has a soul, and you can feel it in the game! Simply, best game ever and it doesn't get old.
virux070;-;This is one of the best FPS's i've played in a while. Gameplay is well balanced between the classes; Art Direction makes me think "Has Valve Taken over Pixar?" in a good way; And It is so addicting thanks to the replay value 10/10
welris;-;Ruined my life 10/10
Rulio;-;This game is truely awesome. I got nothing to say, oh wait, sometimes the boos that you can hear when you lose can be a tiny irritating when you realize you did great but the others failed. However you have a load of community mods like Death Run that can increase your TF2 experience and making you having fun without raging at your enemies.  95/100
Lo-fi Longcat;-;kill a guy while looking fashionable
medli20;-;Ruined my life. 10/10
Evvvvvvv Inc.;-;I paided some big ol' bucks for this game. Only now do I realize it was free-to-play. Big oops on my part. My bad.
Stormesh;-;This game possibly hits the Greatest Multiplayer Gaming Ever. No matter how fun it is. The hats are actually great to use. Blame the people who don't recommend the game. I recommend it because it's useful for everything. and it's like Worms, (because in worms, you wear hats too) That's why. It's also amazing how much the Game got popular. Obviously. It's the most amazing game in the world. You now shoot babies and show them, who is crying.
W-RWickednick | Trade.tf;-;HATS HATS SCREAMING BABIES PEOPLE DYING HOTHOT FLAMEES PUT ALL OF IT IN A CAN AND MIX THROUGHLY YOU HAVE MADE A TF2!
Simply  alibean MBM;-;I need my life back
Meepsauce;-;Flaming duck unusuals, also a $5 rubber duck event. No new map for months because "too advanced". A community made map was refused. Despite unpaid efforts from the community creators for a year. A new gamemode with grappling hooks and 9 modifiers is okay though, because Valve. Fundamental changes to classes that have existed in a thriving game for 7 years, because apparently they were the reason this game went downhill. Also, gimmick weapons that seek to support the handicapped players. Danger Shield still in. Minisentry is still broken.  you, Valve.
Once Sold, Considered Broken;-;It's taken over my life. If you're reading this, it means I'm dead and I want you to have all my hats jk I would never give my hats away
FuKuy;-;Best multiplayer FPS of all time. Thanks VALVe.
Nothing to do here.;-;This is by far the most awesome game I've ever played, I've never seen such variety in any other game before, so many different mods, texture packs, it's flexibility, it's support, it's just lovely and I always get back to it. The freedom you have in this game is incredible, you can noclip through every map, record demos which you can then play back from different angles, movierecording at any fps rate, relatively powerful scripting language, dedicated private free serverhosting, easy access to players on the server to contact them, all textures editable, gravity editable, it's just purely amazing. And it's also relatively bug free by now, compare this to other AAA titles nowadays, there's nothing like this, that'S why I find myself always getting back to it. And it's not just about fragging & killing either, there is also the medic which heals people, you can play surf maps or jump maps to pull off AMAZING stunts, each of the 9 classes is fun in its own way. The moviescene is also huge and this game is almost 6 years old now and is still very actively played.. for reasons! 10/10!
Snerfy;-;If you only play one team based game play his one.
Rin();-;Eat a sandwich while getting shot at Simulator GOTY (Gaben of The Year) :')
Professor Oak;-;Instead of "I would play this game 10000 hours straight and i would still suck. 10/10" I will now post the class jobs or something like that. Heavy: Can be killed by demo or soldier easily has high output of bullets with medic can be a bullet sponge for 10 seconds if under medium fire. Medic: Healer also has a syringe gun that's like snipers smg a bit except I believe it does less damage also has a crossbow that when fired at teammates it will heal them. Sniper: Not the fish COD sniper you probably want the Darwin's danger shield (I think it's that one?) and that will replace your melee but have it so spies can't backstab you. Scout: Runs 2x as fast as everyone else has a double jump triple jump if you use the nuka-cola bat (Can't remember it) and back-scatter makes it so that when y'know you hit the back of your enemies it crits. Soldier: His rocket launcher can be used to rocket jump to get to places that the other classes wouldn't really be able to get to. Pyro: Can airblast using right-click to blow away explosives or can use Soldiers rockets to rocket-jump himself. Engineer: (Best Class!) Can set-up a sentry which fires when any enemy is in range (Might want to protect it against spies though) you want to hide it around corners and his dispenser can give him and his teammates Ammo, Health, and Metal (Metal only for him) and his teleporter to teleport to where the exit has been put (So say your entrance got put in a shack near where you spawned and you put the exit all the way across the map in a tiny patch of grass behind a building you would be able to get behind the enemies spawn better). Spy: He has a few different watches which allow him to go invisible such as The Cloak and Dagger (You can stand in one spot to regen watch time and be pretty much infinitely invisible) The Dead Ringer (Anytime you get shot or damaged you turn invisble and leave behind a decoy dead body) And the normal watches and the spy has his sapper and knife the knife insta-kills with a backstab and the sapper destroys the engineers buildings over time. Demo: (Or Demoman) Has a grenade launcher from which can be used to launch around corners at the enemy team or the enemy engineer's buildings and a sticky grenade launcher which can be blown away by the pyro (I recommend setting sticky grenades up at the start of the match on the exit frames) and of course melee. Owo this is the hardest I've worked in my life. (Jk)
Rod;-;Stupidly fun.
I am the Ice King :(;-;"Game so good that it will ruin your life." A+++++++++++++++++++ WILL GET LIFE RUINED AGAIN
pow;-;It's ok i guess
[GFL] Euphoric Doritos;-;You get hats. You sell hats for more hats. It is a vicious cycle. Once you get more hats, you sell those. For more hats. Hats are everywhere. All hail Gaben, the lord of Savings. All hail Valve, the lords of Hats. Edit: I might play it once in a while, but it isn't good anymore. Valve is running out of ideas, soon TF2 will die out and VALVe will lose their highest engrossing product. Perhaps if it goes back to the old school way, it'll get a lot more popular. Saddens me that it has become this. 2nd Edit: Okay, so I kinda lied. I'll only go back is I am playing with a friend. Or Freak Fortress.
dfens00;-;Hats are love. Hats are life.
Ludor Experiens;-;A great first person shooter with comic look and interesting weapons and a creative and big community. In the first hundred hours you learn to play the game on regular servers, find new weapons you will test (and recognize that not always more damge = better) Enough of these matches? How about a bit coop mann vs. machine? You can upgrade the weapons you learned to love and kill waves of robots with some friends or other TF2 players you can make bonds with. I still have a lot of the players I met as friends on my friendlist. Done more than enough of these two? But wait, there is more. Have fun with community made mods like Zombie Fortress, Versus Saxton Hale, Parcour Fortress, Death Run...there is so more to find. You got that good that the public servers are starting to bore you? Get into competetive and meet highly skilled players along your way. Build a team and learn how strong the team aspect of Team Fortress really can be. Want some special items? There is a whole big community based on trading in TF2. Look around and you'll find players trading the stuff you want to have. (Please inform yourself about what items are worth before starting to trade; many items you find may not be as valuable as some items you want; AND DON'T TRADE AWAY UNUSUALS FOR ANY WEAPONS, EVERY UNUSUAL IS WORTH MORE THAN 1000 WEAPONS, NO MATTER WHICH WEAPONS; I warned you) All in all, great game, many possibilities and a lot the community has to offer.
Assisticat;-;Before I start, THIS IS A GOOD GAME. The people however are not of the nicer catagory. Often when I get on servers there are at least 10 people swearing throught the voice chat. or pasting inapropriate sprays. and the comunity is so based around hats rather than playing. graphics are just fine. gameplay is fun. bunches of maps and guns. comunity has no repect. people who swear all the time outnumber those who don't 3-1. DO NOT get this game if you are under 10. please. have a good life. haveing a good life is a good thing. 9/10 I do not recomend playing it though. it is a fun game. Mute players and disable sprays and go free to play. and you won't lose your life or money.
R3d_Fox;-;I wanna be..the very best! That no one ever was. Catch them,is my real test,to train them in my cause... Hats! Got to catch them all! It's you and me, I know it's my distiny Hats! You're my best friend, in a world we must defend!! I collected hats, and I became pregnant. ;-;
Adrenaline Rush;-;Hats. OMG THIS GAME IS SO SPOOKY ITS  AND POOPY AND POOP AND OMG MY FACE IS MELTING I WANTED THIS ING AWESOME HAT CALLED THE GIBUS AND I KILLED 37523582347492017 PEOPLE AND GOT MY HAT AND  IT WAS AWESOME SO THEN I WORE MY HAT AND EVERYONE SAID I WAS A NOOB BECAUSE THEY HAD HATS THAT WERE SHINY AND  IT LOOKED SO COOL SO I WANTED TO BUY ONE BUT I DIDNT KNOW IT WAS A UNUSUAL SO THEN I BUYED A HAT AND IT WASNT SHINY SO I REPORTED THEM FOR SCAMMED BUT I REALIZED IT WAS A UNUSUAL AND I GOT BANNED AND THEN I GOT SCAMMED OUT OF A LAW AND I WAS  SO I PUNCHED MY SCREEN AND GRABBED A CHAINSAW AND CUT MY FACE OFF AND THEN ATE POOP AND THIS REVIEW IS SO  I WASTED 50 DOLLARS BUYING HATS AND I GET SCAMMED OUT OF IT AND IM GOING INSANE HOLY ! WHAT THE HELL IS WRONG WITH THIS GAME I WANT TO PUNCH THE CREATOR AND THEN GRAB HIS HAT AND PUNCH MY OWN FACE AND SAY YOLO SWAG YOLO AND THEN GRAB A SHOTGUN AND SHOOT EVERYONE IN VALVE WITH A ING SPAS-12 AND MURDER MYSELF AMD BECOME A ZOMBIE YOU KNOW WHAT THIS REVIEW IS SO  SO WHY DONT I STOP YOU ASK WELL I DONT KNOW MAYBE IF YOU WOULD STFU AND LET ME TALK MORE  ON HOW  THIS GAME IS MAYBE YOU WILL ING UNDERSTAND OKAY? NOW LET ME FINISH MY REVIEW! SO THEN I GRABBED A GAS CAN AND PUT GASOILINE ON THE ENTIRE PLACE AND LEFT THE BUILDING AND DROPPED A MATCH ON THE BUILDING AND BURNED VALVE INTO CRISPS AND THEN TF2 CRASHED AND THE SCAMMER WAS MAD AND I WAS UNBANNED! AND THAT RHYMED LOL SO THE SCAMMER QUIT TF2 AND I GOT A REAL HAT YAY HAPPY ENDING  YOU!
Fluffysox;-;I love children. Tf2 is full of children. I love tf2. would reccomend to friends and family, 28/27
Renengure;-;Well, what other games can you conga with your allies and enemies in? :3
1234qwerASDFzxcv;-;Cool! And it's free!
Fancy Ferret;-;cool hat simulator
JackWalms;-;How to become a professional TF2 Player: Play game. Buy hats. Buy more hats. Buy a few more hats. Let people look at you in awe. Trade your hats. Get better hats. Get scammed. Start from square one. ~~~~
B4XT3R;-;The best hat simulator to date - this game features a large assortment of headgear and other wearables in a variety of styles and colours. With the ability to trade, purchase and stash away pixels in a virtual backpack, you can finally feel comfortable knowing that you've wasted your life. And once you have completed your worthless collection of wearable items, you can show them off to other pathetic losers in-game. You can also express your poor creativity by naming, describing and painting your items with a large array of bland, depresssing colours. Become a true jew by repeatedly attempting to make miniscule profit off of hour-long trades! Oh, and you can also shoot stuff. A must-buy for all basement dwellers and fat losers; 10/10.
Regnilla W.;-;A great game with a ton of replay value. I would not call it perfect, but TF2 is a game that will suck you in and waste your life away in the best ways possible. No two rounds of TF2 are the same, so there is always excitement.
VillaiN // G6Hentai.com;-;Let me just tell you, this game is euphoric. From the free to play novices donning their wonderful gibuses and mercenary badges with dates less than a month prior, to the phlog pyros, to the 8 snipers on a payload offense, all the way down to 5 Pleb-Tier spies pursuing a single heavy for 10 minutes. All of this just draws you in via amazement. All of the 9 classes in the game and dozens and dozens of weapons are simply there to pull in you in for the real purpose of the game. Hat simulation. After playing the game for a few months you are bound to purchase more than just the 5 dollars you wasted to get a premium account, now you are beginning to put yourself in debt as there was a sunbeams fedora on the market that you had to have, in order to attain maximum euphoria alongside your fellow brony friends. Although the review has indeed been negative to this point, you will meet some amazing people and experience some wonderful moments along the wanderlust that is TF2 and by the end of the road you will have over 3k hours clocked and have over 2 thousand of your parents dollars logged in cancerous unusuals. I am just a lone wanderer in the massive journey that is, Team Fortress 2 .
Zyga;-;WAIT YOU ARENT PLAYING YET? ITS FREE MAN! Story: 10/10 (you can follow a story for this. Rather rare in FPSs) Gameplay: 10/10 (FPS, and 9 classes each with unique things they can do. Yeah, perfect.) Presentation: 10/10 (Of its own theme) Soundtrack: 7/10 (Could use some work, maybe more songs form the VSO) Replayability: 10/10
eefra*back on monday;-;First off, I want to start by saying that I have had quite a lot of experience with this game, and all the different mechanics in it, which make it very interesting. TF2 really isn't just your ordinary shoot-and-run game, it has much more to it than just aiming a gun and pressing M1. The classes are what really make the game stand out of the crowd. Classes are divided in to three different types, offensive classes, defensive classes and support classes. I'm going to go through all of the different classes and their purposes in the game. OFFENSIVE CLASSES: The Scout: He's fast and effective at doing objectives. Double jumps and speed make him move quite unexpectedly. He might be fast and do good damage, but he is quite weak. Equipped with a scattergun, a pistol, and a baseball bat. The Soldier: He's slow, but deals quite a big splash damage with his rockets. He has quite a lot of health so he can take quite big hits as well. Equipped with a rocket launcher, a shotgun, and a shovel. The Pyro: It's quite self explanatory with the name. Pyro does a lot of damage with it's close range flame thrower, and can also airblast enemy projectiles (rockets, grenades, sticky bombs). Equipped with a flame thrower, a shotgun and a fire axe (ironically) DEFENSIVE CLASSES: The Demoman: He is a drunk black scottish man with one eye. Demoman is the class who uses explosives, much like the Soldier. He can also take a big hit, but not as well as the Soldier. Equipped with a grenade launcher, a stickybomb launcher (the bombs stick to walls, and are detonatable) and a bottle. The Heavy: A big man, with a big gun and a big Russian accent. He's the most tanky class in the game, and has a freaking minigun. Be wary though, he is very slow, and usually depends on having a Medic. Equipped with a freakin' minigun, a shotgun and his bare freakin' fists. You really wouldn't want to mess with him. The Engineer: He's one of the more unique classes in the game, he can build an automatic sentry gun that shoots at enemies, a dispenser which gives him and teammates health and ammo and a teleporter to get your comrades faster to the frontlines. When an engineer is good, it is a game changer definitely. Equipped with a shotgun, a pistol, a wrench and a construction- and destruction PDA. SUPPORT CLASSES: The Medic: He's the one who is responsible of keeping the whole team alive, and you should definitely protect him. He's a german doctor, who might be a bit on the crazy side... Equipped with syringe gun (ouch), a medi gun (a gun that is used to put a healing beam on your teammates) and a bonesaw. The Sniper: He can quite easily pin down key enemy targets like heavies from a long distance, but is also quite weak, and vulnerable to Spies. This Australian man is effective in long range, but starts to get less effective when in close range combat, since the Sniper doesn't have much health. Equipped with a sniper rifle, an SMG, and a kukri. The Spy: A lady killer (figuratively) and a man killer (literally). The spy is a stealth class who can get behind enemies, turn invisible, disguise as other players, disable and destroy Engineer buildings and effectively kill unaware enemies with one stab in the back. Definitely one of the more interesting classes. Equipped with a revolver, a butterfly knife, a disguise kit, an invisibility watch and a sapper. I would also like to point out that this game has had an unusually long lifespan! It's been over 7 years since the release of the game, and people still play this actively! Although the economy has went down the shitter. I was thinking of typing about the different types of unlockable weapons in the game, but this is already a really long review in itself, so I'll let you guys look into them yourselves. If you want to play an FPS-shooter that's out of the norm, TF2 would definitely be something I would recommend. It's free and fun. Phewh. It's been quite a job writing all this. Lastly I would like to state that this is my favourite game of all time, and I hope you guys found this review interesting and or helpful! Go out and play this awesome game (for free). Peace.
Hush;-;Welcome to E- Simulator. If your head is on fire, you get respect pretty easily. If your head is similar to the sun, you're a saint. If your head has a few scattered metal bits circling around it, you're awful. Get out. Have fun, kiddo.
adnanBro;-;I entered server Played as Medic Healed Heavy And he said "REALY THANKS!"
Agiri~Weak~ Birthday :3;-;TF2. A game where if you're bad you are a F2P or if you're too good you're a hacker. A game where if you are wearing no hats you are worthless or if you have 20+ unusuals you are lifeless.. TF2 Community in a nutshell 9.67456/10
Tota;-;Best free Game ever
[24/7] B>Key: 15.77 Ref;-;10/10 would recommend
Bacxaber;-;Months without a substantial update, and we get the following: Unnecessary weapon skins that are essentially the same thing as botkillers, almost every weapon they touched was ruined (R.I.P. Engineer 2007-2015), and some new maps - one of which that should have been added months ago. TF2 is dead.
Burnie #away17th~23rd;-;So, Team Fortress 2 is a game that is free to play and offers a fun user experience to people of a large age range. TF2 gives players the choice to play with friends and have a good laugh, or even take it to the next level with competitive gaming. One thing which I love about team fortress 2 is that almost everyone is happy to play with you and that some items in the game are created by our online community. This gives people the chance to display their own creations and hopefully bring them to life in game. TF2 is more of a relaxed game and does not require you to be good at first person shooters. This is because there is a class suited to every style of play. If you prefer to stealth and be hidden, then the spy is for you. However, if you having a bad day and you cant concentrate, why not throw out some flames with the pyro's flamethrower which requires no practice to use. There is also a large amount of different gamemodes on TF2 such as pushing a large bomb into the enemys base or even sending a rocket into space. If your a relaxed person looking for a bit of fun with a game that is not full of try harding people... then tf2 is definatly for you! I highly recomend it :) Happy gaming
The Pun-Isher [trade.tf];-;>Be me >Be 15 year old  >Decide to play cool looking game called tf2 >I'm sorta good but people make fun of me for being f2p >I decide to become p2p >BAD DECISION.jpg >I spend all my money on hats >Soon lose my job due to how much I play tf2 >Eventually money runs dry and can no longer buy hats > >Start selling myself for sex so I can buy hats >Pretty sure that by now I play tf2 while I sleep >Mfw I get all the hats in the game but I have no social life, girlfriend, friends and my family have disowned me. Worth it.
Space;-;it's ok
NO INTERWEB FOR 14 DAYS, CYKA;-;10/10 full of racist and offesive people It ruined peoples life I laugh at them
New Vegas > 3;-;Literally the worst game ever
[HotH] SgtVanGelder;-;This game is 7.9 GB's, and 7.8 are hats.
Stanley the Talking Grapefruit;-;I'm broke, I spent all of my money on non-existent hats to wear while being ruthlessly spawn-camped by snipers. My team is always full of Gibus-wearing pyrovision Scouts. I have 5 MvM vouchers, yet no Tour of Duty badges because my team always goes full Sniper. And Spy. And one Pyro. I can't enjoy the sounds of my character's pained screams because of the squeakers constantly violating my ears. I've gotten into arguments with 9 year-olds about who has a better beard, which doesn't exist. This is my favorite game of all time. 11/10
Noxovo;-;A very good, and addictive game, even years after its original release. The replay value of this game is just amazing, with each class can be played in different ways, depending on the situation and items you have. Also, this is one the perfect example of a how free-to-play games should be, free users can get every weapons in-game , while upgrading to premium can be done as cheap as $0.10, completely optional, and gives tons of benefits and features. 10/10
Timeflyer;-;this game made me spent money on pixels and even on plushies, I've spent so much on this one game... 10/10 worth it.
Trogdor The Burninator;-;The most fun you can have online is now free
bandit leader;-;this game have all very funny and tactical too if you want , i been playing like 6 months and every time is like first time. very recomended if u wanna have a good time
MOUSEY MAN;-;this game  my wallet i now live on the street 420/10 VALVAO PLZZ MOR HETS
Neko_Dude|Bali Trip;-;What to heck, why you no play this game? A very casual (and sometimes competitive) first person shooter based around hats and dancing. I recommend this game to those who love casual first person shooters. HOWEVER, for those who want reasons not to play this game. I would have to say that this game sometimes suffers the occasional stalemate, forcing a slow and very drawn out round. There also suffers the problem (doesn't bother me) of the cartoon-like graphics. -Very fun overall. Rating: 8.9/10
Whisker :> | tipofthehats.org;-;still playing this game jesus send help
_inu;-;Game of the year, every year.
SauloFXx;-;Team Fortress 2, one of the most enjoyable FPS, it's a unique kind of FPS, always getting updates, making the gameplay being more fun and exciting. You can choose between 9 classes, all of them with their unique functions and abilities, you can always attack or defend, both are great in gameplay, you can attack and defend in thousands of ways, always surprising your opponents! You don't have money to buy weapons? No worries! You get them as long as you play the game, and even doing achivements. Recieved an weapon you didn't liked? You can trade this weapon to get another one in public servers or even your friends, or maybe use it to craft a brand new weapon. Yes, that's right! If you never played it, Team Fortress allow you to combine weapons to create new ones, a big variety of weapons, there's going to be one that you will enjoy using it. So, if you're looking for a different and new FPS experience, i recommend Team Fortress 2, i'm sure you will have no regrets.
DinoBoy612;-;This game is simply amazing, I don't care what you call of  Haters say, Because does it look like anyone cares? If you don't like this game, Go back to Xbox Live Where you belong.
yogo kery;-;THIS GAME IS COOL FOR WANNABE PRO LIEK ME I QUICKSCOPED 5 FEGGITS ON TURBINE MID, THEN I'VE GOT KICKED BCS OF "CHEATS" 11\10 COMMUNITY
No Dick McMuffin;-;1000+ hours. I have 0 hats. dont do what I did. worship Gaben = get hats.
Moist;-;Community Unfair weapons and combos Dying Terrible Competitive community Demoman > All Other classes I'll take 20
[V!P] Viper Djinn;-;This is a good game. Yes.
Merczy(No Sound);-;That was a tasty banana!
[tea] terrible tortilla kbab;-;Probably one of the best, if not THE best online first person shooter out there. A game for casual players. A game for pros. Frankly - for absolute everyone. Pretty good mechanics, hilarous background story, frequent updates and events. "Free 2 play" but not "Pay 2 win". Nuff said. You absolutely have NO EXCUSE for not even trying it :). Both thumbs up.
sterscrem - Away In Japan;-;I've spent over a thousand hours of my life sitting at a computer and playing this game. And I'll be damned if it wasn't the best time I've ever had.
)r( Deceptive Muddler;-;I don't know why I buy other games.
Polar Bear;-;I like playing this game while listening to mozart and having a glass of shardonnay. And boy are my arms tired
Rainbow^_Soon...;-;This Game Rocks! :)
Homeless Polarbear;-;Its like my grandma but with more hats and kids running around screaming
Couch Potato;-;Team Fortress 2 is really fun multyplayer game. There are 9 classes and all of them have balance, like heavy has a lot of health but he is really slow and really big target on the battlefield, sniper is verry good at long range but he is verry weak in close range, pyro is verry good at close range but weak at long range, ect. In tf2 there are weapons that you can get by random drop, buy them from mann co. store, craft them or trade them. All weapons have balance, no weapons are OP,if there is a op weapon it's going to get a nerf, they have good sides and bad sides, like frontier justice: you gain revenge crits but you have no random critical hits and smaller clip size, tomislav (minigun) has faster spin up time but has slower fireing speed. In tf2 there is so mutch teamwork, one team is probably going to lose if they have only one class on a team or if they don't have a medic or if they have 6 snipers and no engineers to defend. Overall this game is great and it's free, so if you are reading this on computer that you own, why don't you download the game. BTW sorry for my English ;)
Land Mantis;-;In the words of Robn's famous Skyrim recommendation: "Ruined my life. Five stars."
Sharp;-;9 Classes with fun personalities and gameplay, a really fun skill and team based (8 snipers on a team :P) game with a huge variety of really good designed maps. A lot of balanced weapons you can mix and have fun with. Funny cartoon based models "I need theres tf2 to live in happy" My rating is: 10/5 genuine hats
pants;-;>couple days ago >playing TF2 >joins pl_upward server >"Welcome to The Furry Pound!" >oh god please no >furry and brony sprays all over spawn >nobodys really fighting, theyre only pushing the cart to extend time >all talking about their favorite animals and what theyd like to do to eachother >sees a group of people all crouching in a circle >changes to demoman >puts down stickies >*dramatic explosion* >taunts and says "GET ING  IDIOT" in chat >gets banned because i killed all the babies in a nursery >worth it *based from a true story*
john the asian;-;team fortress 2 is a fun,action paced game base around 9 balanced classes,if you die a lot,its not because of some over powered class or weapons,its probably because u suck. xD
pingu;-;10/10 Best hat simulator out on there, and its even free. Played 500 hours since december. Prepare to get addicted....
Cygnus;-;dis is da 1st out of da team fortres series,,, and i mus say............. da graphics r a lil... GAY??? (lolz JK) anyway.. moving on2 da review..: i mus say it has gr8 featurs.. 1st of all u play 9 characters,,, city boy. armyman... fireman: blak man (AKA ..... demonstradion man)) ,fatman,,, hilbilly, hitler. austarian long shoot man. specal agent thos r da guys u play as n 8 is wite (u can play as blak person.. demonstradion man(i m not racist but i h8 blak ppl).: and anoter gr8 featur dis da hats,,, got da blak hat!! aite listenm: wen u st8 play tem fortes... ur gon be like WTFF!?!??specalagent always die 2 da firemans lef&rite...............: they shud give agents 2 knifes and waterguns for fireman bcuz fire is op (imo) lmao and more ezzz kinda gay 2... does anybody know how 2 make spikyballs sparkle as hitler???? BTW rof fly as the armyman my overal raitng gamplay : 2/10 graphiks : 3/10 >(r not as good like blak ops 3...need dat realism!!(uhh i mean thers bildings but its lik WTF??? jpeg alert lolz) players: 8/9 (i lov th e wite ppl and wite power) overal game play/10 (DOnt buy dis game if u got atleads 3 games lik batelfield or blakops plzzzz))
Marshe;-;You can't go wrong with this title. Not only is it fun, but it is ridiculously varied. Valve has worked on this game with additions and fixes since its launch, so it has undergone a lot of changes, and it barely resembles what it was when it first launched. If you get into it now, sadly you're probably going to have a hard time understanding what's going on under all that cluster of weapons, hats and whatnot, but even though it became such a chaotic mess, Team Fortress 2 remains my favorite Team-based FPS of all time. You have lots of options with every class thanks to the sheer number of weapons available to them. Each one is balanced and focused on a specific role, so you're bound to find one that fits your gameplay preferences like a glove. Don't like being an useless sniper who stands way back, away from the action? Fine, get up close and go with a bow. Your team needs a strong offense in order to fend off enemy attacks, and you're playing as a Medic? Switch from the normal Medigun which confers limited invincibility to a Kritzkrieg for guaranteed crits, no problem. Are you so pro with your aim that you feel disgusted using the stock Rocket Launcher as a Soldier or Grenade Launcher as a Demoman? No problemo, use the Direct Hit or Loch'n'Load to show off your mad skillz and deal more damage as a result of your prowess. Do you love being a soldier, but feel a glorious desire to help your team with temporary buffs? Okay, give up your shotgun and go with a Buff Banner, Concheror or Battalion's Backup so you can help everyone push with increased damage, increased speed or increased defense, depending on your equipment of choice. There are a lot of options available to you. It's simply amazing what this game offers. Plus, since it became F2P, there is no reason not to try it. Get it now!
CFFG. JJ (Jay-getaclub);-;BEST GAME ON STEAM! First off, tf2 has many gamemodes, so they're lots of choices to choose from! It's origanality is amazing, saying that it has trading weapons, have killstreaks and kill counters, hats and miscs, It's endless! Plus, it is one of the most played games on steam, and has a huge amount of recomendations, so go ing buy this game, and ask friends about why they enjoy it!!!
Buttered Toast;-;this game is awesome! just a classic killing game with good graphics
Lacey Shadows;-;you want a review? well even if you didn't I'm giving you one anyways. TF2 is not like most FPS games, let alone one that is free to play. TF2 is the sequel to a game known as team fortress classic, a mod using the unreal tournament engine. blah blah blah historical stuff I prolly got wrong. ANYWAYS: TF2 is quite simply an amazing game, with 9 different classes, each with their own unique roles in a successful match. 1. scout: he runs fast, capping intel, capping control points, and pushing the bomb cart with the power of 2 people! warning, since he runs so fast and has a double jump, allowing for high evasiveness, hes also pretty squishy, having a measly 125 base health. 2. soldier: soldier is a powerhouse, holding 200 base health and a rocket launcher that deals splash damage to multiple enemies. his rocket jumping ability (though this takes a LOT of practice to fully master) can get him to the point even faster than a scout! 3. pyro: the most controversial class, having 175 base health, medium-paced walking speed, and a short-ranged based primary (the flamethrower), pyro can be seen as the weakest class. while most newbies would complain to him being an overpowered fire demon here to eat your babies, they really just don't know how easy it is to counter her. (ONE SECOND THOUGH: PYRO CAN AIRBLAST PROJECTILES AND EXTINGUISH BURNING TEAMMATES BY USING M2, OR MOUSE 2). 4. demoman: arguably the most powerful class in the game, demoman is here to bring diversity to the game. (y'know, because hes scottish). anyways, demoman, while having the same 175 health as pyro, has one distinct advantage: the stickybomb launcher. this bad boy does 60 damage per sticky, meaning that spamming it on a public game makes you a bad player that should go back to playing minecraft and the hundredth jumpscare game pewdiepie just played. 5. heavy: also considered one of the weakest in the game (especially without a medic latched onto him 24/7) heavy is the mascot for TF2. this bald, bear wrestling, russian giant shows none of his ruthlessness in the game, but rather the comics (which even then he realy kind of doesn't). heavy has 300 health! "wow!" you must think, until you learn his disadvantages. he is the slowest and has the largest hitbox in the game, making him easy to pick off from afar. 6. medic: oh boy. medic is the second fastest class in the game, just after scout. he also has 150 base health.your CoD-washed mind might think "hey wheres his souper smg ding?" well thats because TF2's medic is actually here for healing. sure, he has a syringe gun (which is basically a flamethrower without afterburn) but no sane medic would rush into a fight like that, as he'd die near instantly. (each class has their own way of dealing 100+ damage in one shot, though this is mostly up to crits/ actual skill). instead, medic uses his medigun, a long, black, healing device that can patch up your teammate's wounds in seconds! plus, when you have full "ubercharge" you can either have increased healing, full invincibility, 100% chance of everything your teammate does being a critical hit, or a tiny uber that increases your resistance to a certain type of attack, and gives you health for the damage the person you're healing recieves. 7. engineer: engineer builds sentries, dispencers, and teleporters. sentries will guard an area, sitting in place waiting for some unsuspecting scout to run in and get blasted away by tons of bullets (and rockets when your sentry reaches max level). dispencers health and provide ammo for you and your teammates. teleporters are capable of sending your teammates from one side of the map to the other, however, all these buildings require a lot of care, as they are susceptable to many attacks, and will do no damage to stock ubers (the kind that grants full invincibility). and since you'll probably be taking care of your buildings and aimbot, engineer only has 125 health. 8. sniper: sniper, if played right, can outdamage demoman! even though sniper only has 125 health, he has the longest range out of every class, what with a sniper rifle and all. sniper is the one of the only classes that can kill a fully overhealed heavy in less than 3 seconds. the sniper rifle isn't like most sniper rifles in other games. having good aim is essential to playing sniper, as his main source of damage is getting headshots, otherwise he'll normally do only 50 damage. 9. spy: spy is a real sneaky rat. he can diguise as any class, sap buildings (turning them off and eventually destroying them unless the engineer hits and breaks the sapper), his main "deal" is that he can "backstab" enemies. backstabbing someone is always an instant kill, with only for a few exceptions. TF2 is a great game, and I suggest you look into it.
Mn&C;-;Hat Simulator 2K14 is the premiere hat simulation program of the decade! Best of all its free! {Jokes on you if your a pay to play, scrub lord}
DAAAAARKNESSSSS;-;My son, who suffers from mild autism, is now in his room crying after being called a "" by one of the people with a cartoon horse next to their name, then he was issued a ban for 420 seconds. I understand these to be the actions of private server moderators. Now, I allowed him to play this game because it is usually very family friendly and politically correct, we especially loved the animations last year, but this is crossing the line. I don't know
DAAAAARKNESSSSS;-;My son, who suffers from mild autism, is now in his room crying after being called a "" by one of the people with a cartoon horse next to their name, then he was issued a ban for 420 seconds. I understand these to be the actions of private server moderators. Now, I allowed him to play this game because it is usually very family friendly and politically correct, we especially loved the animations last year, but this is crossing the line. I don't know
Cockeye the Sailor Man;-;This game makes me moist
Void Dweller;-;I'm playing TF2 since 2010 and still enjoy it. First of all one most important thing about it: it's 10x more fun when you play with friends. Here's my top 10 reasons why I love that game: 1 You don't need to be great at multiplayer FPS games (CS, Quake 3, UT etc.) to be good at TF2, of course skill, reaction and good aim helps, but as long as you know your role and if you're playing it smart you're gonna be just fine and there's always something you can figure out or learn to turn things to your advantage. 2 It has one of the best and most hilarious characters with hundreds of lines and a lot of space for random accidents that make me lol really hard even after playing it for three years. The humor in this game is great and it never gets old. 3 A well crafted balance between teams and classes and really great maps. Unlike most games with good balance this one doesn't make you feel underpowered and pressured to be a real pro or die as a noob in shame (I'm looking at you Starcraft), when you start to do things right you start to feel how powerful your class is, that feel that by doing simple things you're supposed to do is bringing the glorious victory of your team closer every passing second is priceless. 4 Complexity in simplicity: each class has a simple purpose and just few simple tools to accomplish it. The complex gameplay of TF2 is made of very simple concepts, like "rocket launchers hurt people", "if you get an ubercharge you can use it and make yourself and the guy you're healing invulnerable and push through heavy resistance", "airblast - alternate fire of your flame thrower, is pushing things away, players, rockets and even arrows, also it extinguishes allies and saves them from burning to death", "spies may look like one of your teammates, but act suspiciously, smack their face with your wrench" and one more simple thing most new players are having a hard time to figur out for some reason: "engies can actually help other engies to build and defend!" 5 there are no weak or powerful weapons, most weapons are the same as your default weapons except they are slightly better in something and a bit worse in other thing. You don't need to know the entire arsenal of the game, you just need to find the weapons that are most appealing to your playstile. Also there are a few weapons change the way you play, like engie's gunslinger, you can't build big fat and mean sentries, you build a small mini-sentry, however equipping that thing gives you HP boost, and makes you a mobile obnoxious prick who runs around and builds and instantly deploys those annoying mini sentries whenever he feels like. 6 Most items are cosmetic, that means you don't need to have any hats, high level or money spent in game's store to be effective, some weapons that will amplify your strong traits would be a good addition though and those are very easy to get. Also despite those cosmetic items thanks to the good character design all classes are very distinguishable, you always know what to expect from a fat guy with a minigun and you always know you should kill the dude in white coat because he heals others. Still you can get some cosmetic items and look badass or funny. 7 The game is constantly updated, every now and then you get new maps, modes, bug fixes, balance fixes, weapons and cosmetics. Sadly Valve gets more lazy and greedy with each new major update and makes more hats rather than real content. 8 They got it right with graphics. I remember playing other modern FPS games and that was terrible! All those "eye candy" effects, strong contrasts, "cinematic" camera movement, "realistic shaders/lighting/effects, poor character design and "spectacular" explosions were very distracting and were making it really hard to tell what's going on before it would be too late. 9 It's all about teamplay and mission goal rather than killcount and skill. A team of average players who help each other will always be stronger than a team of disorganized show-offs with mad skillz who play their favorite class even when the team needs a medic and engie and don't care about anything but their killcount. 10 Valve puts a lot of effort each year to make the Haloween event in TF2 very VERY awesome. However there are things I don't like in TF2: 1 Community. LOTS of obnoxious kids, trolls, pretentious jerks and total s. 2 Trading. I hate it, I really-really hate it. 3 Painfully stupid people. This game introduced me levels of stupidity I couldn't even imagine. 4 Bugs. There are some really annoying gameplay and performance issues with the game and Valve pretends really hard that everything is cool. 5 Cheaters. Sometimes there will be some  who will ruin everyone's game by flying through walls and spawncamping with 100% accuracy and 100% crits. However there are some guys who use not so obvious hacks and claim they knew where you were and hit you from an impossible angle and distance for ten times in a row just because they are so good at this game and you're a stupid butthurt noob. 6 Server customization. Finding a server that has good ping, vote menu enabled, good map list and doesn't have custom music, idiotic settings like instant respawn, ads or other  are very hard to come by. Hope this was helpful.
70;-;Ayo, guys, I want play in dis game all time. Am already got ghostly gibus and i rly happy. Now I look forward to when me drop Backburner and I am going to valve public in order to show ma rly skell. Its da best game. Gaben is love. Gaben is life!!1
Samuel Titor;-;What year is it ?
AlexKT;-;Nice F2P game from Valve. A good way to spend time with friends who don't like to spend money.
Porridge;-;It took me 2000+ hours of my life, to realise that this is a waste of time. But I recommend you have as much fun with it as you can, before you grow the  up.
trist[]n;-;I love this game! but unfortunately, my pc doesn't let me to download it! :c
oph;-;worst game ive ever played
videogames;-;i want my 1700 hours back i wish i had friends
= ocu = ScrapBot;-;Cool game.
Custom;-;I used to love TF2, but I don't think I can recommend it in its current state. The community is awful, the focus of the game is completely lost, and it has become a fashion show for people and their collectables. It's hard to find people in random servers that just want to actually try and play the game anymore. There is almost always one guy that just wants you to stand still and look at his stupid hat or #RARE gun. Most Demomen now just want to run around with a sword and an axe and get kills instead of actually helping the team by destroying sentries like their class is supposed to do. It is no longer a shooter people play to win at a casual level, but more of a virtual hangout for weird kids. I just want it to go back to what it was in 2007.
Swaging Pug;-;Very Good And Adictive Game. This Game, In my Opinion, Is The best Game Created By Valve. This Formidable Game, have got ALL: -No Blood -Funny Characters -Interesting History -HATS ! Please, Rate this Review If U like it... 10/10 KONGA IS HERE!
www.com;-;woooooooahhhhh this game is fun! i like cartoons so i play team fort 2 with my friends. the community is so all the time and cartoons. i watch spongebob a honey bunches and oats so this game is perf 4 me! if you like cartoons and funny people then play team forest too with me. im about to go play right now, come and join me! leeeets plaaaaayyy!!!!
Dr. Eris;-;It's okay I guess.
Goon-e;-;Download this game, it's a fun game. Alot of glitch/exploit/hacks but fun.
[Jacket];-;Like Skyrim with hatz 10/10 would violently masterbate again.
Twurkk;-;Ruined my life, 10/10
Dawst;-;This game is great. If it can ruin my life, it can ruin yours too!
[]::.. FreeFrag ..::[];-;Nine distinct classes provide a broad range of tactical abilities and personalities. Constantly updated with new game modes, maps, equipment and, most importantly, HATS-HATS-HATS!
sem;-;i've spent my entire lifes savings on this game please help me
Mushroom_;-;Well, this game went from Industrial 20th century combat simulator, to a "who can get the most points" simulator, to a Hat Simulator, to a Bread Simulator, to a Conga Simulater, and this sim is the current one. 10/10 Would Doge Again
[KeyBot] Schwer #rks;-;this game gets me moist
K.!.L.L.3.R.;-;F2p=Fun2Play. Really Good Multiplayer Game.Balance Classes and just a superb game to have fun.Each and every class has some unique skill attached to them and mastering every class is pretty tough.After so many hours of play,I have only mastered Spy and Medic. Best Game Ever.
EdevoK | Hombie;-;11/10 Best hat simulator for 7+ years in a row.
Cdc1893;-;Great game and an fantastic game with friends.
|LZ| Waffle;-;Club Penguin with guns.
GodPhantom;-;Unknown Why I always been killed with F*cking Frying Pan. I noises every godamn TIME. And the First Sound On TF2 Were: FUCCCCCCCC WHY I ALWAYS DIE IN THE SAME PLACE!!!!????VTJBVYIFYTVTYYCTVYGYFCYGUF Infinity/10 Updated On 16 March Since 3 Weeks Ago,I was Stopped Playing TF2,Playing CSGO. I Love TF2,But CSGO called Me to play The Game. I was Thank You For TF2 For Spending My Time For Almost 350+Hours. I'll Play Again Some Day,But Not Today. Now I'll Trade almost all my items with other people for CSGO Skin. Thank You Team Fortress 2 For Making My Life More Worthless. Also I'll Miss My Sentry and ing Frying Pan.
Plush;-;Short Review: Go And ing Download It Long Review: Team Fortress 2 is definantly the best Free to Play game out there. There are so many different game types in TF2 from CTF,Mann vs Machine and even the Hidden. You can get any weapon by crafting,trading or finding, without using real money. Although you are limited to a short backpack space as you start off, you can easily purchase a 10c item to upgrade to premium and get heaps more spaces. Even though being released 7 years ago there is always an update around the corner. One of the best things about TF2 is that if you get an item which is festive,vintage, strange,genuine, collectors and more you can sell it on the steam market and get real steam credit. I know I have got a a lot of moeny from selling my items, some people even get 500 of steam credit, by selling a rare/awesome item. I can`t possibly list all the things you can do in TF2, but overall Team Fortress 2 is the best game ever, it even beats all my paid games. :)
twitch.tv/TheGamingNachos;-;One of the best free games out there!
Grendster;-;Team Fortress 2 It may be old game, but the idea never gets old. Team Fortress 2 is about guns, hats and miscs. and when you use them all together, you may even do money. Yes, You may earn money in Team Fortress 2, to your steam wallet. Of Course, it is also very good as game, the Mann vs Machine, vanillas and all other game modes make Team Fortress 2 one of the most flexible game to play. What you're waiting for, it is free, amazing and for everyone.
Dispenz0r;-;I don't have to say anything about this game, you probably know about it already and if you don't, you live under a rock this is the most amazing FPS i've ever played in my life, i seriously love this game if you didn't try it out yet, get it NOW oh and if it's your first time playing this game, don't ever get cosmetics they'll curse you, trust me
[MT5] Big Bad Birna;-;Easily worth the purchase price.
Jemima /music;-;Tf2 is an excellent class based fps that has taken over the last few years of my life.
[KI TP] Gangpirate;-;>spend 2,500 hrs on TF2 >Plays on CG sever >Gets airshot 1 2 too many times by demo bots >ragequit
lime_;-;Great game based off a great engine, you'll see lots of new things every week from the community and valve, the best free to play deal you can find, unlike the silly "pay to win" games. Whether you like sneaking behind your enemies or burning them down with fire, Team Fortress 2 is a great game!
Trips;-;This game may not have weapon skins, but does it really need to? I mean, come on everyone... it has hats. What more could we ask for?... Oh wait! Collectors being bought at half the price they should be being bought at!? Wonderful! This game is perfect for you! ...Oh right, there is some gameplay, but who the hell plays tf2 for it?! Well dammit everybody should but it's pointless now. I swear everyone is going to become a salesman by the age of 13 in 10 years when this game is obviously going to be still relevant.
Epalaka;-;I only played a little bit but it was fun.
Safira;-;Nice game!
Oldspice Bodyshots;-;Shooting people in the torso to make 10 year olds irrationally angry is a once in a lifetime experience.
ZyaxitronED[YT];-;This game is one of the best free to play games I have ever played and would possibly say that it is the best overall game I have played. I do not recommend this game to any Call of Duty player who thinks they are amazing at games just by playing COD. This game will make you angry if you go in hopefull that all of your hours of COD will pay off. They wont. This game is for the adventurous people who enjoy a community based game. What I enjoy about this game is the fact that you can find weapons from enough gameplay time, the fact you can craft weapons, the achievements, the taunts, how you can install huds and change in game visuals, the range of characters and of course, the taunt kills. The taunt kills give you a sense of achievement when done on an opposing player because they are very hard to do (apart from against lazy snipers). Overall this game is highly recommended by me and others that I know. I would encourage you to download this game. - [YT] Zyaxitron Ed
Fofelam;-;This is a very awesome game, i will see forward to this game in the future. 10/10 IMO
Grim.;-;Let me rename this game a bit - Hat Collecting Simulator .
Hearts Desire;-;Team Fortress 2, the game where buying vitural hats are more expensive than actually buying them in real life. 10/10 needs more Gibus
Wizzer;-;A really funny game to spend time, everyone should at least try it :)
BananaSquid;-;Okay, here are the basic classes: -A new yorker kid who kills people using baseballs and soda -A patriotic dude who jumps by shooting rockets at his feet -A pyromaniac who sees the world as rainbows and candy -A drunken african-scottish man who blows people up -A fat russian who eats sandwiches that heal bullet wounds -A texan who builds sentry guns just by opening a damn toolbox -A psycho german doctor who heals people bypointing a gun at them -An australian who throws jars of urine at people -A man in a suit who can magically transform into any of the above and kill people by just stabbing them in the back area In summary, I love TF2.
cloud;-;its ok
Derpy MeeM;-;Very funny game. The game never ends. And it's free!
Phone Pyae Tun;-;THE GOOD Team Fortress 2 is not your ordinary game. Focusing on its cartoony graphics, offbeat humor and wide variety of game modes and player classes, but it will definitely put some people off. If you're a person who likes team-based multiplayer first-person-shooter video games, I think this game is for you. The sound in the game is exciting overall together with the visuals. It's a perfect game. You are always updated with new incredible releases. Last but not very least, a very fun and unique shooter with cool mechanics and great teamplay is totally free to play. THE GREAT The game can be addictive and challenging if you let it. The game is very fun, with different characters and balanced. One of the best Games of all time for sure. People who call this game or boring don't know much about shooters to be honest. Each class is a really funny, cool and interesting character with an unique and awesome personality. You're not running around with an AK47 or M16, but with Syringe Guns and Sticky Bombs, it's quite hilarious. Not to mention its great item-drop system, an amazing fanbase and the community, they are the perks which keep the players from all over the world to play this game. THE UGLY There is no serious gameplay whatsoever. If the developers wanted players to have a real serious gameplay, they would have made an in-game system where players get penalized for quitting the game before the match ends. Face the facts: You can disconnect the current game any time you like even in MVM matches. Perhaps for dynamic joining and disconnecting of players of the current match, but it can be frustrating when you spend the whole damn match without stable players. Gameplay Most Team Fortress 2 game modes have 2 opposing teams, the Reliable Excavation & Demolition (RED) and the Builders League United (BLU), that compete against each other in various maps to complete certain objectives. Some game modes include: Capture the Flag: Each team attempts to steal the opposing teams intelligence briefcase from their headquarters and secure it back at their own base. King of the Hill: A central point must be captured and defended for a set amount of time to win the round. Payload: One team attempts to escort a rail cart filled with explosives to the enemies base. Team Deathmatch: A team is able to win a round by killing off the members of the opposing team. Characters The players on each team must choose a class to play, each with their own set of abilities and special weapons. Medic: Heals fellow teammates with a Medigun that can berCharged to make other players temporarily invincible. Scout: Runs very fast and is able to double jump. The Scout default weapons are a shotgun and baseball bat. Heavy Weapons Guy: Also known as just Heavy, this is the largest and slowest moving of the classes. He wields a minigun and boxing gloves, and can recover health by eating sandwiches. Pyro: Wears a gas mask and fireproof suit while wielding a flamethrower and fire axe and is best at killing enemies up close. Engineer: Can build teleporters, sentry guns and dispensers that aid other teammates in battle. Sniper: Can kill enemies from far away with his sniper rifle. Enemies can be killed with one shot if they are hit in the head. Demoman: Wields a grenade launcher and sticky bomb launcher that can be used to kill enemies around corners, or lay traps for enemies to run into. Soldier: A rocket launcher equipped brute that is capable of reaching great height by jumping while firing a rocket at the ground. Spy: Can disguise themselves as members of the other team, and can kill enemies with one hit if they manage to sneak behind them and stab them in the back. Can sap Engineers buildings to quickly destroy them.
[AG]TonyTheFatFluffyWolf;-;One of the best firstperson shooters out there, plus its free. If you got spare time, or just bored whilst doing work, grab your computer and play this game, cus we're all wait'n on ya!!!
Kakyoin Noriaki;-;Wonderful simulation of the hat trading black market
Candles;-;ok sdo you pl.ay as dids afat cj giuguy and den u get k ild by an oi m8 or a gu7y ufrom york proly tirn also muikal kills robots
Candles;-;ok sdo you pl.ay as dids afat cj giuguy and den u get k ild by an oi m8 or a gu7y ufrom york proly tirn also muikal kills robots
SirLagsAlot;-;Well I was once like you, a person with a life scrolling through steam, until I saw this so called inncoent game. I donwloaded it,and begain to play now i can't stop and i refuse to leave my PC! I highly reccomend it!
Space Butt;-;Best game ever. Ruins your life <3 Empty your walet. Show off hats. Have no social life. Die happily with your virtual hats. 10/10 no doubt
Shrodu;-;I played this for over 2 years and haven't reviewed it yet? Even after getting 100% achievements?! WHAT'S WRONG WITH ME?!?!?!?! Anywho, your one-stop shop for all your multi-player needs. A team-based game that turns into a free-for-all 3 minutes into the match. After months of playing and getting bad drops, you'll want better hats. You'll go to trade servers..... a lot..... Then it'll be a game about Hats, Trading, Rocket Jumping, Backstabs, Sniped Headshots, and Lazy Engineers. Well recommended.
JUICE ME;-;like skyrim with guns -IGN
Ardillita Reticulada del Norte;-;Before this game, I used to have a life... I think. I remember the sun. The gentle breeze of summer air. The sound of children playing outside. Outside... yeah. I remember going out with... friends? They aren't shooting at each other and why no one is wearing a hat? Poor guys, maybe I should give some gifts around... But, wait. What is this strange triangular sandvich here on my hand? Oh, I remember, it's called pazza, pazzi, pazzia, piazza, pizza! Yes, pizza! And look at that beautiful sunset. That's some serious modding going on here! I need to save this moment forever. Wait! Where is F5? Oh no! Where is the keypad?! And the mouse?! Ctrl+Alt+Supr!!! NO! NO!!! What kind of hellish game is this?! I don't like this character, I wanna change! Where is Esc? Shift+Tab? Alt+Tab? Anything? Please let me out! I'll buy more keys! I'll do whatever you want! What is it that you want? My wallet? My soul? The blood of my first born child? Is all yours! But please don't let me trapped here without a tutorial!!
RoarJr;-;Though my actual in-game hours is closer to 600 hours, Team Fortress 2 (TF2) is one of the best first-person shooters of all time. Feeling the need to just fool around? TF2 is hilariously comical. Feeling the need to play competitively? TF2 has a very high skill cap. Feel the need for variety? TF2 has mounds of variety. Verdict: Team Fortress 2 is a game where just when you think you have had enough of it, it lures you back in and leaves you thinking, "man, I totally love this game."
Small Dick Johnson;-;*Trembling* Uhh, yes, I think this game is amazing a-a-and could only be improved by adding more weap- UUHH I MEAN HATS. YES HATS. THE HATS ARE AMAZING. WE NEED MORE! *Sob* *You hear a gun cocking* "READ IT ALL!" Please Valve, we need m-mm-more hats! If you don't - AAAAAARRRRRGGGGGHHHH I DON'T WANT TO BE KILLED BY A HAT!
Road to;-;Team Fortress 2...Most Epic FPS Online game i ever played. This game includes all classes that every FPS Games combined! Everyone calling you an F2P in a server? No worries! Just dominate them with any Gibus Hat you own to hummiliate them! 10/10 would play this...even grandparents
MASTER YODA;-;This is a very nice game, every time i play it with pleasure !
404;-;I recommend this game to anyone who has never heard of Steam before. I've been playing TF2 since 2009, and I wish I had instead been playing since the 2007 beta. This is a fun game to play, and the ability to use SourceMod to create custom plugins to add new features to the game is one of the greatest selling points in my opinion. Look at all the wonderful gamemodes we've received such as VS Saxton Hale, Slender Fortress and many others. As well, being a lover of beta/unused/cut content in games, and TF2 being jam-packed with beta/unused content....well it's just plain awesome.
POPTART;-;Fun. That is all
GODMODE :c;-;Played it a bit.. it was fine
Littlepip;-;Team Fortress 2 is a unique game in many respects, first and foremost being just how much (and for how long) it's been updated. While it's only recently gone Free, Valve has been supporting the title for years with rather significant content additions, and game-breaking bugs tend to get squashed within hours or days, rather then the months that some other companies take with even their flagship titles. It's also interesting in the fact that you don't actually have to be a living god at first-person shooters to do well or support your team. The Engineer and Medic help their allies out with their buildings and healing abilities, and the hundreds of items available can change any of the classes' capabilities significantly. And, of course, the game is infamous for it's cosmetic items, such as the hats, which don't typically provide any real bonus but do allow you to customize your character further. You have to play this game. And if you're on Steam, you already own it!
scrapp;-;This is supposed to be a review for Counter-Strike: Global Offensive Dedicated Server. Apparently that's not a game. I should have known. Not only can I not play the dedicated server like it is a game, I can't review it like one either. Let me save you some time. Do not try to play Counter-Strike: Global Offensive Dedicated Server! It is not a game! If you want a comparable non-game, open the command prompt. That will save you so much downloading. It's like you have to download all the Counter-Strike: Global Offensive content, but only get to access it through command prompt. Why? Sure sure, other people can play the game on your computer because you're running a "Server" but all I get is words in a black box. Who needs that? Certainly not me! Getting shot repeatedly in Team Fortress 2 is much better. I would encourage you to play Team Fortress 2 over something like Command Prompt Simulator for Counter-Strike: Global Offensive.
[DeagleSquad] RageFu;-;This is a F2P game in which I've spent and I will spend lot of hours playing! Isn't a standard FPS game because of the amount of funny class available to pick! Worth the time downloading for sure!
TPI | Jack Black;-;GREAT GAME (but it's mostly hats)
Lady;-;Met my boyfriend and became obsessed with getting an 80 dollar particle effect. 10/10 would experience again.
sarysa (power failures);-;Take two at a review of this game. I'll make it quick since it's early 2015 now and TF2 has been out for nearly eight years. That said, it's balanced. They keep adding things while still keeping it balanced, with a few notable exceptions. (google Short Circuit, heh) It has lots of game modes, and they keep adding more as well...with Mannpower and its grappling hooks currently in beta. There are tons of communities...many are mature, many are not. There's surely at least one for you and you'll make friends, spend thousands of hours playing. The best part is, it's not an MMO...it's a real competitive and cooperative FPS that you can pick up and put down at any time. Getting bored of the standard game modes? Try mod servers. Versus Saxton Hale/Freak Fortress 2 are the undisputed kings of the modding scene, but there's Deathrun, Prop Hunt, Dodgeball, FortWars, Jailbreak (not my thing, but meh), Slender, Hidden, TF2 Ware, TF2 karts, and so much more. The TF2 dev team has done plenty to rope people in, but it's the modders that fill in the gaps. With the absurd gameplay variety stemming from nine distinct classes, and a Player vs Player foundation, it's impossible to get bored of this game. Also, you might see a hat or two. And some ducks eating bread.
TPI | Jack Black;-;GREAT GAME (but it's mostly hats)
M I D O R T E C H I E S;-;It's ok.
Apoc Hedgie;-;Team Fortress 2, seems like such an understatement when I say I recommend this. It's probably my favorite game of all time with over 2000 hours logged on it. Even though people may not like the hats and new items, personally I think that's what keeps this game alive. Every time the game feels like it's getting boring or repetitive, they add something new that makes the game feel fresh and fun. This is the only game I think I'd ever give a perfect 10/10, because the game's always expanding. The community on the other hand, is quite a lot like the Sonic fanbase, and I'll just leave it at that. In conclusion, if you haven't played this game before, DO IT; I cannot stress that enough, download it and play it. It's free, but I highly recommend buying something in it at some point in time.
Zing Zapper;-;It's ok.
FUNKe;-;A Shooter that ages and adapts at its own pace. For people experienced in Military-esque shooters like CoD or Battlefield, This game will require you to completely throw out the ideas of those games in favor of more unique gameplay elements aswell as teamwork being much more essential than in your standard shooter. TF2 is layered in multiple games within it's core shooter design. For collectors, you can get potentially hundreds or thousands of a specific item, and even potentially wield a collectors variant of it. For fashionistas you can design and paint your character as you see fit. For shooters you can ignore it all and focus on playing. Even amist the heat of battle, your enemy could become your best friend seconds later. Say you're looking down a hall. you see a soldier. You blink. There's a pyro now too. You blink. The soldier is now dancing the conga. The pyro is now too. You run up to them and dance aswell. Blink. Both teams are now crowded in a room raving. Before you know it you're headbutting and hifiving that sniper who kept headshotting you minutes ago. In a nutshell: Why haven't you downloaded this yet?
Colonel Quinn;-;Has Hats 10/10 Best Game, Only have one Bank account though.
Starscream;-;What makes this game so much fun is that there's always something new everytime you start up. Definitly a reccomendable.
.joker~Gone For Five Days;-;Want a game that you can play and make money and have no life? WELL THIS IS THE GAME FOR YOU.
Arex;-;Good game, makes a lot of fun if played with "right" people. Get in, make some friends and "git gud".
ProGem;-;This is the most addicting Free To Play game i ever played. I highly recommend this to you.
Colonel Quinn;-;Has Hats 10/10 Best Game, Only have one Bank account though.
Starscream;-;What makes this game so much fun is that there's always something new everytime you start up. Definitly a reccomendable.
.joker~Gone For Five Days;-;Want a game that you can play and make money and have no life? WELL THIS IS THE GAME FOR YOU.
FabulousGlobe;-;So far this is the best econmics simulator to I could find online. I have seen or been able to simulate door to door selling, monopolies, pawn shops, and one of artwork masterpiece selling. It's all in the game, and you can trade on websites or on a server dedicated to it. I can't believe someone could duplicate the feeling so well. Also, a bunch of people on my friends list insist that I just have to try the first person shooter mode of the game, maybe I'll get to that someday.
pug;-;in great debt, have whipped many 10 year olds dressed as a reindeer with a rocket launcher, lost my son, wife and job to this game. 10/10 great for the whole family
Serket;-;11/10 would recommend -easy to learn -fun people -overall great game
Chaotic;-;I got scammed out of my unusual gg.
Burnt Sienna;-;if cod, pokemon, and a hat had a baby this is the ratarted child that would come out
Dan;-;This should sum it up [gyazo.com]
Reaper of Death [];-;Team fortress 2 is the funniest game i have ever played. You get to face up against other players online, robots, get to be multiple characters and able to find many items in the shop or during gameplay. ^^ get tf2 you will love it
Xelatross;-;Team Fortress 2 is one of the most fun games I have ever owned. It's face-paced comedic FPS that has a very addicting way of making one want to play more. The nine classes (Scout, Soldier, Pyro, Demoman, Heavy, Engineer, Medic, Sniper, and Spy) have their own traits and balances that make the game fun, such as backstabbing (Spy), running faster than the other classes (Scout), and being able to rocket jump (Soldier). With tons of different weapons and a random number of classes of the other team, each round is never the same, so it never gets boring (unless one is playing Deathrun). Team Fortress 2 is also been known as a "Hat Simulator", which it basically is, considering the amount of cosmetics that each class can wear one the battlefield. Their are many different kinds of combinations of hats and miscellanious cosmetics that you never know which kind of combination you can obtain. The game has it's own humor that the characters create and sometime the game itself will cause something that will make one laugh. If one is Free to Play, then one has the choice of being Free to Play forever, or buying something from the TF2 Store and becoming Premium. The game does not force the player to buy something from the store, although the downfall to being Free to Play is that one can not trade with other people and some servers make "[F2P]" appear at the front of your name. But these are just minor things that a player can bypass if all the player wants to do is play the game without the hats and such. I fully recomend this game to anyone who wants a fast-paced FPS that likes to laugh at the often switch between comedy and intense battle. I recommend it even more if you like cosmetics that make your classes look awesome in your own way and the different varieties and stats of weapons that can change one classes health or vulnerability or even strength in damage. To me, Team Fortress 2 is my favorite game I have bought on Steam today.
Kitty cat;-;Amazing game perfect for all ages and good start if your new to steam
RUN-C.M.C.;-;It's pretty fun i guess
ThePantsWizard;-;Mass murder with a hint of fashionable hats: a fine recipe.
PINGACHEW @ CAMPBELLTOWN;-;The most fun you can have online.
~Mischevious Mawile~;-;Makes me want to take meth and shove a rocket in my  10/10
(TeamLGB) bert did 9/11;-;Probably one of the best games I've ever played.
MrOrange;-;If you wanna destroy your E key really bad, this is the game you've been looking for.
Pmp;-;Crate Unboxing Simulator 10/10 Spend more money in a day buying keys then you would in 3 months buying food for your family.
shoras;-;Don't think I've ever played any other game as much as TF2 and I still can't stop. P.S: It's all about hats actually.
Weedoof #BDay in 365 days!;-;September 2013: "Free to play? All right, I guess I'll try it out." RIP money. You will be missed.
Kitty cat;-;Amazing game perfect for all ages and good start if your new to steam
m4risa;-;0/10 Please uninstall right away.
SLOW;-;This game is dead, valve please let it die in peace.
I Use Pony Blood for Pancakes;-;The Best reason to have a Steam account, and a huge reason I am leaving consoles in favor of building a PC.
peremptor;-;Like the "meet the' videos more than the game itself.
Ivanrofsky;-;Always on the first favorite game on my library, First time trying pyro class and got stuck on it! Awesome game for try our Teamwork to win on battle, And have been returned and got bored on pyro class ,head over my pointer to try scout class with killstreak gun and and its my favorite class till now. You can't just go soloing on the arenas, you need a great Teamwork to get in the good place like in the game title. Highly recommended this game at all first person shooter sequel, would try and should try this game! The first thing that you must know from this game is, This game was fully for free to play, doesn't valuable player can win at once you can just start with item drop to be the great one at battle but i'm not. Let me tell some deep thing about this game, the grapich and texture on the game already at the top points and depend on how far you can handle it. There are two team you can join that is Red and Blu or Blue(mostly called it Blu). Many class that you can wanna be like Sniper, a burner, a medic, an heavy man, a spy class, or as a scout bring deadly itself small shotgun and more class that make you into the core. Many awesome map made by community and official creator, a Crowded server by player and official server make this game more enjoyable for in random gamer community. An stats detail about your gameplay to beat in some records, as much as achievement to unlock beat the average players and meet stranger and be a good team, all is about shoot and some teamwork require to win i need to say again. Few fun mode that you can play, the game always updated, so don't be minded is this game was old and bored, like in other day i check up on SteamCharts, almost got 70K player everyday! An active player every hours! don't think you're lonely, you can start your own story and friendship by just playing this game and be a good person, all will accepting you well. Grab your favorite class and combined item and start chillin with your friend for more fun!
Xx_DarkSceneGirl666_xX;-;blastin' commies has never been this much fun me - 420/10 dank lvl 103%
Ilija;-;It has hats,what more could you want?
(E.X.W.) The World Cup;-;"Eventually well-balanced FPS" -Honest game Trailers couldn't agree more
Nimdo ( Aeric);-;TF2 is a good game, it is fun in many aspects like characters, voices, hats, maps, etc Nowadays i just play this game to jump around everything and have some fun in community gamemodes like Deathrun, surf, parkour and fun servers. Over the years the gameplay of the game has changed, valve keeps doing small changes everytime, combining those changes the gameplay experience is not the same in my opinion, i think the game was more fun and attractive when i played the game for the 1st time, small changes like not being able to take your buildings in you hand to the spawn, the distinction between the rocket launcher and the rocket jumper, small changes to weapons... made me abandon most of the competitive gamemodes from valve. The only valve gamemode that sometimes i play is MvM and it is getting more bugged whenever a big update is released and its matching system sucks. Valve added so many hats that i don't even care about them anymore, i'm fine with my old hats. I still recommend this game but not as much as i did before.
UMR ('');-;Thank you based Gaben, I made $1000 outta this game rip in peace, TF2
.wav;-;RUN AS YOU STILL CAN THIS GAME DOESNT SIMPLY RELEASE PEOPLE
DESSA;-;It was free
oidy;-;Remember when this game wasn't about hats?
OMGItzGnaR;-;Easier to make kids cry on this, than CoD. 10/10
Saudade;-;ruined my life with hats 10/10
Kortie;-;By far the best free to play game I've ever played. Never gets boring and always has great updates. If you don't like killing other people then enjoy the awesome Man Vs Machine mode and kill tons of robots. 10/10 Will keep playing.
Skuld;-;The best free-to-play game out there and one of the best multiplayer experiences! Incredibly well balanced and very fun, especially when exploring the abilities of each class. Both the co-op and the versus modes are incredibly fun and unique in their one way. I highly recommend it!
oMendigoPadeiro;-;sniper throw pee on enemys. 10/10
bael;-;Team Fortress 2 is a very decent racing game. First of, the vehicles in this game are somewhat strange. Instead of licensed vehicles we get stuff like Heavy, Soldier, and Scout. The vehicles are all different in their own rights, for example: the Heavy is the slowest, the Scout is the fastest, and the Medic is normal speed. Classes in this game seem to be slightly broken, however. The Medic class vehicle is near useless on its own, and only serves a purpose when teamed up with a second vehicle. This will either serve to slow him down immensely, such as when healing a heavy, or let the teammate he is healing get away from him because the teammate, such as the Solider, is faster than the medic. The level design is beautiful, but Take Two, in an attempt to create an immerse and beautiful world, forgot that these types of tracks aren't really suitable for racing, taking place in such areas as underwater, in long corridors, and intelligence rooms. But some of the levels seem to be made for racing, such as 2fort, but there is no finish line, The fun thing is that each vehicle has a weapon to take out the other players. Of course, you can only take players that aren't wearing your vehicle colors. For example, the Heavy has a weapon that literally takes out everything in sight except that it slows him down to a halt, the Pyro has a weapon that sets fire to anyone and anything, and so on and so fourth. It seems similar to Mario Kart, with the various courses and powerups. However, it fails to capture the fun of Mario Kart, and instead going in an ultra-realistic direction that often looks quite boring and bland The major flaw in TF2 is that there really is no direction as to where you should be going. There are no checkpoints and no wrong way markers. Valve did include a "map" that changes between tracks but it is very confusing and really, isn't beneficial. These maps are nearly identical anyways, so changing the maps seemingly randomly only serves to aggravate the players more. While the tracks and graphics are fun and creative, this racing game is lacking in many ways. I wouldn't recommend this game to game owners if they had access to a console, as this PC-only racer doesn't seem to try hard enough to stand out from the crowd.
Falacu;-;Better than crack! 10/10
[AF] sloth;-;My friends always ask, "What exactly is Team Fortress 2?" I always tell them, "It's like a better, more fun Call of Duty with customization out the wazoo. You can pick between classes and all of them are essential to the team. You can find weapons, hats, crates, and so much more. The community is amazing as well. They are the most fun loving, funny, all around awesome people you could ever meet on the Internet. Go and get this game. You won't regret it."
Saudade;-;ruined my life with hats 10/10
Kortie;-;By far the best free to play game I've ever played. Never gets boring and always has great updates. If you don't like killing other people then enjoy the awesome Man Vs Machine mode and kill tons of robots. 10/10 Will keep playing.
OMGItzGnaR;-;Easier to make kids cry on this, than CoD. 10/10
Alphawolf;-;I love the game its one of the best free steam games I have ever played and i would Recommend this game to any hard core game cause 1# The game is awesome and great !!. 2# You can buy stuff for your favorite class. 3# You can enjoy the game online or Offline. 4# The updates are very big but its worth it at the end cause it gives you new stuff 5# You get stuff that it worth money... !!! FREE !!! 6# You can pick any 9 classes like heavy,scout,sniper,soldier,demoman,spy,medic and engineers and pyro. 7# And there are lots of hats to pick from ! !!!! ONLY FOR HARDCORE GAMERS !!!!
[::]--[::];-;Team Fortress 2 is one of the best free to play games out there with thousands, maybe millions of players on right now playing. it is really fun and 7 different classes to keep you ocuppied. there is scout class: fast and can double jump, has a very powerful shotgun that can kill an enemy with almost 2 shots. there is a soldier class, has a RPG, very power for taking out large groups of people or destroying sentry guns from long distances. there is a pyro class, has a flamethrower, good for burning large groups of people together and good for taking out surpport classes, spies, snipers and medics are easy to kill unless they have backup. there is a heavy. good for leading the way and taking out lots and lots of enemies at once, even harder to kill with a medic assisting them and healing them, unstoppable when the ubercharger is ready and activates and thats when the heavy is at its best, has a big gun and loves it like his own son. there is a demoman, has a grenade launcher and sticky bomb launcher, lays sticky grenades near doors and waits for a enemy to come through and blows them up which pisses some people off sometimes, their grenade launcher is good for corners and hitting the enemies beside the corner and taking them out, unlocks a sword and can charge at enemies and can kill them with one shot unless its a heavy. there is a engineer which its main weapon is the shotgun and of course its mechanical tools to help kill the enemies, the engineer can make teleporters; entrance and exit point, a dispencer, heals him and friends, and a sentry gun which kills and protects a certain area placed in, has a limited sight and cannot shoot from far distances, all the things can be upgraded to level 3 which is the last and best levels. there is a spy, has a pistol and knife to backstab enemies quickly and quietly, the spy is a quiet and sneaky basterd that pisses off the enemies so they rage quit the game so the friends get a better advantege in life and make their job easier. the spy can go invisable and hide from enemies to help make them live longer and hide from enemies who caught them backstabbing their friends and want payback. the spy can sap the engineers teleporters; both, dispencer and the sentry. the medic has a needle gun and a ubercharger that heals friends. the medic is very important in helping the offensive time. if medic and heavy combine and the ubercharger is ready they are invincible and not a force to be reckened with. the medic and shoot needles at enemies and when the needles hit the enemies the medic gets 2 health back for every hit. the medic gets 2 hp per second as a medic and which no class can do that. special ability is to ubercharge and be unstoppable for a short amount of time. and finally the sniper. the snipers main gun is the sniper rifle, its his best weapon and takes out enemies from a far and safe distance one at a time. he a sub-machine gun and is his secondary weapon for medium range combat. his machette is for close combat situations if a spy tries to take him out or tries to run away or a enemy comes and it becomes a close combat round. the sniper gains focus whenever he keeps his scope in for along time and deals more damage. his machette is a powerful weapon and can kill a spy and a scout in 2 hits, other classes 3 to 5 hits at least. thats all the classes ive covered. the maps are amazing and highly detailed, and new maps coming in from the community every month. new guns being made, skins and character customization to personalise your own class to make u unique and one of a kind. new abilities for classes and more to come, stuff to buy at the tf2 store (man.co) is what its called, i think its highly over priced but if u dont have a thing and u want it bad, go to the store and buy it (dont recommend that when u could just keep playing and wait to unlock it the hard way i better most of the time) ok thats covers tf2, hope u like my review and please rate it. i give Team Fortress 2 9/10 from: arcade
The_Player_#_4;-;Fun game, although very addicting when you get into trading like i do.
who the fuck;-;Old gay dudes and hats 10/10
BRUNO VON MARS;-;"I am very happy!" -Heavy, 2014
kebab;-;When joining a game you have a choice between red and blue (usually you don't even have that choice), after a while of playing the game forces you to join the loosing team only to get steamrolled by 8 enemies due to the fact that the rest of your team were all gibus wearing machina snipers...Sometimes you have the opportunity to play against the endless swarm of gibus snipers and kill them again and again and again until they ragequit and get replaced by better people which is so rewarding that I actually recommend this game.
Skuld;-;The best free-to-play game out there and one of the best multiplayer experiences! Incredibly well balanced and very fun, especially when exploring the abilities of each class. Both the co-op and the versus modes are incredibly fun and unique in their one way. I highly recommend it!
{JSA}OFFICERMARIO;-;It's alright.
Literally;-;who makes this garbage?? it sucks. prob worst game ever. buy a good game like sonic genesis collection its better than this because it has more games it better than team gaytress 2
netnord;-;Something cod players hate! You'll be the envy of all your quick scoping friends! But if you're f2p you'll probably suck. "No matter who you are if you're a f2p you're going to suck" - IGN
Da Gangsta;-;Team Fortress 2 is a fun, quite addicting FPS multiplayer game. You can play as 9 different classes, including Demoman, Medic, Heavy, Soldier, Pyro, Engineer, Spy, Sniper, and my favorite, Scout. Each class has their different strengths and weaknesses, and their colorful personalities will keep you laughing while you play. With its fun characters, cool unlockable items, detailed maps, and the fact that its FREE, I would definitely give it a 10/10.
poosh;-;this game sucks, theres no sprint, every class is bascially slow except scot but he is basicali worst class, he deals no damaj an has a reataded shotgun and baseball bat???? what???? and why cant I shoot thrugh windows?????? plus there is no aiming down your sights so the game forces u to hipfire and you have awful acurasy!! plus theres no killstreaks so i cant call in an ac130 or my pet wolves when i get like 30 kills in 1 life (which i do evry gaem btw) and theres NO ASAULT RIFLES. how am i supposed to kill with a needle gun??? i want golden ak47s not golden fring pans.... the graphcs in this gema are dumb the ar cartoony not reven realistic like what am i on disney channel why is this game rated m its like for little kids just looka t heavy he looks like a big panda!!!1 this game sucks once i tried to snipe a guy through window but i cant. this game doest now how real lief works. if this were a better fps game i would get a milion kills becos i would shoot through windos. but i cant. because this game sucks and aitn realistc. sldo al the wepons are dumb and not realistic. like how am i suposed to be a mercenary wen im trowing  at pepol?? or when im using  wepons that shoot lasers........... plus there's nor egerenating health. you cant survive in thisg ame you die every 2 seoconsds because teh only class is that regenatrs is medic and medi c is THE WORST CLASS!!!!11!! you cant kill ANYTING with medic. all he dos is use dumb needle gun, it deals no damag so medic is basically just a "kill me im dumb" class dont play as him. oh that reminds me YOU CANT NOSCOPE IN THIS GAME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!1 its awful really it is you cant' show all the noobs ur skill when you 360 noscope them becos the game is dumb and snipers only do damage when the lightenning bolt is full. so basically gameencouarajes u to hardscope and camp as sniper, game is badly desined becos it encourges no skill with snipers. if this were a better game i would get 100000000 kills by 720 noscoping n0bs through windows. but its not its a dumb game, no skill recired. also you only get wepons by buying dem or by wating for drop system to gvie them to you which is dumb, it enourajes doing noting not unlike i want to get my wepons by skill there should be credis and level up... also this game has no emblems???? and no clan tags................ this game is dumb honesti. its bad. plus theres no melee button, the melee weapons are all geven theyre own weapon, so if you want to knife ppl real quick u gotta switch........... so basiscally theres no point in melee cos by the time you switch you couldve alredy killed them with shoting............ theres no knives only dumb mele wepons like "bonesaw" and "fists" why would i use my fists in a gunfight??? game is dumb characters are dumb, only clas with knive is spy but spy is basically worst class, he daels no damag only good wen u r behind ppl and even then u cant stab unless not invisivlbe????? then whats the point???? ppl will se you behind them and they will shoot you?????? wow game is dumb 0/10
kebab;-;When joining a game you have a choice between red and blue (usually you don't even have that choice), after a while of playing the game forces you to join the loosing team only to get steamrolled by 8 enemies due to the fact that the rest of your team were all gibus wearing machina snipers...Sometimes you have the opportunity to play against the endless swarm of gibus snipers and kill them again and again and again until they ragequit and get replaced by better people which is so rewarding that I actually recommend this game.
Cole;-;If you don't get over a hunderd hours of fun out of TF2, you're doing it wrong. All hail Gaben.
[GP]Fwuffy [Back in August :3];-;Please rename to Hat Collector Sim. Thanks!
MrHomless;-;This game is funny. I had to delete this game 3 times before I started to like it. And remember, do not play to show the expensive items that you have, play for just one reason.... for fun. Until you start in the trading community, where you will forget all the fun. btw Selling sister for 2 keys
UB33R;-;Ducks are a true value in gaming history!
Swagachu;-;great game. 20 pineapples out of 13 girafficorns.
b0ss;-;My parents, friends and even doctors all laughed when i said i wanted to devote my time to collecting hats and throwing  at people. But this made it possible. Hat simulator 2 is the best hat simulator i've played in my life, not only does it have beautiful hats but you can also fight people and show off your hats. 10/10 oh, and it has guns
AA I LOVE MEMES;-;If i could  TF2 i would  it every day :3
Holbie;-;I swear I had money in my wallet...
Killer B (`);-;10/10 would hat again
quasioma;-;I have never seen a game more like Call of Duty in my life. They might as well call this game "Call of Duty: Noobs n' Dudes" Now grant it, there are loads of hot dudes in this game. That is not enough to make me want to play this game over and over. I feel like it is a childish version of Call of Duty. It definitely is nowhere close to as good. This game has awful graphics, unlike Call of Duty, alright characters, and way too many weapons. A video game should not have so much customization. I want restrictions. I think I am just going to stick with Call of Duty. If you like Call of Duty, but can't afford it. I recommend getting this game. It is pretty much the same exact thing.
DekuNite;-;Finally an FPS with Color! This game has been eating away at my life lately! 9 UNIQUE classes, each with their own different weapons. Sounds simple on paper, but In reality it adds up to so much fun! The controls are tight, music is wonderful, and the art style is impressively different. The best part is... It's all free!
Cole;-;If you don't get over a hunderd hours of fun out of TF2, you're doing it wrong. All hail Gaben.
UB33R;-;Ducks are a true value in gaming history!
dancefloor;-;Good game lived through all game generations. Still playing it everyday /m\. 10/10 pyro would bang spy.o/
MrHomless;-;This game is funny. I had to delete this game 3 times before I started to like it. And remember, do not play to show the expensive items that you have, play for just one reason.... for fun. Until you start in the trading community, where you will forget all the fun. btw Selling sister for 2 keys
The Twinkie Thief;-;I walked up to the enemy. I went for the backstab when suddenly, I get backstabbed. Spy-ception 12/10
INTERITUS;-;PROS: Excellent - UI Cooperative Multiplayer Full customization Fully optimizable CONS: Light Bugs/Glitches Repetitive Restricted 7/10 "Decent"
brep;-;this game is free unlike obamacare
Yuso;-;I killed a 10 year old and got called a hacker. 11/10
TheOnlyDeluxe;-;Whipped a 10 year old kid to death while dressed as Santa, then blew up his friend and didn't get arrested 10,5/10
Buttered Computers;-;It's alright.
Dima;-;Like skyrim with hats - 10/10
Vitor Coelho;-;What can I say? It's free, it's fun and I've been playing it since its release.
.Clic Clic Boom !;-;Awesome game, (If you're bored of playing on a serv then just go trade, and if you're bored of trading then go back playing on servs ... ;D) Also, there is 9 classes so 9 different ways of playing this game, Just, an awesome game ! Did i say it was an awesome game?
Neko Matoi;-;Team Fortress 2: the game where everyone loves hats, but hates newcomers Actual Review: Hello everyone, i'm here to tell ya about TF2, it's one of VALVe's biggest games out there, maybe not up there in competitiveness like DOTA or CSGO, but it's more of a game you grab a couple of beers with your friends and just have fun, the weapons are not like this stupid "reach this level to unlock this OP weapon that's meta as all heck", no, in TF2, you find weapons just through playing the game, now, some would argue that this is a bad system, but to counter this, the weapons you start with, the stock weapons, are the best weapons in the game, no downsides, on upsides, sit's completly balanced. now, in each shooter game, you have this generic story about a marine taking on a army, or this super-powered soldier, but in TF2, there is no single player camapign, which might turn you off, but what it makes up for is frantic action and hilrious characters, seriously, TF2 pushes the boundaries of FPS-characters, every character in this game is a stereotype, like the Scout for example, he's form boston, ergo, he's annoying, loves baseball, and is generally, really cocky, but VALVe made it work so that he's completly funny, same with all characters, even the mann of espionnage himself, The Spy. There's also holiday themed events, like the Scream Fortress update every halloween, Smissmass every christmas, etc, Tf2 goes out of it's way to have micro-dlc like hats, taunts, even the weapons from earlier you can buy, but they ain't cheap, Only bad thing i can say about this game is the community, They are really hard on new players, my advice, hop onto the tutorial and do all 4 of them, it will give you a general sense of how to play, TF2 also sports a Co-op game mode called "Mann vs Machine", it's like tower defense, except you and 5 other players are defending your base from a bomb that robotic versions of the classes are carrying, you can do it for free with your buds, or buy a ticket and do tours, everyone's after the fabelled "Australium weapons", which are golden weapons that go for alot of money, so if your willing to have RNG hate or love you, try it out in conclusion, TF2 has so much things modern day FPS's don't have, if you haven't tried TF2 yet, what are you doing? it's free, forever, GO DOWNLOAD IT MAGGOT!!
ian07123;-;It's good for your soul.
[AyyLmao] Tribe (bday on 17th);-;If your life or wallet wasn't ruined by this game you haven't played enough.
Fvgads | Busy~4weeks(mid-Aug);-;Great game, so fun! Trading is awesome too! :DDD
Roasty my Toasty;-;For as long as I've been playing Team Fortress 2, I have never found myself being bored. The constant updates and additions keep the game fresh and fun. The game is starting to become more of a social experience, what with the conga lines and friendly players on opposing teams. My only concern, however, is that Team Fortress 2 may be rather intimidating to the newer players, maybe a bit overwhelming. With all of these new cosmetics, a vast arsenal of weapons, and the ability to turn any bloody battlefield into a parade has changed the face of shooters. I'm afraid that newer players may start playing and will be immediately turned off by either the vast personalities and items, or just the overall sillyness. Regardless, TF2 remains a great game over 7 years after its initial launch. Props to you, Valve!
JaxPradaa;-;well I'm the Conga Queen what else should I say new game title: Conga Fortress 2: Hat Simulator is too great to be 'ftp' in my opinion but enjoy the hell out of it friends
Wazza;-;IZ GOOT
Bin Laden did 9/11;-;[Insert yet another outstanding review for tf2] Wait no, don't. Not anymore. Not since the Halloween update gave us no new bosses, infinite appearances of Merasmus and an event version of the worst map in the game. Not since the most hyped update EVER turned out to be, surprise surprise, just more hats. 10/10 scientists would confirm EotL is worse than Robotic Boogalo. Not since Smissmas gave us 7 festives instead of 9, and crappy festives at that. But before then 20/10 would spread my wallet wide for Gabe.
Ducky;-;Not even realistic 10/10 would waste my money on free2play again..
=L=FestiveGentleMudkip;-;Team Fortress 2 is a Game set with many Gamemodes and various set objectives. It is a game based on many God like weapons and Hats and Miscs :D Best Frwee Game Evar x3
Burgmond;-;This is by far, the ONLY FPS in my eyes. Like, the only one in the world. True there is CoD, there is Battlefield, etc and so forth. But this game has a charm to it, that incredibally fast-paced, all action... STUFF that makes it great. AND it's a free game! So, really, you don't need to worry about wasting, like, $15 or $200,000. Honestly, if you JUST got steam, you NEED to try out this game first. Like... Need. I'm not kidding. Go play it.
Big Baws;-;If you have a steam account but no Team Fortress 2 : http://www.tf2sounds.com/2423#p%3D3
stormheat;-;Warning; this game is to addictive for the following "average" gamer. If you want to play this game prepare your self for a quest for unusuals and australium weapons which you will never lay your comic holding hands on!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
KennH;-;9 playable classes, with diffrent personalities Customizable by buying hats and cosmetics, and taunts for extra Travel the world! too many maps to play on! So many guns to use! So many gibus... soo many ducks... sooooo many breads.... I hope the humor doesn't end!
Panda Vivian;-;Well I honestly thank this game for a lot of my friends, which help formed more of my personality, but  this game is bland now that I actually see it from a logical point of veiw, economy is now garbage, the gameplay for me is just meh, you play one game and you've played all of them, excluding modded servers, this game is old, I respect it still but Valve, PLEASE lay it to rest ITS 7 YEARS OLD, work on something new, or atleast give updates, you get millions of dollars from CSGO and TF2 keys, new gamemode you say, End of the Line? Oh yes, but wait, its TOO advanced for new players, lets take that from Valve servers. Point being I honestly don't see how people play it for thousands of hours. I really loved this game, but as an outsider looking in, its not good anymore, its all the same
Cpt.Morris;-;I've lost most of my childhood to this game and it was worth every second.
ianskate;-;What can I say? Team Fortress 2... so many know it, so many love it. This is one of those games that changed my outlook in many ways. As a follow-up to a game, to a mod, it's a wonderful experience that truly revolutionized gaming. From challenging play, to quirky characters, a great artstyle, and a unique universe and level design, TF2 has become a classic (in my mind) that will forever remain one of my favorite games. If it wasn't for TF2, hats may never have been as popular as they are today.
Hikkler Always Got Munchies;-;Team Fortress 2 is the biggest cluster  with strategy I have ever played, but I love the trading system. In this game, you choose teams, and a class with a basic set of tools to kill your enemies, along with teammates, every character has his own backstory, and truths: Valve really ,really thoguht this through.
Shea the Flaffy;-;Once you go wack you never go back
Miryn;-;Very fun for Hours/days/weeks/months/years/lifetimes!
Kawaii Kitten;-;it's not a bad game
Billy;-;I bought this game (retail) and then spent a secret amount of my disability benefits and allowance on virtual hats and keys. Now I wear a fedora on most of my mercs and recently started a vintage fedora collection in real life. Needless to say, this game, no this alternative way of life changed me into a better person and a true atheist blessed only by my own intelligence and superior spy techniques together with my knowledge of 2fort. I tip my hat for anyone willing to give this amazing CARTOONMMOFPS a chance. I will finish this wonderful review with a quote from my favorite merc. -Le corny hen- Spy -Billy 2014-06-27 16:36
twitch.tv/ghandimcfarland;-;Greatest FPS of all time. And with constant free content updates from Valve, it gets better all the time.
[0GS]Papa Peace (Steel Spy LFT);-;I love this game. 5/5, 10/10, 100/100. Best fps action to date, and a KILLER hat simulator.
Haziq_As'ari;-;"The Best F2P FPS on Steam! 9/10.." -Sincerely, Me.
: Ragnar The Red;-;Dont play this game if you want: - A social life - Money 10/10
Star Platinum;-;best hat simulator ever
Shea the Flaffy;-;Once you go wack you never go back
Miryn;-;Very fun for Hours/days/weeks/months/years/lifetimes!
Oceanside Spider House;-;It's like Team Fortress 2 with hats and bread is the yeast of your concerns
Gaara;-;I really like this game because it makes us to be closer to friends and shows us to have fun but the one thing that i dislike is that they have the same things over and over they should make some more weps. But i really do like this game.
Transit Of Venus;-;Team Fortress 2 is a free FPS but it has a lot diffrent game types from Payload, Mann vs. Machine Capture the Flag and more, You will have a lot fun in TF2 :D
Shara;-;This game has guns. Obvious rip-off of Call of Duty. Except this game doesn't have care packages give it time
S!r Vlad .:Just For Fun:.;-;This game are the best from my games.
[WTP] Fire Fox;-;Still great to play after nearly 1700 hours :D
[WTP] Fire Fox;-;Still great to play after nearly 1700 hours :D
Oceanside Spider House;-;It's like Team Fortress 2 with hats and bread is the yeast of your concerns
RQ;-;best hat simulator ever!
panosttm;-;Really awesome game
Darkwolf;-;Best hat simulator in the business. Oh and there's mini games with co op, ctf,payload,payload race,attack and defend,control point with 9 different classes with a varied amount of weapons
Last_Hound;-;WARNING: it may give adaction to the game
Yuuta-chan <3;-;Simply brilliant.
Crssby-Chan!;-;This game is the best game i've ever played you must play it too :D
Fancy Gibus;-;Hat simulator. BTW, Auto balance kinda ruins the "team" part. But you can always join a servver with autobalance disabled.
Arabic brony #offline;-;this is by far the best game i have ever played, but in need more hats :3
CbIHoK;-;Endless fun with hundreds of strategies, weapons, hats and funny situations all the time. Also really interesting in competitive way - prem highlander opinion confirmed.
bo4r;-;If you havent played this game you havent lived.
Al;-;Basically a good first-time-game, if you want to play shooting games. Graphics are unique when you compare it to other team vs team games. A big shop with a lot of clothing and free weapons makes the game more interesting, in a way that the users can get creative and style their own characters. Nine classes, makes the game more challenging and less boring, as you can just switch class when you feel like it. The videos about the characters and their histories are absolutely terrific, and the medic is something you don't see in every game, as you heal with a medic-gun and shoots with this incredible "syringe shooting gun", where in other games it's often a character with a medic-back and often with normal (often normal) guns or in use of some type of magic. Also is the game always active with players and new products in store. In all is the game catchy and available for everyone. 5/5
Marci;-;Best hat simulator I own.
Gildergreen. #RoadToGlobalElite;-;"Get a life." They said... well, I live for the hats; wasted approximately $334.30 on this piece of sh-heaven.
CirnoBaka (Chibi-Chan);-;"Wanna play TF2 with me?" "Yeah sure, Orange? Or maybe an achievement_idle server?"
Quiet Ambassador;-;Awful breeding nest for autistic fandoms
PuNkD;-;Bought 8 unusuals, and 2 Australiums, 10/10 Could of donated to Charity
Bubby<3;-;Burninator simulator 2007. Best with alcohol and a Phlog pyro. MvM is scary because of the monster robots, my dog does not approve. 11/7 would invest another 6 years of my life.
* lazyaced *;-;I can literally describe the Pyro's life. ~Sun Shine ~Rainbows ~Lollipops HANDS DOWN. Pyro is officially my favorite. Now Lets go give them some RAINBOWZZ! FEEL MY RAINBOWSS FEEEEELLL THEM AS THEY BURN YOU TO DEATTTHHH  I would totally recommend this game to anyone who love Burning people with rainbows. :D
Cheezburger;-;This a very entertaining game that allows you to battle with friends, or just anyone, by choosing one of nine classes that each has their own pros and cons. You will either be on team blue or team red. Obviously, the teams are against eachother and you want to battle the opposing colour. There are a variety of game modes to choose from where you must beat the other team. You can trade items, and there is even a whole currency for this game that is used in trading, or when identifying the price of your specified item. Overall I think this game is great. I highly recommend it for people who love action filled games, and who love to learn new skills. I recommend helping your team out if you would like to win, and don't leave them behind. Team Fortress 2 is a great game, but is better accomplished as a team rather than a singular person. If you've never tried the game, I recommend you give it a shot, it's loaded with entertainment, and you might just like it.
Machine_ Neil;-;This is a well made, stylized, team based first person shooter. Teamwork is needed to win at higher levels of play, though lone wolfing is fine on lower skill levels such as on most public servers. There are 9 classes to choose from. Each class has unique weapons and abilities that allow each to fill a unique roll as part of a larger team. This provides for a challenging and rewarding experience when faced against opponents of similar or better skill levels. There are two official modes of play: player versus player and 'Mann Versus Machine'. Player versus player is a mode where one team of players battles against another team of players. Within this mode, there are different types of maps. Each type of map has it's own objectives for both teams to achieve. 'Mann Versus Machine' is a mode where a team of up to 6 players battles against waves of bots. Players collect money from destroyed bots. The money is divided equally among players in the team and can be used to purchase upgrades and abilities for the next wave of bots. The pay to play sub-mode, "Mann Up", gives rewards upon completing a "tour". In addition to the official modes of play, there are several player made mods that introduce other modes of play such as 'Versus Saxton Hale', where a team of players battles against a player playing as a character named Saxton Hale; 'Dodge Ball', where two teams of players playing as Pyros must airblast rockets and other projectiles back and forth in order to stay alive; 'Zombie Mod', where a team of players must make it to the end of the map without dying to zombies that are played by other players; to name just a few of the many player made mods available. In addition to game play, players will randomly receive free items from the game. Some of the free items given out are weapons, hats and crates. Hats can be worn by a class to change the appearance of that class. Crates can be opened with a key. Keys can be purchased from the Mann Co. Store or from the Steam Community Market or traded for from another player. Most crates will list which items can be found within them. The game has several communities for a player to choose from if a community is what you are looking for. The game is easy to pick up and play, either alone or with friends, yet has a depth of play that will keep you from becoming bored too quickly. The dynamics between the different classes, weapons, play styles, skill levels, modes and maps provides content for many hours of play. I have been playing since November 2007 and I still return to the game on a regular basis.
Meepsy #PoutineOrgasm;-;If I could live inside this game... and make a pyro family. I SO ING WOULD. Anyway if you don't like TF2 I dont like you :)
Vickydoll;-;Most likely the game you'll always wanna play.
John Galt;-;gg wp and end of the fun for someone
Nesu;-;Ah, classic ol' Team Fortress 2. There really just is nothing like it. It has team-based combat, unlockable weapons, and most important of all... HATS! But forget about that for just a second, what makes this game so good? The humour of this game is just amazing. Every class has something nasty to say about each other, and you would know what I'm talking about if you played the game or watched the "Meet The ..." trailer/teaser series. It just makes me smile when I hear a line I've never heard before. Secondly, the team-based combat. As with most modern day FPS's (With the exclusion of the Battlefield series, somewhat.), you don't see a lot of team oriented gameplay. Take for example, Call of Duty. It's really just a run and gun experience, and that's not what teamwork really is about. In TF2 though, it really requires a good deck of cards for you to win. You need to work together to capture the control point, get the intelligence, push the cart, and etc. It can get rather intense, with either your team or the other team trying to do a push. That is one aspect that I love about TF2. Next, the unlock/drop system. With games such as Call of Duty, you need to level up in order to gain new weapons and attachments for your current weapons. But with TF2... No need. They drop randomly. Every weapon has its advantages and disadvantages, making them virtually balanced either way. But do note that these are only SIDE-GRADES, not overall upgrades from your stock weapons. Your stock weapons are just as effective as your new weapons, but droppable weapons do have stat bonuses and stat drops that your stock weapons do not have. Every unlockable weapon is suituational to some degree. So it is important to plot out which weapon you will use. The thing you've been waiting for... HATS! While not all that important, hats do add some flair to the game. They give you customization options to your class, which can often result in a rather spectacular looking player to not only look at, but play as. But, how do you get hats? It's somewhat complicated, really. Standard "Unique" quality hats drop rather rarely, but you can get them from unlocking crates or trading. You can get "Genuine" hats by ordering a game that has a special compaign that gives you the hat for free if you buy that game. Then there's the real meat of this whole "hat" thing... The holy unusual hat... Yes, they're rare and expensive to obtain. But they give you a feeling of satisfaction and achievement once you do get one for the first time. ESPECIALLY IF you unbox one, that is rather hard to do on the first try. But hats don't add anything special to the game, really. Same with stranges and killstreak weapons, they only track your kills. (Obvious difference is that Stranges track your lifetime kills, while killstreak weapons count how many kills you got in one life.) But yes, I do recommend this game. It is a nice game to play for a few hours and hopefully find something new to do that you never did before.
Gamer 'Tia;-;If you're looking for a challenging FPS, that'll give you hours of competitive gameplay, aswell as an unique community, and amazingly fun weapons allowing you to get creative, look no further! Team Fortress 2 is one of the most fun, amazing, one-of-a-kind games that i've played. Not alone does the 9 different classes grow on you, the game itself is amazing! Featuring unique, fun gamemodes as Payload, or atk/def. If you're not conviced just yet, the game allows you to customize your classes with hats and miscs, community created, aswelll as valve's own! All in all, Team Fortress is by the community, for the community. Now i understand if you find looking at people, and clicking hard, or cook that grenade just right, but in Team Fortress 2 you dont nessecarily have to. There's much more to the game, than just being the first to draw fire. Heck, there aint even that many guns! To top it all off, it's free! you might think "Ah, then its a pay-to-win..", and you'd be absolutely wrong. With the unique Drop System you'll be sure to aquire new firearms by the end of the day (If not a hat or two!)
Whoopsy;-;*Insert joke about game ruining life and jokes about hats here* 11/10 was okay IGN~
[R] mooffinman |;-;this game ruined my life 10/10
(Intermission);-;do u liek guns? do u liek shootin guns and wearing virtul moni on ur hed? Wel thn this is the gem fur u, becus hats is guns and guns is hats!
Marcho;-;Tis geim very god and , hats is cool but need lukc find and geimblay is gud lik you go as tiim wit class like pryro or spei. my favorit is demmo becuase is exblosiev and very tactik to blay. but hevey is also very god it can many kill but he slow alsoy not verry usevufl lone rage compat. som stuf cost monei but u can blay frie! 4.5/5 not 5/5 becuse no kilsteak.overral very god geim but very moneis cans go and time if go buy key and open box and traed hat. soemtimes u get no hat but srtraeng wepin.... moneis lose.
Master Chief;-;pros: conga cons: not enough conga and not enough hats improvements: add more hats notes: conga conga conga hey conga conga conga ho
= [o.W.n] = flaming chipper;-;i recommend this game lots of fun get to play with ur friends,trade and fun maps
DirtyHarry07;-;THE BSET GAME EVER
Prof. Sugarcube;-;Nothing like joining a trade/idle server to have thousands of people gape at your unusuals then have a 12 year old kid to call you a  when he kills you once. I love you TF2, never change (too much). Oh, and, Valve, if i can get my $1,500 back for all the keys i used on your crates, that'd be great; you kinda owe me... fifteen hundred dollars... I'll give back all the Strange Jarates I unboxed, I promise
Baivo;-;I dare you to find a better combat MMO
Spa Sapping;-;Team Fortress 2 The best Multiplayer Experience Ever Ofcourse, skill first then.... I FOUND A HAT !!!
{ZNR}Squall The Gunblade Master;-;Team Fortress 2. It is For litterally EVERYBODY. The Community is one of the best I've ever seen, and is CONTSANTLY putting more into the game. The mods, and things are great, but why do people like TF2 then? The game it-self is not only free, but has HATS! I know what you're thinking, "hats in a shooter!?! Thats Obsurd!" But it works. I don't think I'm the only one who thinks this game is not only helping Steam, but Valve as a whole. They make money off of hats and the market, and we have Awesome looking hats/weapons that are fairly balanced, and have fun. It is truly the Win-Win situation at hand. Keep Making great games Valve!
`Yahiamice | LFT Heavy;-;wow much hats much skill much unusuals BUY MUCH MORE KEYS much metal much trading economy much never forget much recommend
KUSH BIRD;-;It's ok I guess
ElwisFromPoland;-;Let's start with the fact, that I have never write any review, so don't be too harash with mine, please. Team Fortress 2. What can be said about this game? Some people might just look at it and say: "Regular FPS. You play with maybe even 100+ people a day, and shoot to win." Or is it? What I like mostly about TF2, is the fact that everything there is build on the TEAMWORK. After all, this is called "TEAM Fortress 2", not "Deathmatch Fortress 2". Playing as a lone wolf will lead you to no where, and even eventually make you rage quit from playing this game. For good. It's not about your high score, or how many kills you get at the end of the round. (altough it still motivate you to fight more and shows that you are the experienced player to others) It's all about doing the objective together with your team, to win the game. And every new game there is completely different than previous one, so working together as a team is really important with every challenge that comes with every new game mode, team members and map the game is going on of course. So we already know, this game is all about team work, and doing current game objective. Got it? Good, and keep it that way! Let's go with the next thing - weapons! Even though there's not many of them, as the cosmetic items (that would be something) there's still a lot of them, to pick and choose from. And most of the weapons usually change to way of playing your current class, so it makes the game even more interesting and challenging. We have weapons that heal or overheal you on killing your opponent, slow down enemies who are shot, gives you speed boost, hurt enemy after attacking him... the list is long, every weapon have it's pros and cons, so everyone can choose, try out every weapon and stick with it, as this style of fighting with it fits him most. Thus makes your gameplay completely different everytime you join on a random server, with new random people. More guns = more fun. Check them out, and find your style. That's our conclusion here. One tip though - every time you will get a new weapon, don't think you have advanced to a next level or something and this new weapon is way better than the previous one! Carry on... Classes you're playing! There are 9 playable classes in game, avalible from the beggining, so there's no any "This class avalible after reaching that level." No. You can play as who do you want, from the beggining. So you can try out every game style and see which one fits you most, as with every class you're playing completely diffrently than with previous one. So, the classes are: Scout, Soldier, Pyro, Demoman, Heavy, Engineer, Medic, Sniper and (my favourite) Spy. Every class have it's pros and cons, just like the weapons you can get so the choice of your favourite one are a little easier. For example - Scout is the fastest one of all the classes, can make double jumps and even capture points 2 times faster than anyone else. But he is really easy to kill in battle, unless you're good at dodging incomming spam of bullets and rockets. Much better for a frontal attack are classes like Soldier, armed with his rocket launcher and the possibility to do a "Rocket Jump" to help him reach bigger distances in a short time, due to the fact he's really slow. But that's just a short example of everything that each class is avalible of. And honestly? Too lazy to write down all of them, that's all... meh. Worth to mention, that every class have it's own personality, which makes them a bit more cooler and interesting to play with. Another example? Fine. Scout is pretty much kind of a cocky guy, who likes to annoy others, and think that every girl wants him, and every guy wish to be like him. Soldier is a stereotypical example of an American patriot, who most likely lost all his brain cells durning WW2. Heavy is a very calm and serious guy, until his minigun starts to spin and the battle starts. Then he's like a wild, angry bear, that hates people. And so it goes as well, with the other 6 classes. So, 9 different mercs for a usually 12-24 teams. Sounds cool? Because it is... that is, until most of them are only Spies or Snipers. Exactly, most of the players think that this game is like CoD - thus they go full sniper force, believing they have nailed everything. No, no, NO! This game is nothing like CoD! A team full of snipers, will never win. I was once in a team where out of 10 players we had 8 snipers, one spy and a soldier which was me. So, I think you can say how that round went? (inb4 MLG jokes) So, what I mean is - teamwork is important, we know that. But, when there's not enough classes that will provide enough firepower for the team, the teamwork won't help you much, or does not exist there at all. Okay, time to move on to... HATS! This is something completely random, that makes this game unique. In this game, you can wear on every class a nice and fancy hat, or other cosmetic, that will make you look diffrent from the others. Here's my question - can you wear a hat in every other FPS, than Team Fortress 2? No. Or dance Conga? Of course not. Or being a total annoying brat and taunting after every kill, no matter how much skill you put into your kill? Of course not! Another reason why TF2 is so unique, and why we love it so much. Okay, slowly getting tired of thinking what to poot here. So, conclusion time! Team Fortress 2 is an awesome game, unique in her own beautiful way and great to play. I recommend playing it, together with your friends! "But they have no money..." This game's free! Just download, learn how to play and get good! The only thing that makes me really angry about this game are most of the time unbalanced teams, the autobalance curse in the worst possible moment of the round, or the fact the prices are getting higer in its shop...
|Picto| blevinsrt;-;7.8/10 Too much ducks -IGN
Nikey;-;Great game 3.14159265/10 not enough GabeN hats.  pingerz much review mlg pause play t f 2 hl3 confirmed
Levine;-;Hat Simulator. 10/10 would recommend.
honeylover68;-;this game. this game right here. i have spent a long time on this game. it is fun. please. please play this game. help me.
MemePaladin;-;The first question I saw was, do you recommend this game, and I slapped my computer with my  yelling "What kind of question is that, I love this ucking game" My experiences are as suit: Go online Go on favorite server Micspam with beautiful voice Conga Aquire hats for free with my beautiful voice Conga Stop congaing Sit in middle of map with new Engineer taunt Micspam /w beautiful voice Get killed while sitting in chair Have my beautiful voice questioned to be a voice changer Tell them it's not and that they're a  Realize the person questioning me is Head-Admin Still call him a  Get muted for 60 minutes because anally sore Head-Admin is anally sore Complain to the Owner because he my a Wait for him to come back because he not on Owner comes back Owner unmutes me I call Head-Admin a  again Realize that server staff is filled with a bunch of Lenny worshipers (   ) Joins Lenny Cult Micspam /w bootyful voice Gets off server (   )/ 10 or (11/10) Would call Head-Admin gay again (   )
Cloudy;-;Team Fortress 2 is a popular F2P FPS over the country. This game is actually one of the best game Valve ever made, I'm not saying that this game is the best one among all the games that Valve made. The only thing players love about this game are hats, yes, hats, the economy of Team Fortress 2 will be hats ans cosmectics. Why not weapons you said, well, it is very difficult to have a new weapon because of the weapon's stats and when a weapon goes wrong, the game will not be balanced making this "unfair". So, I know some of the players in Team Fortress 2 just focus on weapons and not focusing on hats and they just quit Team Fortress 2, I know a lot of players did this because who doesn't want new weapons? Now... Valve are now looking into the Steam Workshop of Team Fortress 2 to find new weapons for the game and even hats, every damn time. Yes, you're actually playing the future Hat Simulator. When I first played Team Fortress 2, around 2008, I forgot where I started playing it, but nevermind, just stick to around 2008. This game is well optimized, but it sucks up a lot of your CPU Usage though. This game is well optimized, I said again, I mean, most maps are smooth making you having a good FPS. Well, Valve is actually a big company due to popular, fun, optimized game and etc... The graphics in this game looks "cartoonish" and when the Graphic settings are all "Low" the game will still run the graphic to "pretty". I know that graphics doesn't make a game better, only story does. Oh and I forgot to mention that this game has a story, just check their wiki and read the comics, the story won't show up in-game. And let's get back to the graphic I last said, the graphic looks "cartoonish", I mean, who doesn't like cartoonish graphics? Trust me, it's beautiful, just like the Borderlands series, it's cartoonish. There are 9 classes in this game: Scout, Soldier, Pyro, Demoman, Heavy, Engineer, Medic, Sniper, Spy. The Scout focus on speed and agility and Scout captures Control Point x2 faster. The Soldier focus on DPS by using his Rocket Launcher, very useful on a pocket Medic. The Pyro will uses "his" or "her" Flamethrower to start a fire to the enemy for afterburn damage. Demoman will focus on defense and offense with his Stickybomb Launcher due to the DPS or he can focus on Melee or Demoknight for short. The Heavy is the tank, he's also good at being a pocket and also wield a Minigun but the damage isn't high. The Engineer focuses on defending and uses his Sentry Gun to defend points, he can also equip the Gunslinger to build Mini-Sentry and also becoming Offensive Engineer, the Engineer can use his Shotgun or Pistol to deal with enemies instead of his Sentry doing it. The Medic focuses on Support, the medic is a MUST on all team due to healing and ubercharge. The Sniper also a support class, the sniper stays back front of the battlefield to support his team-mates. And lastly, the Spy, he is very mysterious, you won't know he is behind you or not you better watch out his backstabbing skills and also watch out for your "fake" team-mates, the spy can disguise as your team-mate and act like them so watch out! After a lot of hours playing this game, I should like to rate: 10/10 Amazing
Emre;-;Just amazing.... Valve made a masterpiece to be followed with this game! but when kids start screaming into the mic, the fun goes down :/ 9/10
Luna132ful;-;Very fun to play with friends and good time play with others from other lands
Serious kimen;-;It's TF2! do I need to say more?
Paradoxclock;-;Best hat simulator game I have played so far. Here is why. + You get 9 choices of hat modelers from different ethnicities. (The Russian and German models are probably the worst models, because they dont wear a default hat) + You get a lot of different locational maps to model you hat in. (Best with western hat modeling) + You can team up with others in what I assume are competitive hat modeling competitions, like Capture the Hat, Control Hat, king of the Hat, Mann vs. Hatted Robots, Hatload, and Hatted Delivery. + Super cheap hats in the games hat store. $12.99 for a Bubble Pipe Hat What a steal! (I think they should increase these prices, or they might run out items. I already bought this item 26 times in case they ever do run out of hats) Some things I did not like about the simulator. - You get these weird metal hats drops called weapons, which you cant even wear on your head! They only go in your hands! What idiotic developer decided that putting hats on their hands is a good idea! There only real use in the game is to be crafted into scrap hat metal, which you can then trade in for real hats.
AutistOnScriptsIn240p;-;This game ruined my life in this game you shoot people with no hats,black and broken hats,hats,hats that doesnt harm the wearer even it is burning,somehow it is fun and addicting as hell hat+guns+skill+cartoon+ponies(sad i know)+f2p+burning hats= tf2
Shadows;-;When I'm looking for nonstop action, without the need to get seriously involved in plot or invest a lot of time, this is my go-to game. With 368 achievements, 9 playable characters, a wide assortment of maps and styles of play, TF2 offers a good time every time. Give it a try!
the yellow fellow;-;please help me
Insecticon Lord;-;This game absolutely destroyed my life. It made me kill my Wife AND sell my kids. I give this game and 11 out of 10.
[DFS] Ronald Mcheartattack;-;Hey you meatballs, my name is sgfbdsibhosi, and I hug every single one of you. You are all Chicken and Waffles that go on Club Penguin and ERCRAFT on it, making you mouth watering cheese pizza.
Obey Mudkips;-;The shizzle!
[DFS] Ronald Mcheartattack;-;Hey you meatballs, my name is sgfbdsibhosi, and I hug every single one of you. You are all Chicken and Waffles that go on Club Penguin and ERCRAFT on it, making you mouth watering cheese pizza.
Obey Mudkips;-;The shizzle!
D'gengo;-;There is a Hot Dog hat. You pretty much cannot function in society without experiencing this.
[Lemons] loopuleasa;-;The official Steam bandwagon
Sean Connery;-;Good FPS. Also a good way to lose faith in humanity.
Elmer J Fapp;-;dis game is da best of da best everyone should play!!!
PizzaMindControl;-;I blew bubbles at people, then I realized that they were NOT bubbles...
Ragtime Betty;-;Has hats and guns. I like both.
bledking;-;Camaraderie, heroic feats and truly spectacular demonstrations of what humans can accomplish with a refined hand-eye coordination.
Dont act Dumb!;-;Team Fortress 2 is one of the best games I have ever played. It is addicting, fun, and 100% FREE. The class based gameplay encourages smart teamwork and class balence, and the random drop TF2 as rewards you with free items to play with. There is no paywalling in this game. You can be Free to play and it will not affect your gameplay whatsoever. Becoming premium however brings the tf2 experience to a new level. Becoming premium is optional, but it gives you many priviledges such as an exended random drop, and the ability to get hats through craft or drop! There is no downsids to this game other than the troller, kids spamming mics, and mini sentries. Otherwise, Excellent game!!!
Hudduh;-;From riches to rags.
Panda Bear;-;the waviest game i ever did play. get it now
Hiatus;-;This class based shooter might seem cartoony and corny at first but once you start playing its a hell of lot of fun. Also there's tons of cool weapons and cosmetics to dress up with and try out. I have always enjoyed playing this game.
CR@CK3RK1NG;-;Free,fun and Fantastic this game beats all other FPS'
Tipper of Fedoras (making games);-;Best Hat Simulator on the market. Buy it. 1337/420 - IGN
Clone;-;Probably one of the greatest time and money sinks that Valve has ever come up with -- Other than Steam itself -- Team Fortress still holds up years after its original release, regardless of what anyone is telling you. Yes, the hats start to get annoying and sometimes just a bit too flashy, but it still retains a brand of humor that is wholly unique in what it does. For those unfamiliar, TF2 is a Class Based Shooter, based on the Team Fortress mod for Quake and Team Fortress Classic, which was a mod for the original Source Engine. A CBS is commonly a First-Person shooter, such as Enemy Territory, Battlefield, and Battlefront, although some CBS titles, like Battle of Heros, is a Third-Person shooter. TF2 is the former. Unlike the example titles, however, both teams are exactly the same, and neither side has any kind of special unit or weapon that's only available for that side (Unlike Battlefront giving each of the four factions a Unique Unit with Unique weapons). There are nine classes in total: Scout, Pyro, Soldier, Demoman, Heavy, Engineer, Medic, Sniper, and Spy. This is also quite a few more classes than some other game have had (Again as an example: Battlefront had only six classes per team, and some Battlefield titles, such as Hardline, only have four classes). Although it is a lot of classes, each one carries a bit of weight, and can be very important to a team (Although in general play, teams will have multiple members of each class, and some cases one class will not even exist during a game). The Scout is a fast moving class that can get in close with a shotgun and blast enemies at close range, and then quickly pull out to evade a counter-attack. The soldier, while slow moving, is armed with a very powerful rocket launcher. The Pyro moves fairly quickly, and needs to get close to make use of his flamethrower. These are considered to be the offensive classes, and are meant to push for an objective. The Demoman can create explosive traps with sticky bombs, and has excellent melee capabilities. The Heavy wields a minigun and has a very high amount of health, which makes up for his slow walk. The Engineer can build ammunition dispensers and automated turrets which will shoot any nearby enemies. These are the defensive classes, and are used to hold a position (Although Heavies, when paired with a medic, can also turn into a menacing offensive force). The Medic, as the name suggests, heals team-mates in the thick of battle. Snipers, again as the name suggests, use a sniper rifle to pick off enemies from a safe distance. Spies can cloak themselves and get behind enemy lines to take out deadly players with a swift one-hit-kill backstab with a knife. These are the support classes, and are meant to help the rest of the team succeed. As mentioned this game has objective based gameplay, such as capturing points, stealing intelligence (Capture the Flag), King of the Hill, and several kinds of demolition based missions. So, probably not as advanced as an Enemy Territory game, but probably a bit more mission related flesh than a Battlefront game. So if you like team based class shooters, give TF2 a try. The base game is free, and the cosmetics are optional. There are a lot of extra weapons available to all players, and new content is added semi regularly, though mostly in the form of cosmetics. Sometimes new weapons are added too. Also, the community is still quite large, and community servers host a barrage of custom maps and content that can enhance the experience.
MrRepzion;-;Great game until they made it free
MrRepzion;-;Great game until they made it free
MFPallytime CHKN;-;It's like there are teams in a fortress, and there's two of them. I approve.
-BK-Dogus47;-;I stopped playing tf 2 a long time ago because we have seen not so much updates. But then tf 2 turned in cs go :0. Litterly it is the same . Ill give it positive because maybe they would add cool battle cosmetics in cs go :D Eh maybe taunts.
noibn;-;Do I really need to state the awesomeness of TF2 at this point? All I can say is that it takes a really good game to still be not only popular, but creatively thriving 3 years after its initial release. TF2 is one of, if not THE, best cooperative first person shooters ever made. 'nuff said. Get it if you don't already have it.
goreston;-;Hats and guns. If the guns could wear hats, this would be the perfect game.
crab_f ringme?;-;this game is ing stupid
rosh;-;It's like SeaWorld But Better. Who has two thumbs and like this game? Probably you if you get it!
GLaDOS;-;HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS....... and sometimes, guns. BUT MOSTLY HATS
Standin.Takahashi;-;This is a well made, stylized, team based first person shooter. Teamwork is needed to win at higher levels of play, though lone wolfing is fine on lower skill levels such as on most public servers. There are 9 classes to choose from. Each class has unique weapons and abilities that allow each to fulfill a unique roll as part of a larger team. This provides for a challenging and rewarding experience when faced against opponents of similar or better skill levels. The game has an active dev team that continues to release updates to the game that add new content such as weapons or game modes. At the time of this review, there are two official modes of play: player versus player and 'Mann Versus Machine'. Player versus player is a mode where one team of players battles against another team of players. Within this mode, there are different types of maps. Each type of map has it's own objective or objectives for each team to achieve. 'Mann Versus Machine' is a mode where a team of up to 6 players battles against waves of bots. Players collect money from destroyed bots. The money is divided equally among players in the team and can be used to purchase upgrades and abilities for the next wave of bots. The pay to play sub-mode, "Mann Up", gives rewards upon completing a "tour". In addition to the official modes of play, there are several player made mods that introduce other modes of play such as 'Versus Saxton Hale', where a team of players battles against a player playing as a character named Saxton Hale; 'Dodge Ball', where two teams of players playing as Pyros must airblast rockets and other projectiles back and forth in order to stay alive; 'Zombie Mod', where a team of players must make it to the end of the map without dying to zombies that are played by other players; to name just a few of the many player made mods available. In addition to game play, players will randomly receive free items from the game. Some of the free items given out are weapons, hats and crates. Hats can be worn by a class to change the appearance of that class. Crates can be opened with a key. Keys can be purchased from the Mann Co Store or from the Steam Community Market or traded for from another player. Most crates will list which items can be found within them. The game has several communities for a player to choose from if a community is what you are looking for. The game is easy to pick up and play, either alone or with friends, yet has a depth of play that will keep you from becoming bored too quickly. The dynamics between the different classes, weapons, play styles, skill levels, modes and maps provides content for many hours of play. I have been playing since November 2007 and I still return to the game on a regular basis.
Kenuty;-;you guys should play this i mean what can go wrong? ITS FREAKING FREE NOW!
(scrap2Unusual) RivMitch;-;This is the best free game I have ever played
Fremy;-;I hate this game almost as much as I hate myself. 8/10.
Sharky;-;This game was cool. Used to have nice co-operative and competitive gameplay. The original gameplay for the base game was enjoyable. Use certain weapons/classes with a degree of teamwork against the enemy team with a decent plan of attack or tactics, and score a win for your team. That's what this game used to be. Now the game is all about the microtransactions for flashy weapons and useless cosmetics. It has been transformed into a virtual shopping mall for kids and autistic manchildren.
= ocu = OfferBot24 (Beta);-;Wow such game. Join our group :)
TraxOnDaRocks;-;What's the point of reviewing a free game anyway?
Cold The Pikasaur;-;I want a refund.
pilou.l;-;I know that Tf2 had always a market with hats and stuff. But why add the Cs:Go skin system to it. That wont get more people to play it will most likely scare them away. Tf2 just got d out by valve and im angry at them for this. Wasnt there enough money made already with all the crates and ducks and ? And not to talk about the balance changes they simply suck. The sense of most weapons got just ed in  like caber for example. Liberty Launcher will be the new LochnLoad and the only flaregun pyros will use is the scorch shot. 10/10 Balance valve. Maybe you should ask Icefrog to rebalance Tf2.
Jelour;-;The only game on steam that I have 380+ Hours on....... But when the sh'itty community came, and taken over, then I stopped playing since I was annoyed by little bi'tches. This game was fine until trolling di'cks had to come, pf. I recommend this if you can handle out the pressure with kids... with 7 year olds.. then this is great with you. LOL. Rate: 9/10
One_man_Cheeseburger_apocalypse;-;HATS HATS HATS. Thats what its all about
Toast;-;It's free.
Koishii~;-;Team Fortress 2 is a popular first-person shooter, wherein you can choose to play as one of nine different classes to fit your play style. Thanks to the reliability of the community, it's usually not very difficult to find a good server. You can gain access to a diverse range of weapons and accessories to equip your character with (either by trading with other players or just playing the game on a regular basis) that further enhance your gaming experience. I always have a lot of fun when I play this game with my friends, and I would recommend it to anyone who is a fan of the genre.
Fades | agarp.co;-;Hat based simulator
[FaZe] KFC - M4$T3R;-;Best Free-To-Play Shooter Ever.
Lepmtg;-;the best game i have ever played. 12/10, never before did i think i would enjoy owning a hat worth more than my halftop. best way to lose all your disposable income, great gameplay, great community, great game
ML Kinguin;-;Badass game. Combines trading and gaming all into one.
Katia Managan;-;Alright, first review I've ever done, so ignore incorrect spelling if you can. Right! So off the bat, I adored the art style and the gameplay, but... The gameplay was way overwhelming for me at first. The good thing is that I wanted to join in, be more of a team player, so, I started playing more to gain more experience in how to basically, as some might say "Get good" at this game. Its really enjoyable, and with updates every now and then, it stays fresh, fun and the community are always welcome. I'd say that this game, is the one that everyone should have a go at, and if its your kinda cake, then pick up a slice, place it next to your sandvich, and get your lunchbox to the battle field and place a dispenser here! Its go time!
ourguile  no internet :c;-;Well, there goes my life...
27;-;This game is ok, I guess
John F Kitten;-;While highly addictive and extremely enjoyable, this game does have it's issues, but let's focus on the positives for now. Unique gameplay, insane weapons, amazing class variety, witty and sarcastic domination lines, interactions between classes, hilarity ensues. This game offers a variety of gamemodes, such as payload, control points, and more, you can play as a range of classes, from a fast paced, accurate, scouter, to a super slow, powerful heavy weapons specialist, from a pyromaniac suffering from schizophrenia, to a stealthy wine connoisieur, with a sharp knife, and sharper wit. The downsides, oh the downsides, this game is a total wallet robber, over 3 for an in-game weapon, of which there are many, or you can spend hours and hours playing the game for a CHANCE to get a weapon, which by the way, that weapon probably won't be what you want, the Mann Co. Store is a total rip-off. Next, Mann Up mode is also a rip-off, 59p to play one match, which you have to complete multiple matches to win anything decent, and again, that thing won't be what you want it to be. In total, while this game is a money stealer, it is great fun. My suggestion? Play PvP casually. Getting into this game competitively will bankrupt you.
1995 Honda Civic;-;This looks like a little kid's, but it's an adult game, which is why I love it.
Snivy;-;TF2>Every FPS shooter that exists.
MalloryKnox.;-;It was fun. It was enjoyable. Then it was free, with purchasable items. And it all went horribly wrong. Full of suspicious players, full of....STUPID items, and full of half-baked maps. It can be really fun for killing some time on a 20 player spammy server, but I'd rather stab my eyes out with spoons than try and play it competitively again. Recommended as a  about with your mates. Trying to play it more competitively will make your brain implode.
flick;-;People kept killing me idk what i'm doing but i got some hats so it all worked out okay 10/10 waste hundreds of hours of your life
Barnacle;-;10/10 would recommend, once u get an Unusual hat, you can't Stop. Trust me....
blizz;-;Outstanding Shooter. Amazing market and wonderful trading systems. 10/10
armypro;-;i bought tf2 when it was in beta or alpha and i would say 100% it was not worth like the 4.99 trust me its worth alot more than 4.99 a amazing game! i wuv it!
Fried_Burgerz;-;My favorite game. 15/10 (yes with this game, those ratings are possible). Good community in-game, and of course, THE HATS PART IS AWESOME!
Ryan4736;-;A very nice and fun game! Might even give us community to have a chance at making nice submissions :)
away till sun/mon;-;TF2 now: *sees player with swag cosmetics* Hlysht PRO! I'm trying to join his team to win! *sees someone hatless/just wearin gibus* HAHA! F2P..! And suddenly the hatless/gibus player just did a quad airshot... Really, hats has change our perspective in TF2... like, No hats no gain 10/10
Wisdom Hoovy;-;I love this game. The Hats, The Weapons, The Quirky Characters, Cheeky humor. It surpasses CoD, Halo, and BattleField by FAR. If you haven't played Team Fortress 2 yet, you need to. Also, after a ton of game hours, you will always hear Heavy eating a sandvich Minigun ringing KA-BOOM! DOCTOR! POOTIS PENCER HERE NEED A DISPENCER HERE! BONK! MMMPH! SPY! And so on. Great game. Hat Simulator 2015. Great community. 10/10 wuld bang agen. -IGN
Linkus;-;Have fun wrecking all the F2P noobs
"Bullet proof" Bullet;-;Just look at my hours. Awesome game, community, and you never get bored. Joined because my bro showed me random SFM. I tought it was a pay to win, so I never tried it. Now that I have it, it's ruining my life. 10/10
Ultra;-;i once got a Hemorroid and couldnt walk for a week. 12/555.5 IGJEW GameSpats
Salty Skullz;-;This game has hats. I can't afford hats. But I'm always trying to aquire hats. Why should you get hats, you say? Hats make you look cool. Why do they make you look cool? Because you can't afford them. 10/10 would dream again.
C0la;-;want a casual fps without people screaming at you on mic? want to hear thai kids cry? play it
Muffinmurdurer;-;The life of a tf2 player: F2p: This game looks fun I bet I can own these noobs. Gibus: Wat is cloack? Normal player: Ill get a few dominations and leave. Above average player: There are expensive hats in this game? What do you want for them? Pro: Meh the only reason I topscored is because the other team mvp has only 100 points. Asshat: STOUT SHAKO FOR 2 REF TRADE ME.
spoon full of trix;-;This game never gets old.
FrozenAutumn;-;Tf2 Is An Amazing FPS Game, It Has Many Different Type of Game Mode, And It Has An Excellent Animation, And Its Completely Free 2 Play
Heather Ainsley;-;when you have to write a review just for the "pillar of the community" badge.. so um..hats es!!
Garry Oak;-;Can kill robots and push them back while screaming you shall not pass. Gandalf simulator 2015 10/10 would Gandalf again
Suspicious;-;Wasted my money on a free to play game on in game hats and weapons.
Knaph10;-;This is a great game, An amazing game. The best first person shooter on steam, at least in my opinion. Colorful graphics, balanced classes, you can choose your own weapon, mods, classes, great gamemodes... This game pretty has everything you want in an FPS. Also, it has hats. I'd give this game an 11/10, but I can't. So I'll have to give it a 10, outta 10.
Ryanthenforcer;-;very good game and lots of fun to play with friends
{D3RP} Marc13Bautista;-;ASWUM GAME!!! 11/10
beeches and creem;-;Addicted like a back alley hooker and heroin. Fun game.
slime girl;-;no engie u stupid  push up instead of fortifying our last point ing  delete this   BACKBURNDER PYROR E  YOU MACHINIANA SNIPER  YOU
Falmer;-;This game ruined over 1,800 hours of my life. LOVE IT
Krissp * CSGORage.com;-;very nice game, fun and engaging! nice economy system, server almost full all the time and good trading system!
[-IX-] Sgt_Nico_The_9th;-;!!WARNING!! After so many hours this game will take ur social life! first u will play as a new beginner, then u get ur first hat!! When u get ur first hat ur wallet is gonna burn. then u get more hats the u dont even play the normal attack-defence u will only be on trade servers! i've used over 250 so far on this game. So for all u new people this is my view: it's an amazing fun game and it's free! but be careful when u start u can stop!
Mr. The Centers;-;It's free, there is no reason you shouldn't play it.
JeWizz;-;Trust me when you get the game you say to yourself screw spending money on stuff, Next thing you know BAM over 100$ spent. Fun wise I give it a 11/10
SomedaY;-;ITS A REAL FUN :D
DoctorMozG;-;Team Fortress 2 is, at heart, a gloriously simple game that's been created with style, panache and an undeniable love of gaming. It's the kind of game that you want to show to people who don't play games so that they understand and then either get involved or go away. There is life before Team Fortress 2, and there is life after. After is better.
[o.W .n]ir.RX;-;it is the good game
Gnananadalf;-;Once upon a time, in a far away swamp, there lived an ornery game named Team Fortress 2 whose precious solitude is suddenly shattered by an invasion of annoying Free-to-players. There are blind mice in his food, a big, bad wolf in his bed, three little homeless pigs and more, all banished from their kingdom by the evil Squeakers. Determined to save their home--not to mention his own--Team Fortress 2 cuts a deal with Squeakers and sets out to rescue the beautiful hats to be the Squeakers' bride. Accompanying him on his mission is wisecracking Free-to-play, who will do anything for Unusuals... except shut up. Rescuing the hats from a new trader may prove the least of their problems when the deep, dark secret it has been keeping is revealed.
Krawser;-;When I reached 1000 hours and finally asked myself: "What am I doing with my life?" It was too late, TF2 sucked my money, time, studies, everything; Now I do nothing more than spend all day sitting in front of my computer playing TF2. Don't play this game for your own good
Snoiped;-;Its the most played free to play game besides DoTa on steam and its made by valve! What could go wrong?
|TvM| brutal_pizza;-;Ever since I originally bought TF2, I fell in love with it straight away. I am still in love with the game. It's an absolutley amazing game. I would seriously reccomend it to anyone who is into FPS games. I love Mann Up, MGE, pubbing and lots more. It's free, its worth buying something to become premium. This is a serious reccomend for me!
Excaliberty;-;I was only nine years old when it happened. I loved Valve so much.. I had all the merchandise and movies. Everynight I would pray to Gaben. "Gaben is love," I say "Gaben is life." My dad overheard me and calls me a n00b. I call him a console peasent. He slaps me and sends me to bed. It's cold now, and my face hurts. I feel a warmth come towards me.. It Gaben! I was so happy! He kneels down beside me and hands me a game called "Team Fortress 2" I begin to play it. I see that everyone is wearing hats. I buy some and Gaben lets out a mighty roar. My dad walks in and sees Gaben. 'Your wallet's empty now" He flies out of my window. Gaben is love, Gaben is life... 11/10 Supah MLG
Thy Clappeth Your Handeth;-;I used hacks and got banned. Don't cheat kids. :) 10/10 VAC system works ok
Cheddar;-;Game is Addictive. Stay Away
Marth Hyuga | Stooge;-;I actually quit playing videogames around the time I started High School, but then a few years later I was introduced to Steam and only wanted to try playing TF2 because all my close friends had it. All my friends in real life have stopped playing, but to make a long story short... I'm addicted. To be completely honest about my recommendation though, I'd change the metascore to 100/100 if I had the ability to.
The GamingLaptop;-;this game is asome i give it 5 stars better than tf1 yea thats rit theres a tf1 by the way its rlly a mod for the first half life ikr
Scraggle;-;A fantastic game that has no competition in the first person shooter genre. There is nothing like Team Fortress 2, it's frantic class based multiplayer combat is unmatched. I can only imagine that there will never be anything exactly like Team Fortress 2 ever again. Even Team Fortress 3 would not quite be the same. I have spent many hours playing Team Fortress 2. Time and time again I return to play it no matter what. The game play never gets old for me. Every match is against different players with different play styles and different strategies. If for any reason you still have not played it now is your time to try it especially since it is free to play forever. While there is an item system the default weapons are definitely the best in most combat situations. Hat's are purely cosmetic and have no change on the game, they only change how you look. I give Team Fortress 2 10 out of 10. Hopefully the community stays strong for a long time to come. It has been strong since 2007 and still going.
/////Cloudy is a Rowdy/////;-;It makes me fap everyday! 72/9.1 -IGN
Canadian Bowling Squad;-;More often than not, I hate this game with a burning passion. BUT IT HAS HATS 10/10
alieNB;-;One of the, if not THE BEST class based multiplayer games I have ever played . Adequately balanced nd loads of fun. HIGHLY RECOMMENDED .
Hyuntae;-;A must-play FPS. F2P!
bee zeus;-;you can shoot stuff with stuff. also, its basically a buggy hat simulator disguised as a first person shooter
Z Ben;-;Damn good and damn free game for teamplay ^^ We have lotsa fun there . Come and join us .
Argeon;-;The most epic of epic games.
Zukso0;-;It's frickin' awesome game <3 hats, miscs etc. You just don't get bored it.
Futter;-;This game was really fun and can play it with you friends.
Eris Master of Ugu-Desu Kawaii;-;Hats: Check Diverse play styles: Check Diverse Characters: Check Endless fun: Check Good Voice acting: Check Balanced maps and weapins: Half a check, not always. Awesome art style: Check Mixed skill levels of players: Check ;n; Hats: Check Seal of Aproval: Oh yes!
Shticky;-;I gotta say... this game is worth most of your time playing. With the art style, the humor, and all the creative weapons, I highly recommend this game
bravoman80000;-;This is one of the most violent... Messed up... gory... beautifuly peice of  their is... and its all free!!! FREEDOM LADS!!!!!
JasNinjah;-;This has to be the best Free to Play game of all time. Sure, to get some of the cool stuff you'll actually have to pay for it with real money. But the overall experience of this game is amazing. There are so many different game modes and so many people to play with. There are also many different ways to customize your characters. So if haven't already gotten TF2, get it. It's totally worth it.
Jmh;-;Interesting... very very interesting
Dexama;-;Now what can i say about team fortress 2? Well first of all they have made it now free to play which is excellent. This game is mostly responsible for ruining my life. And also the millions of "My dog ate my homework" excuses was because of this game. Yet i still play it. But why? Well thats the fact, cause it is a addicting first - person shooter with a cartoonish style. Valve has made this game for a reason. To kill things. And thats what everbody loves. Rating 10/10
khalifa [DZ];-;this game ftw
Spaceman;-;Awesome class based game!
MiSt;-;Fun game. Free FPS game. :)
Danny54d2;-;I got TF2 last year some time and have been playing ever since. You may not think 100 hours is much but it is seen as tho i play so much Minecraft. Anyway, I would reccomend TF2 to anyone because it is a really fun 'Free to play game'. I found the tutorials on how to play very easy to understand, the tutorials consist of being a certain character and going through what weapons they have and what they do. Once gone through the tutorial i went on to mulitiplayer, The multiplayer of TF2 is faultless with Countless amount of servers to choose from all having different aims like capture the point or team death match etc. You may be thinking to get better weapons you will have to buy them in the store like in other games, well thats not the case as you find items while playing, which you can use or trade with others. Making it ideal for all gamers no matter there budget. Graphics side TF2 has decent graphics with a low to zero lag experience. If you like third person shooters TF2 is for you! 10/10!
Mrminitimmy;-;Why arn't you playing this game? Its free AND you can actually make some money out of selling strange and geniune weapons and misc :D
Drexel;-;>Are you Rich? (in Real Life) >Are you skilled? >Do you want to have Golden Weapons? Then this game is for you!
Something Creative;-;"Skil? What's skill? You don't need skill when you have random crits."
HE'S DONE IT AGAIN;-;there goes my school grades
FaZe OpTic;-;i got votebanned from a valve server for changing teams 10/10
Fried_Burgerz;-;My favorite game. 15/10 (yes with this game, those ratings are possible). Good community in-game, and of course, THE HATS PART IS AWESOME!
Spaceman;-;Awesome class based game!
Ultra;-;i once got a Hemorroid and couldnt walk for a week. 12/555.5 IGJEW GameSpats
khalifa [DZ];-;this game ftw
Jmh;-;Interesting... very very interesting
Dexama;-;Now what can i say about team fortress 2? Well first of all they have made it now free to play which is excellent. This game is mostly responsible for ruining my life. And also the millions of "My dog ate my homework" excuses was because of this game. Yet i still play it. But why? Well thats the fact, cause it is a addicting first - person shooter with a cartoonish style. Valve has made this game for a reason. To kill things. And thats what everbody loves. Rating 10/10
Wisdom Hoovy;-;I love this game. The Hats, The Weapons, The Quirky Characters, Cheeky humor. It surpasses CoD, Halo, and BattleField by FAR. If you haven't played Team Fortress 2 yet, you need to. Also, after a ton of game hours, you will always hear Heavy eating a sandvich Minigun ringing KA-BOOM! DOCTOR! POOTIS PENCER HERE NEED A DISPENCER HERE! BONK! MMMPH! SPY! And so on. Great game. Hat Simulator 2015. Great community. 10/10 wuld bang agen. -IGN
/////Cloudy is a Rowdy/////;-;It makes me fap everyday! 72/9.1 -IGN
Froobert;-;10/10 would hat again
Defective Healzer | Trade.tf |;-;I love this game more then any other game on my steam list
.{ind}.Veekaa19;-;It's a cool game with A LOT OF achievements! It's funny! But I'm NOT good at it ;-)
( );-;gotta collect em all. there are more than 100 hats you can gather. its definitely the best hat simulator on the market. also theres a built in mulitplayer
Crease |-/;-;>This is the best game to relieve stress. >It can ruin your life. >You can wear very fancy hats. >People doesn't care about your skill as long as you have fancy hats. >Since the first time that i went in the steam workshop of TF2, All the players of TF2 just cared about the hats. >They also have awesome weapons. 10 out of 10 I would recommend to family and friends.
FlatWhite_;-;Stole my house, my wallet, my wife, my hat, and my life. I really liked that hat
NUDE DAD SURFIN THE WEB;-;team fortress 2 ruined my life i met my fiance on this game (i wish that was the joke)
Flump;-;if you want to waste money then this game is for you :P
Scrub Lolli-POP #Detox;-;This is a very good and awesome game.You guys should play this game.
Spicey_Wolf;-;I've decided to quickly just edit my "joke review" to provide a better idea of how the game is. TF2 is a brilliant game, there's no denying that. I've been playing this game non-stop for almost two years now. However, while it is a fantastic game, the overall quality of updates and morale in the community has been dropping quite a bit since I joined, many players are now looking towards two possible solutions to the lack of proper updates. 1) Move over to Blizzard's upcoming game "Overwatch". 2) Pray that Valve is just holding off on content until the release of Source 2 (TF2 currently runs on the Source Engine in case you didn't know). The game is free so I suggest you at least give it a go, however do keep in mind that there were better times than this (which I sadly never got to experience). It's also important to note that the game might be near death in the near future if Valve doesn't pick up the pace a bit. EDIT: COMPETITIVE MATCHMAKING WAS CONFIRMED. DOUBT THE GAME IS GOING TO DIE ANYTIME SOON. JUMP ABOARD THE HYPE TRAIN!
~September~;-;HOLY  IS THIS GAME GOOD! My experience with TF2 has been a rollercoaster, awesome and not that awesome, almost quitting to getting my first 1k kills on a strange weapon :D. TF2 is so diversed with so incredibly many ways to play you will be hooked straight in with its addictive multiplayer action all day long, forgetting of time. This game has a ALOT of potential and you should try this out right now, THIS INSTANT. This game does have some downsides- random unfair crits, unfair playstyles, the market has been turning , and lack of new stuff at the moment. The good sides are- u dont need microtransactions to look good(u can craft hats with ref as a fp2), there are lots of fun ways to play the game(TONS of weapons), this is, as i said earlier, not a pay to play game in any way,new weapons drop randomly so you dont have to buy them. Those were just SOME of the good things about TF2. I HIGHLY RECOMMEND THIS GAME! DOWNLOAD NOW AND HAVE FUN!
Deez Nuts;-;Been playing this game fot about a year now, and it is a great game. Not much to say about it other than that tbh. Valve keep it going, it'll do you good.
young, petite twink;-;Hey random, watch out, theres a super subjective review ahead! After over 3000 hours of playtime in this game I can surely say that it is one of the best games I have played (yet), the 9 classes, numerous maps, many gamemodes and huge number of weapons in the game just make this a super-diverse game and very enjoyable to play once you figured out HOW to play it. Looking at TF2 from an outsiders perspective: its free2play, first downside, it doesn't look too serious, theres are a ton of cosmetics and you can buy stuff from a store... seems pretty much like a pay2win game right? Well it isn't! Cosmetical items ALL only have visual effects on your character and don't matter, weapons however do all have diffrent, sometimes even completely classchanging stats, which may or may not be usefull, depending on the situation you are in. (Stockweapons being the most realiable ones in pretty much EVERY situation) You get weapons through item-drops, there are around 7 item-drops per week, the counter resetting on thursdays, so there you go, you can get all the items (except some special ones that have diffrent visuals but otherwise are just reskins of their "normal" counterparts) through just playing the game! It might take you some time of course, but I think that being overwhelmed by all the unlocks and not knowing what they do as a starter, could more easily lead to frustration than getting them after each other and checking out what they do, then deciding if they are usefull or not. (Psst, you can also find HATS!) Gameplaywise, its a pretty fun experience (occasionally annoying randomcrits and some unbalanced weapons aside) and you can actually have a BLAST playing it with your friends! TF2 has a class for every type of player, there's a stealth-guy, theres a sniper-dude, theres some big slow guy with a freaking minigun, theres some really fast dude, and so on, also it's, like I mentioned before, free2play, so whenever you are bored, why not jump into the game with some friends, have fun for an hour or 2 and quit the game without having spent any money! Actually, if you get further interested in the game, it also has a competitive side to it, the skill ceiling is incredibly high, I myself for example have only managed to be semi-good at ONE of the nine classes, and am not able to play in a competitive division higher than steel (one of the worst), even with my 3000 hours of playing the game! Yes there are people like me that take that game serious! And you know what? It's amazing to play in a team of nice people and try your heart out just to lose because of teams that actually know what they are doing wrecking you... (You can't blame it on unfair unlocks or randomcrits either, both aren't existent in comp...). SUMMARY! Good: -many maps, classes, gamemodes, weapons, for alot of variety -actually not pay2win, pay2lookgood instead -huge trading community, if you are good you can trade your way up and own virtual items with real world value! -enjoyable competitive formats (go to playcomp.tf to get more info) -playstyles for everyone -visually appealing artstyle -ALOT of mechanics -features amazing fun, hilarious moments and people falling off cliffs Bad: -some unbalanced weapons (though counterable with an ounce of coordination) -occasionally annoying randomcrits (random critical hits) -hard to get into all the diffrent mechanics at start -actually pretty badly optimized, all the updates made the game run slow on "casual" machines -as a free2play you only have 50 backpack slots, any kind of investment in the store however (which start at a few cents), increases your backpack size to 300 slots (defenitely enough) P.S.: Theres quite some stuff I haven't actually talked about like the actually challenging co-op missions in MVM and community created gamemodes and maps! Go ahead and boot up the game in order to have a nice time! :D
Decimal;-;Conga will help you through all of your problems. Lol 100/10
Scooty;-;Hats Unusual Hats w+m1 pyros spycrabs f2p bodyshot snipers 12 year olds kids asking for items  giving items to poor people because they feel more powerful Exploiters Bugs 10/10 would hat simulate again
Gus Fring TF:CO!;-;Game makes no sense, dispense bread, eat a sandwich: 11/10
Buck Rogers.t9;-;TF2 is a great game with great classes. The action is fast paced and plenty of maps to choose from. From pubs to competitive, it has something for everyone.
Knaph10;-;This is a great game, An amazing game. The best first person shooter on steam, at least in my opinion. Colorful graphics, balanced classes, you can choose your own weapon, mods, classes, great gamemodes... This game pretty has everything you want in an FPS. Also, it has hats. I'd give this game an 11/10, but I can't. So I'll have to give it a 10, outta 10.
Suspicious;-;Wasted my money on a free to play game on in game hats and weapons.
Garry Oak;-;Can kill robots and push them back while screaming you shall not pass. Gandalf simulator 2015 10/10 would Gandalf again
Fapoleon;-;>Get on Trade Server >1 guys spamming Russian Songs on mic >1 kid yelling how he got scammed >Endless Trade Requests >Get on Payload Server >Same 10/10 Best Hat Simulator
superdry;-;The best hat simulator out there.
Copep0d;-;At least the best free game on steam.
basya;-;You don't understand, for years people have been telling me "YOU'RE NO GOOD!" NOW I'M GOOD! I have a hat to prove it!
Dazzy;-;At first I thought it was some cartoony fps. But now Valve proved me wrong. TF2 is a great game, very addicting, and a great place to make money.
(NAFF) SheitaN666 In Holidays;-;My favorite game on Steam ^^
M3LZAR;-;289 hours and counting. Save yourselves, or collect the hats. This is what it truly comes down to. There is no going back after this.
Katrice;-;A Co-worker told me that the game is sooo gay... Well, you know what, you missed half of your life. And you don't know what the word FUN is. I played 18-20 hours at first run. And I can't get enough of it. It helped me loose a bit of weight because I didn't worry about food, I just want to play haha! Non- stop action. Best soundtrack. Funny short films to meet each classes. The best voice actors. Cool updates, unique weapons, and of course hats! BEST FREE-TO-PLAY GAME! You'll miss the fun if you don't play it.
Catsmoothies;-;Whipped a 10 year old kid to death while dressed as Santa, then blew up his friend and didn't get arrested 10/10.
nashieG;-;A great balanced fps game, i recommend everyone to play this. ^_^ Maybe the economy is ruined, but this game keeps me playing it for some reason. x)
dunelm1;-;this game is the best thing since sliced bread. in fact it's better than sliced bread, because it has sliced bread (see sandvich). the only problem is that sliced bread doesn't have a 7 gb file size. which is annoying, especially if you have a 10gb broadband allowance. bt WILL chase you with a shotgun, but the months in hospital are worth it. until you realise your hub is crap. still 10/10 though. because engies aren't affected by lag (or the laws of physics) yeeeeeeee haaaaaaaaaaaaaaaw!
[Pootis Mann] Senpie;-;Ah... TF2... The best hat simulator there is. OMGWTFBBQ I GOTZ HATZ 4 FREES YAY! -First time getting Gibus YAY MOR HATZ! ITS NO HATZ IT GOGGLEZ -First time getting Pyrovision Goggles 10/10 would hat again
Dave K;-;Every time a round of new games comes out that eat my time, TF2 is there when I'm done with them. It never stops being fun.
hPALLY #LF> EXP ArtWorker !;-;Played a bit, kinda liked it. Especially the trading part, wasted around 500 hours on PPM Servers !
basya;-;You don't understand, for years people have been telling me "YOU'RE NO GOOD!" NOW I'M GOOD! I have a hat to prove it!
|Dash|;-;I like how I can play and dominate players, everything's cool and awesome! But the only problem is the Ping, I'm surprised I still play it with my Ping at 524 -.- Valve please fix it!
GanNZ;-;Really fun co-op game
CIVI | Subzero;-;Great Game! Although i feel like i wasted to many hours and dollars on hats!
PP-Schrek - VACacje;-;THIS IS AWESOME!!!
Punchy;-;also hats
WightLynxie;-;This game... Oh gods this game. "Oh, you only have nine classes? And you don't even get unlocks that are better than beginner weapons? What reason is there to play?!" Words can not lend this game justice. That 7.5GB that was spent downloading this game? It was definitely put to good use. You see other people playing and it's all; "This game is sh**" But when you actually play it, you don't even notice the minutes tick by. It's like a hypnosis-machine, but with more gun. The only gripe I can really give to this game is that it uses a lot of internet data. Then again, what good online game doesn't? Aaargh, I couldn't encourage you to download this game any more than I am now. If you can only barely spare the 7.5GB download, trust me. Download TF2. You WILL love it. Except for those dumbasses who spam the microphone with some dumbass song =w=
Inspector Heavy;-;Awesome Game I love this Game so much :D
[BOT]Red Dragon;-;My Bot Masters Makes me play this game all the time. i hate all the Non-Bot players
(NAFF) SheitaN666 In Holidays;-;My favorite game on Steam ^^
M3LZAR;-;289 hours and counting. Save yourselves, or collect the hats. This is what it truly comes down to. There is no going back after this.
Katrice;-;A Co-worker told me that the game is sooo gay... Well, you know what, you missed half of your life. And you don't know what the word FUN is. I played 18-20 hours at first run. And I can't get enough of it. It helped me loose a bit of weight because I didn't worry about food, I just want to play haha! Non- stop action. Best soundtrack. Funny short films to meet each classes. The best voice actors. Cool updates, unique weapons, and of course hats! BEST FREE-TO-PLAY GAME! You'll miss the fun if you don't play it.
hPALLY #LF> EXP ArtWorker !;-;Played a bit, kinda liked it. Especially the trading part, wasted around 500 hours on PPM Servers !
PP-Schrek - VACacje;-;THIS IS AWESOME!!!
Inspector Heavy;-;Awesome Game I love this Game so much :D
Punchy;-;also hats
ThunderMRK;-;i killed a guy with a fish
xuikan #chinapls;-;It's aight
[BOT]Red Dragon;-;My Bot Masters Makes me play this game all the time. i hate all the Non-Bot players
superdry;-;The best hat simulator out there.
Fapoleon;-;>Get on Trade Server >1 guys spamming Russian Songs on mic >1 kid yelling how he got scammed >Endless Trade Requests >Get on Payload Server >Same 10/10 Best Hat Simulator
dominik2015 spazmouse;-;Can teleport bread 11/10
Ros| Mr.Green;-;Great game!
Ciaru;-;Body explosions, Medic!!, SWAG, Hats!, MORE HATS!, BOOOONK! Anymore to say? 11/10
Swatt;-;its alright
Cake3Days-Bday;-;This game is quite easy and fun, once you get used to it. My favorite part is playing on Dodgeball servers. I highly recommend that. It's pretty hard when you first start, and if you're using a trackpad like myself, but practice and you'll be good! It's also very helpful in MvM, or pubs. Have fun!
Prefector;-;Spy. Makes me realize to just put a mask in your face and act the right guy for the right person you are deceiving. And that applies in real life. Its a helpful skill you can apply to your friends and family. Because you can make a fake copy of yourself that you will show to your family and friends for what they want you to be. The game is great and makes you know what's right and wrong. But seriously you don't know whats right and wrong in this game. Just blast them because they're the enemy and shoot your teammates doubting that they are enemies too. 10/10 Would doubt everyone in the team an enemy
Ike | SoW;-;Team Fortress 2 is a great game with a great community. What I love about this game is the large variety of styles classes and ways tp play each class not to mention the large amount gamemodes. I would recommend this game to anyone who is a gamer. :3 Love this game.
Sh Zaid;-;Team Fortress 2 is absolutely astonishing! it combines cooperative teamwork and intense moments in one large package. This game is extremely balanced and has numerous things to do. It will keep you occupied for months and years to come. TF2 also incorporates creativity, as it provides you with the opportunity to create and customize your own classes with epic hats and weaponary. This game is a must have, and I would reccomend it to any PC Gamer who takes interest in action, or shooter games. I hope to see you in-game!
Mr.Rocco;-;A game that redifines your average FPS like COD or Medal of Honor. Its actually fun to play, the game is balanced, and you don't even have to pay to play. The characters have amazing qualities and personalities. The game is filled with different weapons AND A BOAT LOAD OF HATS!
Modgamin The Guard;-;AWSOME MUST GET OUT OF F2P THEN RUN AROUND WORK TOGETHER IN MVM AND BATTLE IN TEAMS IN MULTPLAYER 10 OUT OF 5 STARS
Dah Cow;-;This is game is AWESOME, if u love funny shooters, super unique ppl, and everything awesome in the world! you WILL love this game!!!!! plus there are hats! 1000/10!
Positive;-;It's alright
Skermer#TerrariaMultiplayer!;-;After playing 1000+ Hours, I might do a re-write of the re-write of my review Stage 1: Graphics Everyone knows the cartoony graphics of Team Fortress 2, IMO, the change from a Realistic Shooter that Team Fortress 2 was supposed to be, was a good idea. The graphics are amazing, HD and no lag when at high, hopefully, TF3 (If they actually do make one) has the same graphics from the current game that everyone loves. Rating: 10/10 - Beautiful Art Design Stage 2: Gameplay and Mechanics In the usual FPS, its simple, WASD to move and Mouse 1 to shoot and kill everyone to win. Well, in TF2 its much different, Custom Weapons that allow whole new styles to play, Gamemodes that never get old (Especially Payload and Control Points) and the creative maps, no map is the same except for its gameplay mechanics. One problem I have with this is, they don't have a filter that allows premium players who have higher skill than free to players, this causes unbalance in some teams when a team where its mostly free to players and and other team where its highly skilled players always destroy the other team. As well as the auto balance, it makes people who are about to win then BAM! the player is now on the losing team. But overall, the mechanics of the game may have little downsides but never stop people from enjoying the gameplay and different weapons. Rating: 8.5/10 Close to amazing Final Stage: Community, Updates and Content First, I'll start with the community, the TF2 Community is amazing, a lot of faithful players who love this game to the very end, but it has some flaws, free to players, These people are so stupid, these players can't even listen to direction, I've tried coaching and it sucks so much, they don't listen to you at all and clueless to what is happening. Second, Premium, those people are mean, in trading they force you to pay more than what its worth, they should add rules to trading, chatting and other things that can effect new players. I hope those who are mean, become good and help those who are new and change the way they play. Second, Updates, the updates are lacking very lacking, Valve step it up, after some updates, TF2 is losing their community I mean the EotL was overhyped, there was supposed to be new weapons and a new map then Valve says "the map was too confusing for new players" how about rd_asteroid? Even players who played for a long time don't get cp_steel. Basically, step it up Valve. Finally, Content, there is A LOT of content in this game, mostly hats. They should focus more on weapons than hats. That covers most of that but now, gamemodes, no new game modes for a long time, except for Mann Power but recent players of the Gamemode think its bad. Valve is focusing on hats and bugs. Rating 1: 9/10\ Rating 2: 4/10 Overall:7.1/10 Need a bit of work Rating 3: 7/10/ Overall Rating: 8.6/10 - Amazing Game
Rexinexus;-;TF2 is one of the most fun FPSs around. + Great gameplay and fair shooting. + No one class or weapon is overpowered. + Art design is great. + Map design is great. + Modes are all fun. + Co-op is fun, but costs money. + Never really gets old or stale. + It's free. - Far too many cosmetics that clog up the game and turn it into a d*ck measuring contest. - Official in-game store prices for cosmetics are astrinomically high and basically pointless. - 90% of the servers are trade servers, not enough game servers. 8/10, download it you idiot, it's TF2, it's free.
PyroJoe;-;Killed my social life, along with my inancial life, to collect hats with things coming out of them 10/10, would reccomend to friends and family
Amigo.txt;-;out of the 3 hurs f mi life ive ben pleying thiese for 2 and i LOVE you. sry it. hahahahahahahahahah enywey i would sey it was a 10 outta 10000000 ahahhaah jking agaien stop faling for mi gud jokesss plz. anuway it shouldve bene nup thre rwith half flife 2 for4 gem of century im not even gonna be alive for centurery what how am i going tm see next gem of centurryy.i dont want to die. well if i dye ill snd my assehes to alve to comrpess adn make into a grpahics chip. i gobba cher myshelf up agein im sed from thinkgin baout impending dezth. anyaways i went to the makrit and this women passed mi on acident it calmsd me to know thet grils liek her are sufring the sem fate and will die too, they deeeserve it. lol jking. would buy gmae ea second time./ wouldnt. lo ljk i love team fortresaa tln kastest updet meks me a difernet shoae. canr wszit to die and see the nxet game of year . i luv yu everbidy who reds this is gobba dye someday and its ok. In seriousenss team fortress 2 brings new life to the "fps" mostly with the lovely community and the cool unlockables.the strategic gameplay that forces you to work together everything melds into a great game. 8/10 great game keep it up infinity ward. love you ~ jerody
'Kish;-;Team global fortress offensive 2
prankmaster tonni;-;hello every1 this is my first review i played tf2 because its free 2 play that's a big bonus. i never pay for games and i nevr will. if i dont get it for free, i dont even want to touch it. in tf2 u can play medic heavy soldier sniper spy pyro scout demoman and engineer theyre all rely good if u havea rly good team full of good friends i f u really wana play tf2 however i sugest u get steam first then install it. after it is instaled u can play all u ing wnat!!!!! if thats not good then go herd some goats !
Bitch U Guessed It;-;-Unusuals -Australiums -Taunts 11/10 would spend money again
MARIOMAN6444;-;great game all thing about it are just the best
Mentlegen;-;Watched the world burn with eyes of a maniacal pyro. Burned an 8 year old kid to death. Got killed by his rocket. U GOT KARMAD'!!! Best F2P ever!
[DVA] Vintendo101;-;Very nice and competitive game
Kythrol;-;A free to play first-person shooter with lots of content and an unique art style. Nine classes, each of which plays and feels differently. Lots of game modes to play. Hundreds of items to craft or trade, ranging from purely cosmetic stuff to different weapons for each class. It's very easy to jump in and just enjoy yourself. I'll be honest when I say that the game isn't like it used to be back when I actually played it a lot - but it is a great title nonetheless. And being free, you've got nothing to lose.
MetalWolfGaming;-;Team Fortress 2 is hands-down the funnest game for trading and just playing for fun. Yeah CounterStrike is fun, but that is more of a competitive game. Team Fortress originially went through many titles and ideas, until they came within an idea. That idea was having two teams, Red, and Blu, having nine classes, Scout, Soildier, Pyro, Demoman, Heavy, Engineer, Medic, Sniper, and a Spy. All these classes were very thought out and disputed like how they are. This is one of the best games ever made for millions of people, but I would like, More Cosmedics, Bug Fixes, WAY More SFM's, etc. To conclude this, I will be going by saying Team Fortress 2 is a very fun cartoony style game, and I will recommend for any interested people to play. Thank you for the time reading this.
The Lone Spirit;-;Played it some. Pretty good. Hats are important though.
|;-;Very Good Game. Some skill in hand of this , its free to play and premium. Its Fun and not too gory with alot of comedic action. But After awhile you could get bumped into many problems. For Examples - Gaben memes. No Updates. People Calling u hax if u kill them. Russians (not all of them) Calling you Bylad. Or when u miss people call you noob. But I Overall Reccomend you do play this game. Its Economy is Dying (alittle). But the Gameplay is very good. Would Reccomend to Anyone i know.(except somone named Bill Cosby)
Putin;-;Vri gut game but VACation :((((
ReL Hatana Sinclaire;-;its ok
Dissident Aggressor;-;It's a good fishing simulator. Also there's a little bit of an owl sim in it.
kum.kun;-;this is my drug :3
Mindless Bot;-;The best F2P game ever. 11/10
[F.A.G] Urto;-;This is a Japanese turn-based RPG dating sim with trains.
TG | Karma;-;I've put all my money into this game, besides Garry's Mod. This is an amazing game, everyone should be playing it. 10/10
Hell Hath No Fury Like Me;-;Madeline I know you love this game I'm so sorry for peeing in your ramen and stealing the chicken flavoring for myself please take me back!
Crikasaur ();-;Love it. I suggest this to anyone.
Jonova;-;Absolutely amazing, fun, and entertaining, though it is a bit rough on most computers.
Shylo;-;How could you not play this?!
TG | Karma;-;I've put all my money into this game, besides Garry's Mod. This is an amazing game, everyone should be playing it. 10/10
Yum;-;Why would you not have this game?
swix*;-;I think it's alright... Not sure yet, need more time...
-Lieutenant Salty-;-;My favorite Kanye is Kanye West because he can Kanye jump from one Kanye to another Kanye. He also uses the (in my opinion) the best secondary Kanye: The Kanye. Kanye West has proven to be the most Kanyeest Kanye you can ever Kanye because his cosmetics are so Kanye. I personally use the "Best in the Kanye West" and the "West Kanye" in my Kanye slot. Overall Kanye West has given me much Kanye in Kanye Fortress 2. Kanye/Kanye would Kanye again.
bert;-;The best cosmetic simulator I've ever played. 10/10 would dress up again.
Dream (Sueo);-;Yep. I totally recommend it. Really fun game to play with your friends, but please call it the Hat Simulator. 10/10.
Spectra;-;It's a good game!One of the best 1st person shooters I have ever played
gt.DJ kitty;-;Its a great First person to play its just a game where you can have fun every class has its pros and cons but if you know how to play that class your going to have a great time!
Bonster!;-;Playing since 2008 and still my favorite go to shoot-em-up. I've made real life friends, and had more laughs than I can count. I still play rather vanilla, but enjoy that the community can and has played such a big part in developing items and creating a wild economy within the game.
Leigh Daniel Avidan;-;This game ruined my life. I really should stop playing now-- Maybe after a few more hours.
MASTAHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH;-;The game is very well balanced with 9 classes with unique abilities and weaknesses. Valve continues to update and add more maps all the time. The animation and voice over work will have you chuckling as you intensely battle for intelligence and capture points. Also there are a lot of random gamemodes such as Deathrun,Jailbreak and so on...have fun!
Ded;-;Just 2muchConga4u these days
ironically dead inside;-;One of my favorite fps games/hat collecting games. Overall rating: 11/10
bert;-;The best cosmetic simulator I've ever played. 10/10 would dress up again.
Dashij!;-;First, check the achievements for pyro. Check which one gives you the backburner, then start up the game and farm it together; congratulations! Now you can equip your weapon sent to you by the achievement gods and grab a small rock, place it on your W key to win! Don't forget to hang your massive scrotum over your microsoft mouse and flail it around madly while screaming in mumble until desired success is achieved. Yes I used to main pyro. It was a necessity.
Princess Luna (broken pc);-;Can't stop playing it because this game is awesome!!!!!!
horny teen white girl;-;What a masterpiece of a game. You could be pushing a bomb in this game while a person plays "All Star" by Smashmouth over their mic. Truly a beautiful game.
Dream (Sueo);-;Yep. I totally recommend it. Really fun game to play with your friends, but please call it the Hat Simulator. 10/10.
The Diddler;-;I agree
( ) Greeny ( );-;cool game ^^
Desmond Miles  spy lft s17;-;Filled with DDoSers, scammers, *INSERT FAMOUS PLAYER NAME HERE* wannabes, people who are actually good at this ing game, noobs. I think it's safe to say that this game is the biggest  to exist by far. I love it.
Nickers;-;hats
Kiddles The Rather Volatile Cat;-;I went on a trade server and was called a noob for killing. 10/10 would kill again.
BumFreeze;-;Lots of depth. Every class has its weaknesses and enemy classes, as well as strengths, when you look a little deeper into the concepts of this game you'll see how everything is linked and you need to choose the right class and weapons for every situation. TOO MANY HATS THOUGH. This takes 12 gigabytes of data on my hard drive and I can assure you its aaallllllllll hat textures, and it updates every day. -_-
Cool Pizza;-;ruined my life. 5 stars
Kaleidescoop;-;In EA's new hit title, Team Fortress 2: Band of Brothers, you play as one of nine different characters through gritty war scenarios that tell the tale of two PMC companies embroiled in a privately funded war. On one side is the REDfor team, a band of experienced Veterans based in Europe. On the other is BLUfor, a ruthless mercenary group based primarily in Russia. From the minigun-toting cigar smoking character Ivan "Heavy Weapons" to the cocky, accented demolitions expert Tavish "Smokey" DeGroot, this game will provide a whole new level of immersion with characters you care for, realistic battlefields and vehicles, and over 100 real weapons including the P90, Mossberg, M16, and a fan favorite, the Gluon Gun. For only $79.99, this game is what is described by reviewers like IGN and Gamespot the "pinnacle of modern FPS's." Pre-order it now and you can get two tactical maps of Teufort and Coldfront, a limited edition Gamer's Guide, and the "End of the Line" DLC for free!
Nevermore;-;Team Fortress 2 is the perfect Steam introduction game; if you already haven't been pulled in by the fact that this game is no less than zero dollars then let me persuade you. TF2 is filled with clever humour, wacky hats and weapons and hundreds of hours of online play. Even without a premium account you can enjoy all of the weapons bar a few promotional items and have access to any server you choose. There is a class for everyone; whether you like capturing points and intel as the scout, building sentries and dispensers to aid your team as The Engineer or remaining disguised and unseen as the Spy, Team Fortress 2 can provide this along with much more. There are 8 gamemodes in total including Mann VS Machine; not including several spin-offs and countless community generated content. The community holds considerable power in TF2; almost all of the latest updates have been under a strong community influence; including items and maps. Get TF2. Now. You have nothing to lose and I can almost guarantee that you'll have a great time.
JackBlack;-;one of the best game ever and it is really a good trading game so play it
*~chocolatedalmation~*;-;Fun to play with friends
Koala Master;-;Nothing much to say about this game, other than that I love it and I'm pretty much addicted to it. You can never get enough hats and it's easy to become sucked in with the many different things you can do (Pubs, ToD, Jump Maps, dodgeball, etc). With items and hats created by the community, it is easy to get involved and share your creativity. Except I can't get an Aussie. Or an unusual. That is the only downside. GABENNNNN! And gosh, lower the price of keys already.
MASTAHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH;-;The game is very well balanced with 9 classes with unique abilities and weaknesses. Valve continues to update and add more maps all the time. The animation and voice over work will have you chuckling as you intensely battle for intelligence and capture points. Also there are a lot of random gamemodes such as Deathrun,Jailbreak and so on...have fun!
Ded;-;Just 2muchConga4u these days
ironically dead inside;-;One of my favorite fps games/hat collecting games. Overall rating: 11/10
inakilbss;-;Great game with 10 gamemodes and an enormous variety of weapons and cosmetics. It has a humoristic touch and an extensive lore on the webpage. Stylized reality with relaxing colors. Fast-paced and team-playing. Definetly recommended.
Spectrum;-;If you enjoy shooting drunk scotsmen with a -gun, this game is for you.
The Muffin Man;-;Amazing fun, fast paced game for all to play.
trichy;-;spent $100 to paint all hats pink. 10/10 will play agian
The Kunai King;-;I haven't played much of the game yet, but Team Fortress 2 is an incredibly fun experience that shouldn't be passed up. The game follows 9 mercenaries on two teams battling each other to the death in order to complete a certain objective depending on what game mode they are on. What really makes the game unique is that each class doesn't seem too highly overpowered like in Call of Duty or Halo. Each one has their weaknesses and relies on other classes to help them stay alive. For example, the Medic class is designed to heal teammates and occasionally grant them invulnerability to bullets at the expense of a poor arsenal. He needs to be protected by the class he's healing because he can't defend for himself very well. The Engineer class relies on his Sentry turret which can be deployed to wreck havoc on enemies trying to invade his base. Along with this, he can deploy a dispenser which grants ammo/health to his team and two teleporters (good for helping them get out into battle quickly). Although he can't be with most of the others fighting on the front line, he still helps them immensely with these inventions. Along with uniquely designed classes, the art style of the game is gorgeous in its own way, as it's not too realistic with a fun cartoon art style. The voice actors for each class are hilariously over-the-top which adds to the enjoyability of playing as each of them, and even if you don't like what they seem to offer they're still worth a go. I'd defenitely recommend this game to anyone. The classes are fun, the gameplay is fun, and the visuals are even "fun", I'd say. This is probably one of the best multiplayer shooters you can come across - and it's free, too!
schnitzel;-;Who doesn't want a hat with fkn flames on it?
Mushrooms;-;Addictive and tons of fun. Great game and hardly lags at all even on crappy computers. This game is a must have for any steam player who enjoys fps. Would be better though if three new classes were made, either in a new catagory or a new one to each catagory.
Lord Bob: Proud King of Irelands;-;What could I say about Team Fortress that hasn't been said before? It's simply a great game. Not only is it free to play, but it offers unique and fun gameplay, characters, and innovations that many games today lack.
JUST JUAN;-;its gr8
EdmundMcGaben;-;It is a game,If you are REALLY Intelligent this game is Frickin' Awesome.But if you think this: Hats are everything,i can go to work and get at least 200 dolar per week and i buy hats. I am premium.What now?I have a set for Medic(Or anything else)!Now i gonna just play with this. Another guy:Do you haevnt got another hats? Who need this?Pfffff. I am F2P.I just wearing a  gibus and a pyrovision s**t.I am a worthless idiot. Well,please,im begging pleeeease leave the game or understand.This game is not for accesories,This game is for premium's accesories.Hey Premium's!Go and buy hat!F2P's!Go and have fun :3 But...You must buy hats with trading,NEVER with Mann co. Store.Think the real world goodies that you can buy with one unusuals price.This game AWESOME,but if you are INTELLIGENT.I will want to help the 'Richs' That spending money in a 'virtual' game.This game is awesome,but if you are have to spend money good. Some Comments From Our Friends: This Was Frickin' Awesome While I'm Crushing Skulls And Beating Peoples Face!-Scout I Used This Mann co. Shovel While I Playing This Game And My Opinion,I Would Do Again!-Soldier Mmphphphpmmmphpmh!Mmppphmmmphhhmmpmhhpphhmmph!-Pyro Lads,Blow Up People,Jump Like A Bird,And Play This Game!-Demoman I Like This New Weapon,This New Sandvich And This New Fists!-Heavy Think Like A Man,Shorty.-Engineer Danke My Hard Hatted Friend!-Medic Thank You Doctor!-Heavy I Love This Game!-Medic Is This Another Skull Fracture?No,its Headshot. ''CRUNCH''But That Was Skull Fracture.-Sniper The Spy Is Not Our ''AAAAAAH!''-Heavy Naturally.-Spy
[ALTFS];-;nice game with nice graphics and and you will never get bored with all of this new weapon and maps and game modes and it has 9 classes each class has his own ability to do his job
[NRG] Yuuki DoRito [CAPT.BOBD];-;A awesome game.
Pacman;-;This game is really awesome even though it is violent and gory it is still fun to play due to funny rag dolls when dying, game modes, promotional items, maps, items, unboxing, effects from unusuals, and other stuff I really recommend this game to all players on steam and feel free to add me and put comments What you think about this game
Paintalon;-;allows you to throw christmas ornaments at people, only to beat them to death with a roll of wrapping paper, all while you're dressed as a pirate wearing a virtual reality headset who has a portal badge. i think thats all i need to say
Homeless Sandvich;-;Best game ever! Evrything is balanced and even f2p. Just awesome!
5bo.de | Casindas;-;Hats are the Gameplay... 10/10
Dittochu #Vacation;-;As promised, Heavy will now lay egg in your mouth
[Sting] Overseer;-;I love this game very addicting and fun!
Lord Urien;-;It defies all the known laws of physics
Archibald Fooster;-;I still don't have any weed.
Darkvaler;-;I don't have much to say about this game just play it. ITS FREE!!!!! ITS AWESOME!!!!! you will enjoy it.
Alinda;-;Hats are the fruits of TF2. You can wear them, trade them, craft them, collect them. There's, uh, sniper hats, soldier hats, scout hats. Medic hats, heavy hats, demo hats. There's spy hats, engineer hats, pyro hats, all-class hats, painted hats, strange hats, unusual hats, uncraftable hats, limited-quantity hats, achievement hats... that- that's about it.
[DOGS] zXPotionOfSexyXz;-;Nice game looking nice and it is awesome! You can buy something in mann co. store and get premium for trading and getting awesome items! And you find items anyways! Nice F2P and P2P game!
Jed The Jedi;-;9 Classes for a huge variety of play styles. Multicultural characters for a colourful experience. Humorous dialogue from a skilled team of voice actrors. Comical animations. Vast community influence. Constant updates and holiday events. Many game modes including tdm styles and Co-Op. This game will amuse you for hours and it is free... WHY WOULDN'T YOU GET IT?! If you want more it can give you more. If you don't want to get swept in the hype you wont be punished for it!
cuenta vendida gg wp;-;This game ruined my social, sexual and happy life. 10/10. I love it. 5 stars.
Yo home, Geri The Dank Ferret;-;I..... I cant begin to describe how i feel. what i feel is that..... Tf2 is dying. Its hard to admit. I still love it, but the telltale signs are everywhere. Youtubers leaving, and hell. Shibby is basically a freaking battlefield 4 youtuber now! Like, seriously! What did we do to force him to play the generic military shooter that has been rehashed? Tf2 was great. It still is. Its, one of the most unique and innovative games, and well, its dying. Nothing lasts forever. Tf2 has been around for 19 -ish years and theres only a certain point to something. You start with a sketch. You expand on it, draw lines all over the paper, fill in the gaps. But eventually...... Your run out of space.. I hate to see a wonderful game die. But more and more actual servers empty, and more and more people go to trade, idle and VSH servers, the game slowly kills itself. Is tf2 still the 3rd most played game? Hell yeah! But so many of those people are congaing, or bartering over unusuals, and not playing the game. Is it the communities fault? No. A poor reflection of valves contribution and what just soldified the joke that "Valve used to make games, now they make money" Is the end of the line update, a poor excuse that could have introduced something that hasnt been seen in so long- a FINISHED map. Not ing operation hole bound beta, or tile texture RD, but a real, somewhat new gamemode. But valve took it out because it was "Too confusing" They dont add weapons, only cosmetics and a ing cheap attempt to suck up money through bonus ducks. I would hate to see tf2 die, because so many people are invested. If tf2 dies, so does the market. the 10,000 dollar spender who bought the burning KE. Smissmass was okay. New weapons. Yay. But once again valve seems to be trying to please us with half finished ideas with mannpower. Theyve brought too much beta, and we the people would much rather see a finished and drawn out map rather than a  overpowered attempt at pleasing the people. I dont hate tf2. I hate whatever the cause may be for this wonderful deviation from the rehashed ing military shooters like hardline and advanced warfare. Just please, valve, as great as community effort might be, it seems like your not trying. Please make it like the good ol days where You'd introduce a polished custom map that is valve standards every update. We have enough hats and festives. we need weapons, and maps, and gamemodes, and anything but this . Just please. Ive gone through 2 game deaths in my gamer career. They were fun on the last days, moderators giving out planned items, it was amazing. but then they ended. And although you think youll be fine, you sometimes wake up and go to your computer, and open up steam only to remember that your favorite game is gone. Please, dont leave the ones who love this in the dust. Just focus on this game and give it some love
Zarbi Y;-;This is a good game, and for the CoD kids that don't know how to play this: you need team work, that's why it's called TEAM fortress 2. and not Egoistic D.I.Y. fortress 2. Well have fun :D
zhulov3rz #NeverLucky;-;The greatest hat simulator mankind has ever seen! 11/10
Numero Uno;-;This game is highly addicting with unique elements, once you pick it up - it's hard to let it go. The game is a hat-simulating game where one trades items untill he becomes the richest or untill he wants to stop, which is a hard thing to do. One can also just play the game, wether organized with websites such as tf2lobby.com or just plain community/valve servers. This game has barely any hackers, which gives off a great experience.
Spectra;-;It's a good game!One of the best 1st person shooters I have ever played
Princess Poona;-;This game ruined my life. I really should stop playing now-- Maybe after a few more hours.
celo .50cal;-;Been playing this since 2011 on friends/my pc. 2008 on lan houses :3 There is no words to describe this game of awesomeness, try new loadouts, have fun with hilarious scenes and situations, well, download and play it. Remember to always be creative, thousands of possibilities.
O G S  X L A;-;There is pornography for the spy 10/10 would pornographize again
gt.DJ kitty;-;Its a great First person to play its just a game where you can have fun every class has its pros and cons but if you know how to play that class your going to have a great time!
Bonster!;-;Playing since 2008 and still my favorite go to shoot-em-up. I've made real life friends, and had more laughs than I can count. I still play rather vanilla, but enjoy that the community can and has played such a big part in developing items and creating a wild economy within the game.
Delvillano HD;-;this game took my life 10/10 (but when you play it for a while it gets boring)
Bloody Strawberry;-;The Real FREE 2 PLAY game All things can be obtained via Dropping Systed Only thing to get via Mann Co. Store (Or trade) is Cosmetic items such as: Clothes (Hats, Misc)Mann Co. Suppy Crate KeysTour of Duty TicketMost tools item like: Team based paints or Backpack Expanders Done Game is like chess Easy to learn, hard to master NO P2W  Every weapon (Not including reskins) IS FREAKING FREE Wanna "Buy" this game, pff its just 0.10$ Also You can kill peoples with FISH Fish is love Fish is live 10 Fish cakes out of 10 Fish cakes Would *Dunno what im doing* again
Ykredfield;-;Rocket flies above your head. Fire burns the surrounding. Grenade lies over the floor(it will explode any second). Bullets spam everywhere. People running around trying to hit you. Intensely feel that you will die from 1 shot kill. Nervous and worry about backstabbing. You have no way to escape except for doing the things above. That's right. CHAOS!! One shall not simply stop! If you stop at the middle of the road, you die. If you jump, you die. You walk, you die. Yes. Every single move is towards death. All you can do is fightback! This game is extremely ENJOYABLE! What's so fun about keep dying in a game? Well, you can respawn and go for alternate way. Do this game has replay values? Of Course. You must play at your own risk, as you may get addicted to it. You get to play every classes with different tactics. Therefore, you'll experience different kind of gameplay. I'm afraid that this game will be dead and the server would be empty. Well, no worries, mate. Is Counter-Strike dead yet? No. TF2 is more fun than CS! Besides, Valve always keep this game updated with special event such as Anually Halloween Event(which is my favourite event). This game provides trade system. Trading is another fun activity you can do in TF2. Due to the massive amount of items in TF2, you can trade to get your long-wishes item! Overall, this is a comedy-filled action rpg-like multiplayer game. You will like it. I promise.
ImCindy ^_^;-;Team Fortress 2 should be considered a classic of all time! it fun and straight forward to play, always a game and people playing after all this time. You really cant go wrong playing this, whats more is its free to play. <3
Miles Prower (Anti-Verse);-;If you love warfare and taking anger out of yourself through some form of gaming, then this game is for you. If you just like some FPS, then this is also your kind of game, although if you've played Halo, COD and Battlefield, then you try this, you might not be good at it at first, but what do I know?
ded;-;TF (Trade and Fun) it's a very good game.
ded;-;TF (Trade and Fun) it's a very good game.
MajesticFatPony;-;This game is entirely pay 2 win. It's highly recommended that you drop a couple grand on this for a few unusual hats. Good game
I'M FUCKING DONE. DONE. DIE.;-;Eh, I've played it a few times. It's alright I guess.
stock;-;its bad
a fat turtle trade.tf;-;form your own opinion please people. because others pull a lot of eet so he is a recipe for a bacon sandwich, ingredients: bacon 1lb bread of your choice your favorite drink (yes this is needed) step 1: cook bacon in frying pan until it is your desired texture step 2: drink some of your drink step 3: insert some bacon into your mouth to be sure that its not poisonous step 4: place bacon between bread step 5: sit down on a nice chair and enjoy your sandwich and drink
"x";-;game and  woo
I want to see the world.;-;Yeah its a good game, played it a little. >"Little" >2000+ hrs >legit Remarks - Haven't left my seat for the past 6 months. - Spent hundreds on hats In other words, 0/10 Would not play again . 10/10 Hats are life.
Scrumpy;-;Since 2007, Gabe Newell ate through everyone's wallet. BUT HE WAS STILL HUNGRY.
Le-Lo-Du-87;-;After 2000 hours on this game, I believe I can made a correct review about it. Well, Team Fortress 2 is a free to play FPS. Unlike in some FPS, being a great killer is not always the key to sucess. Indeed, teamwork often beats singlework even if this singlework team is made of real good players. 9 differents classes with their pros and their cons. Some classes can be hard for beginners, for example spy. However, some are easy for them. A good point is that each class, even if it seems to be easy to play at first, can be really effective after some training. There are a lot of weapons,most of which are balanced (Some are not though). I would say there're many ways to waste your money with this game, but if you're clever enough, it's possible to have fun without spending too much money (Mainly to get the prenium pack, nothing more). The lastest update and Mann up need money to be played (Well, you can buy mann up tickets on market). Nevertheless, you can play a similar gamemode which is free, except rewards. Since it's a rather old game, there are a lot of custom gamemodes and maps which can enhance your gaming experience. The amount of maps and gamemodes is very high, which prevents you from getting bored in this game. Even after spending 2000 hours, I'm still having fun. Community however can be an annoyance. Some preniums players act very badly with beginners, and show off how they spend their money (You know, they think paying tons of money on a game will make you strong and skillfull, prff). On an other hand, there are some servers where you need to pay in order to win and Valve servers where teamwork is almost impossible since beginners think they're in a singlework game. A pro tip : Don't wear Gibus hat if you don't want to get mocked. In the end, I would like say that this game worth a try. You may not like it, but I rather think you'll enjoy it if you're a FPS and teamwork player. The game is kind of old, but is not dead yet (And the cartoon graphics ire ok). Also, be carefull of trading madness, some players and of excessive money spending.
Your own human life sized meme;-;one of the most boring games i've ever played. i know i've only played for a short time, but it was enough for me to realize this game is garbage.
Tonata;-;No COD players alowed. It will spookify you. It is also named Dance Dacnce Fortress 2. It has Conga. 11/10. Give all money to Gaben.
E.E.;-;I just wanted to thank the dark lord for making me sell all of my stuff and cash out long before TF2:GO happened.
Maniac :>;-;IS THIS THE CSGO REVIEW LIST?
i gave santa a lap dance;-;This game is basically a hat simulator, it's economy is just a smaller scale of ours and each update adds more hats so Gabe can swim in $$$ all night long. Also you have to spam lenny faces
Toroi;-;My hours. help. I wrote something for real! These hours are legit, I played this game a lot in the past to avoid some tragic stuff in real life. I was young and didn't really have my gaming consoles anymore because of my brothers and I had a really bad pc, which i still own. TF2 was one of the games i could play pretty well on this pc but with horrid graphics, but it was one of the more fun games I installed. I met some real cool and nice people on this game as well as people who i plan to keep by my side. The community back then was more humble compared to nowadays. You have competitive gamers who spam their bind keys with unfunny/gross jokes and very obnoxious people who are either yelling at you or telling you to do specific things to win the game. When really, it doesn't even matter if you win or lose. However, you also have those people who are really awesome and you may meet some nice friends along the way! Although you never know what kinda person you're going to meet on this game. In my honest opinion, if you want to have a game to just waste time on (and money) or just mess around with people you know (which is what I do now), this is perfect. Esspecially the mann vs. machine co-op. I mainly play that now. Although to me, the game lost its touch, update wise, and I moved onto other games. I believe it's worth a shot to try it out but other than that, I'd keep it as a casual game. I don't think the competitive scene is worth getting into anymore because it's being flooded by crude people. Atleast from my experiance after over about 4+ years of playing it just got worse and worse. You will eventually be tied into drama even if you try to avoid it. You'll be more stressed than actually having fun, I'll tell you that! Although in all seriousness, this game is losing its touch and probably isn't worth making it your main game MAINLY because the updates they've been releasing are becoming very dull and not as great as they used to be. BUT, it's a great game to just play to pass the time and have fun! All you'll really notice nowdays is...people really love to trade more than actually play. Living off as a free to play would be very tough and you'd need to be patient with items you would want, unless you got that MONEY! Hope this helps. One last thing, I am not saying this game is bad in any way. I am saying that it's worth trying and playing with friends, or even meeting people! Although there are some downsides that you won't like, such as some stuff I pointed out above. Strictly towards the community. I personally think you should have this game as a side game rather than your come home to play sorta thing. Have it as a once in a while game, because it's nothing to be big about, unless you really do not like most of the millions of other games out there. Just give it a shot and see what you think! Have fun <3
Vale;-;Can you name any other unmodded First Person Shooter that lets you play as a cocky and fast Bostonian that can slap the hell out of urine throwing Australian campers with a fresh atlantic fish wrapped in fine christmas lights, eat a bucket of fried proccessed poultry over their corpses, and then get hit with an exploding cannonball launched from an African-Celtic one eyed alcoholic who can leap yards into the air from his own explosives while weilding a mystic ancient talking ghost claymore? I thought so.
A bLuE cOw;-;If you bind forward to a button on your mouse, you can play pyro and eat at the same time
UnfunnyName;-;The vicious cycle of Team fortress 2 First when you'll arrive in the game, you'll want Weapons, tons of them. Then you'll see that everyone has hats, and you'll want these, a tons of them. Then you'll realize that hats doesn't matter, only skill count, so you'll want a lot of skills, tons of them. Then new weapons will be added, and you'll want them, all of them. Then a new hat will be added and you'll want it, cause it'll be fancy on your main class. Then you'll realize again, that you don't give a damn about hats, all is about is skill. Then when you have waited for 3 years, new weapons will be added, and you'll want them. And then you realize that you spent like 2000 hours of your life for this, met great friends, and you'll have a server where's you feeling like home, and you discovered so much things via the community, it learnt you so much. Then the rude reality of life, bring you on earth, and this game is here, Waiting for you to play 1,2,3... hours, and you'll be happy to see that all your good friend are still here.
[CotC] King Conga Gandhi;-;Oh, and if you're wondering, the new update, Gun Mettle, did NOT ruin TF2 for me. I actually find it a LOT more fun now! I think Jerma summed up this game pretty nicely... "Maybe you got like two Pyros that just installed the game ten minutes ago. They don't have any hats, they're spraying  and they're having a blast. They might even be at the wrong point. They might be going backwards to the point that's already been capped. On the same team, there's a Scout with a Hale's Own Scattergun. He's got 18 kills with a 17 killstreak, he just got 18. He's going 'I just got 18, sick!' He runs up the stairs, he's trying his  off. He's get *beeping noises* dodging the 'Oh, the sentry almost got me!' He looks up to his left when he gets up the stairs on Gorge and there's two sandwich Heavies having a ing picnic. So he stops for a second and goes, 'Two... nnnggh!' so he walks forward and gets blown up by a soldier's rocket next door... ...The two sandwich Heavies then decide to move their picnic. There's ants. 'There's ants here, honey. I wanna get out of here.' So they get up, they pack their sandwiches, pack up their lunches, and their breakfast, and whatever the  they're eating. They get up and walk toward the door to go to RED because they think, 'That spot near the A point for RED is pretty good.' They walk out the door, and they see four Level 3 Sentry Guns pointing at them. They get shot a million times and blow up, and there's like nine Engineers swinging their wrenches in random directions. The BLU Scout, at this point, respawns, and walks by the at least 3-4 statues because we all know there's four people AFK when you play this game, you go by the museum of people standing still. He walks out the door and readies his weapon, he's ready, 'I'm going to get another 20 killstreak, just you watch Gaben, I'm going to praise Gaben!' And he goes forward and starts shooting, and he gets backstabbed by a Spy that has been sitting with the Cloak and Dagger in the corner for at least the last 68 seconds." Normally when I do reviews, I turn into a critic and start to examine that game, pointing out every little flaw and pro and determining a final score. However, Team Fortress 2 (or TF2 for short) helped me make so many memories that if I actually tried to make a fair review on it, it would still be way too biased to consider a valid review. Team Fortress 2, is, obviously, an amazing game. The teamplay is necessary and going out and attacking solo may be difficult. You need teammates in order to survive and win. The graphics are unique to a shooter game and really makes it a special game. I'm not here to explain the gameplay or graphics or whatnot. I love this game because of its charm. The game has such a unique and diverse cast of characters, you can't help to love all of them at some point. Scout is cocky and overconfident. Spy, another one of the characters in the game, is technically Scout's father. Soldier is a crazed WWII American patriot. He never actually joined the Army, but instead, he had his own personal Nazi killing spree. His roommate was a magician named Merasmus, who grew to hate Soldier. Pyro is mysterious, but portrays the world as one big happy paradise, known as Pyroland. Demoman is a Scottish alcoholic who, due to Merasmus, lost his eye that is now haunted. Heavy, although he appears to be dim-witted, is actually very intelligent and looks over three sisters. Engineer is very intelligent as well, and his grandfather was a major contributor to keeping the war with RED and BLU continue. Medic isn't fond of normal forms of medicine, but is still an important member nonetheless. Sniper is from New Zealand, but was raised in Australia. He prefers working from a distance and his backstory is very similar to Superman's. Spy is the master of disguise, and is technically Scout's father, as said before. Of all the characters, he appears to be the most "mature" and appears to be the ringleader at many times. Not only that, but the game has an interesting story. I would not like to get too detailed with it. However, it makes little to no sense but is still funny, engaging, and gives TF2 much more depth. There is also a storyline that takes place a few years later where Mann Co. is being attacked, so the mercenaries have to defend it, called Mann vs. Machine. This game mode ties in with the TF comics, which explain many characters' backstories and is currently still in the works as of this review. The other comics (all of which can be found on TF2's official website) are all funny and charming in their own way as well. The community has been quite debatable on how nice it is at many times, but in the end, it's still an overall great community. I've seen people give out stuff, others mentor some of the newbs (something I do as well) along with much, much more. Yes. the game is considered a "pay-to-win game" but it isn't necessarily a pay-to-win game. With lots of patience, you will get what you want from the game, whether it be hats, weapons, or whatever it is you want. The game has a learning curve that isn't too steep, but become dedicated and you'll fall in love with it. No matter how many times you rage to a W+M1 pyro that destroyed your 16 killstreak, or cheer when you unbox an Unusual, or maybe discover a few friends or learn a few things, Team Fortress 2 has been a huge part of my PC gaming life and without it, I would be as bored as hell. I cannot recommend this game enough, and I hope that many more memories are made on here. Valve may be cash cows, but you can't help but admit they are amazing when it comes to making games. Portal, Half-Life 2, Counter-Strike, but this game stands out from the rest to me. Do I recommend this game? Yes, yes, yes, YES.
Nerd House;-;Team Fortress 2. Being ranked as the third most-played game [steamcharts.com] on Steam, Team Fortress 2 is probably one of the best free-to-play games we've got. Why is it so popular? Let's take a look, shall we? First off, the obvious: It's free. 100% free. This means its accessible to everyone on Steam. This is just the icing on the cake though. What really shines about TF2 is the game itself. Team Fortress 2 usually consists of two teams (Red and Blue) going head to head against each other. Sometimes fulfilling certain objectives or just downright killing each other. There are many, many maps and modes, such as Payload, Capture Points, and Mann VS Machine. But the general idea no matter the map or mode is to KILL EVERYTHING THAT MOVES! And my god, is it fun to do so. The game has 9 playable mercenaries, each actually being a certain "class". Each class is divided into 3 different roles: Offense, Defense, and Support. Let's go over each role and class. Offensive roles specialize in dealing damage to the opposing team. These are your main attack force. Scouts are the speedy hit and run class, with the ability to double or even triple jump depending on equipped items. Soldiers pack a bit more firepower with their rocket launchers, which gives them not only power, but mobility due to the ability known as "rocket jumping". The Pyro is great at setting the opposition on fire, as well as extinguishing burning teammates using an airblast. Defensive roles serve to inhibit enemy access and to hold enemies back from vital points on the map. Overall, the defensive group has the most firepower of all the groups. Demomen can safeguard areas with stickybombs that they can detonate when enemies come by. Heavies are great for mowing down incoming troops and pushing back forces. Heavies can also keep enemies in an area while whittling their health for teammates to finish off. Engineers can build Sentry Guns for effective area defense, as well as build Teleporters and Dispensers for logistical support of the team. Support classes cannot hold the fight on their own, but their specialized abilities can tip the balance in their team's favor. They offer the offensive and defensive classes an extra edge in battle and can help turn the tide of the game. Whether crippling the enemy advance from behind or keeping teammates healed, the support classes are always handy to have around. Medics are the team healers, capable of providing numerous buffs depending on their equipments. Spies are great for sneak attacks or eiliminating key threats. Snipers excel at long range, also eliminating key threats, as well as extinguishing burning teammates with jarate and providing a damage boost to teammates. Next, let's look at the presentation. TF2 has a very unqiue art style. It's somewhat cartoonish, but very appealing. It's simple, and un-complex. But it doesn't need to be complex. It's simplicity is it's strength. Everything is detailed enough to where you can easily tell whats going on, what a specific model or item is, and they all stand out. The soundtrack is also very appealing and catchy, especially the main theme. I personally have it as a ringtone/alarm tone on my smartphone! :) One of the best aspects of TF2 is the Steam Workshop. Users can submit designs for items and weapons, and possibly have them added to the game! A very lucrative sub-market has also emerged from this game in the form of the Crate Keys. That's a whole different ballgame in and of itself, so we won't get into it here. During normal gameplay on most servers, you can obtain random items, weapons, and sometimes crates, and taunts....through the item drops system. You can only receive so many drops per week, and you will get them randomly as you play. You can use these items and weapons to customise your mercenary's loadout, or you can use them to craft other items, hats, and weapons. You can take multiples of items and craft them into Scrap, then Reclaimed Metal, then Refined Metal. You can then use these metals to craft specific class weapons/items, among other things. The crafting system is simple yet robust, with lots of possiblities. Some of it is very luck based. You can take some very common items and end up crafting a super rare hat or gun worth a lot of moolah on the Steam Market! All-in-all, Team Fortress 2 is just a very fun game. Endless entertainment awaits when you start up this game, especially if you play with friends on your favorite server. Probably the best free-to-play game on Steam. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=383235670 Highly Recommended Be sure to check out Nerd House Gaming for more reviews!
Mr Squiggles;-;How to play Team Fortress 2: Be polite, Be efficient, Have a pan to kill everyone you meet.
pacsomepuppes;-;> I was only 10 years old. > I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. > I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. > Then I got my first hat, The gibus. > Suddenly everything changed. > I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' > I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. > I had so many hats, I loved them all. > But then someone traded me, I accepted. > They offered an Unusual for all my hats. > It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. > But no Unusual, He scammed me. > I lost it all. > I was so sad I cried for hours. > Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. > I went to bed after praying. > I felt warm. > I looked behind me, It was Gaben! > He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning Team Captain. > Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning Team Captain and I was naked. > I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. > Hats are love. Hats are life. TF2: 11/10 Best hat simulator 1981 Overall, I'd give this game 9 out of 10 Gabe Narwalls Shoutout to ObsidianObelisk17 for making a youtube vid of this Showout to TheDisableBore for making a comic of this I cringe re reading this :smug:
Flexi;-;Ruined my life and cost me over 500. 10/10 would recommend to friends and family
Special;-;Team Fortress 2 is the most realistic hat simulator created to date. There is absolutely no other simulator quite like this one. The first time you start the simulator, you join a server where you can play a minigame where you show off your hats and items. If you kill a person three times in a row in the minigame, you get your very first hat: the Gibus. This is where it really starts; To play the simulator correctly, you have to spend money in the market place, made by Valve. After that, while you play the minigame, you can find hats which you can trade for, or collect! There is many other people who wants to collect and trade hats, just like you! After you collect enough items and/or hats, try joining a trade server! There, the REAL fun begins! Good luck, and beware of ending up poor!
prstg sun.set :>;-;Best game ever. Ruin my life.
FISH KILL;-;Team Fortress 2. A great game believe it or not, and the best part...it's free. Now just because it's free don't think it'll be some crappy game that's insanely pay to win, because it's not. It uses a great F2P model (that was around 8 months before the game even went F2P). The model the game uses is that everything you buy is purely cosmetic, and the weapons you can buy from the mann co store, everyone else including you can find and craft ingame. The game has many things to offer, hell the game is 7 years old and has 7 years of great content in the game. Between the hundreds of hats and weapons in the game, you can literally customize your loadout to be completely different than other players. The game has 9 playable classes: Scout, Soldier, Pyro, Demoman, Heavy, Engineer, Medic, Sniper, and Spy. I know, the class names sound generic as hell, but anyways. The classes are broken down into three tiers. Offensive, Defensive, and Support. Scout, Soldier, and Pyro being offensive. Demo, Heavy, and Engineer being defensive, and Medic, Sniper, and Spy being support. Of course that doesn't mean that you can't play any of the classes differently. If you want to be an offensive sniper then you can do that, just use the huntsman. If you want to be a defensive demo then sit back and place sticky traps. Scout: Fast, agile, can double jump and get in and do serious damage and get away easily. Soldier: Slower, deals great damage with his rocket launcher and shotgun, can rocket jump to higher ground. Pyro: Pretty high health, can ambush with his flamethrowers and cause havoc. Demoman: Can place sticky traps, charge at you with huge f*cking swords, and simply p*ss you off. Heavy: Highest health count (300), slowest class, huge minigun to tear through people. Engineer: Same health as a scout, can build sentry guns to defend areas of the map, heal teammates and give ammo with dispensers and teleport teammates closer to battle with his teleporters. Medic: Very useful, can heal teammates and overheal them and upon full uber can make said person being healed including hisself invincible for a short period of time. Sniper: Can take out classes from long distances, same health as scout, pretty easy class. Spy: Same health as scout, can disguise as teammates AND enemy players, also can sap engineers buildings to destroy them, and can cloak to get away silently. I just described the classes in their vanilla form, there are literally thousands of ways to customize your classes to change their playstyles and it's amazing. Game Modes Team Fortress 2 has tons of gamemodes to play, and their are community made gamemodes and maps. Modes: Capture The Flag (ctf), Capture Point (cp), King Of The Hill (koth), Payload (pl), Payload Race (plr), territorial (basically cp, but slightly different), Special Delivery (SD), Mann Vs Machine (mvm), and Robot Destruction (map currently in beta, BUT you can play it) CTF and CP pretty much describe themselves for you, however the other modes are different and I will explain them. King Of The Hill: Hold a capture point for 3 minutes to win. Payload: Red has to stop Blu from pushing the cart to the objective and winning. Payload Race: Both teams have carts to push to an objective and have to stop the other team from capping at the same time. Territorial: Basically CP expect the map is divided into different sections. The map unlocks by whichever team caps first. Special Delivery: Basically like Capture The Flag, but you're delivering a package of Australium to a rocket. Mann Vs Machine: Horde mode, also Mann Up mode can give you awesome rare loot. Robot Destruction: Both teams work to get a certain amount of points by killng enemy teams robots or by stealing the others teams points from their vault and returning it to their own vault. Maps I'm not going into great detail with the maps, simply because there's way too many to just list off, but all the maps have a way different feel and are all pretty damn amazing besides Steel and Hydro. Team Fortress 2 in all honesty is a very good game, I've spent a lot of time on this game (over 2000 hours) in the past 4 going on 5 years I've owned it. Really you can't go wrong with this game. Just download it and give it a shot. It's pretty f*cking amazing. Rate: 9/10
MEUSHI;-;this is a bad  game
Enigma;-;Hat hathat 2
Lids;-;game full of bronies, autistic traders, literal children and mentally ill people that play dress up with 3D virtual pixels that are somehow worth real money
ixron;-;This game will make lightning shoot out of your pee hole. You like shooting people? You can make someones head explode!! Nine classes each with their own way to make someone bleed. Dont like shooting people? You can become a virtual haberdasher and get eRich from selling the  out of hats and accessories. Playing this game will make your  day turn on its back side and beg for the D. (Domination for you noob F2Ps.) Play this game today, or dont, Im not your dad.
=PIC= Happy =$H$=;-;Team Fortress 2: I played it about 2.377 hours so I guess I can judge about how good/bad Team Fortress 2 acutally is. I really like the trade system, hats with different qualities etc. but I guess for new players it's quite hard to get into the game. If you want to play a game for fun reasons and chilling on some nice customized maps Team Fortress 2 is the game you need. Do you want to play serious and show everybody how good you are? Play Competitive. It's really amazing and you can always learn. Do you want to spend (much) money in the game, buy good-looking items and trade? Buy some keys and get started with your great trading career! All this describes Team Fortress 2. From Fun servers where everybody doing taunts to serious gameplays with money as a reward and as well trading high-quality items. Get Team Fortress 2 for a mixture of fun, competitive spirits and trading success. 10/10 for one of my favorite games!
3,4-methyleendioxymethamfetamine;-;The only games that makes me spend money on something that grants me a 1% chance of getting hats that are on fire
Sentient Spaghetti | Back 22nd;-;has ruined my life. 10/10. Some mercs are RED, Some mercs are BLU, I've spent too much on this game, Hats.
A_StateOfTrance;-;I absolutely love this game! I've had endless amounts of fun and the pyro amuses me massively :3 you can experience all kinds of fun in any type of game play!
pula;-;The balance and fun of this game is unbeatable. Who can resist it?
Marthu-is-waifu-for-laifu~;-;LIST O' TEH IMPORTANT THINGZ -HATZ -Exclusive itemz AKA teh pan -fishies :3 -PSHHH WEAPONZ ;3 being friendlies get you killed :3
Enigma;-;Hat hathat 2
Georgi Zups [RB];-;Almost every time i get bored of it, no matter what i find myself coming back to it. Yes, tf2 the game. Its good, awsome stupidly fun and has alot of things to do and comeplete! So to sum it up, iz a gud'in so install this. BTW ITS FREAKIN FREE AND THERE ARE FANCY HATS
Krysumoar;-;Mmmm.....hats......australliums.......I WANT THEM ALL.
[APG]Xander Hytch;-;This game defines the Free-To-Play genre .It should be by all means the standard go-to example for any game developer out there that aims to make a Free-To-Play game and profit from it . In any case...the actual review : The aesthetics in this game are greatly done and the colour pallet is so carefully picked that it creates a unique if not beautiful visual experience. The music really immerses you in the kind of atmosphere the game tries to offer The gameplay itself is great and it covers any kind of play style you could possibly ask for with the nine classes : the Scout for fast passed shooting , the soldier for tough all purpose defence/offence play style , the Pyro for close range ambushing kind of play style , the Demoman for the indirect play style ,the Heavy for all-out-offence reckless players,The Engineer for strategists , the Medic for the laid back defensive players (though it can be an efficient offensive class too), the Sniper for picking off key targets from great distances and finally the Spy which gives a unique stealthy gameplay to this First Person Shooter . The huge pool of weapons that exist and are still coming for each of the nine classes makes it all the more interesting and fun .With all the possible combinations of loadouts you simply can not get bored of this game. There are numerous classic game modes like King of The Hill , Capture The Flag , Control Point and Arena to name a few but the game has a lot of unique and fun game modes like Mann vs Machine (essentially a swarm game mode) and Special Delivery. There is a lot of content done by the comunity like cosmetic items and very well done maps that encourage exploration and have multiple ways of tackling a challenge . Putting all these aside the game is very welcoming to new players and very rewarding plus with the implemented weapon drop system you can essentially experience everything the game has to offer without paying a single cent By all means it isn't perfect but it strives to be and that makes it great . Over all awesome game ,I passionately recommend it !
Abraxas;-;This game will steal all your money and ruin your life. From experience, I have clocked in over 1600 hours and spent over $100 dollars on this game. I don't even play it anymore. 10/10
Taygete;-;Team Fortress 2 Two opposing camps and try to conquer territory or those of others to steal documents. This is not a big map, while the action is concentrated on a fairly small area and never on its own base line of the war you do not have to far. So little could be described as a system deathmatchov turmoil with very rigid constraints that determine the characteristics of the characters. Each of the nine occupations is completely different and presents a specific approach to playing. They pick all - born attacker reaches for ultra fast Scout , Soldier balanced with a rocket launcher or a flamethrower armed Pyro . Defenders choose your favorite HeavyGuy with oversized gun, a rogue Demoman with a grenade launcher, and on the walls fireable-holding mines. The third option is astute Engineer who can build a teleport station complementary health and ammo (Dispenser) or fatal loophole after the third upgrade capable of firing missiles. The last group of occupations will appeal especially calmer nature that play for the team and not rushing to the front line. They have a choice of Medic with its inexhaustible source of health and the occasional immortal effect. Of course not miss Sniper , whose professional look me after every execution can inflame red. And finally, virtually invisible Spy , who are attacking from a backup in disguise. Maps The basic package includes six maps, which is quite a few. On the other hand, all radically different and shortly after the release occurred fan creations. The classic is the already mentioned 2fort, which will again become the most played of all - you know it from the trailers. There's no guaranteed recipe for victory and hardly anyone will be surprised by the unusual strategy. Dustbowl is a map of conquest points. One team defends, the other attacks. When you have some place you can not lose him and immediately move forward to conquer the next space. Thus, working through progressively up to six stations. The map is definitely interesting and the best part is the determination with which resists defending team at the last point. Has never happened to me that I would not much help the team conquered. Any negatives? It is very difficult to me to Team Fortress 2 find any bug. Aside sobs veterans who lack the ability grenades or enemy Medic poison injection. To them and to all who come simple concept, is intended as modifications to Fortress Forever Half-Life 2. Otherwise TF2 but perfectly balanced mix between complex for discerning players and also the accessibility to a wide audience. Enjoy Game CZ/SK/ENG etc.
=PIC= Happy =$H$=;-;Team Fortress 2: I played it about 2.377 hours so I guess I can judge about how good/bad Team Fortress 2 acutally is. I really like the trade system, hats with different qualities etc. but I guess for new players it's quite hard to get into the game. If you want to play a game for fun reasons and chilling on some nice customized maps Team Fortress 2 is the game you need. Do you want to play serious and show everybody how good you are? Play Competitive. It's really amazing and you can always learn. Do you want to spend (much) money in the game, buy good-looking items and trade? Buy some keys and get started with your great trading career! All this describes Team Fortress 2. From Fun servers where everybody doing taunts to serious gameplays with money as a reward and as well trading high-quality items. Get Team Fortress 2 for a mixture of fun, competitive spirits and trading success. 10/10 for one of my favorite games!
Mathew;-;Best game ever to play for free. I played the Xbox version and fell in love with it then I moved to PC and found there was more things to do and get. By far the best Free to Play game in my opinion.
Soundpulse;-;Team Fortress 2 is the sequel to Team Fortress Classic. It was included in the Orange Box, along with Half-Life 2, Half-Life 2 Episode 1, Half-Life 2 Episode 2, and Portal. It was released in 2007, running on the Source Engine. It's a class-based FPS that relies on teamwork. For Offense, there is Scout, Soldier, and Pyro. Defense has Demoman, Heavy, and Engineer. Support has Medic, Sniper, and Spy. Pros: -The quite cartoony graphics make it unique. It brings a new feel to the Source Engine, and it does well. -There are no overpowered classes. Everything is balanced. Each class is made to counter each other. -Unlike TFC, there is music in the game. -Tons of gamemodes and maps, including custom ones. -The gameplay has improved since TFC. Airblast, Ubercharge, etc. -Constant updates. -Unlike TFC, there are extra weapons. Each weapon is made for certain situations. -Hats. Cons: -Music only plays during the title screen or class select screen. -The community can be pretty bad. The amount of naked pony sprays explain a lot. -Too many trade/achievement servers. -Updates never seem to be tested, and each bug fix brings at least 2 more bugs. 7.5/10
BUTTER MILK ._.;-;Ruined my life 10/10
[-V.E.X-] Saekyo;-;Shoot at feet. Boom boom. EZ killstreak. Spam stickies while holding right click. Boom boom. EZ killstreak. Machina bodyshot everything. Blam. EZ killstreak. Mini sentries. Beep beep. EZ killstreak. Shoot everything with minigun. YATATATATATATATATATA. EZ killstreak. WM1. EZ killstreak. Heal the heavy. EZ assist killstreak/dominations. Spam double jump. Get aimbot. EZ killstreak. Spy=3l33t5me D:
Segfo #groundedfor1week;-;I have wasted 200+ on this game 10/10
Gamer3214;-;Well... It's free to play. Might as well download it. But seriously, one of my top 5 favorite FPS games!
Iggy;-;A great game ruined by being made F2p. It went from a great example of how class-based teamwork is a great thing to a bunch of idiots going around flaunting stupid hats and overpriced taunts. I just played a game of MVM where instead of preparing for the match, they spent the whole preparation period dancing a  conga dance. Every few months I forget why I quit playing this game and it only takes half an hour to remind me. In 2008, I would have suggested this game to everyone. Today? Not a chance.
Shorty;-;Team Fortress 2 used to be so much fun, hence my hours played. Then with a combination of Free-to-Play, micro transaction , and hats becoming more important, AND more frequently added than new weapons, this game became one of the worst experiences a player can have. Not the mention the spawn of so many dumb internet memes that mouth-breathing fans of this game just can't get enough of. A personal complaint of mine is the lack of any highlander or 6v6 matchmaking, but that isn't for everyone. If you want a great experience, pick up Team Fortress Classic or Quake World Team Fortress.
A-Aron;-;Steam's bread and butter.
LASAGNE;-;Bought this game with the orange box before it became F2P and has to be one of the best multiplayer games I have ever played. Would recomend it to any gamer!
Fancy, Schmancy!;-;Hurl jars of . Slap people with mackerels. Put on a silly hat and conga into gunfire. Just your everyday, run-of-the-mill FPS, really.
Kylerb888;-;Hats, and congaing. That's all.
xXUltimateDragonXx;-;Very Fun highly recommend!
..:Cheshie.:*;-;Hats. hats and more silly hats! But on a serious note, this is the best designed shooter this far. Unique characters and playful color scheme makes it easy on the eyes, yet has some skill level one needs to gain not to get murdered over and over again.
Sardonyx;-;I hate this game so much 10/10 I play it every day.
SohirToZorio;-;Team fortress 2, a game that removes all of my stress. Team fortress 2 is a game that is as great as the portress. You play on various maps, no matter what I always find it hilarious. You play as one of 9 mercenaries from different countries, on each map there is no gap, designed tactically so that every class can be able to kick some  equally. If you want you can go scout, to double jump about. With high speed, to fight hard with good dodging, and making them bleed! You can distract a sentry with a chug of bonk from another entry and with one konk from a mate that sentries fate is decided. Or grab the intel and run like hell has broken out in the area for fun. If scout is annoying and you want someone with a louder shout, you could go soldier the man who is as scary as a boulder, armed with a rocket launcher the results are grandly stauncher! You have multiple banners an trumpets, each with different manners of effect to protect your allies, or boost them to the enemies roost. Or if you're bored, get out a shovel and pulverize the enemy like they've been hiding in a hovel. But if you want to be a drunken scott, you certainly can and its as fun as being shocked by 1000 electrical watts! You fight with a grenade launcher and a bottle, or a blade if you want to add onto the throttle. Pull out the eyelander and charge'n'targe to pander to your sick barge. Fight your best to destroy whatever pest is attempting to melee fight, because clearly they weren't that bright to fight a drunken man who can stomp you like a tin can. Or if you want to dawn a gas mask for my favourite class, the pyro spewing fire to change enemy attire into ash, while you laugh and dash in to smash their heads with an axe. A psychopath who doesn't hesitate to unleash his wrath upon the map. Charred and scarred bodies in burning coal mines, which is probably costly in fines. But with flare in hand do you dare to land a critical strike, and extinguish your cohorts while they're burning like a shrike. Or to easily kill a tankier enemy just become a , with the sniper a foot blowing heads open from the root, of where you stand which I find very grand. The satisfaction from their reaction and watching the brain matter patter to the ground. You have a smg and a shield to help protect you in the field, but if thats not enough you got a machete for when things get tough. Or if you're normal you can be very formal, with jarate in a jar you chuck from far soaking the enemies in urine. Better yet do not fret, pick up a minigun and have a lot of fun. Mowing down the opposition with destructive suppression, enjoying a sandvich whenever you find yourself cornered in a ditch. Though it'd be wise to use it to help heal allies, cooperation is a major key to the enemies destruction. But if angry, break out a tangy steak, and go break an enemys face with your fist, each hit spilling so much blood like a huge mist. Or to become near immortal and quite vital to your teams survival, you could become the medic an interesting pick. You stay close to the group not wanting to stray, with a medigun in hand you run with your crew to ruin the enemy like a bad bowl of stew. With an ubercharge you make a huge barge. Critical strikes or ubercharges for real, which are very analytical when they deal true damage. If cornered don't get bothered get your ubersaw out and cut the enemy like a cat paw, use a crossbow when you need to allow for long range heal. A medical vow which Is very high brow, to do no harm but I laugh while making a human limb farm. If camping is what you prefer pardner, than look for farther. Be smarter and barter with sentries a lot of kills which fills my heart, watching so many die to my sentries like pennies on the sidewalk. You can help your cohorts with some teleports, teleporters ready to help steady the fight on the front which I'll be quite blunt, is wasted often because someone became somewhat too soften. Building them five steps away from spawn, a major thrive to a  swan. To aid the fight an supply the braid of the team, a dispenser can help condenser the teams health. But again it is wasted like a pasted chain, kept mostly beside the sentry to guard an entry instead of make a fight quite tight. But if its a bore grab a mini sentry and even the score, get in on the combat being as threatening as a gnat. But if you want to be subtle like a cuttle, pick up a watch and attempt to botch the enemys defenses, forcing them to hesitate their offenses. Disguise yourself and chastise the enemy for trusting you, before busting their spine with a fine knife to the back. Go through an odd entry, and sap the engies sentry. When he charges aim your ambassador, like a bally matador and headshot them right on the spot. Before cloaking away to enjoy more smoking while choking the tactics of the enemy. Gameplay is far from all but lets stray to a plot, which is quite an unexpected clot. It's very comedic like my relation to a Hasidic, in the form of comics on their website which are very great to some peoples plight, and I enjoy whatever they write, the fact the plot is good is an extra to be stacked on the many pact reasons to love it. The characters are just perfect like a group of barristers. And with trading that is never fading, you can get other material like games an such which I love a bunch, without it I don't doubt I'd have no bout with any other games to play. That aside I play it competitive as well I find it hard to get repetitive. To drop the rhyme for a moment, I have to be honest. Without this game, I'd of been bored so often. And I've met some of the greatest people, and my best friends through this game. No matter what I will love this game, I may have arrived late to the party only joining a few years ago, but I will always be happy to be a part of the team fortress 2 community. Otherwise can recommend.
Wubsilicious;-;Well, there's hats, there's guns, there's swords, there's (literally). There's burning hats(literally burning). More hats Shirts, pants, and hats. Did I mention hats?
Peerie Pepper Tins;-;I can be sniper heavy! "Your whole body is going to be a lumpy. red. mist!" - Snipavy
BlacKy;-;"Do they make those shirts for men!?" 11/10
Marthu-is-waifu-for-laifu~;-;LIST O' TEH IMPORTANT THINGZ -HATZ -Exclusive itemz AKA teh pan -fishies :3 -PSHHH WEAPONZ ;3 being friendlies get you killed :3
Minion;-;I honestly don't know what you're still doing here.... go play TF2 now, right now..... Why are you still readin' !? was i not clear enough? well what are you waitng for?
dog hello;-;i suck at it but i have hats
Fluffybutt, DDS;-;I love this game, it's so much fun.
Miss Sweeti;-;Basically how this game works: 1. You buy a hat with real money 2. You get a hat 3. You sell a hat 4. You buy a hat 5. Repeat steps 3 and 4 until you get bored, or, more likely, die.
Kinguin .| Mylez |.;-;Funny game and well wroth playing in short just completing somethign to lvl up my Steam Account c:
JDO #SpyForOneDay;-;As of writing this, it has been one year to the day that I started playing tf2, I thought it appropriate to finally write a review on this wonderful game, as a mile stone of sorts. In one years time, I've accumulated a little more than 3,000 hours. More time than I have sunk into any other game so far. The re-playability of this game is something you rarely see in an average First Person Shooter, and its charm is something that has kept its fanbase happy since the games release in 2007. Some of the things that set this game apart from its rivals is its unique brand of humor, and its beautiful art style. In interviews with the games creators, it was explained that in development, they drew heavily from the art style of beloved American illustrator, Norman Rockwell. In this well thought out game, there are 9 classes to choose from, each with their own unique weapon arsenal, strengths and weaknesses, and personality. Scout, soldier, pyro, demo, heavy, engineer, medic, sniper, and spy. Scout being a very frail, fast class with burst damage output at close range, he can also capture control 2 times as fast as the other classes. Soldier having balanced health and mobility, comfortably played in all situations. pyro being of lesser health, and balanced speed, allowing him to flank enemies and ambush them. Demo man with overwhelming damage output, lesser speed, and a fair amount of health. Heavy being the bullet sponge of the game, massive health, slow movement speed, and decent damage output. Engineer with the ability to construct buildings that will help allies, and hinder enemies with area denial. Medic being able to heal team mates back up to full health, sending them back into a fight. Sniper having the devastating ability to pick off enemies from a distance, but having the disadvantage of low health, and normal speed. And lastly the spy, able to become invisible, disguise as enemies, and one hit kill anyone, with the major disadvantage of low health, and close range combat. When it comes to gameplay, this game is about as balanced as it gets. You start out the game already owning all the best weapons, and you slowly earn, or randomly receive items with different stats, better in one area, worse in another. The fact that everyone is given the most balanced weapons from the start, make this a game heavily based around skill. The hilarity of slapping someone with a fish, a ham, or a frying pan make the game enjoyable for more casual players, where as the mix of good art style, balanced weapons, and numerous tournament modes make it enjoyable for more serious players. On the topic of serious game play, there are competitive gaming leagues from all over the world hosting tf2 tournaments and events. All with special objectives, rule sets, and banned item lists, making the outcome of each game different. There are several divisions of skill, so even the best have something to work toward. The economy of the game is something that has a controversy surrounding it. Although this games target audience is mature, young adults, several children find there way in. With so many children actively participating in a global scale open economy, it can lead to unbalances, unfortunate, and sometimes hilarious circumstances. Hats are what make the TF2 economy go around, everyone wants to find a hat that showcases exactly what they want their character to represent. Finding just the right hat, with just the right color, and possibly a special particle effect, can be rather expensive, making most people pour more money into pixelated headwear than is reasonable. In the end, this is the most interesting, quirky, an beautiful game I have ever had the pleasure of playing. I recommend it to any gamer, and will continue to enjoy its charm for years to come.
Mr. Weapons Guy;-;I like this game.
Detective Dank;-;Very child friendly. I would reccomend this game to friends and family of all ages! My toddler absolutely loves this game!
RashMoose;-;It's... a good game... Pile of Community!
DJSF;-;Team Fortress 2 is a prime staple of a First-Person Shooter that balances "casual" and "competitive" gameplay very well. Since game sessions are fairly short, you can always drop into a game and play even if you only have a short amount of free time. If you like FPS games, different team roles, random item drops + crafting, and fun, action-packed gameplay, then you will really enjoy this game. As a Free to Play game, TF2 is one of the best of its kind available, and you can play without having to spend any money - it gets very tempting though, especially the more invested you get into the game. The aesthetics are fantastic, the character models are very well-done, and there is also a lot of detail in the environment. There are a multitude of different weapons and cosmetics (ex: hats, outfits, etc), allowing for huge character customization; however, most of these things must either be purchased with real money or traded (if you don't want to rely on the random item drops). The sound effects are good, and there really isn't any music, so I just play my own in the background. The character taunts and dialogue are great and comical. The controls are very straightforward and the learning curve is minimal to moderate depending on your experience with FPS games. There is a coaching option, where players can volunteer to train new players, and new players can be matched with any available coaches. This is a great option, considering that there is no real tutorial and playing against bots does not compare at all when playing against real opponents. Understanding the different character roles + equipment configuration (different loadouts can change your playstyle considerably) can take some time, but I personally find this part to be very fun. For example, you can equip the Demoman with a melee weapon (each character has a primary, secondary, and melee weapon), and give him a shield and special boots for his other weapon slots - this will effectively turn him into a whirlwind of melee death, so long as you are able to close the distance between yourself and your opponents (swords will give him a charge ability). This differs from his default loadout, where the Demoman can use his grenade launcher and also set up trigger-able mines. The gameplay is extremely fun, and there are a number of different game modes available - territory control, capture the flag (briefcase), and push the cart (get your cart to the other end of the level) to name a few. The different character types and equipment make for high replayability and can also make each match different in its own unique way. I strongly advise you to try out every character type at least a few times, as each class can be very fun (and complementing your team makeup is always helpful). The cosmetic items and weapons are fun to craft, and you may be very tempted to purchase a few things (basic items are very cheap on the market). If you don't want to spend money, there are frequent item drops that happen while you play, as well as achievement items that will be unlocked when you fulfill certain requirements. Overall, this is an excellent game that you should try if you are interested in multiplayer and/or FPS games, especially since it is F2P. If you aren't into those type of games, you should still try this out, since it is much easier for people to get into than say, Battlefield or Call of Duty (again, the perfect blend of casual and competitive elements makes this game very appealing for all types of gamers). Highly recommend! Cheers, DJSF @DJSF's Rogue Reviews
Wafflez;-;Causes anxiety problems, low self esteem, Tourette's syndrome, mood swings, Bipolar disorder, breakdown of relationships, raging erections, racism. Would definitely recommend.
Theslyrider;-;One of THE best games ever made. After 9 years of development...it's been worth the wait!
WLF;-;Its free. nuff said
Hittox;-;Good game if you wanna do bad things to ppl. 9/11
Caboose +;-;You play the game long enough to become a hacker or not enough to be a f2p.
Project : Clairvoyant;-;TF is life. Simple as f*ck. Since TFC.
Samantha Woods;-;Funny, hectic and addictive, those are the words I would use to describe Team Fortress 2, unlike Call Of Duty where only one player can own the enemy team, here you need cooperation and the classes are very balanced against each other.
Coelho ugado;-;One of the best games ever developed by Valve with a major upgrade in comparison to Team Fortress Classic
Coelho ugado;-;One of the best games ever developed by Valve with a major upgrade in comparison to Team Fortress Classic
Julia;-;MAYDIC!
iJayzik;-;Great game. Tf2 is love. Tf2 is life.
Boris the Atomic Cockroach;-;This game is now 7 years old By rights this game should be relegated to the dark dank corners of the internet played by only a few die-hard geeks with fond memories of the days gone by Instead its now the internets premier hat collecting game, spawned a trading system only slightly less complex that a wall street derivatives trading unit, and added far more weapons, maps, and silly items than anyone can shake a stick at. Yes the game has its faults..... but I've never found any (except arena mode) and its cheered me up on more occasions when I've been down merely by enabling me to set fire to people without the risk of another long jail sentence
[DB] Conman;-;Continuing from the classic Half Life mod Team Fortress Classic, this game is constantly being updated and improved. You can trade Items with players across the world, collect and craft your way to the top, play as Red or Blue and comeplete objectives, or pimp your class out with stylish hats and accessories. Team Fortress 2 is always a game that you can turn to in order to waste some time and have fun while in comeplete chaos and silliness. There are nine personality filled classes to choose from to fit your liking, each one has a different set of skills, and over time you can get enhanced weapons by playing, buying them from the shop, or even trading with a stranger! Definetely a game I'd recommend to players that love free deathmatching games with a ton of things to do on the side.
Nylten the PyroMedic;-;Better than Call of Duty! The game's all about hats! This is a game where it can be either serious or goof-off-ish. All you need to do is select the mode and choose what map. Requires some skill to get the hang of goofing off though.
J4k;-;This Game Is Tottaly Same As Drugs You Get Addicted To It And Ruins Your Life But Whoever Addicted To Drugs, He Must Love Drugs Same As Team Fortress 2 THE BEST GAME EVAR BTW : Wastes All Your Money c: *Sigh* 5 Stars
CierraSkywalker;-;VERY GOOD GAME ITS AWESOME YOU CAN CUSTOMIZE YOUR CHARACTER AND GET NEW WEAPONS AND BUY STUFF FROM THE STORE ITS FREE TO PLAY AND ITS THE BEST FPS GAME EVER
() Pink Lily;-;Fun to play with friends! Just play the game, you easily unlock achievements without trying hard and get decent item drops. It is definitely more fun when you learn more about the classes and go online against other players. I do consider it to be a unique game where hours do not give you much of an advantage against newer players but knowledge and skill is what makes the difference.
Wheatleh;-;Do I reccommend this game? It's like asking me if I eat  for breakfast. Of course.
t'h'i'n'k;-;This game shanked my nan behind the Tescos.
RaidenPursuit;-;Want to play with a great community and skilled economy. Play TF2! The game where you could level up your stranges unbox unusuals and even yes even, taunt kill. Yes in this game you can die with style with the medic's ubersaw kill he literally impales you in no time at all. You thought i forgot about this but no i didn't Heavys finger blaster. PRepare to be fingered by the heavy and it will blow you away wit ha stunning killcam. Now i know what your thinkin. "Your crazy this game cant be that good." Oh but it can with the infinite number ofhats and taunt you can be the ultimate pokemon master..... wait wrong game. HAT MASTER!!! Also use backpack.tf when in trading cuz it could come in handy in trading. Team fortress 2 is the most updated with over 300+ updates and has been released since 2007 and is still on the top 3 list and is compatible with almost every computer (exept 98) Also the game has an abundance of classes to chose from to suit your playstyle. Scout the team postage stamp everywhere and anywhere, as long as you have aim and bonk atomic punch. Soldier (recomended for newbs) is a rocket launching General and was kicked out of the army for being "stupid" and has a rocket launcher a shottie and a shovel to dig your grave in. Now for a favourite, the pyro a flamewielding alien with no soul and has 3 weps (flamethrower, shottie, and axe) also the afterburn is op so use it when spies are around. Now for the Demoman an overpowered drunk scottish man with only one eye and can shoot grenade and sticky grenades. Also if your nice he would share a drink with you. with his beer bottle as his melee. Now for the Pootis.. i mean heavy with an abundance of humor and lack of chorus he will sing you to laughter and with his minigun if your mean, also he carries a shotgun and his fists as his melee to beat you down. Now for the engineer a texan who doesnt tell much about himself other than his close relationship with his machines (sentry, dispencer, and teleporters.) he likes to chill and drink beer while his sentry takes up the defendin the point/intel. MEDIC! MEDIC! MEDIC! here we go. this man lost his medical liscence and is a crazy doctor with his bonesaw, medigun, and his syringe gun to support his team. Everyone needs a medic support the team! Now for the sniper the hired assasin workin for the army (sort of) he takes out his sniper rifle and takes out enemies from across the map to sure his teammates safety. He carries a jar of "jarate" with him to reveal spies in the area so the team is aware or the sniper can take him out with his knife. Finally we have the Spy a man who knows secrets nobody knows he carries a knife and could make a costume party if he wanted to. He can be you or me, he can even be *BOOM*. The spy comes with a knife, pistol, disguise kit, and a sapper for enemy buildings to take out their defences. As a spy you need to stay low so the enemys are unaware of your presence. Just watch out for pyros. Anyway thats my review i love the game nearly put 1000 hours into it and one more thing. MANN VS MACHINE is the zombies mode for tf2. That is all that needs explaining for now i just wrote a book and if you read all this congrats. IF you thought my review was helpful or you want to meet me friend me we can talk about it Thanks for reading!
antos;-;Ruined my life 10/10
Nice Original Name, Hoovy!;-;Team Fortress 2 is the best FPS Multiplayer Game I have ever played! 10/10 here's my review: Team Fortress 2 is one of Valve's games that you should have first once you made your steam account There are 9 classes you can play as so what are we waiting for? Let's meet them all! Scout: He is not as weak as you think, he has a scattergun, pistol and a bat, He is a offensive class and he can beat you up by bonking you on the head plus he's pretty fast too! Soldier: He is a pretty balance class but he is equiped with a Rocket Launcher, Shotgun and a shovel (yep, it's a shovel) He's also offensive too and also can rocket jump too as in jump very high with the help of his Rocket Launcher. Pyro: What's with the fire guys? Oh it's the pyro that makes the fire with his Flamethrower, Shotgun (Same old shotgun) and a Fireaxe, He's the last offensive class and he can burn you alive. WATCH OUT SPIES Demoman: Sure he's drunk but he's a defensive class and he has GRENADES well not really unlike tf1/tfc but he uses Grenade Launcher, Stickybomb Launcher and a bottle (cuz he drunk BURB!) He is a powerful class if you use melee :) Heavy: The Heavy is a heavy weapons guy that holds the Minigun, Shotgun (again) and he's own fist. He is a defensive class and he is heavy I mean he's slow so keep that in mind if you dont want to get SNIPED in other words: He's the face of TF2 Engineer: Our buddy likes to build stuff and these buildings are useful, He Builds Sentries, Dispensers (heals) and teleporters. he fights with Shotgun, Pistol, and a wrench which use for building as well. Look out of sappers [He is the last defensive class] Medic: MEDIC! we need healing and that's where medics comes in, He's a support class that heals his teammates and he wields with a Syringe Gun, Medigun (Heals teammates) and a bonesaw. MEEEEEDIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIICCCCCCC! Sniper: G'day mates, Let's headshot our victims with this supportive class. He shoots with the Sniper Rifle, SMG and a Kukri (well not for shooting with) Watch your head and avoid getting shot by snipers. Spy: Our last & Support class, The Spy, He is very sneaky but also weak. He's uses a Revolver, a Sapper (to sap the engineer's buildings but it takes time) and finally a knife which he backstabs people with. That's Spy a Spy.....wait what? That's all of the classes and now let's talk about gamemodes, there's CTF, Control Points, Payload, Payload Race, KOTH and Arena. Okay, I don't have to explain what this game is all about because this game is SO AWESOME, you'll have fun and download this game Play Team Fortress 2 a FPS Multiplayer Game that will keep you busy for hours and also get new weapons and last thing: There's hats for your classes to wear and also some Misc such as clothes now anyway DOWNLOAD THIS GAME AND HAVE SOME FUN! [Require a Purchase at Mann Co. Shop in order to become premium TF2 Player] I might make a guide of this :)
TheLordKhon;-;4 years ago.......there was a fun shooter called team fortress 2 and now..... there is conga fortress!!!!!it's like skyrim with hats ~~IGN
Roundpants Twenty Two;-;The best prolly
Roundpants Twenty Two;-;The best prolly
-Blaze;-;Team Fortress 2 has one of the Best Multiplayer Experiences and it free, it's definitely a must have for your game library.
SchwartZero;-;''Consider yourself dominated, you Scot son of a !'' After I heard this line of dialogue from The Soldier, I stopped playing the game. This is the first game ever to offend Scottish people in such a manner. As a longtime Demoman player, I will not stand for this Valve... Not until you ban The Soldier from the game or give Demoman infinite health, 10x damage multiplier and an unlimited supply of beer. That is all.
| CMM | Astrak;-;Have you got too much money? Then play TF2. That is all.
Madolche Tiaramisu;-;Waffles.
Rival Samson;-;ruined my life, 10/10 would recommend
SoZettaPridefulBabby;-;This game is my favorite hat trade simulator, the FPS part is kinda lame though (but better than all others)
[NJ] Rhinosaur;-;This game is stupid, you can only wear 1 hat at the time.
Akumu;-;I've quit this game ever since before The EOTL Update, pretty much when they started nerfing, buffing and adding weapons. The game became somewhat dull and continuously repetitive despite the ''updates'' it was getting. Only thing stats changes did was to  up the balance and make me want to play it less. Then there is the updates which added new weapons... Really didn't helped at all, it ed the game even more. Valve saw their precious TF2 that got them so much money from the mann co. microtransactions is dying and they thought adding more stuff to it will make it more interesting and that people will come back running to it because of the new content. Wrong move. Today, The Gun Mettle uptade was release. From now on, 3 July 2015 will mark the day when the TF2 we all knew and loved has died and was replaced with a more cartoonish version of Counter Strike. Good job, Valve. Good job... Edit: Some users might agree with this here, maybe others not, but I'm pretty sure the only way Valve will ever have some of the old TF2 players back in the game is to launch a damn update that removes all this new weapons, stats changes and CS:GO crap. Or atleast some official valve servers for vannila gameplay WITHOUT this  updates. Some of use like then, some don't. Why would you try to get new fans by adding all this  when you had a really huge community backing all of you up!! You had supporters, people that actually loved the game, the vannila one, without all this new updates that completely changed the game's feeling. Or is it that you saw the game is slowly dying and thought adding new stuff will make it last longer? Wrong move. The game is soon becoming as old as 8 years, what made you think a game like this will not eventually die? It happens, you can't avoid it. in' learn that your game is dying and you people are not able to bring it back alive with all this updates which add new content to it. I still do like and support you Valve, you make great games and all that, but sometimes you make some the most horrific and staggering decisions one could make. And I don't wish for you to become like EA or anything close to them. I want you to be the company we all know and love. That's all. Stop thinking you can bring TF2 back to popularity with all this new additions.
TheDookiestFerretEver;-;Bought Unusual for 50 keys. The next day the price went to 30 keys. 10/10 would  myself over again,
mrboom;-;What the  did you just ing post about me, you little f2p? Ill have you know I've won over 500 payload maps, and Ive been involved in numerous Highlanders, and I have over 50 confirmed Genuine First Place Highlander Tournament medals. I am trained in advanced Scout mindgames and I am credit to team. You are nothing to me but just another Ghastly Gibus-toting f2p. I will wipe you the  out with Strange Festive Scattergun precision the likes of which has never been seen before on this game, mark my ing Genuine First Place Highlander Tournament medals. You think you can get away with typing that  to me over the chatbox? Think again, f2p er. As we type I am contacting my secret network of BLU Spies across the pl_waste and you are being keylogged right now so you better prepare for the hacking, you Pyrovision Goggle-toting . The hacking that wipes out the pathetic untradeable items you call a backpack. Youre ing Level 9001 Vintage Ban Hammered, f2p. I can be anywhere, anytime, and I can kill you in over seven hundred ways, and thats just with my Level 42 Strange Festive Holy Mackerel. Not only am I extensively trained in advanced Scout mindgames, but I have access to the entire arsenal of Valve quality weaponry and I will use it to its full extent to wipe your f2p  off the face of the game, you little noob. If only you could have known what premium account retribution your little clever comment was about to bring down upon you, maybe you would have held your ing fingers. But you couldnt, you didnt, and now youre paying the price you wouldn't be able to trade for anyways, you  f2p. I will  Fish Kills all over you and you will be humiliated in it. Youre ing dead, noob.
Duncan Reeves (dA: FosterBonnie);-;After seeing the F2P Update, I was glad because I wanted the game so badly but when time progresses, the community gets more hostile towards you and it has been changed a LOT. The TF2 Community is friendly in the old days, but now it's full of morons who are hostile towards you. All these depressions I played against ty unbalanced stuff, I decided to quit playing TF2 (not entirely) and forget all those idiotic moments I have. If Valve cared enough of their community then this wouldn't happen but  hits the fan by the EOTL Update, instead. The community complained that Valve just.... made the update sucked and cutting the new map that has this reason "Too Complicated or Too Challenging for new players" *facepalm* Valve, are you trying to mock your community because you cut cp_snowplow with that reason. If so, WHY cp_steel is there? that's too complicated and too challenging too! And now you care about the $$$ and not the community Goodbye TF2, you're good in the past, and Valve is gonna milk the game because they now care the money
=W/H= Lawgamer411;-;I saw one dude with almost 12,000 hours of time put into this game. That's almost 500 days, like a year and a bit in game. It's like that Anime, Sword Art Online, where they spent like 2 years in a video game, except this one due willingly did this. If his devotion doesn't sway you, this will. Over the years, TF2 has had many many things put into it, but here are some to name a few: HATS CONGA DRUNKEN CYLCOPSES SANDVICHES ARCHIMEDES BONK BALLOONICORNS ROBOTS TAKING AMERICAN JOBS NOPE JARATE(Jared pee) BACKSTABS AND FACESTABS AND ALL THE IN BETWEENS SENTRY, BIG AND ANNOYINGLY SMALL AND BEST OF ALL, ROCKET AND STICKY JUMPS. and hats.
[0GS] Bennycorn;-;10/10 i really like this game like if u think so :D
Your Gynecologist.;-;Your wallet will be hungry because you will be wasting money on pixels and more pixels and more pixels you play the game to get more pixels and with more pixels you look better and cooler and people assume you are good at the game when you really can be crap so with fancy hats and glowing weapons you are good at the game that is how TeamFortess2 works
[DT-D] Wombat;-;This is great game the Grafics are awesome and its he only thing I do on my computer (apart from homework)
CodyRockLeeX;-;The legendary class-based FPS, Team Fortress 2. What can be said that hasn't already been said? Play "Hat Simulator 2," as some affectionately call it, and you'll see what I mean. Strickingly memorable and lovable characters, an amazingly well-executed atmosphere, and satyrical gore and humor, it's an unforgettable setting that's paired with a super-solid game engine and superb FPS gameplay. It's even free now! No excuses.
Xeptar -mix?;-;Awesome game sometimes friendly players sometimes mean players many gamemodes adn valve maps u can play i gotta say i love this game its amazing.
Kablaminator;-;A colourful, fun game for anyone who likes FPS and video games in general.
Adolf Hitler;-;Very Realistic Hat Simulator 2009 (Beta Test on 2006)
TheAugmentedRussianHeavy;-;One of the best games i've ever played in my life. 7 years later the game is still a masterpiece for many. 10/10
anuw;-;Looks simple, high skill ceiling, and hats. 10/10 my most played game on steam so far.
Reese;-;I say this is probably my favorite game. Choose from 9 different classes with many gamemodes to do some killing! Many items to earn/buy! Discover epic loot by opening crates with keys! Best part, it is still updating with more items! 5/5
Coont;-;TF2 is BY FAR the best hat simulator in the world
What a Lovely Day!;-;Now how I came to get this hat, 'tis very strange and funny Grandfather died and left to me his property and money And when the will it was read out, they told me straight and flat If I would have his money, I must always wear his hat "Where did you get that hat? Where did you get that tile? Isn't it a nobby one, and just the proper style? I should like to have one Just the same as that!" Where'er I go, they shout "Hello! Where did you get that hat?" If I go to the op'ra house, in the op'ra season There's someone sure to shout at me without the slightest reason If I go to a concert hall to have a jolly spree There's someone in the party who is sure to shout at me "Where did you get that hat? Where did you get that tile? Isn't it a nobby one, and just the proper style? I should like to have one Just the same as that!" Where'er I go, they shout "Hello! Where did you get that hat?" At twenty-one I thought I would to my sweetheart get married The people in the neighbourhood had said too long we'd tarried So off to church we went right quick, determined to get wed I had not long been in there, when the parson to me said "Where did you get that hat? Where did you get that tile? Isn't it a nobby one, and just the proper style? I should like to have one Just the same as that!" Where'er I go, they shout "Hello! Where did you get that hat?" I once tried hard to be M.P. but failed to get elected Upon a tub I stood, round which a thousand folks collected And I had dodged the eggs and bricks (which was no easy task) When one man cried, "A question I the candidate would ask!" "Where did you get that hat? Where did you get that tile? Isn't it a nobby one, and just the proper style? I should like to have one Just the same as that!" Where'er I go, they shout "Hello! Where did you get that hat?" When Colonel South, the millionaire, gave his last garden party I was amongst the guests who had a welcome true and hearty The Prince of Wales was also there, and my heart jumped with glee When I was told the Prince would like to have a word with me "Where did you get that hat? Where did you get that tile? Isn't it a nobby one, and just the proper style? I should like to have one Just the same as that!" Where'er I go, they shout "Hello! Where did you get that hat?" -"Where Did You Get that Hat?" by Stanley Holloway 11/10
Laces115;-;If "Free to Play" scares you away from this titile: don't let it. It is a great game! There is no need to pay anything, as all items are given though "drops", the more you play, the more stuff you get, Premium Player or not. Speaking of "Premium Player". you become one by spending ANY amount of money in the game, even under $1, and you will always be a Premium Player, no subscriptions. This basically lets you have more items, and sometimes get hats and rare (but only cosmetic) items through the drops. Players are not hindered by being Free to Play, or by not playing a lot. The default guns given are balanced, and unlocked guns provide benefits in some areas, but have negatives in others (ex. a larger clip, but no random critical hits). All in all, the only thing that will make you like or hate the game is the gameplay, not the pricetag. If you like FPS games, you will love it, if not, still give it a try, you could have fun, and not need to worry about being locked behind a paywal.
Pigeon| #TF:GO;-;It is very addicting. :D
Platinum;-;Yes, this game is fun. At first, going to a server MAY tell you you are a noob because your a F2P ( I Find It More On Servers ). Well, YOUR NOT GONNA GIVE UP TO THAT RIGHT?! So Buy a Hat, Show it Off, Fight, Dominate, Join Tournaments, Play with 500+ Robot Attackers, Defend, Trade, Duel. And Ofcourse HAVE FUN! 99/10 10 Stars 9m Likes Thumbs UP Thats all i got
Belial;-;It is a cool game
Gambit;-;Best game I've ever seen, with so many mods and game modes you never get tired of it. Well balanced classes that all have flaws so no one can be "OP". Team work is what makes the game, hence the name "team" fortress 2, you have to learn that you can't just go kill a whole team by yourself, it ain't gonna work that way. Comapred to the other fps this one has to be the best.
procrastinationerer;-;this is a really fun game - my friends got me into this and at first I was hesitant, but after a while I was playing this everyday
George;-;The most fun game i've ever played, along with Portal. Good job Valve
LOOKING FOR A GIRLFRIEND. KAPPA.;-;*Skip this first part if you just want to read my review* Ah, I see you see my review. Well, not really, because it hasn't started yet, and I can't see you. Anyways, now that I've wasted a good thirty seconds (that's an aproximation, if it hasn't been thirty seconds, replace the word thirty with the time it is currently taking you to read (if you don't know, I encourage you to go back and read it again, with a timer)) Now, on to my review. TF2. Two letters, one number. These three characters have a meaning to all of us "gamers". To some, TF2 is merely the sequal to Team Fortress, or Team Fortress Classic. To others, this game brings meaning to Steam. Unsurprisingly, TF2 still remains one of the most popular Steam games. A while back, the game officially became F2P (free to play). Ever since the official release, as I said before, it has "touched the hearts of hundrends, if not thousands, of Steam users." The game cleverly mixes first person shooting with the cartoon graphics you see in Disney movies (except Valve makes it work). Though this brilliant combination attracts tons of people every day, it is very much a reason not to play for the harcore graphic obsessed Steam users. To combat the people who say things like, "The graphics of this game are horrible, I will not play it." and, "A cartoon first person shooter? No. Let me play Call of Duty and Halo.", I must say that you learn to love the commical blowing off of the head and watching your vital organs fall here and there as a handful of characters that could only be created from the mind of a serial killer run around shooting this and blowing up that. Overall, the game is very fun and entertaining.
feesh;-;i love tf2 soo much, ITS AND ADDICTION!!!
OPST Dantheman;-;This game is amazing, I can truly play this game for hours non stop. It gives so much costumization, the community is outstanding, and it is loads of fun. (repare you mind) I would r8 8/8 m8 cuz dis game is teh best tin deat ebeh hippin, m8 this game is gr8 and f8 made me l8 so i can play this game m8. Leik af u cri errih tim
Meduka Meguka;-;I Laughed I Cried.... Then i got a jar of  thrown at me 10/10 would jarate again
Chikan Tounai;-;This game ruined my life
simple librarian;-;one of the better animal crossinglikes on this web zone. this, much like killing floor, features a bit out-of-place shooter element but the customization options are incredible. would recommend to fellow crossers
juma;-;the
Pretbek;-;I honestly recommend Team fortress 2. I bought it with the Orange box on the release day which would have been 10 euro, but I would pay 60 for it aswell. Since the game is Free to Play now you need to try it out. I am disappointed in the fact that it is free to play now though, the difficulty level has drasticaly changed to low standards due to all the new players. Other than that it is a nice game when you're bored
xo magic;-;With over 700+ hours on this game I think I have the right to say it's one of the greatest games ever.
AimAssists;-;Good game BUTT U need Money to get full exprience
Jed;-;NEAR FAR WHERE EVER YOU ARE I BELIEVE. THE SENTRY DOES SHOOT ON
Pengu;-;One of the best Free-To-Play's i have ever played
WW  Ottis the Otter;-;Team Fortress 2 is an AWESOME game!!!!!! Even if you have a bad computer you will be able to process it. P.S. If you are new to TF2 wwatch out for spies.
Meister Grein;-;This game is the best FREE game I've ever played!
Nyc2x;-;It's a perfect game. You are always updated with new releases incredible. This game is very fun, with different characters and balanced. Game : 9.0/10 Graphic : 9.0/10 100% Achievement : Easy | Medium | Hard | Very Hard
The Funky Sage;-;This game is simply fun like really fun from the classes who have their own unique personalities making them come to life while experience the game each with their own playstyle that is both enjoyable and a blast to learn and play the cosmetics only sweeten the deal making everyone look and feel different and not bland like most shooters out there overall if you enjoy a good time and like free things with a lot of content this game is for you I hope this helped and I really Hope you enjoy this game Also it has hats.....who doesn't like hats?
Sniper;-;Gave us hopes for bread and then didn't add any bread-based headwear. 10/10 Horrible Game- IGN
virco;-;This game, so fun, and free
Dr_Hax242;-;A truly Amazing game that never get's old. Once you have found your class and got some basic skill, this game is very VERY fun. One of the best game's I have ever played. AND IT'S FREE. What more could you want?
[EZDIK] Sumptuous Sasha;-;4/10 got called f2p for wearing gibus
Stitches;-;I Reccomend This Game Like...IIts Fun And Eh Yea When i Started Watching meet The Pyro I thought He Would be Behind Me With his Flame Thrower And The Song Do You Believe In Magic Quite Funny :) - Your`s Sincerly - Tyler Ocimek -
Lucifer_sz;-;Very Nice Game
t Christian;-;A very well Balanced Game with comedy,nice voice acting,and very addicting gameplay I would recommend this game anyday
PureMadness;-;Awesome Game!~ I love it!
Gruntley;-;it's alright I guess
Zach Rick;-;through my experiences of playing this game i have come to realize that people pay more money on virtual hats than they do on themselves in real life such as food, water, clothing, and shelter. but id give a 12/10
TiMoN;-;I spent $105 on a Free to Play title. Skill doesn't matter in this game, it's all about how much hats you own.
Kosmic;-;You work as a team you protect a fortress and there's 2 teams Team Fortress 2 but really its a fun game and a hat simulator.......
Agent Thane;-;Tf2 is a good game( if u like 1st person shooters) becuase u have all these different verieties of classes and weapons I do recomend this game to peope who like to play 1st peron shooters.
inferno;-;I wish I could have paid for this game, thats how good it is
[Hunie] Nikki Ann-marie;-;Great game 5 stars :)
Flustig;-;is free to play no p2w $1,876.04 spent so far 10/10 would empty my wallet again
Paisley [VJC];-;doing this for the achievement if u dont have the game my Llama will eat you
[POOTIS]CrossfireStyler;-;Very fun Modable Customizable Game >Thumbs up> Funny game with funny in-game characters. Balanced and Safe Free-to-Play All in
[]TSRC[]dat tf2 style;-;i recomend this game beacuse me and my siblings had lots of fun playing it and i deffiently recommend this game to have fun with your siblings and family ;)
NobodyCreator;-;Do you like f2p? No? Well.. Do you like hats? No? Well, maybe you like doing 360 while noscoping? Yes? Well, this game may be for you...It was better when it was premium and community is not realy good. So there is my final desicion: -F2P,- Not good community, +tons of weapons +lots of maps +LOADS of hats and costumes +Cartoonish shooter +Fun mode 9/10
Ranra;-;tem fortes 2 is abot kileng pepol is fun beng spi nd jompng al arond nd bilding a despenser
Coci-A-;-;The competitive is awesome.... the trading not so much! And too many people judging free-to-play s just because they have no hats...
vLgTF2| MouseCake;-;TF2 = Hats Shall I say more?
GuitarHokage;-;this game is just one of valves greatest Massively multiplayer games. I recommend this!
KoRRuption;-;Spectacular game. Reccomend it for everyone
Jinjo;-;This game... I think the hours say it all. It's fun, but difficult against better players- it makes you want to keep getting better. Very highly recommended.
Scarlet;-;You all know this game is good. Just play it.
.iG Baller #QuittingTf2Soon;-;You can have a penguin on your belt 10/10
Baron von Squaron;-;This game has a little bit of everything humor guns FLAMETHROWERS radioactive drinks hats birds snoipahs BLOODY SPOIS knives stealth austrailians comics disguises bombs on rail tracks EXPLOSIONS etc...
Mentallly Insane;-;Team Fortress 2 is by far , the greatest online multiplayer game I have ever played , its for everyone, even you , I Highly recommend this game to everyone, even If you dont like fps games, this game will give you a new look on fps games, as there is no other game out there like it . Heck even my dog has played Team Fortress 2 with me before :)
chase;-;waste all your money
The OCD Pikachu;-;This game is a really fun massive FPS Multiplayer game and is perfect for getting cool hats, making new friends, and finding new weapons such as milk, cool pistols, etc. If you like silly FPS games, this one is the one for you.
Miknew;-;It's ok I guess.
soul-eater125;-;This game is so awesome! Everything about it is just great! Everyone should give it a try.
Bones;-;Goat Simulator 2014 is so this year. Hat Simulator 2014? Now that's what I'M talking about!
Dylanthony;-;Why this game so addictive
Spy Crab Wolf;-;10/10 best game since conga update.
GFed Shiro Pant~;-;Best free,multiplayer fun you will EVER have...
ipodragon;-;Endless replayability value from overall a simplistic game. The community contributions and custom game modes really add to the experience. Oh, and hats.
Grandma;-;Best game ever, I got it for christmas, and have played it non-stop. I rek n3rds. You should get it so I can rek you, too. :) ;c
Dominus;-;RUINED MY LIFE!!!!!!!! 20/10
Jinjo;-;This game... I think the hours say it all. It's fun, but difficult against better players- it makes you want to keep getting better. Very highly recommended.
toast is love, toast is lyfe;-;It ruined my life and I have no money now. But I have hats. Lots of hats 10/10 -.-'
Seon;-;This is by far the best Free to Play Game ever Made. TF2 Is More than just a Hat Simulator. Its a Hat Simulator with Guns! No Seriously, TF2 is Awesome. It Features 9 Classes which are All Needed to make a Perfect Team. (Except for Pyro. No one needs Pyros). It does have it Bad Sites because the Game is sometimes full of COD Kids who only Choose Pyro and also the Medic which is Highly Needed is Very Unpopular. Most People wont get that its TEAM Fortress 2 and not KILL EVERYONE ON THE FIELD Fortress 2. Also, The Trading is a VERY Big Part of TF2. So TF2 is VERY Different from Shooters like COD, Battlefield or Halo. I Recommend it. Highly.
Coci-A-;-;The competitive is awesome.... the trading not so much! And too many people judging free-to-play s just because they have no hats...
Tex the Tepig;-;2007: Simple game with 9 classes and basic maps and weapons, nothing else. 2014: War themed hat simulator
Fred;-;Fun and addicting game with loads of items
El Grincho;-;The best free to play game around, better than a lot of premium titles with a great community and an awesome team of developers.
mr. big knob;-;This game is like a women it eats away at your wallet until you realize what its doing but then again this game is sexy just like women.
Lessandissa;-;After long hours of gameplay in Team Fortress 2, and after playing every single mode in the game (except a few mods), I guess it's time to do the review! :3 The game is very unique. In everything. It's not everyday you see a game which you have to choose between 9 different classes, with unique abilities for steal out some kills. It's not everyday you find a game with crazy guys hired to kill each other, just because silly brothers. It's not everyday you see the both silly brothers being killed by their lost brother and then starting a war for get the company. It's not everyday you find out a game where you have to kill a lot of hordes of robots made by the crazy lost brother. ...Seriously, TF2 has even story behind the mercenaries protecting briefcases, pushing giant bombs and capturing points. Also fighting not-so-smart robots. It's not only about the hats (actualy), it's the gameplay! It's not the same thing in comparison with others FPS's. Entering even more inside the game, you can discover more random stuff, like the in-game fads. That's what attract more players, in my opinion. And for being a F2P game, everyone can enjoy the randomness of Teufort! And don't think the F2Players will only noob: some Gibus guys will dance over your corpse in-game. I'm being serious. Curious now? :D Get the game. Doesn't have space in the computer? At least get some "culture" of the game. Don't know where to start? Watch all the "Meet the Team", pay a visit to the TF2 Official Wiki and check out the most famous TF2 fads. Two famous ones are Demopan and Painis Cupcake. ;D Meet ya around Teufort!
vLgTF2| MouseCake;-;TF2 = Hats Shall I say more?
CL4P-TP General Purpose Robot;-;Very fun and free.
ShinySylveon;-;For a free game, this exceeds any and all standards. Allowing you to play for free, while giving you the option to go into the world of "premium membership." With cartoony gameplay and a comic series, what can go wrong? Plus, you have a thriving community creating updates for the game! It can't get better than this! My favorite part is getting the task done, as a team. Most people don't do that, but its fun once they do.
Gremmerz police officer;-;I don't think much has to be said about TF2. If you haven't played it, you should! It's f2p after all so you have nothing to lose. Besides, no one can resist the most hyped hat simulator ever existed! ;)
ishaboi;-;sometimes i play this game
TheSubtleGuy;-;I can kill people with pans, cameras, candy canes, swords, neon signs, whips, bats, postboxes, baseballs, christmas decorations, crossbows, compound bows, mutant bread mittens, boxing gloves, knives, needle guns, flare guns, car batterys on sticks, laser guns, wrenches and cannonballs in a single game. It's enough to resolve any fetishes, suppressed or anger issues that ANYONE has.
Pay Me in Bacon;-;It's cool because it is mostly customizable... if u hate a certain character u don't have to play that person... there's other members! Not to mention you can change the weapon they carry if you unlock them. ALSO it is free!!! i don't know what the hell is better than free games..... free is my second favorite f word!
Sooperman;-;to cool
Pay Me in Bacon;-;It's cool because it is mostly customizable... if u hate a certain character u don't have to play that person... there's other members! Not to mention you can change the weapon they carry if you unlock them. ALSO it is free!!! i don't know what the hell is better than free games..... free is my second favorite f word!
Sooperman;-;to cool
Ranra;-;tem fortes 2 is abot kileng pepol is fun beng spi nd jompng al arond nd bilding a despenser
Victor Baxter;-;You have steam and you're not playing Team Fortress 2. What are you doing with your life?
PureMadness;-;Awesome Game!~ I love it!
Gruntley;-;it's alright I guess
Zach Rick;-;through my experiences of playing this game i have come to realize that people pay more money on virtual hats than they do on themselves in real life such as food, water, clothing, and shelter. but id give a 12/10
simple librarian;-;one of the better animal crossinglikes on this web zone. this, much like killing floor, features a bit out-of-place shooter element but the customization options are incredible. would recommend to fellow crossers
juma;-;the
[SG] YankeesBoy55;-;awesome! it is an amazing game that everyone should have. Also, HATS!!
The Real Sperd Shady;-;After playing this game for a while now, I would recommend this to anyone. It has a competitive side, casual minigames, the vanilla is extremely fun, and tons of hilarious moments. When you light someone on fire, and they try to give you a high five, it just adds to the overall fun and experience of the game. With constant updates and new items, Valve is ensuring players stay interested. As mentioned above, there are some funny group or solo taunts, that can be traded for in the games expansive trading economy. Also, hats. Hats are worth a lot, and valuable in trade. They are fun to collect and allow you to make your character look as ridiculous as possible. However, new players be warned, don't expect a shoot-em-up style game, as it takes numberous amounts of good meatshots to kill somebody, or a few rockets. Weapons are vastly different than other games nowadays, and take skill to learn to use effectively. So be prepared to have fun, wear hats, and hone your abilities with flamthrowers, rockets, miniguns, and even A FISH?!?!?!
LockJaw;-;This Is The Game That Made Me Come To Steam, Made Me Know About All Of The Hats And Tryhards/CoD Fanboys That Hate This Game, And HL3 So I Would Rate This Game.............. 999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999999/10. Cause Why The Hell Not? CONGA CONGA CONGA!!!!!!!!
Makka;-;I wasted over 1000 hours on this game, and it stole my life from me. and I have to say. I love this game to death. I see new players every day, and think back when I was Free 2 play. it doesn't really matter about hats. but skills.
Zero-One;-;Team Fortress 2- Absolutely no words can express what I feel about this game. Main reason is I have mixed feelings about this game. Its a great First Person Shooter game, with many servers allowing you to customize your character. The downside to this game is the creator's will to continuosly aim the game towards a money-making process. So much of this game is money-oriented, its quite sad and ruins the cartoonish aspect the game provides. But besides that, this is one great game that would not disappoint. Through the hours I have logged, I have spent countless hours playing competitively, casually, and even just sitting there and helping coach other players. Its a fun game, and I really do love the time playing it. The cartoonish feeling and effect has a major voice in my opinion. Reason being is just that after coming home from a long day of work, the cartoonish characters, with all their personalities, is a real pleasure to see. Would recommend you get it. (Its free!)
~  ~;-;You don't actually have to spend money on this Free FPS! 20/10
LinkTheSniper;-;Team Fortress 2 (TF2) is one of the most popular games ever, especally in the FPS (First-Person Shooter) catagory, there's 9 Classes to play as, all with diffrent playstyles, peranalitys, weapons, or something funny to say, in genral, TF2 is a must have, if your on a computer you own, there's absolutely no reason to NOT own this game.
PootisPAW!;-;Funniest way to waste your time!
PickleTickler;-;not worth the money
NomNomYum;-;To all Gamers out there... If you guys are looking for games that include gore, multiplayer, and FPS... This is the right game for you... This game also includes HATS!!! There are 9 characters to choose from, and the 9 are divided by 3 groups, first group is Offense, second group is, Defense, and third is support. In the offense group there are the characters Scout, Soldier, and Pyro... In the group defense there are the characters Demoman, Heavy, and Engineer... And finally the third group we have the support group and that group has the characters Spy, Medic, and Sniper. That's all i can say... Have fun.
xTcR | Mr.Bill [CM];-;Fun and great game ( also free 2 play)
Lyraissad;-;Spent all my money on hats and now i'm homeless. 10/10.
Lemonbomber;-;Love this game. Definitely buying a headset has made it more social experience. If you get past some of the asses that just like to agitate people thre are some gresat peeps to intereact with.
ownosourus;-;Team Fortress 2 is, at heart, a gloriously simple game that's been created with style, panache and an undeniable love of gaming. It's the kind of game that you want to show to people who don't play games so that they understand and then either get involved or go away. There is life before Team Fortress 2, and there is life after. After is better.The action is fast-paced and furious, the game's presentation is hilarious and exciting and the gameplay is very easily approachable.Team Fortress 2 is a beautifully designed game with a visual style reminiscent of old Warner Brothers cartoons, and battles that combine strategy with frenetic action.
DeadLine;-;I love This Game
unnamed;-;Hat Simulator 2014 is an interesting, engaging game where you trade hat for hat, hat for key, key for hat, hat for metal, metal for hat, and metal for key, and much more. Also has FPS elements but nobody cares about them. Get Hat Simulator 2014 today for a true hat experience like you never could in real life.
The Psychotic Snivy;-;Send. Help. This game gets you to play it. A lot. And I mean a lot.
Lance;-;it is really fun
Demon Cleaner;-;As one of my most played games of all time, Team Fortress 2 is an incredidibly original and fun FPS. It not traditional, in a way. But I can honestly say no other game has come as close as being as fun as TF2. I mean, you know when a game is good when it has it's own economy. Anyway, play TF2. It's free, it's fun, and it doesn't pull too much out of your pockets like other "Free to Play Games".
Clown9. ThePurpleEagle;-;Great Game! Test It out and fall in Love with it!
|><|Bilbo Swaggins;-;Tf2 is a fast paced game with a crtoony look and will make you lagh so much on how stupide the custom made gamemodes are. But if you want to get serious you can buy hats and wepons to look good and get a head of the game. Finally if dont want to pay at all just keep playing and youll find tons of items whe you die.
[ZG] zapzac :D;-;this is an amazing game i love it i play it all the time i relly recomend this game
Melter;-;THIS GAME HELPS ME SATE MY HUNGER FOR CRUSHING NOOBS, I APPROVE. Cheers
ChattyClown;-;This is the best game in my life :D
Kazame;-;If you dont play this you are a dumbass get on it and download it. Go ahead i am waiting.
Brian The All Brian Brian;-;I LOVE THIS GAME!!!! ( anyone who doesn't)
Captain;-;I killed myself using console commands and got banned for hacking. 20/10
Elan();-;By the love of the game player.
GenericProfileName;-;> I was only 10 years old. > I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. > I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. > Then I got my first hat, The gibus. > Suddenly everything changed. > I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' > I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. > I had so many hats, I loved them all. > But then someone traded me, I accepted. > They offered an Unusual for all my hats. > It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. > But no Unusual, He scammed me. > I lost it all. > I was so sad I cried for hours. > Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. > I went to bed after praying. > I felt warm. > I looked behind me, It was Gaben! > He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning TC. > Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning TC and I was naked. > I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. > Hats are love. Hats are life.
Dylan Wraith(QUIT TF2);-;If you like action, and sometimes mindless hilarity then this game is for you! There are many different aspects of the game and each loadout is a new way to play. It is extremely fun and most of the people you will meet on this game are very entertaining! The trading feature in the game is very useful as well, but there inlies one of the only flaws of this game. Often times after an update the trading network goes down as well as the item server so that you can't use your items for a while. These probelms are fixed quickly, but its still a tad bit annoying. All in all its still a great game, and as you'll see I have over 400 hours on record so I have a good idea of the game.
DU.Ahhlecks;-;Honestly, this is one of the best games I have ever played. I'm suprised they don't make it cost money, because if it did, I would totally buy it.
Macky Nishinkers;-;possibly one of the best dress 'em up games on the market. great variety in costumes; my Demoman in particular wearing those shutter shades and a cool beanie, and my Pyro looking super-threatening in a skull and bones get-up. it's a shame you spend most of the game shooting each other
I wasted $70 on Sawed-Off Skins;-;So much fun for a price of nothing.
Po1nter [Selling 2x CSGO];-;I love burning people. Good game.
I'd Ship Marisa & Flandre <3;-;Dominate F2Ps, eat sandvich, and sell hats.
Foehnn;-;Ah Tf2..."The most fun you can have online"...Well,they got me.Tf2 really is an addicting game.Much more fun than i originally thought it will be.I could go more in detail while i love it,but this review would be over 9000 pages long and you probably don't want to waste that much electricity just reading what my opinion is on Tf2.It's amazing.....But you already heard this before right?
<3Mizz.KittyKat<3 (Quitting);-;Great game! Aside from the constant need to buy stuff, one of my favorite games!
Ghosty;-;Literally perfect.
Georgiy;-;Team Fortress 2  it gets the aggression out. No yoga! And you can't score points in yoga anyway. Neither the hats.
senpai;-;This game is all about the hats. The weapons in this game are balanced, and very fun to play with. I highly reccommend this game.
tuncone;-;Play game. Get weapons. Remember about hats. Craft metal. Buy hat. Sell hat for more. Get profit. Get key. Unbox. Get unusual. Get scammed. Cry. Repeat procedure.
GLaDOS;-;Mate, Team Fortress 2 for me is the most Awesome game in the Steam.... Really man i play like 800 hours i think. is very cool mate. Play but Play like a MANN
Gaspar;-;Great game for a great price!
undeadblake03;-;this game is the
Blackout7 #getrekt;-;Hell yeah i recommend this game!, anyone that plays it will be instantly addicted!
Belial;-;It is a cool game
Gambit;-;Best game I've ever seen, with so many mods and game modes you never get tired of it. Well balanced classes that all have flaws so no one can be "OP". Team work is what makes the game, hence the name "team" fortress 2, you have to learn that you can't just go kill a whole team by yourself, it ain't gonna work that way. Comapred to the other fps this one has to be the best.
Sir DezGame;-;Spys are red. Spys are blue. That spy is a spy. So are you.
lolslayer123;-;TF2 is a fun game
[DT-D] Wombat;-;This is great game the Grafics are awesome and its he only thing I do on my computer (apart from homework)
CodyRockLeeX;-;The legendary class-based FPS, Team Fortress 2. What can be said that hasn't already been said? Play "Hat Simulator 2," as some affectionately call it, and you'll see what I mean. Strickingly memorable and lovable characters, an amazingly well-executed atmosphere, and satyrical gore and humor, it's an unforgettable setting that's paired with a super-solid game engine and superb FPS gameplay. It's even free now! No excuses.
Xeptar -mix?;-;Awesome game sometimes friendly players sometimes mean players many gamemodes adn valve maps u can play i gotta say i love this game its amazing.
Kablaminator;-;A colourful, fun game for anyone who likes FPS and video games in general.
Tatanka;-;i woul recomend the game if you are older then 10
e;-;Setting a hat on fire multiplies its value by hundreds. 16.3/10
rarE;-;i hate this game.
Stitches;-;I Reccomend This Game Like...IIts Fun And Eh Yea When i Started Watching meet The Pyro I thought He Would be Behind Me With his Flame Thrower And The Song Do You Believe In Magic Quite Funny :) - Your`s Sincerly - Tyler Ocimek -
Lucifer_sz;-;Very Nice Game
Muaz (   );-;This game is very entertaining,I luve how people rage in this game sometime ^^
Taddy;-;This is one of my Favorite games on TF2 bscuase it has some thingy for every one if you like a fast pace first person shooter
some guy;-;it is awsome
ToastyCotton;-;Still rocks, even after all these years!
V1NNY;-;hours of fun
==[ Cat/Fodd ]==;-;This is a great game with lots of friendly players, it has a variety of weapons and accessorys. I especially like TFDB because to me i think that its a lot of fun and strives for skill rather than luck.
freddy master;-;is cool and aseamone peles join
Nixter;-;hats economy sell money get rich shoot peopel scam 8 year olds bread robots heavies scouts pyro medic 1 vs 1 me as a demoman broken cellshading 3.1444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444444
Serious Steve;-;1.    ,      ,-       (    ),  TF2     ,,  ,                    .         ,  Valve       Community Steam'   Policount,Valve     2 .  Community      ,      .    ,            ,     , Valve      Love and War,      Community         ,      ,     ,    " "   . 2.      (    ),           ,          .        ,               -    .
Nexus Phoenix;-;I have been playing MVM for 36 hours straight. I think i have a problem. So Addicting. I have to stop typing and go play some more...
Rich Homie Huan;-;Best Hat Simulator I ever played. GOTY
Teque5;-;Just. ing. Awesome. This is the ultimate Valve title. Not since Counter-Strike has a muli-player game been this much fun. 10/10.
Not Miss Pauling;-;A really dumb FPS focused around hats, sandviches and conga-lines. I highly recommend it. (In all seriousness though I had never played a FPS before TF2, they all seemed boring, dull and over-competitive. TF2 is not like that. All the classes are hilarious and full of character, it has a thriving and friendly community, and there are weapons suited to every play style. No class is better than another. Everyone should give it a go if you haven't already.)
I'm only ironically gay;-;babby's first game
Kenny';-;First game i played on steam. And after over 1,000 hours of playing it, i still come back for more.
Eyepatch;-;Today I shall bring up an important question. Can a game go too far? In short, yes. Team Fortress 2 sent hat simulators way too far by adding guns to it. But unlike other things that go too far, Team Fortress 2 actually improved the hat simulator genre with guns. Yes I certainly reccomend the best hat simulator in the whole world.
Sniper-Fly;-;how can i say its bad game while i played 3,500 hours.. best game ever!
chaosshadow289;-;It's free -funny -better then CoD -each character has a background story -multiple gamemodes -hats -hats -keys....and hats - I have an octopus for a hat hat/hat
Marlon Brando's Eyes;-;What is outside?
Humble Policebirb Wife;-;The conga almost made me forget about hats. Almost. 10/10
::;-;Fantastic way to kill time
El Gran Gordo;-;A team based FPS game with hats. Not much else to say.
DLq Snivy;-;I LOVE THIS GAME
Selling vintage swag gaming gear;-;Very good game, best Hat Simulator ever, you can paint, set style, go on dates and see your hat's mood. I'm so glad that they added Frostbite 3 to it, and that this game is on for casual players. Well, the last part is not entirely true, even though the game was never meant to be played competitively, IT IS being played competitively, ever since late 2006. Valve just don't want to take this game "seriously" like they did with Counter-Strike. Many, and when I say many I mean it, I bloody hell mean it, MANY Quake veterans moved from Quake to this game but I think they got upset that their old comp tournaments weren't there anymore and that the comp community wasn't official. Valve, please, listen to all the players asking for it, I know that you've heard it many times before, even when Sal and eXtine went to your office just to ask this, make TF2 official, this game has a HUGE community, this game has HUGE potential, come on, look at all those game gimmicks, but you can't deny that Highlander is a lot less strategic than 6v6 and that it'll be a pain to assemble and manage 9 players for each team, instead of 6.
[Aimnot.exe] M@dScrub (R.A.D);-;This is an awesome game! I love it I got addicted to it pretty fast. I didn't like "1st Person Shooters" games, but something about this game got me into it. Thank you Valve for making this amazing game!
=[O.W.N]=^*DJ*^derpyponylawl ^;-;i luv this game so much i have 259 hours on it
The Faggot;-;Awesome Game,its a must have!
Teque5;-;Just. ing. Awesome. This is the ultimate Valve title. Not since Counter-Strike has a muli-player game been this much fun. 10/10.
LeDinkie;-;Awesome Game. It is easy to learn and play. The funnest FREE game you will ever play on PC
WiLlieW0nka;-;This game is just tons of fun, I like both the econimic side and the play side of this game.
Humble Policebirb Wife;-;The conga almost made me forget about hats. Almost. 10/10
::;-;Fantastic way to kill time
El Gran Gordo;-;A team based FPS game with hats. Not much else to say.
DLq Snivy;-;I LOVE THIS GAME
Selling vintage swag gaming gear;-;Very good game, best Hat Simulator ever, you can paint, set style, go on dates and see your hat's mood. I'm so glad that they added Frostbite 3 to it, and that this game is on for casual players. Well, the last part is not entirely true, even though the game was never meant to be played competitively, IT IS being played competitively, ever since late 2006. Valve just don't want to take this game "seriously" like they did with Counter-Strike. Many, and when I say many I mean it, I bloody hell mean it, MANY Quake veterans moved from Quake to this game but I think they got upset that their old comp tournaments weren't there anymore and that the comp community wasn't official. Valve, please, listen to all the players asking for it, I know that you've heard it many times before, even when Sal and eXtine went to your office just to ask this, make TF2 official, this game has a HUGE community, this game has HUGE potential, come on, look at all those game gimmicks, but you can't deny that Highlander is a lot less strategic than 6v6 and that it'll be a pain to assemble and manage 9 players for each team, instead of 6.
Not Miss Pauling;-;A really dumb FPS focused around hats, sandviches and conga-lines. I highly recommend it. (In all seriousness though I had never played a FPS before TF2, they all seemed boring, dull and over-competitive. TF2 is not like that. All the classes are hilarious and full of character, it has a thriving and friendly community, and there are weapons suited to every play style. No class is better than another. Everyone should give it a go if you haven't already.)
TTM~Freakboy12;-;Really good game multiplayer is loadss of Fun
Serious Steve;-;1.    ,      ,-       (    ),  TF2     ,,  ,                    .         ,  Valve       Community Steam'   Policount,Valve     2 .  Community      ,      .    ,            ,     , Valve      Love and War,      Community         ,      ,     ,    " "   . 2.      (    ),           ,          .        ,               -    .
Squid Grill;-;A game in which you have to play with others to protect your box fort. Nothing more to say.
Krang!;-;It's Good!
FRIENDLY PERSON;-;Team Fortress is a multiplayer action,shooter game where you can choose between classes(pyro,medic,heavy,engenire,spy,scout,solider and demoman).It realy fun,and it not requare a good pc!!!! I hope you will play this game.
tuncone;-;Play game. Get weapons. Remember about hats. Craft metal. Buy hat. Sell hat for more. Get profit. Get key. Unbox. Get unusual. Get scammed. Cry. Repeat procedure.
[ZG] zapzac :D;-;this is an amazing game i love it i play it all the time i relly recomend this game
Melter;-;THIS GAME HELPS ME SATE MY HUNGER FOR CRUSHING NOOBS, I APPROVE. Cheers
ChattyClown;-;This is the best game in my life :D
toast is love, toast is lyfe;-;It ruined my life and I have no money now. But I have hats. Lots of hats 10/10 -.-'
Seon;-;This is by far the best Free to Play Game ever Made. TF2 Is More than just a Hat Simulator. Its a Hat Simulator with Guns! No Seriously, TF2 is Awesome. It Features 9 Classes which are All Needed to make a Perfect Team. (Except for Pyro. No one needs Pyros). It does have it Bad Sites because the Game is sometimes full of COD Kids who only Choose Pyro and also the Medic which is Highly Needed is Very Unpopular. Most People wont get that its TEAM Fortress 2 and not KILL EVERYONE ON THE FIELD Fortress 2. Also, The Trading is a VERY Big Part of TF2. So TF2 is VERY Different from Shooters like COD, Battlefield or Halo. I Recommend it. Highly.
CrAzY PaNdA;-;yes this a absoulote amazing game im from the airforce
SLY_FinN;-;A rather simple, yet entertaining first person shooter. Normal Objectives. Blow things up. Kill other players. Repeat. Just what i like :D
hearthstone fucking stressful;-;Individuality and balance, both is ok. I can feel Quake by playing this game.
Shadow Shaymin;-;Come for the killing, stay for the hats
One Fish;-;10 out of 10 game
Victor Baxter;-;You have steam and you're not playing Team Fortress 2. What are you doing with your life?
derpy eleventy;-;many team such fortress much hats
EH_killer603;-;this is the best "free to play " game you will fined on steam.it is funny game that make you play over and over and over with non-stop.10000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000/10
g Jaffa;-;Team Fortress 2 Review Team Fortress 2 is a great game that everyone can enjoy, I love it as there are loads of maps to play with different gamemodes. Even if you are a more creative person you can buy taunts and cosmetics which you can paint and style to your liking. Positives -It is a very fun game -Easy to customise -Just a great game where you can trade and fight, all sorts Negatives -It can get very addictive -A lot of little children which are not fun to play with -If you play constanly it may get boring
The King Krab;-;its soo fun
iliveinahowsh;-;a wonderfull game. everyone should own this.
Dapper Catish;-;Two words: Get This, It's free, it's fun it's f*cking awesome all it costs is diskspace and once you've mastered all the classes and shooting and weapons and stuff. Then I have two more words for you: Get pimped. Yes. Pimped. There are way more hats than weapons so once you evolve from nooby-F2P-ness. Either turn your crappy old duplicates and unwanted weapons into scrap (the currency of TF2) and craft or buy hats (or you could use real money at the Mann Co store but that's lame) This game is the definition of never-ending awesome.
The Legman;-;Well, this game is . ABSOLUTE ! NOT EENOUGH TEAMS WE NEED MORE TEAMS LIKE PURPLE, ORANGE, GREEN, AND YELLOW........ Also the classes and maps are "DUMB"-nate. Wish they could make these changes and i wish they wouldnt make it cartoonie. Its dumb like reid
Melody Anneannen;-;Hat simulator with a mini fps game :)
The Psychotic Snivy;-;Send. Help. This game gets you to play it. A lot. And I mean a lot.
Lance;-;it is really fun
Demon Cleaner;-;As one of my most played games of all time, Team Fortress 2 is an incredidibly original and fun FPS. It not traditional, in a way. But I can honestly say no other game has come as close as being as fun as TF2. I mean, you know when a game is good when it has it's own economy. Anyway, play TF2. It's free, it's fun, and it doesn't pull too much out of your pockets like other "Free to Play Games".
Stig Helmer;-;best ham this year 10/10
sleep is for the shekels;-;Best game to turn your dollars to hats. 420/360 best cod series would d4nk sc0pe.
PieSpie;-;An extremely addictive and fast paced game, Team Fortress 2 has it all! Hats, guns, and burly mustached Australians, plus a winding and thrilling storyline filled with unique and relatable characters with their own crazy personalities! Chock full of various game modes, anyone can pick up on it with ease, and quickly find out which character is right for them! Best game evuuurrrr
Adebowale /S/;-;Amazing free game 11/10
Moo;-;I Recommend this game Tf2 Is a fun and great game for FREE
OfficerJenk1ns;-;What I think of the Game: Its alright I guess, I mean there are some flaws like hackers and such. But its not bad really. Its basically for anyone. To all the destructive people out there play as the Soldier or the Demoman or the Pyro. For all those people who love to help out to be the team player, play some Medic or Engineer. A little story I wrote for Team Fortress 2. Once upon a time, a little boy named Jimmy had finally got himself playing some "Call Of Duty: Modern Warfare 2" and he said to himself. "Gee, I wish people aren't so mean and hateful of other people!" and so Gaben flew into little Jimmy's window on a unicorn with laser eyes with armor made of Chuck Norris Beard hair, and so Gaben took little Jimmy on an little adventure into the world, of Team Fortress 2. He showed him ctf_2fort a magical place to live (if you are a maniac who has a barn full of guns.) and he showed him the magical-ness of Team Fortress 2. Little Jimmy couln't believe what is going on so he fell asleep and the next morning he gathered all his lunch money and bought himself so many hats he became! A hat lord! Something truely amazing!(Not) So he went on and bought even more which made Gaben very happy. The End Basic Steps: Launch Team Fortress 2 Get on a server Buy hats Buy even more hats Rename Team Fortress 2: "Hat simulator" Give it the "Game of the Year award" fifty times Eat Sleep Play Anyways, to be mature about this. Team Fortress 2 is a wonderful game which players can interact with each other. Either by relentlessly murdering them or just giving each other high fives. It has many game modes like Capture the Flag(Briefcase) or Control Points. It really gives players control over many things. There has been other things like custom community content or Mann vs. Machine. It also has many abilities to make players smarter. Each class requires you to play differently everytime. I would recemend Team Fortress 2 to many people. But I don't have that kind of communication. Although you'll first end up as a Free To Play you'll soon invest some cash into the game. Word of advice: If you get the Ghostly Gibus, Throw it away. People will criticize you for it. All of all things enjoy the game don't just mess around, time will fly way past your head if you do. But you might find yourself addicted to it after a while. That has been my review hope it helped you!
Asure;-;Old But Gold
WeinerFaggot;-;Addicting I love trading its a good game:)
Dylan Wraith(QUIT TF2);-;If you like action, and sometimes mindless hilarity then this game is for you! There are many different aspects of the game and each loadout is a new way to play. It is extremely fun and most of the people you will meet on this game are very entertaining! The trading feature in the game is very useful as well, but there inlies one of the only flaws of this game. Often times after an update the trading network goes down as well as the item server so that you can't use your items for a while. These probelms are fixed quickly, but its still a tad bit annoying. All in all its still a great game, and as you'll see I have over 400 hours on record so I have a good idea of the game.
Kenny';-;First game i played on steam. And after over 1,000 hours of playing it, i still come back for more.
Kirito;-;Team Fortress 2 is an awsome FPS (and TP) Game, it has some weapons from the future, some of them are historical, someof them are existing today... And there are cool gamemodes too! Like Control points (cp_) Payload (pl_) King of The Hill (koth_) and Sd_. Let me explain one of them: Control points is a Team Fortress gamemode, and the most popular C.P. maps are cp_gorge and cp_dustbowl. The gamemode is simple: the Re team is defending, and the Blu team is attacking. The Blu team's goal is to stand on the Control points for a time. The red team's job is to prevent the Blu team for "controlling" a point. Usually, control point maps have 2-3 Control points, but there are C.P. maps which have 4-5 points too! The other gamemodes are good too, so go and check them out for yourself, in the great world of Team Fortress 2! ~By: =[o.W.n.]= Kirito
hazmanbro;-;this is the best game ever
Chocola;-;Team Fortress 2 please just kepp beeing awesome TF2 is the best FPS I have ever played. It's free and is not like other games there you need to buy DLC's to have fun playing it. You don't get tired of playing it. Trust me. I'm not regreting the 500+ h spent on the game. Even if my homework were'nt done.
Spaghetti f0rest;-;Great game! Lots of killing and the only game that doesn't come with hats! COD was too much like a hat simulator.
spencecool;-;With all the little gamemodes created by the community, you can never get bored with this game!
Rasta My Pasta;-;Ruins your life, 10/10 would play for years Anyone looking for a change from these dull grey and brown FPS's, whacky tf2 is for you! also hats
~Stark Senpai~;-;Very unique game. Has it's own art style different from anything I have ever seen. Great weapons, unique characters, and most importantly, HATS! I reccomend this game. 9/10. It's great that this game has been around for 7 years and is still getting hundreds of players everyday.
Sniper;-;Gave us hopes for bread and then didn't add any bread-based headwear. 10/10 Horrible Game- IGN
virco;-;This game, so fun, and free
Toroi;-;My hours. help. I wrote something for real! These hours are legit, I played this game a lot in the past to avoid some tragic stuff in real life. I was young and didn't really have my gaming consoles anymore because of my brothers and I had a really bad pc, which i still own. TF2 was one of the games i could play pretty well on this pc but with horrid graphics, but it was one of the more fun games I installed. I met some real cool and nice people on this game as well as people who i plan to keep by my side. The community back then was more humble compared to nowadays. You have competitive gamers who spam their bind keys with unfunny/gross jokes and very obnoxious people who are either yelling at you or telling you to do specific things to win the game. When really, it doesn't even matter if you win or lose. However, you also have those people who are really awesome and you may meet some nice friends along the way! Although you never know what kinda person you're going to meet on this game. In my honest opinion, if you want to have a game to just waste time on (and money) or just mess around with people you know (which is what I do now), this is perfect. Esspecially the mann vs. machine co-op. I mainly play that now. Although to me, the game lost its touch, update wise, and I moved onto other games. I believe it's worth a shot to try it out but other than that, I'd keep it as a casual game. I don't think the competitive scene is worth getting into anymore because it's being flooded by crude people. Atleast from my experiance after over about 4+ years of playing it just got worse and worse. You will eventually be tied into drama even if you try to avoid it. You'll be more stressed than actually having fun, I'll tell you that! Although in all seriousness, this game is losing its touch and probably isn't worth making it your main game MAINLY because the updates they've been releasing are becoming very dull and not as great as they used to be. BUT, it's a great game to just play to pass the time and have fun! All you'll really notice nowdays is...people really love to trade more than actually play. Living off as a free to play would be very tough and you'd need to be patient with items you would want, unless you got that MONEY! Hope this helps. One last thing, I am not saying this game is bad in any way. I am saying that it's worth trying and playing with friends, or even meeting people! Although there are some downsides that you won't like, such as some stuff I pointed out above. Strictly towards the community. I personally think you should have this game as a side game rather than your come home to play sorta thing. Have it as a once in a while game, because it's nothing to be big about, unless you really do not like most of the millions of other games out there. Just give it a shot and see what you think! Have fun <3
Vale;-;Can you name any other unmodded First Person Shooter that lets you play as a cocky and fast Bostonian that can slap the hell out of urine throwing Australian campers with a fresh atlantic fish wrapped in fine christmas lights, eat a bucket of fried proccessed poultry over their corpses, and then get hit with an exploding cannonball launched from an African-Celtic one eyed alcoholic who can leap yards into the air from his own explosives while weilding a mystic ancient talking ghost claymore? I thought so.
A bLuE cOw;-;If you bind forward to a button on your mouse, you can play pyro and eat at the same time
UnfunnyName;-;The vicious cycle of Team fortress 2 First when you'll arrive in the game, you'll want Weapons, tons of them. Then you'll see that everyone has hats, and you'll want these, a tons of them. Then you'll realize that hats doesn't matter, only skill count, so you'll want a lot of skills, tons of them. Then new weapons will be added, and you'll want them, all of them. Then a new hat will be added and you'll want it, cause it'll be fancy on your main class. Then you'll realize again, that you don't give a damn about hats, all is about is skill. Then when you have waited for 3 years, new weapons will be added, and you'll want them. And then you realize that you spent like 2000 hours of your life for this, met great friends, and you'll have a server where's you feeling like home, and you discovered so much things via the community, it learnt you so much. Then the rude reality of life, bring you on earth, and this game is here, Waiting for you to play 1,2,3... hours, and you'll be happy to see that all your good friend are still here.
[CotC] King Conga Gandhi;-;Oh, and if you're wondering, the new update, Gun Mettle, did NOT ruin TF2 for me. I actually find it a LOT more fun now! I think Jerma summed up this game pretty nicely... "Maybe you got like two Pyros that just installed the game ten minutes ago. They don't have any hats, they're spraying  and they're having a blast. They might even be at the wrong point. They might be going backwards to the point that's already been capped. On the same team, there's a Scout with a Hale's Own Scattergun. He's got 18 kills with a 17 killstreak, he just got 18. He's going 'I just got 18, sick!' He runs up the stairs, he's trying his  off. He's get *beeping noises* dodging the 'Oh, the sentry almost got me!' He looks up to his left when he gets up the stairs on Gorge and there's two sandwich Heavies having a ing picnic. So he stops for a second and goes, 'Two... nnnggh!' so he walks forward and gets blown up by a soldier's rocket next door... ...The two sandwich Heavies then decide to move their picnic. There's ants. 'There's ants here, honey. I wanna get out of here.' So they get up, they pack their sandwiches, pack up their lunches, and their breakfast, and whatever the  they're eating. They get up and walk toward the door to go to RED because they think, 'That spot near the A point for RED is pretty good.' They walk out the door, and they see four Level 3 Sentry Guns pointing at them. They get shot a million times and blow up, and there's like nine Engineers swinging their wrenches in random directions. The BLU Scout, at this point, respawns, and walks by the at least 3-4 statues because we all know there's four people AFK when you play this game, you go by the museum of people standing still. He walks out the door and readies his weapon, he's ready, 'I'm going to get another 20 killstreak, just you watch Gaben, I'm going to praise Gaben!' And he goes forward and starts shooting, and he gets backstabbed by a Spy that has been sitting with the Cloak and Dagger in the corner for at least the last 68 seconds." Normally when I do reviews, I turn into a critic and start to examine that game, pointing out every little flaw and pro and determining a final score. However, Team Fortress 2 (or TF2 for short) helped me make so many memories that if I actually tried to make a fair review on it, it would still be way too biased to consider a valid review. Team Fortress 2, is, obviously, an amazing game. The teamplay is necessary and going out and attacking solo may be difficult. You need teammates in order to survive and win. The graphics are unique to a shooter game and really makes it a special game. I'm not here to explain the gameplay or graphics or whatnot. I love this game because of its charm. The game has such a unique and diverse cast of characters, you can't help to love all of them at some point. Scout is cocky and overconfident. Spy, another one of the characters in the game, is technically Scout's father. Soldier is a crazed WWII American patriot. He never actually joined the Army, but instead, he had his own personal Nazi killing spree. His roommate was a magician named Merasmus, who grew to hate Soldier. Pyro is mysterious, but portrays the world as one big happy paradise, known as Pyroland. Demoman is a Scottish alcoholic who, due to Merasmus, lost his eye that is now haunted. Heavy, although he appears to be dim-witted, is actually very intelligent and looks over three sisters. Engineer is very intelligent as well, and his grandfather was a major contributor to keeping the war with RED and BLU continue. Medic isn't fond of normal forms of medicine, but is still an important member nonetheless. Sniper is from New Zealand, but was raised in Australia. He prefers working from a distance and his backstory is very similar to Superman's. Spy is the master of disguise, and is technically Scout's father, as said before. Of all the characters, he appears to be the most "mature" and appears to be the ringleader at many times. Not only that, but the game has an interesting story. I would not like to get too detailed with it. However, it makes little to no sense but is still funny, engaging, and gives TF2 much more depth. There is also a storyline that takes place a few years later where Mann Co. is being attacked, so the mercenaries have to defend it, called Mann vs. Machine. This game mode ties in with the TF comics, which explain many characters' backstories and is currently still in the works as of this review. The other comics (all of which can be found on TF2's official website) are all funny and charming in their own way as well. The community has been quite debatable on how nice it is at many times, but in the end, it's still an overall great community. I've seen people give out stuff, others mentor some of the newbs (something I do as well) along with much, much more. Yes. the game is considered a "pay-to-win game" but it isn't necessarily a pay-to-win game. With lots of patience, you will get what you want from the game, whether it be hats, weapons, or whatever it is you want. The game has a learning curve that isn't too steep, but become dedicated and you'll fall in love with it. No matter how many times you rage to a W+M1 pyro that destroyed your 16 killstreak, or cheer when you unbox an Unusual, or maybe discover a few friends or learn a few things, Team Fortress 2 has been a huge part of my PC gaming life and without it, I would be as bored as hell. I cannot recommend this game enough, and I hope that many more memories are made on here. Valve may be cash cows, but you can't help but admit they are amazing when it comes to making games. Portal, Half-Life 2, Counter-Strike, but this game stands out from the rest to me. Do I recommend this game? Yes, yes, yes, YES.
Nerd House;-;Team Fortress 2. Being ranked as the third most-played game [steamcharts.com] on Steam, Team Fortress 2 is probably one of the best free-to-play games we've got. Why is it so popular? Let's take a look, shall we? First off, the obvious: It's free. 100% free. This means its accessible to everyone on Steam. This is just the icing on the cake though. What really shines about TF2 is the game itself. Team Fortress 2 usually consists of two teams (Red and Blue) going head to head against each other. Sometimes fulfilling certain objectives or just downright killing each other. There are many, many maps and modes, such as Payload, Capture Points, and Mann VS Machine. But the general idea no matter the map or mode is to KILL EVERYTHING THAT MOVES! And my god, is it fun to do so. The game has 9 playable mercenaries, each actually being a certain "class". Each class is divided into 3 different roles: Offense, Defense, and Support. Let's go over each role and class. Offensive roles specialize in dealing damage to the opposing team. These are your main attack force. Scouts are the speedy hit and run class, with the ability to double or even triple jump depending on equipped items. Soldiers pack a bit more firepower with their rocket launchers, which gives them not only power, but mobility due to the ability known as "rocket jumping". The Pyro is great at setting the opposition on fire, as well as extinguishing burning teammates using an airblast. Defensive roles serve to inhibit enemy access and to hold enemies back from vital points on the map. Overall, the defensive group has the most firepower of all the groups. Demomen can safeguard areas with stickybombs that they can detonate when enemies come by. Heavies are great for mowing down incoming troops and pushing back forces. Heavies can also keep enemies in an area while whittling their health for teammates to finish off. Engineers can build Sentry Guns for effective area defense, as well as build Teleporters and Dispensers for logistical support of the team. Support classes cannot hold the fight on their own, but their specialized abilities can tip the balance in their team's favor. They offer the offensive and defensive classes an extra edge in battle and can help turn the tide of the game. Whether crippling the enemy advance from behind or keeping teammates healed, the support classes are always handy to have around. Medics are the team healers, capable of providing numerous buffs depending on their equipments. Spies are great for sneak attacks or eiliminating key threats. Snipers excel at long range, also eliminating key threats, as well as extinguishing burning teammates with jarate and providing a damage boost to teammates. Next, let's look at the presentation. TF2 has a very unqiue art style. It's somewhat cartoonish, but very appealing. It's simple, and un-complex. But it doesn't need to be complex. It's simplicity is it's strength. Everything is detailed enough to where you can easily tell whats going on, what a specific model or item is, and they all stand out. The soundtrack is also very appealing and catchy, especially the main theme. I personally have it as a ringtone/alarm tone on my smartphone! :) One of the best aspects of TF2 is the Steam Workshop. Users can submit designs for items and weapons, and possibly have them added to the game! A very lucrative sub-market has also emerged from this game in the form of the Crate Keys. That's a whole different ballgame in and of itself, so we won't get into it here. During normal gameplay on most servers, you can obtain random items, weapons, and sometimes crates, and taunts....through the item drops system. You can only receive so many drops per week, and you will get them randomly as you play. You can use these items and weapons to customise your mercenary's loadout, or you can use them to craft other items, hats, and weapons. You can take multiples of items and craft them into Scrap, then Reclaimed Metal, then Refined Metal. You can then use these metals to craft specific class weapons/items, among other things. The crafting system is simple yet robust, with lots of possiblities. Some of it is very luck based. You can take some very common items and end up crafting a super rare hat or gun worth a lot of moolah on the Steam Market! All-in-all, Team Fortress 2 is just a very fun game. Endless entertainment awaits when you start up this game, especially if you play with friends on your favorite server. Probably the best free-to-play game on Steam. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=383235670 Highly Recommended Be sure to check out Nerd House Gaming for more reviews!
Mr Squiggles;-;How to play Team Fortress 2: Be polite, Be efficient, Have a pan to kill everyone you meet.
pacsomepuppes;-;> I was only 10 years old. > I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. > I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. > Then I got my first hat, The gibus. > Suddenly everything changed. > I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' > I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. > I had so many hats, I loved them all. > But then someone traded me, I accepted. > They offered an Unusual for all my hats. > It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. > But no Unusual, He scammed me. > I lost it all. > I was so sad I cried for hours. > Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. > I went to bed after praying. > I felt warm. > I looked behind me, It was Gaben! > He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning Team Captain. > Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning Team Captain and I was naked. > I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. > Hats are love. Hats are life. TF2: 11/10 Best hat simulator 1981 Overall, I'd give this game 9 out of 10 Gabe Narwalls Shoutout to ObsidianObelisk17 for making a youtube vid of this Showout to TheDisableBore for making a comic of this I cringe re reading this :smug:
Flexi;-;Ruined my life and cost me over 500. 10/10 would recommend to friends and family
Special;-;Team Fortress 2 is the most realistic hat simulator created to date. There is absolutely no other simulator quite like this one. The first time you start the simulator, you join a server where you can play a minigame where you show off your hats and items. If you kill a person three times in a row in the minigame, you get your very first hat: the Gibus. This is where it really starts; To play the simulator correctly, you have to spend money in the market place, made by Valve. After that, while you play the minigame, you can find hats which you can trade for, or collect! There is many other people who wants to collect and trade hats, just like you! After you collect enough items and/or hats, try joining a trade server! There, the REAL fun begins! Good luck, and beware of ending up poor!
That Kid From Texas;-;This game is great funny fun funky I give it a 10/10 -Pug games
Equinox;-;I can practise setting people on fire and splitting their skulls open with barbed axes before I do it in real life. Thanks Valve :D
white_waluigi;-;I'm not even sure if i should really recommend it. IT WILL CONSUME YOURE LIFE! I could've cured cancer by now!
Silvians;-;I never get bored while playing this 10/10 :)
nick.liam;-;It's one of the best games I played and the best part is it's free (tip: try to keep your wallet away from hats or it will be the most expensive game u ever played :D)
Zerri;-;WORTH THE FAT
Mawile;-;please practice self control when it comes to spending with this game you will need it
NooPieZ[NOO];-;Best of f2p steam game
ArrogantLemons;-;Hats. I like hats. This has hats. Hats are good. Hats...? hats. We can agree? Hats.
Jennie :-3.. [Back];-;I really like this game with all it's game modes and it's HATS (Stay fancy my friends :3)
.:XAS:.SNYPER_;-;Money Maker!$$
newton;-;its  10/10
Jmar;-;this game is awesome it is a firstperson shooter and has accessories like hats and weapons.This game also has gamemodes like man vs machine,capture the flag,arena,and control points.
Helper Cameron's Brother;-;By far, the best Free-To-Play FPS out there. Need I say more? I need to? Really?.. Alright, if that's what you want. In all my days I have yet to come across a game quite like Team Fortress 2. And by that I mean; "Holy crap this is the best thing ever 1337/10 -IGN all hail Mighty Gaben #Conga4Days #Fabulous #NoFilter #Medic4Life #SaveTheSpyCrabFoundation #Pootis #MeeM #SeduceMe #TeleportedBread #Archimedes #Oktoberfest" With regular updates containing cosmetics, weapons, maps and the like; I don't feel Valve will be stopping the TF2 Train anytime soon.
Faraz;-;It's free and it's fun, what more do you want!?
RD SnPz;-;There is no better FPS game to have fun on!
Pengu;-;One of the best Free-To-Play's i have ever played
WW  Ottis the Otter;-;Team Fortress 2 is an AWESOME game!!!!!! Even if you have a bad computer you will be able to process it. P.S. If you are new to TF2 wwatch out for spies.
Meister Grein;-;This game is the best FREE game I've ever played!
What goes around comes around;-;The best and most efficient money wasting device I have ever used. Disguised as a video game, it is powerful enough to make you withdraw money from the bank just to open crates. Works better than Black Friday sales. Highly recommended to enemies and smugs.
Torte 'Birthday' Lini;-;A step-up from Barbie & Ken's Dress-up mansion!
Fr0sChT3HExc33D;-;Objective of the game : Get cool hats and get cool weps like aussies. 10/0
ra.HateFielld #4Days2Bday;-;A really good game and the best free to play
*Whitechapel*;-;love it. excellent items. variety of game modes. mvm rocks. frequently updated...... if you don't have this. get it.
Yippee, Hacker????????????ARD;-;Team Fortress 2 is a simply phenomenal title if you're looking for a Free to Play First Person Shooter. It has nine classes which are distinctly different in how they look and play, and there are dozens upon dozens of weapons you can unlock either through simply playing the game and getting free drops, crafting them, earning certain items through achievements, or trading other players for them. These unlocks can further change the way you play a class allowing for even more variety. One class has the ability to be a bomb wielding maniac, or use a magic, head collecting sword and shield to slice off heads. There are 50 official maps, and 10 different game modes. Variety is the spice of life, and Team Fortress 2 certainly has variety. It can be daunting to get into considering just how much there is to learn, but it's worth the investment.
CRISTIAN1ELITEFounder To RBEC;-;This game is cool and Funny :) More people play this game! I like places and arms :) If you want a Action Funny Game i Recommend Team Fortress 2 (y) By:#CRISTIAN1ELITE
thinboy02;-;Really fun you get alot free from it it auto gives items.
Awesome3475;-;Love the game. Can't get enough of it. My process of love went like this: Love for weapons Love for 2Fort Love for Stranges Love for crates and keys Love for Hats Want for unusual Overall, if working for this was my job, i'd take it in a heartbeat. Valve, GG.
J-C;-;i love this game , great for starters! easy and basic controls too bad my wallets empty,... thanks steam! =Edit= Hey guys i've been playing this game for SOO long, i've hopefully met STAR_ and i just wanna say if you wanna meet someone famous, look for STAR_ he's a really cool guy, also if you play cod know this, THIS IS NOT COD, THERE ARE NO QUICKSCOPES, NOSCOPES OR 1 KIT KILLS WHEN YOU ARE PLAYING MINIGUN HOOVY! SO JUST STAHP OKEY?! =Edit= Okay little heads up tons of scammers hackers and phishers, but still better than BACON
LittleMissGore;-;Fun...Gore, guns and flying body parts :D What more can you ask for?
My Girlfriend ( _);-;This game is fantastic and is sure to be around for a great deal of time. With the different classes and the variety of equipment to get, anyone will be able to play this on hours on end!
--perry the meth addict;-;great gmae good times but watch out for sharks
Leathwave;-;You thought this game is good? Well you are wrong... It's f***ing awsome!!! You never get bored with this:) And it's free to play, what else do you want?!!?!
Data;-;Great Game and fun.
TeeTaan;-;It's free. And if this wouldn't be enough of a reason to have it downloaded and installed on your hard drive already, it's also fun. And not only fun. Thi- OMG ING NOOB PYRO'S KILLING ME AGAIN,  THIS !!!!!!11
Paed;-;*this game includes* YATATATATATATATATTATATATATA
JAME5_;-;You click on other man and win hats for it. Is good. Is free. I like.
Mr. Bk;-;Buy this game because it is awesome.
= ocu = Mrs.Roxy;-;awesome game alot of excietment and good way to make friends
Dee Jay Foxxy 8days;-;The best game there ever came into my life.
Maridea;-;This game excells in being a great classic red VS blue game, with all of its customization and new features being released (which i love about games), it gives you a variety of playstyles from being a spy relying on your cloak, or a spy who relies on his disguise and backstabs. The main feature of this game is basically a TDM or Capture the flag style game, or even holiday events where red and blue will sometimes gang up to kill a boss. I don't actually have much to say about this game other than that it is a really good game that takes 2 teams fighting, to a whole new style of gaming. Overall i would rate this game a 9/10.
hazmanbro;-;this is the best game ever
Bisho;-;Team Fortress 2 is very nice free game. I recommended it to all gamers and ages. Thanks Valve so much.
Stig Helmer;-;best ham this year 10/10
(   | Delsin Rowe;-;yea get it
Maridea;-;This game excells in being a great classic red VS blue game, with all of its customization and new features being released (which i love about games), it gives you a variety of playstyles from being a spy relying on your cloak, or a spy who relies on his disguise and backstabs. The main feature of this game is basically a TDM or Capture the flag style game, or even holiday events where red and blue will sometimes gang up to kill a boss. I don't actually have much to say about this game other than that it is a really good game that takes 2 teams fighting, to a whole new style of gaming. Overall i would rate this game a 9/10.
MagicC4ke;-;This in game is like taking a  after holding it for a long time. ing great. This game is just so ing amazing you can Conga with the enemy team and make your character look like a fairy. 10/10 ing amazing
[Hunie] Nikki Ann-marie;-;Great game 5 stars :)
Flustig;-;is free to play no p2w $1,876.04 spent so far 10/10 would empty my wallet again
SirCthulhu#RIP Mr. Iwata;-;One of the best multiplayer FPS game out there !! This game has a ton of items , hats ,costumes and more . This is a good game to play with friends especialy MvM (mann vs machine) I recomend this game to people who like to play with friends and those who like fps games. There are many more reasons why this game is a 9/10! Try it becouse ITS FREE!!
Matt;-;Hours of fun!
Meaty M8 Blaze It;-;Greatest FPS known to man. Play for free, and then watch as your money flies from your grasp and into Volvo's pocket. At least you have nice hats now. 10/10
Cook;-;Well... How do I talk about a game which dosen't really have a purpose? How do I convey the hours of enjoyment I've gained... if I haven't been doing anything useful. This game... now this game is not a first person shooter. It is a hat simulating, conga lining, unusual trading, strange gathering, killstreak hoarding, taunt collecting piece of beautiful magic that we are lucky to have graced the earth. Deeper into the game you encounter hours of fun which are never the same no matter what you play! This my friends.. is the only game in my WHOLE STEAM LIBRARY THAT I PLAY. not to mention that its free. (If you want to be a gibbus noob) One thing i must say: download this game. It's not serious; its a joke. but its the best joke ever told.
Kyokuru The Angelic Burster~;-;Amazing FPS if you ask me, various classes each of which specialize in different weaponry, tons of Weapons, Hats and more! Fun game modes too like CtF, Hardpoint, Payload and more. Id reccomend this game to anyone new on Steam, it helps getting used to Trading, Cards, Ingame Purchases, Refferals, Friends and more! 5/5 10/10~
Swate;-;Haven't written a recommendation yet - I must've been too busy playing the game! Seriously though, with 800+ hours of gameplay I can safely say this is my favourite FPS game. In fact, it's the only one I really find interesting - it's got that surreal quirk to it, the award-winning Pixar-like art style, and of course the fact that it records all of your stats. My OCD is pleased with that. I'd definitely recommend giving this a go. Even if you don't like it (which I highly doubt) you can just uninstall it and you won't have lost any money as it's completely free. So give it a shot, it's worth it. ;)
Mr.Masaban;-;team fortess 2 is surprisingly a great game I had doughts at first that it would be a rediculase game because of the hat wearing,strange guns and hats with unusual effects but I thought wrong and now I am addicted to team fortress 2 I recommend =}
xTcR | Mr.Bill [CM];-;Fun and great game ( also free 2 play)
Lyraissad;-;Spent all my money on hats and now i'm homeless. 10/10.
Lemonbomber;-;Love this game. Definitely buying a headset has made it more social experience. If you get past some of the asses that just like to agitate people thre are some gresat peeps to intereact with.
ownosourus;-;Team Fortress 2 is, at heart, a gloriously simple game that's been created with style, panache and an undeniable love of gaming. It's the kind of game that you want to show to people who don't play games so that they understand and then either get involved or go away. There is life before Team Fortress 2, and there is life after. After is better.The action is fast-paced and furious, the game's presentation is hilarious and exciting and the gameplay is very easily approachable.Team Fortress 2 is a beautifully designed game with a visual style reminiscent of old Warner Brothers cartoons, and battles that combine strategy with frenetic action.
Zero-One;-;Team Fortress 2- Absolutely no words can express what I feel about this game. Main reason is I have mixed feelings about this game. Its a great First Person Shooter game, with many servers allowing you to customize your character. The downside to this game is the creator's will to continuosly aim the game towards a money-making process. So much of this game is money-oriented, its quite sad and ruins the cartoonish aspect the game provides. But besides that, this is one great game that would not disappoint. Through the hours I have logged, I have spent countless hours playing competitively, casually, and even just sitting there and helping coach other players. Its a fun game, and I really do love the time playing it. The cartoonish feeling and effect has a major voice in my opinion. Reason being is just that after coming home from a long day of work, the cartoonish characters, with all their personalities, is a real pleasure to see. Would recommend you get it. (Its free!)
~  ~;-;You don't actually have to spend money on this Free FPS! 20/10
LinkTheSniper;-;Team Fortress 2 (TF2) is one of the most popular games ever, especally in the FPS (First-Person Shooter) catagory, there's 9 Classes to play as, all with diffrent playstyles, peranalitys, weapons, or something funny to say, in genral, TF2 is a must have, if your on a computer you own, there's absolutely no reason to NOT own this game.
PootisPAW!;-;Funniest way to waste your time!
derpy eleventy;-;many team such fortress much hats
CAT JOKE;-;It's ok I guess.
Dylanthony;-;Why this game so addictive
Spy Crab Wolf;-;10/10 best game since conga update.
GFed Shiro Pant~;-;Best free,multiplayer fun you will EVER have...
ipodragon;-;Endless replayability value from overall a simplistic game. The community contributions and custom game modes really add to the experience. Oh, and hats.
VeTaL;-;Musttry for everybody.
Naivii-;-;Kids,Kids everywhere.
The Duke;-;I tellya folks, after fighin at the Alamo along side that pompus wind bag Travis, this game is a pure joy, i reckon.
Jeefk0;-;Give it a try. For hats at least.
wadie (WOLF);-;an awesome game .... yeah but JUST GIVE ME L4D2
FlippyTheHippy;-;This game can be anything. You want horror? You got Slender-Fortress. You want Hilariousness? Well it's everywhere... Action? Yet again everywhere... Want brony stuff (Why did i put this here?) It's there too. Theres EVERYTHING! Including little annoying kids. 8/10 Too much Fortress ~IGN
Dange3z;-;ghetto people attacked me in voice chat
Nuclear Kangaroo;-;Extremely fun class based FPS, but what are you waiting for?, ITS FREE, go get it already
Fish and Chips;-;I only played it a little, but its okay.
Errand boy;-;I dont know if youre going to believe me, but... this game has hats. btw have you seen my wallet?
itchy nose;-;this game sucks cuz i cant quickscope ppl and there are op guns and spy is op cuz he can 1shot u and the othr classes r just bad
flapjack;-;Best online fps game on pc, the most fun you can get for a f2p game.
Xeonimus;-;Team Fortress 2 is a Fantastic Game Where The Point of The Game is To Kill Everything That Moves There Are 2 Teams Red and Blue There Are Different Classes and Game Modes Classes: Scout Soilder Pyro Demoman Heavy Engineer Medic Sniper Spy GameModes: Arena Capture The Flag Control Point King of The Hill Man V.S Machine Payload Payload Race Training Mode And Mod Maps (Saxton Hale etc.) Each Class Has There Own Ups and Downs Overall Team Fortress 2 (TF2) Is A Really Great Game For When You Want To Just Have Fun With Your Friends or When You Want To Kill Stuff
TJ;-;hats
Lanky Kong;-;hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats misc misc hats hats hats hats hats hats hats
Munzch;-;This game has been a constant source of entertainment for me for a long time. It is a lot of fun for the competitive gamer, the casual player, or any junior economist. Not only is the shooter gameplay fun as all hell, the trading and the economy will keep you coming back to find that ONE GUY WHO WILL BUY YOUR SMOKING STATELY STEEL TOE UGHH This game has been around for a long time, and in my opinion, it is starting to die a little. The developers have choices, now. Should they keep satisfying dumb hype, or should they change the game entirely? Needs: New gamemodes New maps Better support for competitive All in all though, if you have not played this game yet, you need to. It's a game that, while kinda hard to understand at first, will definitely keep you coming back for more. Team Fortress 2 is an experience that all gamers need to try at least once... or twice... ...or forever... 9/10 would be 10/10, but devs are slacking
Derpy Dan | trade.tf;-;Excellent game a must play.
Uncle Magic;-;My name is Gaben yo. Team Fortress 2 is free to play. Yet to play Team Fortress Classic you have to pay. But anyways, this game is gr8, I swear it ain't b8, m8. 88/8 get it, it's your f8.
Rat King (King of the Rats);-;this isnt minecraft
Captain Vitaliz;-;It's a FPS game tagged with "Hats", "Hat Simulator and "Fashion". What's not to like?
Eggsy;-;Less than average the amount of Russians. 10/10.
~Doktor Panic;-;One class defeats the other, There is never an overpowered class when you know how to use them all.. I preferably, love Soldier, Pyro, Medic, Demo, Scout, and Spy, All to which require skill.. The game is quite fun because you can do all sorts of things and not only PVP, Such as.. SlenderFortress, Rocket Jumping(Which is one of my favorites), Mann Vs. Machine, and so much more!! This game by valve has been quite successful ever since its release and would continue playing it!! If you're new to the game, i recommend you playing CTP or CTF, maps, You won't regret it! (:
maelstrom * I AM RNG;-;Yes I recommend this game. TF2 is pretty good and it's free. If you're on Steam and you don't have it, get it now.
[TKCA] RealCat;-;absolutely amazing multiplayer FPS, bustling with players. a gamemode for everyone, whether you like capturing flags, capturing points, pushing a cart, or more! tons of community-made maps, a friendly community, and a great community-based item economy! 10/10, reccommended for anyone!
Andrew;-;Perhaps the greatest game available that is free to play. Highly addicting and entertaining. You are bound to not be bored.
Freshnez;-;Senp more than 1500 hours in this game...and to be honest i dont even regret a second. This game just has something that will never make you bored,graphics are pretty good,sounds excelent...and even if you do get bored playing one class you got 8more!
naked suicidal polakanakian;-;Team Fortress 2... where to begin, you were the game we as a community needed. You didn't care about the generic shooters and made something so interesting, addictive and fun. Life was awesome at your early years... but then the bronies struck. The bronies were unrelentless in their assault, roaming in packs, server to server to give every unsuspecting player autism as they spread their "love and tolerance" to our precious, fragile community. They began to take root in your server lists with maps like "trade_bronycraft" which to this day have given me a huge traumatic experience, with your dumb high value in game item but have little to contribute in gameplay. But that's a ludicrous topic, Team Fortress 2 skill is based on your hats' value and if you owned items with little "value" you were shunned by these low lifed basement dwellers. The community had to accept the fate that their precious Team Fortress had succumbed to, they tried to tend to the damage the neckbeards had caused. But then the salt was poured on the fresh wound, the weeaboos came. As if some coordinated strike from the scumlickers of the internet, the weeaboos steamrolled throughout the already diminishing community, morales were low; such a dark time. It almost happened instantly, the game was flooded with autistic splash damage mains with their pockets, spamming binds like the Lenny, renaming their items to names that were almost as original as their characters. Currently the assault of these degenerates continues, will the game that fell from such grace ever regenerate into the jewel that Valve had uncovered? Only time will tell. I rate this up due to the fun I've had from this game.
TV's Rob;-;this game ruined my life
Charleytank64;-;like any online multiplayer it takes a certain amount of time to get really good at it this one looks fun has a lot of settings in game and in the menu and I like a lot of settings I would recommend this game to anyone it's a lot of fun.
Kassel3;-;My hours say it all In honor of this new update 10/10 ducks
Banana;-;You could play upon hours upon hours of this game without stopping thats how great it is. Also with the almost endless amount of stuff you could get on this like hats or weapons or crates that you can unlocks or find. Just endless amounts of play time that you can do.
-- Sgt Doe Crits;-;People asked me alot, why I play this game, they mostly say: "Geez, such bad graphic." or "What's that for a kind of shooter? Not even realistic like Call of Duty." But I tell you why I play this: This game is called TEAM Fortress 2, so it basically has a teamplaying role, something what many shooters don't have. To get more into detail: This game IS a bit surrealistic, but that makes more fun. TF2 is a game for FUN, you can work together or against and still play relaxed. The "role-playing" with the 9 classes makes a perfect synergy with the term TEAM, so you wont get bored by doing always the same thing and you can help each other out by just doing something different. Another thing which is good in this game is that you can first TRY the game, so its a Free-to-play game and gives beginners a good chance to try it out. And if they like it, they buy something and get premium, so they can have full access to the game. (and for you F2P-haters... be honest, 70% of all TF2 mercs were F2P when they started, so still calling F2Ps n00bs is a bit respectless...) There are so many more reasons why this game is actually good, but if you want to know more about the game, just try it out! It's free for everyone and has a lot of gamemodes to play for you and your friends and so on. So try this No.1-hat-simulator-game from Valve out and THEN you can shout at it :)
BillyTheFish;-;Quite simply, this is THE best multiplayer FPS of all time. If you're on Steam and you don't have Team Fortress 2 in your game collection, you cannot call yourself a gamer - it's THAT essential. Perfectly balanced, infinitely playable and as addictive as a chocolate-covered crack cocaine sandvich, this is as much fun today as it was when on release. And what's more, it's FREE! Some may bemoan the cartoon aesthetic, but if you wan't depressing realism, go play the tediously repetitive CS:GO. For me, this is by far the most multiplayer fun you can have with a mouse in your hand. Get this on your system and get playing. You won't regret it...
Papa John;-;A fun game when you get into a good server, which is not hard. Multiple classes makes it easy to find something you enjoy playing, and the amount of items alloted to you are immense and ever-expanding.
RaichuTaco;-;TF2 is a bloody game for kids but you will like taunts if you sneek your parents
Pussy Wizard;-;I love this game so much it is the best ever if only i could put it in my bumhole then i would
Wait who got rekt?;-;T F 2 ( Team fotress 2 ) is probaly one of the best F2P games i have EVER encountered, Its got classes, custom maps, tradeble items and even play GMOD GAME MODES! Its just an epic fast paced game! I HIGHLY RECOMMEND TF2 FOR ALL AGES I GIVE IT A 9/10 also a 10/10 for hats
Mr. Yoru the Fox (On me Holidays;-;best game out play it
[DAGO] Ventastic;-;It's good.
newton;-;its  10/10
Joezapy;-;I have spent at least $50 on this game. AND ITS FREE. 10/10 I GIVE IT A FOURTEEN.
MAN IN PINK;-;I love this game very much!!
Thug Newt;-;One of the best games out there. Crazy, random, fun, hats, unlockables, co-op, great community, never gets old, great and different ways to play. Go on get it, its free.
Roy Mustard;-;IM ADDICTED TO THIS GAME
Bunana;-;A really thrilling fun first person shooter game with new weapons and other cool hats.You can buy hats, weapons, misc, and badges.highly reccomend you try this game out. :)
CoinCollector;-;Probably the most fun I've ever had with a multiplayer shooter. Such a sweet art style too! Though I think it's gotten a bit out of hand over the last few years with the bajillions of weapons and other content they've packed in there. But, probably still a bunch of fun, just not as pure as it once was? Been a little while since I've played it.
mama diddle;-;i hate this game so much
ToastyMacRoasty;-;i wod hawe choose TF2 insted of my home :D Super mega epic fun super fantastik ultra cool 1000000000/10
Dancing Hoovy;-;When I was young, I was a big hat collector. Everytime I went somewhere like Walmart or Kmart I always bought some hats. As I got older and older, I bought even more hats. Soon though college came around and I didn't have time to buy anymore hats. Then my friend told me about Team Fortress 2, a hat simulator game. This game let all my child hood memories come back. 10/10 best hat simulator.
Oricalchos;-;This game is in my opinion the most addictive shooter. You have 9 completly different classes to play : Scout, Medic, Pyro, Soldier, Engineer, Heavy, Demoman, Spy, Sniper. Every Class has its own playstyles, which can also be changed by a large amount of different weapons for every slot : primary, secondary, melee. You Don't die so easy in this game, so you can play really hard, long duels against players. But never think you are indestructible. Something could kill you instantly. If you want to learn the game, you need to play it. You need to learn the classes pros and cons. After ca. 100 hrs of playing this game you will be able to learn the game. Give it a try, you'll not repend it.
Nuclear Kangaroo;-;Extremely fun class based FPS, but what are you waiting for?, ITS FREE, go get it already
Fish and Chips;-;I only played it a little, but its okay.
StaggerYeeYee;-;great game animations really great lots of fun, good weapon choises, extremely enjoyable, lots of game moads overall 9/10 suberb game :)
Poon's Dah;-;This game has been a blast from its action-packed gameplay to its unique in-game economy. This is the #1 game I play all the time. It is a great title and fun for everyone. Including the kids. I mean you combine a free fun game, with pyrovision goggles you get a great time for the kiddies. On the other hand for more mature people, there is its own economy. I have had so much fun exploring the economy in this game and I think its just great. Including the various different sites. Yet with its economy there are also sharkers, scammers, and phishers. People who try to steal whats rightfully ours. My first initial reaction to this game was it was just a stupid cartoon shooter. Now I think its the best game I have ever played and I shouldn't have judged this great game by its cover. Its fun for everyone, it is unique in its own ways, and it is probably the funnest game I've ever played on my PC. I recommend this game for everyone and all who enjoys a great game.
-=Anime Cats=-TeamPow S4pPh1rE;-;A nice war game, every time a upgrade comes it becomes better! Free to play, download it now! You can buy dlc premium account
GunLover;-;It's ok.
Boomy!;-;This game is fun for all ages. It is filled with lots of action and a massive multiplayer. With many different characters to choose from and getting to play with their unique loadouts. Their are also many different maps and categories to play from. Also, Valve keeps you updated with new things that were added in Team Fortress 2 and new problems that were fixed. All in all TF2 is an all around game for anybody and everybody to play.
Medric the Pocket Medic;-;Absolute ruin. I started playing this game just as a pastime, hang with a few friends, you know, enjoy myself. It has since morphed into the hideous spawn of Satan and obsession. I have since changed my name, moved to a new state, changed my hair, pretty much gained a new identity to get away from this game. No matter where I went, it found me. It found me and forced me to play it. I cannot stop. Play this game and it will be all you do. 10/10 would play again. Download it. Play it. Live it.
Transformographagizer;-;Best war-themed hat simulator ever
Lcky | Charles;-;Nice, perfectly balanced game with its makers keeping an eye out for bugs, exploits, and/or glitches in the game. 9.5/10
Magic?;-;This is the best game ever i love it not only the battles but the TRADING it's so AWESOME!
Snipercakeman;-;Even in this day and age, Team Fortress 2 continues to be one of the most popular multiplayer games in this day and age despite its age. Although not all updates are great (End of the Line...) the updates are what make TF2 a beautiful on-going project by Valve which will continue to entertain us for many generations to come!
Nel-senpai;-;10/10 would bang
{NBG} Cloud8745;-;A great game that became even more so great when it became FTP. Why do you not own this game already if you don't? All the guns and hats you could ever want await you in the magical world of TF2!
Keux;-;no one's going to read this review.
Jaden Yuki;-;Most Epic Multiplayer game EVER! This is now my favorite game! Eeeeeeee! Graphics! Gameplay! Everything <3
NMeister;-;This game is a must for ANY fans of FPSs or shooters for that matter. I wish most FPSs were half as good as this game is. It's free-to-play. Got that? FREE... and guess what? NO IN-GAME PURCHASES THAT MAKE YOU BETTER. This game is in NO way a P2W (Pay-To-Win) game, it is in it's whole goodness a free game that's easy to pick up and play, easy to start off with and always fun to play. The game has 9 different balanced classes that are excellent both in design and in gameplay, with each one changing your team's options of beating the enemy. With tons of weapons that can be gotten freely without paying, and are completly balanced, the game keeps throwing options of changing your playstyle. This game is great no matter what kind of player you are. Like to take it easy? Go as a sniper. Want to rush in and out before anyone notices and get in the enemy's faces? Go scout. Or do you feel like punching somebody in the face? Well guess what, there's a class for you (It's the heavy). With plenty of character, plenty of options, plenty of weapons and plenty of hours of fun in it, this game will not disappoint when you play it. So have fun!
FeralGryphon;-;Kill a guy with the flamethrower without airblasting him: "You bloody W+M1!" Airblast guy into air, finish him with shotgun: "You stupid tryhard, just go die" Join MVM as Heavy, upgrade some stats. "feral, join another class we have two heavies" Alright, I guess. Switch to Sniper at another players suggesting. "feral nonono i be sniper" "Well, you just told me to join another class. "no i didnt" Join X10 server with Flying Guillotine, kill a guy with it "feral hack kick pls" 10/10
PurpleFoge;-;TF2 is wonderful! I have been playing since 2011. I have made many friends and packed hundreds of hours of fun into this game. Thanks Valve!
Solar;-;ing brilliant, now back to the game
BeZrK;-;Great game, the animation makes it feel like your actually in the game! Definately recommend this great game and the best part? HATS >:)
nippols;-;This game is epic, one of best multiplayer games ever :d you will absoluelty enjoy this
Insane_Shinigami_;-;funnest game ive seen in a long time
DragonPC;-;Team Fortress 2 The Best Funny Game Ever ! Love IT and the Items and Economy Rullz and Kick  ! GG
ACR Aaron;-;10/10 i have never had so much fun in my life.
Pussy Wizard;-;I love this game so much it is the best ever if only i could put it in my bumhole then i would
Wait who got rekt?;-;T F 2 ( Team fotress 2 ) is probaly one of the best F2P games i have EVER encountered, Its got classes, custom maps, tradeble items and even play GMOD GAME MODES! Its just an epic fast paced game! I HIGHLY RECOMMEND TF2 FOR ALL AGES I GIVE IT A 9/10 also a 10/10 for hats
Mr. Yoru the Fox (On me Holidays;-;best game out play it
[DAGO] Ventastic;-;It's good.
[TSE]m1n3craftlvr8;-;I love that throughout the game you get items and cosmetics (or hats) and also that unlike some games i play you get more classes to choose from. I also like the crits and powerups you get during the game. However i don't like that admins aren't around most times if there is someone causing trouble or hacking. But Team fortress 2 is a really great game overall.
Sample_Loli69 (   );-;dis is a review. tf2 is a gud game. buy it, i mean, get et, its free m8. i mean, if u want premium on tf2, spend 0.49$-0.99$ for an item in Mann. Co shop then git premium. kbye. wait, im still here, go play Prop Hunt and Parkour in TF2 if u dont have GMod m8. kbye.
[MS] RebornIsaac;-;I played a bit, seems good so far
Lui Calibre;-;Hey guys this is an awesome game!
Swate;-;Haven't written a recommendation yet - I must've been too busy playing the game! Seriously though, with 800+ hours of gameplay I can safely say this is my favourite FPS game. In fact, it's the only one I really find interesting - it's got that surreal quirk to it, the award-winning Pixar-like art style, and of course the fact that it records all of your stats. My OCD is pleased with that. I'd definitely recommend giving this a go. Even if you don't like it (which I highly doubt) you can just uninstall it and you won't have lost any money as it's completely free. So give it a shot, it's worth it. ;)
Torte 'Birthday' Lini;-;A step-up from Barbie & Ken's Dress-up mansion!
OcculusTavia;-;This game is sadder than to the moon. Open 100 crates and you'll see why.
Swordfish_;-;0/10 this game is garbage
L1LAC;-;One of the best games ever made and never gets boring. ( Ive wasted so much time on this game help me) Im sure ill play it for hours more and you will too
Mr.Quiggles;-;It was worth the weight.
{xG}Captain 'Zo;-;What else is there to say about this game other than lot's of fun and exilarating moments?
soup.;-;The only game where 120fps can feel like 20.
Waxxer;-;Team fortress 2 is a very fun game and it has some bootyful hats.
Simply Eyolf;-;Alright, there might be some people with some problems with my opinion. This game was good until updates just came by and stuffed TF2's er3ctum with hats. I mean, so far I've only seen hats then some more hats, but then maybe by a little chance. Some weapons. But also. Trading... it screwed my life over. I started with trading a bit later and it was fun. Til I actually got this massive drop from MvM and got scammed by someone. So I started with the real serious trading. I traded for a year to get one single worthless unusual and people trying to scam me all of the time and if I didn't accept someone offer they kept calling me for a scammer/sharker. In my opinion is... this game was a good game once, but it isn't anymore. I'm leaving this game forever, it have wasted so much of my life that there isn't a single chance that I will jump back into the hole of darkness. My last words will be.... SO LONG SUCKERS!!! BAHAHAHA. Not seriously. Bye.
Twilight Sniper;-;I played this game for a few minutes and can say that it's really good War-Hat-Taunt simulator. All glory to the Hypno Toad.
Illuminati Lunchtime;-;Best trading simulator out there!
LaChLaN;-;Its a great game you get addicted to trading easily 1 tip NEVER UNBOX!! :D
Craptop Gaming <3 Trading;-;play this
Captain Farrell;-;Play it... its free :D
Chicken_slayer12;-;I wasted 950 hours on this game. I dont know what outside is.
Smajlo557;-;Best Game ever i played, all about work together with your team and getting hats,weapons,tools and many more thing. Also you have there so much game modes to play if i must rate this with points it gets 9/10 may i can rate 10 points but there is so many f2p players who speak too loud to servers and do crazy stuff .. i know there is mute button and u can mute then but you forgot to it so many times and thinks like that ... PS: Sorry for my bad english
Weegeetnik #RIPIwata;-;Don't try to find a reason to play that game : it's too much good to find a reason to play it !
ghit;-;BEST HAT SIMULATOR
Lez[GW];-;Best game every But VALVE DONT CHANGE TO MUCH!
Doctor of Tearable puns;-;the game where a simple hat can turn you into a god
LavaScript;-;By far the best free to play games out there, and game in general you will probably ever play I highly recommend this for anyone one looking for a good, free, and fun game, this game has become a classic, and will always be one of my favorite games, A warning though this game is f2p, but you may find yourself emptying your wallet on digital hats :D. The game constantly has amazing updates! Which is one of the reason its community is growing, and has been for 7 years so far!
CatoNator;-;Call of Duty iz for BABIES!
Sparkie;-;Good hat simulator 10/10 would get phishing links again.
tom288;-;The best free FPS
Saturn;-;10/10. Just going to leave it at that...
MetYa;-;Team fortress 2 is a good game, and here is why i think that, of course, this is only my opinion, but i hope i can be of service First of all, lets talk about the bad things Sometimes, you will run into a hacker or two, its not uncommon, you just have to report the player and go on with your day, reconnecting to a new server or telling the admins of community servers. Another bad thing is that this game is FULL of bugs and exploits, another common thing in all games. thats all i can really think about for the bad things so on to the good things This game is a great time waster, when you're bored or just have nothing better to do, you can spend hours online, trust me, i know (im proud of my hours logged, dont care what nobody says!) The community is usually very nice and fun to play with, sure you will find those players that are quite rude, but this is an online fps game that is also free to play, you will find -talkers. Another thing thats great about this game is that Team Fortress 3 is not needed, the community and valve are always working together to further this game and make it better for everyone, with updates fixing glitches and adding items constantly coming out. and last but not least, hats. lots of them 10/10 best hat simulator 2k07
[xG:M] Demonic Disaster;-;Best game ever!~ Really fun and a very big stress relaver if you want to bust some heads open from really rough days.
Jahan.IR;-;Its super fun game with a magic gameplay you never be tired of, because of vast variety of maps and classes game never get old and boring, can't say much more, ITS Absolutly fascinating.
Gurke;-;its fun and it has hats
Adobe Photoshop;-;Play on a 64 player, melee only sever. It's pan demonium
Medric the Pocket Medic;-;Absolute ruin. I started playing this game just as a pastime, hang with a few friends, you know, enjoy myself. It has since morphed into the hideous spawn of Satan and obsession. I have since changed my name, moved to a new state, changed my hair, pretty much gained a new identity to get away from this game. No matter where I went, it found me. It found me and forced me to play it. I cannot stop. Play this game and it will be all you do. 10/10 would play again. Download it. Play it. Live it.
aPhrix;-;This game?? It is the best hat simulator created on the face of the earth. No other game will surpasses this games addicting hat simulator play style. The purpose of this game is to show off your hats and collect them, once you download the game you will need to join a server. Once your in it you will need to fight against players with normal hats or flaming or sparkling hats, the latter will be the hardest to defeat. As a new player you will need to use your skills to ' Dominate' a person, when you accomplish this you will receive the legendary ' Gibus' which will help you along the journey to become a Team Fortress pro. 10/10 Best hat simulator will recommend to friends or family
DolphinPOW;-;The best hat simulator! 10/10
Pumbloom (TF:GO);-;Maps and sounds for servers filled my terabyte hard drive 10/10
ph!l;-;TF2 Stole my life and emptied my bank account... 10/10
MAN IN PINK;-;I love this game very much!!
James Dong;-;Cant. Stop. Playing. Please send help
Pikachu Power;-;Team Fortress 2 My Review Team fortress 2 is a free to play game with a lot of content to it even if you don't think you will like it you should give it a try. It is unlike most modern FPS's today and one of the only to have classes. You will not have to pay 1 cent to find enjoyment in this game. Hats are nice to have but can be gotten without buying anything. Most weapons are to gimmiky and you should not worry about except a few e.g. Gun slinger, Degresser, Dead Ringer, Gun Boats, Escape plan. Even today I play defualt scout sniper and heavy. You will get achivments at a steady rate and will not be urged to find new wepons. After 9 years of devolopment I hope it was WORTH THE WEIGHT. Like our fatty lord and saviour Gaben
Toroi;-;My hours. help. I wrote something for real! These hours are legit, I played this game a lot in the past to avoid some tragic stuff in real life. I was young and didn't really have my gaming consoles anymore because of my brothers and I had a really bad pc, which i still own. TF2 was one of the games i could play pretty well on this pc but with horrid graphics, but it was one of the more fun games I installed. I met some real cool and nice people on this game as well as people who i plan to keep by my side. The community back then was more humble compared to nowadays. You have competitive gamers who spam their bind keys with unfunny/gross jokes and very obnoxious people who are either yelling at you or telling you to do specific things to win the game. When really, it doesn't even matter if you win or lose. However, you also have those people who are really awesome and you may meet some nice friends along the way! Although you never know what kinda person you're going to meet on this game. In my honest opinion, if you want to have a game to just waste time on (and money) or just mess around with people you know (which is what I do now), this is perfect. Esspecially the mann vs. machine co-op. I mainly play that now. Although to me, the game lost its touch, update wise, and I moved onto other games. I believe it's worth a shot to try it out but other than that, I'd keep it as a casual game. I don't think the competitive scene is worth getting into anymore because it's being flooded by crude people. Atleast from my experiance after over about 4+ years of playing it just got worse and worse. You will eventually be tied into drama even if you try to avoid it. You'll be more stressed than actually having fun, I'll tell you that! Although in all seriousness, this game is losing its touch and probably isn't worth making it your main game MAINLY because the updates they've been releasing are becoming very dull and not as great as they used to be. BUT, it's a great game to just play to pass the time and have fun! All you'll really notice nowdays is...people really love to trade more than actually play. Living off as a free to play would be very tough and you'd need to be patient with items you would want, unless you got that MONEY! Hope this helps. One last thing, I am not saying this game is bad in any way. I am saying that it's worth trying and playing with friends, or even meeting people! Although there are some downsides that you won't like, such as some stuff I pointed out above. Strictly towards the community. I personally think you should have this game as a side game rather than your come home to play sorta thing. Have it as a once in a while game, because it's nothing to be big about, unless you really do not like most of the millions of other games out there. Just give it a shot and see what you think! Have fun <3
Vale;-;Can you name any other unmodded First Person Shooter that lets you play as a cocky and fast Bostonian that can slap the hell out of urine throwing Australian campers with a fresh atlantic fish wrapped in fine christmas lights, eat a bucket of fried proccessed poultry over their corpses, and then get hit with an exploding cannonball launched from an African-Celtic one eyed alcoholic who can leap yards into the air from his own explosives while weilding a mystic ancient talking ghost claymore? I thought so.
A bLuE cOw;-;If you bind forward to a button on your mouse, you can play pyro and eat at the same time
UnfunnyName;-;The vicious cycle of Team fortress 2 First when you'll arrive in the game, you'll want Weapons, tons of them. Then you'll see that everyone has hats, and you'll want these, a tons of them. Then you'll realize that hats doesn't matter, only skill count, so you'll want a lot of skills, tons of them. Then new weapons will be added, and you'll want them, all of them. Then a new hat will be added and you'll want it, cause it'll be fancy on your main class. Then you'll realize again, that you don't give a damn about hats, all is about is skill. Then when you have waited for 3 years, new weapons will be added, and you'll want them. And then you realize that you spent like 2000 hours of your life for this, met great friends, and you'll have a server where's you feeling like home, and you discovered so much things via the community, it learnt you so much. Then the rude reality of life, bring you on earth, and this game is here, Waiting for you to play 1,2,3... hours, and you'll be happy to see that all your good friend are still here.
[CotC] King Conga Gandhi;-;Oh, and if you're wondering, the new update, Gun Mettle, did NOT ruin TF2 for me. I actually find it a LOT more fun now! I think Jerma summed up this game pretty nicely... "Maybe you got like two Pyros that just installed the game ten minutes ago. They don't have any hats, they're spraying  and they're having a blast. They might even be at the wrong point. They might be going backwards to the point that's already been capped. On the same team, there's a Scout with a Hale's Own Scattergun. He's got 18 kills with a 17 killstreak, he just got 18. He's going 'I just got 18, sick!' He runs up the stairs, he's trying his  off. He's get *beeping noises* dodging the 'Oh, the sentry almost got me!' He looks up to his left when he gets up the stairs on Gorge and there's two sandwich Heavies having a ing picnic. So he stops for a second and goes, 'Two... nnnggh!' so he walks forward and gets blown up by a soldier's rocket next door... ...The two sandwich Heavies then decide to move their picnic. There's ants. 'There's ants here, honey. I wanna get out of here.' So they get up, they pack their sandwiches, pack up their lunches, and their breakfast, and whatever the  they're eating. They get up and walk toward the door to go to RED because they think, 'That spot near the A point for RED is pretty good.' They walk out the door, and they see four Level 3 Sentry Guns pointing at them. They get shot a million times and blow up, and there's like nine Engineers swinging their wrenches in random directions. The BLU Scout, at this point, respawns, and walks by the at least 3-4 statues because we all know there's four people AFK when you play this game, you go by the museum of people standing still. He walks out the door and readies his weapon, he's ready, 'I'm going to get another 20 killstreak, just you watch Gaben, I'm going to praise Gaben!' And he goes forward and starts shooting, and he gets backstabbed by a Spy that has been sitting with the Cloak and Dagger in the corner for at least the last 68 seconds." Normally when I do reviews, I turn into a critic and start to examine that game, pointing out every little flaw and pro and determining a final score. However, Team Fortress 2 (or TF2 for short) helped me make so many memories that if I actually tried to make a fair review on it, it would still be way too biased to consider a valid review. Team Fortress 2, is, obviously, an amazing game. The teamplay is necessary and going out and attacking solo may be difficult. You need teammates in order to survive and win. The graphics are unique to a shooter game and really makes it a special game. I'm not here to explain the gameplay or graphics or whatnot. I love this game because of its charm. The game has such a unique and diverse cast of characters, you can't help to love all of them at some point. Scout is cocky and overconfident. Spy, another one of the characters in the game, is technically Scout's father. Soldier is a crazed WWII American patriot. He never actually joined the Army, but instead, he had his own personal Nazi killing spree. His roommate was a magician named Merasmus, who grew to hate Soldier. Pyro is mysterious, but portrays the world as one big happy paradise, known as Pyroland. Demoman is a Scottish alcoholic who, due to Merasmus, lost his eye that is now haunted. Heavy, although he appears to be dim-witted, is actually very intelligent and looks over three sisters. Engineer is very intelligent as well, and his grandfather was a major contributor to keeping the war with RED and BLU continue. Medic isn't fond of normal forms of medicine, but is still an important member nonetheless. Sniper is from New Zealand, but was raised in Australia. He prefers working from a distance and his backstory is very similar to Superman's. Spy is the master of disguise, and is technically Scout's father, as said before. Of all the characters, he appears to be the most "mature" and appears to be the ringleader at many times. Not only that, but the game has an interesting story. I would not like to get too detailed with it. However, it makes little to no sense but is still funny, engaging, and gives TF2 much more depth. There is also a storyline that takes place a few years later where Mann Co. is being attacked, so the mercenaries have to defend it, called Mann vs. Machine. This game mode ties in with the TF comics, which explain many characters' backstories and is currently still in the works as of this review. The other comics (all of which can be found on TF2's official website) are all funny and charming in their own way as well. The community has been quite debatable on how nice it is at many times, but in the end, it's still an overall great community. I've seen people give out stuff, others mentor some of the newbs (something I do as well) along with much, much more. Yes. the game is considered a "pay-to-win game" but it isn't necessarily a pay-to-win game. With lots of patience, you will get what you want from the game, whether it be hats, weapons, or whatever it is you want. The game has a learning curve that isn't too steep, but become dedicated and you'll fall in love with it. No matter how many times you rage to a W+M1 pyro that destroyed your 16 killstreak, or cheer when you unbox an Unusual, or maybe discover a few friends or learn a few things, Team Fortress 2 has been a huge part of my PC gaming life and without it, I would be as bored as hell. I cannot recommend this game enough, and I hope that many more memories are made on here. Valve may be cash cows, but you can't help but admit they are amazing when it comes to making games. Portal, Half-Life 2, Counter-Strike, but this game stands out from the rest to me. Do I recommend this game? Yes, yes, yes, YES.
Nerd House;-;Team Fortress 2. Being ranked as the third most-played game [steamcharts.com] on Steam, Team Fortress 2 is probably one of the best free-to-play games we've got. Why is it so popular? Let's take a look, shall we? First off, the obvious: It's free. 100% free. This means its accessible to everyone on Steam. This is just the icing on the cake though. What really shines about TF2 is the game itself. Team Fortress 2 usually consists of two teams (Red and Blue) going head to head against each other. Sometimes fulfilling certain objectives or just downright killing each other. There are many, many maps and modes, such as Payload, Capture Points, and Mann VS Machine. But the general idea no matter the map or mode is to KILL EVERYTHING THAT MOVES! And my god, is it fun to do so. The game has 9 playable mercenaries, each actually being a certain "class". Each class is divided into 3 different roles: Offense, Defense, and Support. Let's go over each role and class. Offensive roles specialize in dealing damage to the opposing team. These are your main attack force. Scouts are the speedy hit and run class, with the ability to double or even triple jump depending on equipped items. Soldiers pack a bit more firepower with their rocket launchers, which gives them not only power, but mobility due to the ability known as "rocket jumping". The Pyro is great at setting the opposition on fire, as well as extinguishing burning teammates using an airblast. Defensive roles serve to inhibit enemy access and to hold enemies back from vital points on the map. Overall, the defensive group has the most firepower of all the groups. Demomen can safeguard areas with stickybombs that they can detonate when enemies come by. Heavies are great for mowing down incoming troops and pushing back forces. Heavies can also keep enemies in an area while whittling their health for teammates to finish off. Engineers can build Sentry Guns for effective area defense, as well as build Teleporters and Dispensers for logistical support of the team. Support classes cannot hold the fight on their own, but their specialized abilities can tip the balance in their team's favor. They offer the offensive and defensive classes an extra edge in battle and can help turn the tide of the game. Whether crippling the enemy advance from behind or keeping teammates healed, the support classes are always handy to have around. Medics are the team healers, capable of providing numerous buffs depending on their equipments. Spies are great for sneak attacks or eiliminating key threats. Snipers excel at long range, also eliminating key threats, as well as extinguishing burning teammates with jarate and providing a damage boost to teammates. Next, let's look at the presentation. TF2 has a very unqiue art style. It's somewhat cartoonish, but very appealing. It's simple, and un-complex. But it doesn't need to be complex. It's simplicity is it's strength. Everything is detailed enough to where you can easily tell whats going on, what a specific model or item is, and they all stand out. The soundtrack is also very appealing and catchy, especially the main theme. I personally have it as a ringtone/alarm tone on my smartphone! :) One of the best aspects of TF2 is the Steam Workshop. Users can submit designs for items and weapons, and possibly have them added to the game! A very lucrative sub-market has also emerged from this game in the form of the Crate Keys. That's a whole different ballgame in and of itself, so we won't get into it here. During normal gameplay on most servers, you can obtain random items, weapons, and sometimes crates, and taunts....through the item drops system. You can only receive so many drops per week, and you will get them randomly as you play. You can use these items and weapons to customise your mercenary's loadout, or you can use them to craft other items, hats, and weapons. You can take multiples of items and craft them into Scrap, then Reclaimed Metal, then Refined Metal. You can then use these metals to craft specific class weapons/items, among other things. The crafting system is simple yet robust, with lots of possiblities. Some of it is very luck based. You can take some very common items and end up crafting a super rare hat or gun worth a lot of moolah on the Steam Market! All-in-all, Team Fortress 2 is just a very fun game. Endless entertainment awaits when you start up this game, especially if you play with friends on your favorite server. Probably the best free-to-play game on Steam. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=383235670 Highly Recommended Be sure to check out Nerd House Gaming for more reviews!
Mr Squiggles;-;How to play Team Fortress 2: Be polite, Be efficient, Have a pan to kill everyone you meet.
pacsomepuppes;-;> I was only 10 years old. > I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. > I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. > Then I got my first hat, The gibus. > Suddenly everything changed. > I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' > I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. > I had so many hats, I loved them all. > But then someone traded me, I accepted. > They offered an Unusual for all my hats. > It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. > But no Unusual, He scammed me. > I lost it all. > I was so sad I cried for hours. > Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. > I went to bed after praying. > I felt warm. > I looked behind me, It was Gaben! > He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning Team Captain. > Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning Team Captain and I was naked. > I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. > Hats are love. Hats are life. TF2: 11/10 Best hat simulator 1981 Overall, I'd give this game 9 out of 10 Gabe Narwalls Shoutout to ObsidianObelisk17 for making a youtube vid of this Showout to TheDisableBore for making a comic of this I cringe re reading this :smug:
Flexi;-;Ruined my life and cost me over 500. 10/10 would recommend to friends and family
Special;-;Team Fortress 2 is the most realistic hat simulator created to date. There is absolutely no other simulator quite like this one. The first time you start the simulator, you join a server where you can play a minigame where you show off your hats and items. If you kill a person three times in a row in the minigame, you get your very first hat: the Gibus. This is where it really starts; To play the simulator correctly, you have to spend money in the market place, made by Valve. After that, while you play the minigame, you can find hats which you can trade for, or collect! There is many other people who wants to collect and trade hats, just like you! After you collect enough items and/or hats, try joining a trade server! There, the REAL fun begins! Good luck, and beware of ending up poor!
SpookyUNIT;-;Tf2 is a very good Free to play FPS, and I recommend it to anyone who is looking to get in to gaming, or also want to try something comical, as this can be quite a jokey game too.
ellow Person;-;I think I'm nearing 1000+ hours and I've gotta say I haven't played a game thats more fun than Team Fortress 2. Especially for the price! Not only does this game have tons of different game modes such as Capture Point, King of The Hill, Capture The Flag(Intel), Pay Load, Arena (basically Death match), And a Wave-Defence mode called MannVsMachine (MVM), The classes each have multiple play styles making them very versitile for ANY situation you may face. Get some friends together and this game can be a real blast. Once you find a 'good' server with friendly players you'll want to add that one to your favorites and *become a regular*. Usually regulars get benefits, which could include visual effects, auto balance immunity, end-of-round immunity . Some servers even have plug-ins that give your character an in-game effect (Good or Bad, like instant kills! or you may shrink down to ankle high, maybe a giant head? low gravity anybody?.. and anywhere in between!) I forgot to mention all the constant updates, Weapons, Hats, big community, Hats, promotional items, and so much more. in short: If you dont have this game, go ahead and hit yourself for not having it and start the download. Then Go make a tasty sandwich of your choice (don't forget to toast the bread), grab a glass of tea, and commence waiting for your next favorite game to finish.
Monkeyoi_;-;Pretty decent point and click adventure. Needs more ducks.
IceNoob88;-;An economical simulator which will make you want to pay to look cooler than everyone else and will make you want to spend more time to be better and make people rage. Blaming on teammates and your computer are also included as well in the package and you get to meet some rare species such as the vocal commands spamming dude, the guy calling everybody a noob and of course the 9 year old kid who needs to talk constantly. You will find very balanced skilled-classes like the mini sentry engineer and the sticky spamming demoman. Overall a pretty mediocre game, would definitely recommend.
ZaxWaffles;-;Hats. Hats. Hats. Hats! Your body will itch, Your head will ache, Your teeth will shutter, Your wallet will get empty pretty fast on crap load of stuff that this game has to offer. 10/10 Definitely would replace your girlfriend and make you a fat lazy bum.
|TC| Black Jesus;-;its awesome
Bonko;-;Scout: Run and Shoot Soldier: Blow People Up Pyro: Burn People Demoman: Blow People Up Heavy: Point and Click Engineer: Build and Sit Medic: Heal, Heal... and Heal Sniper: Point and Click Spy: Disguise, Stab, Shoot, Sap ... HOLY CHRIST THIS GAME IS AMAZING!
Sonic The Hedgehog;-;my fav fps ever. i highly recommend this game.
Sarmin the Charmin' Gooseman;-;TF2! What can I say about, awesome lore, gameplay, humor, talented and dedicated Programmers and Artworker, stylish trailers and even Comics and of course; the fantastic community! The flaws of the game are the overlong respawn time on the official servers, but the community server are mostly with instant respawn, so that is not a problem anymore! If u want teamplay to capture your goals or just wanna have fun with other people, Team Fortress 2 is your game! And Hats, looots of byoutiful Hats <3
Bloo;-;Get it now you ramen popsicle cream head. (Those are my favorite foods including that head.)
Miro_K (The Croc);-;10/10 Great for PC gamers all around!
XxDarkxX;-;That's Cool I love it!
SirJason;-;Just trying to get into it how much it is awesome.... im going to try out the sniper class *if that fails soilder*
KOOPS;-;Best game, takes your time, your money, and your bordom. With a huge community and a lots of interesting gamemodes!
Camera Man Dan;-;sometimes i like to stick my nipples in hydrogen chloride
chase;-;waste all your money
The OCD Pikachu;-;This game is a really fun massive FPS Multiplayer game and is perfect for getting cool hats, making new friends, and finding new weapons such as milk, cool pistols, etc. If you like silly FPS games, this one is the one for you.
Miknew;-;It's ok I guess.
soul-eater125;-;This game is so awesome! Everything about it is just great! Everyone should give it a try.
Bones;-;Goat Simulator 2014 is so this year. Hat Simulator 2014? Now that's what I'M talking about!
moop | tipofthehats.org;-;lol this game sucks
Doggay;-;Everybody has it. There is no point reviewing it.
[HK] Obby Senpai;-;Its a good game play it
Din;-;Very nice game!!! Now i can't work normally XD
Drayano;-;The most amazing f2p I have ever experienced. Balanced gameplay across all 9 classes. Hats.
Commadore Carrion;-;Can run around with a ham and smack people. 10/10
Jmar;-;this game is awesome it is a firstperson shooter and has accessories like hats and weapons.This game also has gamemodes like man vs machine,capture the flag,arena,and control points.
Helper Cameron's Brother;-;By far, the best Free-To-Play FPS out there. Need I say more? I need to? Really?.. Alright, if that's what you want. In all my days I have yet to come across a game quite like Team Fortress 2. And by that I mean; "Holy crap this is the best thing ever 1337/10 -IGN all hail Mighty Gaben #Conga4Days #Fabulous #NoFilter #Medic4Life #SaveTheSpyCrabFoundation #Pootis #MeeM #SeduceMe #TeleportedBread #Archimedes #Oktoberfest" With regular updates containing cosmetics, weapons, maps and the like; I don't feel Valve will be stopping the TF2 Train anytime soon.
RD SnPz;-;There is no better FPS game to have fun on!
ArrogantLemons;-;Hats. I like hats. This has hats. Hats are good. Hats...? hats. We can agree? Hats.
Faraz;-;It's free and it's fun, what more do you want!?
Chairman CanadaBall;-;Grabbed a rocket launcher and jumped around. Picked up a sniper rifle and killed some people. Riddled unsuspecting people with syringes. Lastly I set a ton of people on fire. After that I picked up tf2 and played over 1000 hours Pretty good gameplay 10/10
That Kid From Texas;-;This game is great funny fun funky I give it a 10/10 -Pug games
Equinox;-;I can practise setting people on fire and splitting their skulls open with barbed axes before I do it in real life. Thanks Valve :D
white_waluigi;-;I'm not even sure if i should really recommend it. IT WILL CONSUME YOURE LIFE! I could've cured cancer by now!
[TSE]m1n3craftlvr8;-;I love that throughout the game you get items and cosmetics (or hats) and also that unlike some games i play you get more classes to choose from. I also like the crits and powerups you get during the game. However i don't like that admins aren't around most times if there is someone causing trouble or hacking. But Team fortress 2 is a really great game overall.
Sample_Loli69 (   );-;dis is a review. tf2 is a gud game. buy it, i mean, get et, its free m8. i mean, if u want premium on tf2, spend 0.49$-0.99$ for an item in Mann. Co shop then git premium. kbye. wait, im still here, go play Prop Hunt and Parkour in TF2 if u dont have GMod m8. kbye.
[MS] RebornIsaac;-;I played a bit, seems good so far
Renegader;-;Hats, hats, hats, and more hats!
Pepe.;-;Very good game. Quality graphics, and more!
Destrominator;-;The best game ever...so far it is cool scout is mah favorite
Coala;-;it's a fine game
[OFM] EnergeticMooMoo;-;I LOVE THIS GAME! A really fun game that feels like it has the right mechanics to be one of the most popular games in the world. Sadly, it isn't. But seriously, it's free... SO BUY IT!
TaydolfSwiftler_;-;Duck, Bread, and hat simulator have crashed... 11/10 look at my hours please god ing help me
Bill Nye The Science Guy;-;It's almost hard to review this game. Most of what I say has been said many times before. This is an amazing game. Despite any glitches or bugs this game has, it is always fun. It has an incredibly unique multiplayer fps experience that is absolutely unrivaled. It doesn't even really compare to CoD, Battlefield, or Counter Strike. Valve never lets players down with new content and is always changing any sort of metagame or unused aspect. This is the shortest way I can describe how great this game is, and for free it is almost impossible to not at least try it. Give it a go if you haven't. It might not be for everyone, but you won't know unless you try.
TheSilverMonocle;-;The only game that if you are terrible at it, you probably always will be. Love it so much. Everybody must be squealing with delight about the fact that it is FREEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE 10/10
Jinzo;-;Amazing just flat out awsome.
Nyc2x;-;It's a perfect game. You are always updated with new releases incredible. This game is very fun, with different characters and balanced. Game : 9.0/10 Graphic : 9.0/10 100% Achievement : Easy | Medium | Hard | Very Hard
The Funky Sage;-;This game is simply fun like really fun from the classes who have their own unique personalities making them come to life while experience the game each with their own playstyle that is both enjoyable and a blast to learn and play the cosmetics only sweeten the deal making everyone look and feel different and not bland like most shooters out there overall if you enjoy a good time and like free things with a lot of content this game is for you I hope this helped and I really Hope you enjoy this game Also it has hats.....who doesn't like hats?
SnuggleBunnie;-;Corporate noise machine handling baby insecurity products to feed the self-centered social justice agenda, bypassing what we call FREEDOM in generation of apathetic disbanded trust fund babies.
Creechuur;-;1145 Hours / 24 = 47.7 Days. 47.7 Days Days that I have wasted to get hats with shiny effects on them and make the numbers on my guns get higher. Thanks, Gabe.
Mr.Tent Mc'Sassy;-;Very unique fps shooter, Provides hours of fun, and also has the best hats than any other game.
TheOfficialPortal;-;I highly recommend this game. Side effects may include drymouth, nausea, diarrhea, eyepain, assploding burrito craving, painful hands, swollen face, swollen tongue, dizzines, fatigue, farts, burps, drowziness, constipation, painful constipation, vomiting, y hands, earbleeding, and increased urination. Team Fortress 2 is not for everyone. Consult your doctor before use
Furno;-;It's a game about hats and... Thats it. Just hats
TVR | Cyvox;-;Team Fortress 2 (TF2) is the sequel to the game that put class-based, multiplayer team warfare on the map. TF2 delivers new gametypes, a signature art style powered by Valves next generation animation technology, persistent player statistics, and more. Unlike other "class-based" games that offer a variety of combat classes only, Team Fortress 2 packs a wild variety of classes which provide a broad range of tactical abilities and personalities, and lend themselves to a variety of player skills. Play as the flame-throwing Pyro, the room clearing Heavy, or the Spy, a master of disguises. Other classes include: Scout, Sniper, Medic, Engineer, Demoman, or Soldier. TF2 features the most advanced graphics of any Source-based game released to date  and the most exciting class-based action ever created.
|Bb| Bleez;-;This game can, and will ruin your life, 10/10 would collect hats again.
Uberrad;-;I was a looking for a decent multiplayer FPS game when I stumbled upon this. Ive seen this title before but didnt think much of it until I checked some reviews and gameplay videos. Now Im hooked! 5 Stars!
Wheel;-;Here's a touching story. I was playing as a medic on an attack/defend map and I was on the attacking team. During the setup time, I managed to build up my uber. As soon as the game started and I left the spawn, I immediately got headshot by a sniper and also lost my ubercharge. Thanks mate. But overall, TF2 is a good game. 10/10
Fun Police Purple;-;THE BEST GAME EVER
Adobe Photoshop;-;Play on a 64 player, melee only sever. It's pan demonium
uter36;-;I AM A POOTIS CHARGE!!!
PelikOala Mix?;-;you must play this game if you strat playing you never cant stop >:3
rill treasure;-;soooo, long story short, i played this game 4 like 2yrs, went to the hospital and pretty much died (a couple of times) had comas, strokes, siezures, everything that should've made me a vegatable ( and did for like 10days ) stayed stuck in the hospital for like 6mnths (maybe7) miraculously came thru the veil and woke up. I had to learn how to walk again and learn who my friends and family were again. Naturally, when i got out and couldn't remember passwords to anything (emails, steam, my laptop, nothin') betchyer  i still d/l'ed TF2 the second i got my new laptop, all i can do is gaze upon my former glory thru my old crew profile i managed to rejoin but im still ballin' (still lampin') and still enjoying EVERY ING MINUTE of Team4tress. i love you guys. (were hatz ALWAYS this cool!?) :D
Rikless;-;Get it. This game is so good even my nan plays it.
Wade Wilson;-;What's not to love about this game?
RiceKrispiesTreat-senpai;-;This gaem is 360spooky420you m9
SmiLee;-;TF2 is great if you like a lot of action paced First Person Shooters. It's nothing like Call of Duty, it's way beyond better.
Yoshino;-;Its a Fun Game When You have Nothing Much To Do
BirDd;-;I am now a fashion victim because of this game. 10/10 would dress my characters again
Gearturner;-;one of the best games i've seen yet, funny, amusing, and game play u can't fine anywhere else!
Mr.Quiggles;-;It was worth the weight.
{xG}Captain 'Zo;-;What else is there to say about this game other than lot's of fun and exilarating moments?
soup.;-;The only game where 120fps can feel like 20.
-=GHS=-Temper #iZEROFORADMIN;-;very swag hat sim pls make a 3 or ill kill myself
[OzzyGZ]NightStriker;-;This game is awesome I give 5 stars
QUBED;-;maybe you already have it maybe you dont but i absouloutley have to say download this game and play it for free bucuase the community is a great place to chat and stuff and there is over a thousand items to find and use and trade!
Kotori;-;Haven't played much 10/10 would buy $200 hats again
The Professor Bonk;-;this game is the best free to play game youll ever play
AKi;-;If you play this game, you're going to have a good time.
Fuzzy;-;TF2: 1. Awesome FPS 2. Epic trading system 3. Free to play!!!! Yes i do Recommend this game! :DDD
Poneh Anon;-;This game becomes more and more addictive the more you play it. It has grown on me man, now i can't stop.
MisterPixl;-;This is one of the best games I have ever played. If you havent already done your TF studies like I did, then you can view my message as an honest guide. But be warned all ye who enter! Ye must beware the money eating Mann Co. Store, with their lure in the form of beautiful, glorius hats! But besides that, its free Mother Fudgers! Its free!!!!
Derippe;-;Now that I have reached 2000 hours on TF2, I suppose I should make a review now. Unfortunately I suck at reviewing stuff and describing things. But yeah this game does have its pros and cons. Here's a few(by the way I suck at finding pros and cons too, so I just put the first things that pop into my mind): Pros: Mostly balanced (there are a few weapons that , in my opinion, need to be nerfed/buffed.) Easy to learn the basics Exciting (except if its CTF and both teams have a lot sentries guarding there intel, that's just boring) gameplay Many different weapons to choose from, so you can make a loadout that works for you. The characters have interesting personalities and have some funny things to say. MvM is also pretty fun. There are different mods such as VSH(Versus Saxton Hale) and Freak Fortress which are really fun, and chaotic ones like TF2 x10 (for those who never heard of this, its a mod in which the stats of a weapon are multiplied by 10). There's a lot more pros than this. I couldn't think of what else to write. Cons: Glitches seem to pop up every now and then, especially after an update. Some players of the community are jerks to F2Ps. The economy is a bit  at the moment. Players will sometimes kick you for no apparent reason. The price of keys( remember when keys were worth 2.66 ref? Yeah I do too. Oh, and you will only know what I'm talking about if you've done a good amount of trading.) I'm pretty sure that there's some more cons for TF2, i just can't think of any right now. Overall pretty decent game.
Edgy_boi;-;great (YYYYYYYYYYYYYYYYYYYYYY) 1000/10
Renegader;-;Hats, hats, hats, and more hats!
Noxor;-;Catching Game! :D
Lucarso;-;Originally, I downloaded this game simply for content in Garry's Mod, thinking I would never take interest in it and play it. I made a mistake. I started playing it in early September, and I'm very glad I did. Everything about it is so loveable. The less realistic, stylized art style, the map design, the gamemodes, the variety of the classes, (the satisfaction when you kill a really good player), weapons, hats and outfits, and the constant stream of community made items! In my opinion, it is far better than other FPS games on the market, and it's free! Without a doubt, I recommend this game to anyone who wants exactly what Team Fortress 2 has to offer, or someone who simply wants a game to be addicted to!
Ghost Nappa;-;This game is good
Baithoven;-;So, wanna know why this is better than Call Of Duty? 1. It's free 2. Who cares about logic? YOU CAN FLY! 3. Headshots on everything are too over powered. 4. Not a killer? No problem! Play medic and let your pocket mercenary cover you or just get into trading! 5. Still wanna spend money and play? Might as well buy Mann Co. Keys and use them to trade! There you go. My top five reasons to throw CoD Ghosts out the window. And play Team Fortress 2. (6. Charity matters. CoD doesn't give a **** about charity. Team Fortress 2 does. Just search "Tip of the Hats".
An Apple;-;This hat simulator gave me cancer. 10/10 IGN
duk;-;TF2 is probably the best choice for someone who likes playing games and not spending any money on it at all, because you can just find items by playing the game. Many maps and cool features make this game very fun and it hardly ever gets boring. Definitely recommend
A Fruit Shop Owner on vacation;-;If you like hat themed conga simulators than just give tf2 a shot :D
chiken teh MLG pro;-;This game ruined my life.
ShruGZ;-;ABSOLUTE BEST GAME EVER
Zhe;-;I Can Tell You What's Fun With This Game.. Seriously. To Troll? Get A Strange  Loadout (Jarate/Sydneysleeper/Bushwacka) Don't Forget To Put Strange Parts On That Sydney And If You're Rich Enough? Get A Damn Prof For That Really ANNOYING Sydney Sleeper, Just To  People Off :3 To Troll As Spy? Get The Enforcer.. That's Literally All You Need To Be Annoying As Spy. A Good Loadout? Your Eternal Reward, Enforcer And Deadringer, Your Best Trolling Loadout. Also If You Can Aim Well, You Will Eventually Make Players Cry And Ragequit ^--^ Engineer? Just Go Camp Somewhere, It's Easy. Scout? Go Tryhard, Dominate Everyone On The Other Team. Also Don't Forget That Strange Specialized Professional Killstreak Festive Holy Mackerel, Slap The  Outta Them. Medic? Just Go KritzKrieg With Your Friend Playing As Soldier With Beggar'z Bazoka/Rocket Launcher, Spawn Camp The  Outta Them... I Did That For 10 Mins A.K.A The Whole Game :^) Don't Know Any More Ways Of Being Annoying... Oh Right... I Forgot. When Playing A Duel Get 1 Kill And After That, Go Hide In Your Spawn Like A . Great Tips On Being Annoying Right? Then Be Sure To Rate This ''Guide''. I'm Used To Use Caps Like This When Writing.. Just Ignore It..
Jamie John;-;This game is SO ADDICTING! 10/10 would buy again.
TheOfficialPortal;-;I highly recommend this game. Side effects may include drymouth, nausea, diarrhea, eyepain, assploding burrito craving, painful hands, swollen face, swollen tongue, dizzines, fatigue, farts, burps, drowziness, constipation, painful constipation, vomiting, y hands, earbleeding, and increased urination. Team Fortress 2 is not for everyone. Consult your doctor before use
Meaty M8 Blaze It;-;Greatest FPS known to man. Play for free, and then watch as your money flies from your grasp and into Volvo's pocket. At least you have nice hats now. 10/10
Cook;-;Well... How do I talk about a game which dosen't really have a purpose? How do I convey the hours of enjoyment I've gained... if I haven't been doing anything useful. This game... now this game is not a first person shooter. It is a hat simulating, conga lining, unusual trading, strange gathering, killstreak hoarding, taunt collecting piece of beautiful magic that we are lucky to have graced the earth. Deeper into the game you encounter hours of fun which are never the same no matter what you play! This my friends.. is the only game in my WHOLE STEAM LIBRARY THAT I PLAY. not to mention that its free. (If you want to be a gibbus noob) One thing i must say: download this game. It's not serious; its a joke. but its the best joke ever told.
Shadow Zodiac;-;BEST PC GAME EVER CREATED,however i really hope valve makes the falsely announced new class (the guard dog). the gameplay with that class would revolutionize tf2 and pc gaming forever.
Matt;-;Hours of fun!
SirCthulhu#RIP Mr. Iwata;-;One of the best multiplayer FPS game out there !! This game has a ton of items , hats ,costumes and more . This is a good game to play with friends especialy MvM (mann vs machine) I recomend this game to people who like to play with friends and those who like fps games. There are many more reasons why this game is a 9/10! Try it becouse ITS FREE!!
Res;-;Sold my Dodge Charger to open cases and get items worth $0.10 in return. 10/10 best Debt simulator to date aside from CS:GO
apple cider (gone for summer);-;THIS is truly the most fun you can have on steam for free from the game itslef to the awesome community behind it TF2 is a must try game
Alhrguy (ON VACATION!);-;Free, fun, and did I mention free? This game only leaves me with two questions: "Why aren't you downloading this NOW!?" and WHERE CAN I GET THIS SOUNDTRACK!?!?
Marin City Thug;-;Review: If you like a cartoony animated FPS, then this is your dream game. It has good gameplay and the classes have their own strengths and weaknesses which makes gameplay very unique. Also the classes are made to work together to win a match. My Most Favorite Part of Team Fortress 2: The Halloween event is my favorite part of TF2, It's all crazy and very funny when you play on the Halloween Event maps. But the downside is that you can only play the Halloween Event around the time of Halloween. I also like the unique classes What I Don't Like About Team Fortress 2: I think the prices on many items in the shop are outrageous. They should also have more weapons instead of many more cosmetics. Also, there needs to be a more secured VAC (Valve Anti-Cheat) system because I have been in games where the hacker doesn't take any damage, I have played with at least 34 hackers in my entire time playing this game. Rating: 8.0 / 10 Really Good
Stratus GFX;-;I connot think of a reason NOT t get this game as it is completly free and you can only pay $ to speed up unlocks. Even on old or lower end computers this game runs very smoothly so dont worry. Why dont you already have this game?!
R.I.P. Satoru Iwata;-;My name is Douk. I shoot nouk kem. I only pay for keys.
Smeelio;-;This game. Is free. AND BY GOD YOU WILL ENJOY IT! AMERICA!- The BLU Soldier, 1972 This game IS pretty much the most fun you can have online. It's well balanced but still has a lot of variety between characters, weapons etc. and is pretty damn funny too. I mean, you can get a Haunted Haunter Hat! What else do you need to complete your life? And, of course, it's free, and premium is enabled as soon as you buy any item, even one of the weapons costing about 30p, and is with you for life, and enables trading, and by extension the amazing economy the community has built up over the years. To be fair, though, to ultimately succeed in this game you must own hats. Miscs, maybe get some, weapons help too, but seriously, get hats. You wouldn't enter the world's #1 War-Themed Hat Simulator and not buy a hat, would you? So, as we all know hats and, even better, UNUSUAL HATS, improve skill, this game is technically Pay-2-Win. But if you think you can handle the hattening, and you have ANY space left on your computer, get this. There's no reason not to. It's free (UNTIL HATS). And fun. So yeah. Buy it. NOW.
[] #CS:Fortress 2;-;TF2 is a crazy FPS where you can battle friends and kill them in one foul swoop with a frying pan, make a fat man look like dovakihn, make a one-eyed black scottish man jump across the map and drink a grenade, laugh over your bff's corpse, have a burning Top-hat, kill people with bubbles, get hats, and more hats, and more hats, and more hats, and more hats, DON'T YOU GET IT YET? HATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATSHATS
+Ezy --> Back in 3 weeks!;-;Awesome game with pretty much no skill cap. There is always something to improve, so it never gets boring. It offers a great diversity for traders, casual as well as competitive players. I had tons of fun sofar and I'm sure I will continue having it in the future. Can't recommend it enough!
Not even toot, toootterrr;-;Sandwiches and guns. Nothing could get better.
ggrey :/;-;Whether you like it or not, this game will eat all your money. It says "free to play" but in reality you will come out with 200 virtual keys and a forclosed upon house.
Cl0ud;-;TF2! Awseome game overall. A firstperson cartoon shooterwith its funny moments and Its competative asspects. GREAT GAME
Oliver_Street;-;this is hat simulator more hats than weapons in call of duty and battelfield has weapons and its all about the hats and the golden frying pan and this game is aweeeeeesome the best fps game eveer
Latext [ITA];-;I highly recommend it is a beautiful game :D
Pepe.;-;Very good game. Quality graphics, and more!
xy the Pirate;-;This game is a very well done game for a free to play Besides the minor flawsand glitches its a amazing game including hats,guns,taunts The possibilitys are endless on maps. So if i were you i'd install this right now !
Zhe;-;I Can Tell You What's Fun With This Game.. Seriously. To Troll? Get A Strange  Loadout (Jarate/Sydneysleeper/Bushwacka) Don't Forget To Put Strange Parts On That Sydney And If You're Rich Enough? Get A Damn Prof For That Really ANNOYING Sydney Sleeper, Just To  People Off :3 To Troll As Spy? Get The Enforcer.. That's Literally All You Need To Be Annoying As Spy. A Good Loadout? Your Eternal Reward, Enforcer And Deadringer, Your Best Trolling Loadout. Also If You Can Aim Well, You Will Eventually Make Players Cry And Ragequit ^--^ Engineer? Just Go Camp Somewhere, It's Easy. Scout? Go Tryhard, Dominate Everyone On The Other Team. Also Don't Forget That Strange Specialized Professional Killstreak Festive Holy Mackerel, Slap The  Outta Them. Medic? Just Go KritzKrieg With Your Friend Playing As Soldier With Beggar'z Bazoka/Rocket Launcher, Spawn Camp The  Outta Them... I Did That For 10 Mins A.K.A The Whole Game :^) Don't Know Any More Ways Of Being Annoying... Oh Right... I Forgot. When Playing A Duel Get 1 Kill And After That, Go Hide In Your Spawn Like A . Great Tips On Being Annoying Right? Then Be Sure To Rate This ''Guide''. I'm Used To Use Caps Like This When Writing.. Just Ignore It..
Admiral Jeffrey;-;This game is based around 9 classes fighting against another team of other classes. In other words a team based game. When ever you start playing you choose between a red or blue team and get to choose the class you want to play as. The classes are Scout, Soldier, Pyro, Demo Man, Heavy, Engineer, Medic, Sniper, and Spy. I reccomend if you are just starting to play this game, do not start with playing spy. He is the hardest class to master. There are also a variety of game modes. King Of The Hill, Capture the Flag, and Payload are just a few of them. Here is a list of the pros and cons. Pros: - Free to Play - Variety of Classes - Variety of Game Modes - Hats - Lots of Weapons for Each Class - Constantly Updated - A Lot of Humor Cons: - Some Bugs and Glitches Here and There Hope this recommendation helped. I encourage you to play this game. Thank You. "SCREAMIN' EAGLES" say Soldier
ShruGZ;-;ABSOLUTE BEST GAME EVER
Zlatan Ibrahimovc;-;It's a very ggod game, If you love funny guy (or girl). I love this game because its have more fun than Cs, Cod, and something like that.
YaDunGoofy;-;he has no style he has no grace this spy has a funny face he can backstab when he needs to and stretch his cloak out just for you transform himself just like a small crab this crazy class just thinks hes fab oh yeah
Hoboneer B>Craft Hats 1 ref;-;This is a great game, it's balanced and Valve listens to it's community, it has an active trade community and has been going on for 7 years now! wow.
crookedisland;-;Without this game I would have never learned the conga. For that reason this game is good.
neckbeard;-;TF2 has had a strong community for many years, and for good reason. beneath all the weapon unlocks and silly cosmetics, the game has one of the most balanced set of mechanics of any first person shooter that I have had the chance to play. All the classes are situational, allowing intelligent players to deal with a wide variety of situations. the health, mobility, and damage of each class is fine tuned to make sure there is no clear cut "best class", and in less organized games one can do well with any class given enough experience. each class presents such different game play that the replay value is very high, and there are many populated servers to play on. it also has a very active competitve scene, for when you feel your skills have evolved to the next level. overall, TF2 is still around because it is a great game and I would certainly recommend it to anyone who is interested in a fast paced first person shooter with some comic relief.
Scardnath;-;This is a great fps game. It has a cartoony feel to it which is not very common among most first person shooter games. However if you have played games like COD or other games with guns, be aware that this is nothing like those. It has specific classes with set weapons, all classes have weaknesses and strengths. Not recommended for people who like to play offline either as the training games are not the best.
DeathReaper;-;Hey guys :) im going to review this game okay so im going to do some pros and cons OR NAH NO ING THANKS IM GOING TO GET ME MOAR HATS
Hoovy Weapuns Guy;-;Everything is great in this free to play game. Even paid games are not this much fun! 10/10 Would recommend to everyone I meet.
Nnis;-;A couple days ago, I cracked 1600 hours on this game and HOT DAMN, I just need to say it was a game that sucked alot of time out of my life. ...Sure, its not the game I like the most or played the most but it's a really good game. One thing bugs me. This is supposed to be a COOPERATIVE TEAM-BASED FIRST PERSON SHOOTER. Not a DRESS UP / DRUNK / MANIAC / STEREOTYPE SIMULATOR. Well, I guess I cant blame myself since I have some pretty expensive stuff in my backpack thanks to this game. ...Oh, and theres a Robot Killing mode in it!
DJAlup;-;Best team co-op game out there. Just try it you will love it.
Demoman;-;It's really fun, and the most advanced F2P game on Steam. But. just don't be a F2P, as you can see people will critisize yiu.
Zeream;-;For this review, I will provide a timeline of the game that also explains where the game was and where it is now. BUT BEWARE; if you are expecting a game that is a complex team and class based first person shooter with an excellent and dedicated community that was this game back in 2011 or earlier. If you are a 9gag user or a LOLSOFUNYRITE gmod lover go ahead and play the game, you'll love it. 2007: This game was super, super fun. Vanilla TF2 was a revolutionary and addictive game. Silly and fun, but also with quite a bit of depth to it. Great game! 2008: New weapons are added to the game that add depth and variety to the already variable 9 classes. New gamemodes and maps are produced, adding variety (although this is team game, so community makes a good portion of maps). Since release, gmod machinima is made by the community for the game and other source titles which is primitive, stupid, but still funny for those of us growing up. Great game! 2009: More weapons, maps, and gamemodes. Cosmetic items (hats) are added. Okay, not very interesting but added a way of differentiating from dedicated players and not dedicated players, adding to the silly nature of the game. Bragging rights is always cool. Great game! 2010: Weapons are starting to get unbalanced or have skewed statistics. Mann-conomy is introduced, which was wierd. Yes, it allowed the cool concept of steam wallet, but it was a radical step away from the traditional payment model of the game. Didn't impact things too much, but the differentiation between dedicated and non dedicated players started to crumble. Community starts to take a downturn for the worse as gmod machinima has become extremely run of the mill and new users still thinking its and TF2's silly nature is the bees knees. Item drops are rare, but when you get something you can trade it for almost anything. Still, a good game, and great servers and gaming communities can be easily found. Early 2011: Replay update added a really interesting feature of the game, even if it was nothing revolutionary. Refreshed the content generated by the machinima community a little, but only by a little; the gmod community at this point is stale and the only things worth mentioning are a few diamonds in the rough. Game is good. June 2011: Uber update is released. Cool new weapons added. Game goes free to play. As of this point, existing community is entirely unsure of what is going to happen to the game. The ingame economy has gotten stupidly complex, there are way too many cosmetic items, said cosmetic items have some stupidly high value that does absolutely nothing for anyone since bragging rights have since crumbled after item drops became common and man-conomy update. Game is okay, but some existing game communities manage to hold it together. 2012: Hopes that free to play would do good for the game where not heeded. Yes, the game was more popular than ever but has become a time and moneysink because of community that is rapidly starting to corrupt since it went free to play. Free to play users become the overwhelmingly dominant playerbase, and make a case to belittle older players when possible, and drink in the support valve constantly throws them. On the other side of the coin, the immense number of free to play users are people who originally did not want to pay for this game and or are of a younger audience, and half of them can't or won't even hold a decent ingame conversation. Chatting becomes largely pointless and unfruitful. Lots of screaming prepubescents and people who don't speak english on voice chat. It is apparent that the switch to free to play was the nail in the coffin for many older users, whom are alienated and feel betrayed for paying for a game that has slowly, over time, become a game it was originally not. Well, thats not too bad right? Lots of new players isn't necesarrily a bad thing, change is good right? Well, the problem lies in that the incoming playerbase is hyped up on a game that realizes all the cool and LOLSOFUNNYRITE and LOLSORANDOM gmod videos which have become purely revolting and uninteresting (same exact stuff since 2007 folks) of their dreams, and act like it in the game; its sort of like every incoming user was from 9gag. The hosting community is not helped since many of the existing gaming communities radically change their policies and hosting format to comply with new matchmaking protocols and keep up with free to play, making the old style of hosting community maps dead in favor of "official" maps. This simultaneously limits the map pool to things old players have done millions of times and are dead tired of and destroys any motivation to make new interesting maps for TF2 which the mapmaking community used to make a point out of. Many communities and organizations that were formerly excellent bastions become obsessed with only generating revenue and gaining playercount and playtime statistics, mirroring the degredation of the cosmetic bragging rights aspect of the game. Weapon balancing is not improved either, since old classics are completely reworked and debuffed, and newer weapons are not balanced and have ridiculous statistics, allowing some users with certain loadouts to easily outperform an entire enemy team. As such, since 2011 a good portion of the original pre-2011 playerbase has stopped playing the game or plays it much less frequently. At this point, I as well stopped playing the game. 2013 and on: Game has continued to degrade, but I have not since played the game and feel that it is a completely different product than what I originally paid for. The lowdown: If you are expecting a game that is a complex team and class based first person shooter with an excellent and dedicated community that was this game back in 2011 or earlier. What the game is now is a free to play party shooter with lots of cosmetic items and a giant completely pointless ingame economy that is enivitably a giant time and or moneysink if you want to participate in it. The community is complete garbage. I'd be surprised if you found any gaming community worth sticking around for. If anything, this review can be summed up as: This is game is NOT Team Fortress 2. It is Team Fortress 7.3 or something.
[CVG]Anton;-;Not bad for a free game, fun and humorious.
Your Waifu;-;A very nice game with silly stuff, cartoony graphics, lots of things you can do and just general fun! 8/10
:Dave;-;When you first played it you may get bored because it is hard to get items, unless you could pay for it. But trust me it felt really good when you got an items, and when you killed people that better than you.
Sawyer From Security;-;Wasted 1000 hours of my life on it and also I got bad grades because of it no problem to be had here get it now maggots
inko99;-;this game is NOT free if you want hats. and you want hats. 7/11
AFancyFrenchman;-;Original joke about hats
berfap;-;Excellent game, the gameplay is awesome, the graphics are beautiful and it's free to play! I would recommand this to everyone.
Shafi;-;This game is 1 of it's bests and so I will like it. Why? 1) It's one of the best F2P(free-to-play) games ever created, because the concept of this game itself is just great. 2) This game is not as PTW(pay-to-win) as any of F2P games that I have yet encountered. 3) It is really a game that is build on cummunity and is great to play with friends, really... almost every item here from now included is made by community. I hope my comment to this game "Team Fortress 2" was somehow usefull, if you think I was wrong at some point please contact me. Have a nice day. Bye. THANKS FOR READING
cube the MAGICAL hobo penguin;-;expect to invest your college funds into this game.... 9.999999/10 <:
Awesome A/GamingforThought;-;This is a fun-action packed game ment for those who love to shoot things in creative ways.
XxPhantomMenacexX;-;You will have a great time!
eetnas;-;THIS GAMEM ROCKS AND YOU SHOULD TRY TEAM FORTRESS CLASSIC ITS GREAT
Weapons Specialist;-;Awesome game but I think I enjoy the trading side of it more than the playing side.
ShadowZiki;-;This game is Counter-Strike with hats and better guns.10/10 would hat again-IGN
Mysterious Ranch;-;I think I have like 700 hours in it, so...
Zlatan Ibrahimovc;-;It's a very ggod game, If you love funny guy (or girl). I love this game because its have more fun than Cs, Cod, and something like that.
LFT HL> Wainbow~<3 | trade.tf;-;Addictive and fun, Recommend dis
Mr. Nobody;-;Alright, it's been a long time since I decided to have a legitamite review of TF2 up, but I feel like it's time to bring one back. As a person who's sunk over 4,000 hours into this game, you're gonna bet this is gonna be a positive review. My old review was pretty damn cruddy in the first place, so I made it into a joke afterwards because it was the corniest pile of screws I've ever (very poorly) composed. My first point to make: The variety. 9 classes was enough for a ton of people to buy this game, even without hats, new weapons, or too many maps/gamemodes. If that's not enough, each gamemode has been updated to have atleast 3 maps, except for TC. TC only has one map, and that's TC_Hydro. The objective of TC is to advance a couple stages, capture the enemy's point, and protect yours. In other words, attack and defend (CP maps) minus the rest of the map. As mentioned earlier, a large amount of new content has spread around the game. With the sniper vs spy update, there came hats. Only a few, but still, hats. I wasn't there myself, but I can bet it would've been my new favorite toy. The weapons, which have been made at least once a year, are always a nice twist to the game. Adding a new form of strategy, offense, defense, and/or mobility, all weapons are a spice to that one bowl of noodles that make it seem like an entirely different game. My second point to be mentioned: How it was made. TF2 has an odd way of how it was first born, and how it eventually came to be what we love today. Starting as a simple quake mod made by 3 people, it's hard to believe that it became the TF2 that we (or I) love and know today. It grew pretty damn quickly, had it's own maps in quake, and was a huge hit in Quake, and Team Fortress Quake was probably the biggest leap in what lead to TF2's hype. Well, not TF2's hype. Valve eventually decided to accept them into them at their large success, and allowed the production of a game on the half-life engine. That was Team Fortress Classic. It was a higher balanced, smoothed, better quality game of Team Fortress. There's not much else to say about it. It's last update was 2004. The community had not completely given up on staying with TFC's system. A new game called "fortress forever." There's not much to say about it, it was a slightly better version of TFC. It never really did make it too far, considering TF2 came out only one month later. Since then, it has recieved multiple updates, changes, and/or tweaks on TF2. My third point that is well, the most interesting part of TF2 in my opinion: The lore. Yep, the lore. It's not well known to most TF2 players, and most hardly ever take note of it. Alongside the updates every once in awhile, TF2 always hides a little something that the community likes to take up on itself. The love and war update, for example. It had an ongoing line of hints that there would be an update revolving bread, and currently people believe there is a "engi vs spy" update coming up, based on game file updates. There's also comics that TF2 releases once in awhile. The mention of Jarate had a comic itself. I'm not going to go into much detail about the lore, because most of the fun of it is figuring the small things out yourself. The fourth part I, myself, find a major detail that TF2 really adds: Trading. Yeah, trading. It's gone downhill recently, and many are quitting because of this. I'm not going to go much detail about this, cause it's not really necessary in TF2 that you need hats, but being able to trade weapons and cosmetics is a large part of TF2. Being able to stem out in many directions, TF2's economy has grasped an interesting way to "donate" to the game creators. Especially Valve. Just know that when you buy something off of the Mann. Co store, the person who made that is payed, and you're increasing the development speed of HL3. The fifth part of this review is simply put: Community. Now, I can't stay positive with this entirely. TF2's community is, well, odd to define. TF2 is so far out there, that it grabs attention of a lot of people. It's jammed with weebs and bronies, not saying either of those are bad things (to everyone, I myself find both of those annoying at times), as most (MOST) of them stay sitting in their own servers. There's community-made maps, community-made hats, community-made guns, not saying that Valve's always too happy to accept those. That, or it's just trying to form a suicide pact. There are a lot of people in TF2, and it's hard to pinpoint what would define TF2's community, other than an ever-growing vast black hole, and it sure as hell isn't going down just because the trading is going down. The sixth and final part of this review: Extra stuff. If you don't like fighting in TF2, and aren't too happy with trading, then that's alright. There's tons of community created stuff that Valve DOESN'T accept into the game, that can still be ported into the game as a custom map, custom weapon, custom gamemode, or something of the sort. This can't really be put into a positive or negative form, as I'm happy with how some of this turns out, and some of it is, well, cannon fodder. Because the extra bits and pieces of TF2 are such a large piece of what makes TF2 so addicting, I'll be putting this into, well, just what it's meant to be. Extra bits and pieces. The weapons. These can be found pretty much anywhere. Whether it's on a times ten server, TF2 tightrope, hale, or weaponizer, most of these ideas are original, or simple modifications of a weapon. Most of these add a spice to it that fulfill a gamemode or class to maximize what it was made for and accept it as an additional piece of the game. When I say weapons, most of what has been claimed is well, a gamemode weapon. Yes, most of it's a gamemode weapon, and you have to play the gamemode to actually experience it. While it is rather strict, the TF2 community is always coming up with new stats, new models, and new ways to play the game with weapons via the workshop. The hats and cosmetics. This is probably going to be my shortest paragraph to exist on this review. It's via the workshop, Valve gives you examples on what to make it with, you make it, it gets accepted, you get some greens. Not paid mods, but, well, content that becomes official. The gamemodes. Whether it's forming TF2 into a horror game with a dark enviroment, somewhat scary unkillable bosses that crisp you alive; or dragging yourself against a slope at lightspeed with flashy lights and upbeat music, the gamemodes can easily turn what you thought was TF2 into something out of it's capacity. Now, when I say gamemodes, I don't mean non-competitive gamemodes. Those are gonna be in here for damn sure. Alongside weapons being added to fully experience a gamemode, there's also competitive gamemodes. Ultiduo, MGE, 6s, 4s, and Highlander. These gamemodes are also accomodated with websites with competitive TF2 involved, including UGC, ETF2L, AsiaFortress, and much more. There's badges, LAN tournaments, and bets placed on players that can easily turn TF2 into a fun non-profit game into a competitive, sweaty tryhard moshpit where you want to win with everything you got. Not saying that it really is that competitive, most TF2 competitive players are making jokes and get along pretty damn well in the community, but it does go large when the players make it. So, I guess that's my review on TF2, 8 years after it's release, still a large growing community with updates that supplies and endless amount of content that, well, does what it's made for. Scare you, infuriate you, or make you feel like you could dig your fingers into a tree because you play it so ed much, TF2's one hell of a game that I couldn't imagine ever dying out.
Trafalgar Law;-;NIce Game :)
PyroEnderSlayerSF;-;This is the first steam game i got and i was immpresed on the quality of this free to play game (in app purcahses may be required for certain content Hats >:( I love the MANN VS MACHINE I have to Comment about people saying that this game sucks because you get addicted to hats. It;s not True. Who Cares about hats if you want to waist money on fake pixelated items buy them all you want This Game still is one of the best games ever (plus it's FREE!!!!!)
Hoboneer B>Craft Hats 1 ref;-;This is a great game, it's balanced and Valve listens to it's community, it has an active trade community and has been going on for 7 years now! wow.
The King;-;To put it shortly, Team Fortress 2 is a competitive multiplayer FPS with a loose spytech aesthetic, and is one of Valve's more popular monetary juggernauts. It was originally released in 2007 and was included in the Orange Box. Players choose from one of 2 teams and one of 9 classes, and must fight to complete objectives for their chosen team that vary by game mode. They can choose from a variety of weapons to aid in their missions, and wear cool hats while doing so if they so choose. Valve are still generously and freely updating the game even more than half a decade after it was released, with new bugfixes, maps, game modes and weapons. They should, however, take a break - more on this below. Objectives range from capturing and/or defending Control Points, to capturing enemy Intelligence while defending yours, to pushing large bombs along rails to destroy the enemy base, to banding together and fighting waves of killer robots and more. There is a lot of variety here, to say nothing of the custom maps and unofficial modes. Some of these are more prevalent than others, however - not every mode fits the game equally well. Players are able to randomly find, craft, purchase from the microtransaction store or trade for different weapons that they can equip. TF2 is not strictly pay-to-win because you are not required to spend money to gain weapons, although it may be the fastest way to get them. It's also worth knowing that the default weapons are generally good, and most of the other weapons are sidegrades. (Most of them, not all - a handful are still direct upgrades for some reason.) New players start off with only 50 inventory slots for any weapons they find. If a player wants more space - and they probably will considering how many weapons there are these days - they'll have to go Premium with a one-time microtransaction purchase. There is also a much larger amount of optional cosmetic items to put on your characters, acquired in largely the same way as the weapons. These are completely optional, but given that most TF2 players want to look pretty there is a sizable in-game trading 'economy' that largely focuses on these cosmetic items. Of note are the keys used to open Mann. Co Crates, which largely resemble a form of slot machine - except modern crates usually give you something nice. Kill-streak counters that grant graphical effects, weapons with persistent kill counters, different taunts and, of course, more hats. This is also completely optional and frankly an auxillary game function that I wish people wouldn't pay so much attention to. Keys also serve as one of the 'currencies' in the 'TF2conomy', and that's how Valve makes money from this game. Don't be put off by the hats - Team Fortress 2 has some good gameplay. The 9 classes are grouped into three categories, which are more like loose guidelines and should be regarded as such: The Attack classes are the fast and double-jumping Scout, the jack-of-all-trades rocket-slinging Soldier, and the flamethrowing ambushing Pyro. The Defense classes are the versatile, bomb-chucking Demoman, the Heavy Weapons Guy with the huge miniguns, and the Engineer with his helpful buildings. The Support classes are the really-quite-important Medic, the Sniper, and the backstabbing, disguising, cloaking, sabotaging trickster Spy. Most of the classes deliver differing gameplay experiences due to their abilities and mechanics. This means that you can play just one or two classes that you really like, or switch between any of the classes that your team or situation may need. This is because the classes largely serve to fill separate niches, and an effective team will contain a variety of classes - with some being more generally useful than others. (Given the nature of the game, you're bound to occasionally come across majority Spy and/or Sniper teams, which can be funny or annoying depending on your perspective.) TF2's general gameplay is slower than its Half-Life mod forebear Team Fortress Classic (and the original TF mod for Quake), especially when you compare player movement speeds. This is however balanced by the more tactical nature of gameplay. Overall tactics revolve around frontlines and offensive/defensive pushes, with the Medic's bercharges playing a vital role. Long-time veterans have also developed explosive-jumping strategies for the Soldier and Demoman that can rival the player mobility of TFC as they fly towards the front lines. This is, of course, assuming that you find a server with skilled enough players. Lower-level public servers (including most of the official servers) don't usually have the camraderie. Unfortunately, there don't seem to be as many around as there was back when new weapons were regularly coming out around 2011-2013. But, that could just be me. TF2 doesn't take itself too seriously, so you should be prepared to come across relatively easy-going players and matches as well. If you find yourself dissatisfied or complaining about a game like this, competitive TF2 is only growing stronger and pick-up games or lobbies are good places to play more seriously - or even enter the scene proper. With all this in mind, you could compare TF2 to a sort of MMO FPS. It had persistent items, and gameplay experiences that are built the same but can play out differently due to differing player tactics. Try playing the same 5 Control Point map for a while and you'll see what I mean. One other thing to note is that Valve treats this game as a test-bed: an area for testing ideas that might not work so well the first time around. This is just a useful thing to keep in mind. I also mentioned that Valve has continually added content to the game for most of its existence - from 2008 onward - which is especially admirable since they've taken to adding community-created content. Unfortunately, most of what they've been adding for a while now has been large amounts of community-created cosmetic items. Since there's several hundreds of them in the game now along with oodles of particle effects, weapons and other things...the size of the game has ballooned and optimization has taken a nosedive. I really hope they take time off from their stated 'content first' policy to do some housecleaning. Until then, you'll want a decently powerful machine to play this on - but avoid NVIDIA cards! They don't like this game's distinctive phong shading effect. Valve's balancing act is not perfect, either; they continually make changes & additions that are not always wise and that some of the playerbase love to argue about. Overall, though, the game is usually balanced enough to have fun with. While I recommend Team Fortress 2 as a great game overall, I must also recommend you avoid the old Steam Users' Forums board for the game. It's an insular, morose community of whiners who spam dumb memes and tired arguments, and the remaining moderators seem to have all but gone into hiding. If nothing else about TF2 interests you, please at least take my advice on SPUF.
Sleeping Knights;-;is fun ;)
The Spooky Squirrel;-;Can't stop playing , I invested 90% of the money on this game 11/10
AltoCrumTato;-;If you came here for a review on team fortress 2 you have come to the wrong place. You did come to the right place if you were looking for an amazing brownie recipie. mmmmhh mhhhh mhhh delicious Ingredients -1-1/3 cups butter, softened -2-2/3 cups sugar -4 eggs -3 teaspoons vanilla extract -2 cups all-purpose flour -1 cup baking cocoa -1/2 teaspoon salt -Confectioners' sugar, optional Directions -In a large bowl, cream butter and sugar until light and fluffy. Beat in eggs and vanilla. Combine the flour, cocoa and salt; gradually add to the creamed mixture. -Spread into a greased 13-in. x 9-in. baking pan. Bake at 350 for 25-30 minutes or until the top is dry and the center is set. Cool completely. Dust with confectioners' sugar if desired. Yield: 2-1/2 dozen. Serves for 30 people ;3
cL' sandals;-;Over 4500 hours and still playing. Enough said. Best game.
hoovy's deli;-;THIS GAME IS AMAZING YOU MUST TRY IT
fuckboi;-;Great Game, Fun, Interesting, and also great to meet new friends.
tinydancer:(;-;I don't think it needs review.
SUNSHINE;-;If you dont have Team Fortress 2 you have bin living in a cave this is a great multiplayer first person shooter with different kinds of game modes loads of maps 9 classes a buch of weapons miscs hats all of the good stuff! The thing that makes this game great is that all 9 classes have there strong points and flaws unlike some other games! Get this game its fun great and if you get board of it you will come back in about a week to kill someone with that rocket launcher of yours for the LOLZ!
Vive;-;Hi 5'ed team member just as gates opened. Rushed out, f2p scout tried to shoot us with scattergun and missed every time. Dead. Capped point. F2p heavy opened fire. Spy stabbed him. Dead. On the way out, F2p medic tried to shoot us with the Medi Gun. Dead. Won game, never saw a single sentry from f2p engineer. Found him trying to shoot us in victory time. Dead. Met a guy with several Australium weapons. Played a game with him. Never moved an inch and flooded chat with trade alerts. 10/10 lovely community
Fily;-;1000 Hours of my life wasted on Hats. Im proud of my self.
RIP Requijo;-;69/69 would mix with tub of butter and rub on body until nips are hard
willy;-;You sort of get bored after the first hour.
CheezyWookie;-;Team Fortress 2. Three words to describe it are Addicting, Superior and Cosmetics The only problem is that once you buy/find a cosmetic you can't stop so unless you want this showing up on your screen 'R.I.P Wallet' then i recommend limiting yourself to cosmetics but unfortunatly my 'R.I.P Wallet' happend a very very long time ago... But I would definetly recommed this game to the ages of 8+. It is one of my favourite free to play action games on steam and if you do go on TF2 make sure to go on at halloween times because they are always fun So may the cosmetics be ever in your favour - The Elite Platypus
ayy.;-;I like this game a lot. The community is nice and the trading is fun. I always am anxious to come home to play right away for a while, then study. It's grown to be a part of my mind. Not big, but a part nonetheless.
High-Five'n White Guy;-;There's enough different classes, weapons, cosmetics and maps/objectives to keep the game fun and interesting for a long time, and it's always fun to play with friends.
dauntless.B>S;-;team fortress was a very good play
ansjovis;-;became complete  because of the latest updates 10/0 -IGN, it's like minecraft without blocks
darkmaster43;-;BEST SHOOTER EVER the only problem i can think of is the respawn time being random based on how long you have been alive for also when half the time i am playing i get killed by a melee weapon when was nowhere near the person who killed me
[TF2Ease] Currently down;-;i love this game i am bot bot loves tf2
Latios ();-;10/10 scooty booty men everywhere. burn them all
Tesla Coil;-;This game is unfathomably good. I don't even like first-person shooters, and not only do I still like TF2, it's actively my favourite game of all time. There are 9 classes, each with different playstyles, and each with a bunch of different weapons you can use to fine-tune the class to how you want to play. It's impressive how balanced the game is - each weapon has benefits and drawbacks compared to the stock weapons you have when you first start the game. There are a few whose benefits outweigh the drawbacks and vice-versa, and a couple that are literally direct upgrades, but you never feel like you're at a huge disadvantage by not having certain weapons. The fact that the game's around 7 years old and they're still updating it is incredible. The Mann vs. Machine update added a new game mode that's a sort of tower defence game. It could have been its own $20-$30 game, but nope, Valve gave it to everyone for free. There are some advantages premium players have over free players, but none of them directly affect gameplay - Premium players can keep more items and trade. Trading makes it so easy to get weapons and Premium can cost less than a dollar, so I really don't see any reason to not upgrade yourself to Premium. I guess at some point I have to talk about hats. They seem silly, right? Why bother making so much of the content have no effect on gameplay? But that's exactly why they do it! A new weapon isn't just about modelling and scripting. You have to make sure it's balanced and can't be exploited in any way. But hats and other cosmetic items can't possibly be 'unbalanced', so of course they can add a hundred hats easier than they can add one new weapon. Maybe they could focus more on weapons, but there are already so many as it is; you don't want to make it impossible for new players to catch up. So obviously TF2 is amazing. 10/10 would play again and probably will this afternoon. There are, however, a few drawbacks. TF2's normal devotion to balance makes it all the more glaring when something isn't balanced. The Soldier has so much versatility in his weapons that it's pretty easy to call him /the best class/ in a game that's supposed to be about teamwork. It's pretty easy to see Valve playing favourites with the Soldier. If some class has a weapon that players are favouring over the other options, most of the time Valve will nerf the over-used weapon (ex. the Spy's Dead Ringer). But for the Soldier, they'll just buff the under-used weapons (ex. The Concheror and Battalion's Backup). Giving the Soldier extra upgrades in Mann vs. Machine also reeked of favouritism when it's the Spy and Pyro who needed the help. One other drawback is that the store's prices on weapons has absolutely nothing to do with how rare / common they are. This isn't really Valve's fault, but it makes a lot of things in the store complete rip-offs. Suppose you want a Phlogistinator. It costs $10 in the store. OR you could buy four Keys ($2.50 each). Each key is worth, in the trading economy, about 100 Phlogistinators. I'm not exaggerating. (Phlogistinator: 0.05 - 0.11 refined. Key: about 8.66 refined.) Basically, once you know a little bit about the economy, you feel like you have to REALLY get into it so you don't get ripped off. Or maybe that was just me.
Zigunda;-;Came here for the steam community badge.
Cockblock anime;-;Pyrosharks, mini engies, battle medics, sandvich heavies, and then, worst of all, Arach.
RekTangle;-;eat sleep tf2, eat sleep tf2, eat sleep tf2, eat sleep tf2, its a viscious cycle.... PLEASE SEND HELP
/M_TPoDHB\JusticeSworDucky;-;really fun game
Scrub AFK until 7/22;-;Better than CoD. Although that goes for literally every game ever. I like it.
[Original]Eli | LFT;-;Team Fortress 2 is the best FPS games that I think is out there. The trading in-game makes the game expand and not only just killing people.
Pirate Cubone;-;TF2 is probably the best game on steam, hands down. With a vast community, ever expanding set of weapons, styles, and playstyles, its hard to get bored of it! 10/10
senpai;-;I like this game
willy;-;You sort of get bored after the first hour.
AFancyFrenchman;-;Original joke about hats
ayy.;-;I like this game a lot. The community is nice and the trading is fun. I always am anxious to come home to play right away for a while, then study. It's grown to be a part of my mind. Not big, but a part nonetheless.
Latios ();-;10/10 scooty booty men everywhere. burn them all
Zigunda;-;Came here for the steam community badge.
[TF2Ease] Currently down;-;i love this game i am bot bot loves tf2
Tesla Coil;-;This game is unfathomably good. I don't even like first-person shooters, and not only do I still like TF2, it's actively my favourite game of all time. There are 9 classes, each with different playstyles, and each with a bunch of different weapons you can use to fine-tune the class to how you want to play. It's impressive how balanced the game is - each weapon has benefits and drawbacks compared to the stock weapons you have when you first start the game. There are a few whose benefits outweigh the drawbacks and vice-versa, and a couple that are literally direct upgrades, but you never feel like you're at a huge disadvantage by not having certain weapons. The fact that the game's around 7 years old and they're still updating it is incredible. The Mann vs. Machine update added a new game mode that's a sort of tower defence game. It could have been its own $20-$30 game, but nope, Valve gave it to everyone for free. There are some advantages premium players have over free players, but none of them directly affect gameplay - Premium players can keep more items and trade. Trading makes it so easy to get weapons and Premium can cost less than a dollar, so I really don't see any reason to not upgrade yourself to Premium. I guess at some point I have to talk about hats. They seem silly, right? Why bother making so much of the content have no effect on gameplay? But that's exactly why they do it! A new weapon isn't just about modelling and scripting. You have to make sure it's balanced and can't be exploited in any way. But hats and other cosmetic items can't possibly be 'unbalanced', so of course they can add a hundred hats easier than they can add one new weapon. Maybe they could focus more on weapons, but there are already so many as it is; you don't want to make it impossible for new players to catch up. So obviously TF2 is amazing. 10/10 would play again and probably will this afternoon. There are, however, a few drawbacks. TF2's normal devotion to balance makes it all the more glaring when something isn't balanced. The Soldier has so much versatility in his weapons that it's pretty easy to call him /the best class/ in a game that's supposed to be about teamwork. It's pretty easy to see Valve playing favourites with the Soldier. If some class has a weapon that players are favouring over the other options, most of the time Valve will nerf the over-used weapon (ex. the Spy's Dead Ringer). But for the Soldier, they'll just buff the under-used weapons (ex. The Concheror and Battalion's Backup). Giving the Soldier extra upgrades in Mann vs. Machine also reeked of favouritism when it's the Spy and Pyro who needed the help. One other drawback is that the store's prices on weapons has absolutely nothing to do with how rare / common they are. This isn't really Valve's fault, but it makes a lot of things in the store complete rip-offs. Suppose you want a Phlogistinator. It costs $10 in the store. OR you could buy four Keys ($2.50 each). Each key is worth, in the trading economy, about 100 Phlogistinators. I'm not exaggerating. (Phlogistinator: 0.05 - 0.11 refined. Key: about 8.66 refined.) Basically, once you know a little bit about the economy, you feel like you have to REALLY get into it so you don't get ripped off. Or maybe that was just me.
ansjovis;-;became complete  because of the latest updates 10/0 -IGN, it's like minecraft without blocks
Warmees;-;This is the sexiest, awesomest, hat-filled free-to-play there is!! Good on you, Valve!
Lead Farmer;-;Fun is quite frankly a complete understatement when describing this game. Fast, crazy, mind blowing, maddening, trouser tightening enlightenment is more like it. Recommended to just about everyone out there even if you don't like shooters then play it anyway for if you are someone who is not a big fan of shooting things then blow em up, backstab em, burn em, bludgeon em, headshot em, hit em with baseballs and Christmas ornaments, freaking fly down from the sky and smash em over the head with a shovel, do whatever just as long as there is carnage in this game then there is fun to be had. Also HATS, GET THOSE HATS DAMMIT! AND SHOW EM TO YOUR ENEMIES!
BestFriends01;-;It's amazing. I am just getting started and so addicted.
([MM]) Buck824;-;Don't even get me started on this game. I was introduced to it back in 2012 and since then I have never looked back, unbelievably addictive. Team Fortress 2 is one of the most well optimised, consistent performing and superbly balanced games I have ever played and has no Pay to Win aspects at all. A person who has had FPS experience on computer can pick up the Sniper on the first day of playing the game and come top scoring in a pub, this game is so simple and complex at the same time which is why it is so much fun! If you don't play this game more, and have passed it over as another of Valve's ploys for money, seriously think again because unlike what most comments say this game is MORE than just hats. TF2 has teamwork that is unlike any FPS I have played and puts COD and even Battlefield to shame as it is ALMOST impossible to lone wolf in this game. Even the pro snipers can get crowded by sphees or gibus scouts and get killed... nobody is perfect. GIVE THIS GAME A GO THOUGH, just... don't go full  and at least learn what things do by watching videos before playing. Don't be that spy that stabs the sentry ;) Also, PLEASE GO MEDIC IF YOUR TEAM DOES NOT HAVE ONE! 10/10 :D
[SaG] Pause;-;haha I love it when a pyro comes running at you swinging a great big sign at you had many laughs with this game, note to self dont stand out in the open like a ****dy idiot or els ya 100% are gonna get sniped MATE!
Nutty Bolter * G2A;-;It's the ultimate hat simulator!
Nooge;-;gg well played
NixiePixel;-;Though I'm for the most part only into realistic shooters, TF2 is too fun to pass up. It's free to play now so there's no reason not to! ^_^
Canadian Canuck;-;I started spy checking in Call of Duty 10/10
Rainbow Chicken;-;An enemy spy was standing next to our base with his hand up, trying to get a high-five. I decided to give the guy what he wants, I high-fived him and we just stood there. We felt a connection, even though we were in opposite teams. I looked in his eyes, I saw friendship and trust.. As I was shooting him the face with my Strange Server Wiping Killstreak Baby Face's Blaster. 10/10.
Jester;-;Team Fortress 2 Review Game Grade: A- Explanation for rating: Team Fortress 2, or TF2, is a wonderfully comical first person shooter. The game does not focus on graphics or realism by any means (unless beating down your foes with a lollypop is normal for you). TF2 is quite enjoyable from a comical standpoint which is outstandingly hilarious. Something else you can enjoy in the game is the balanced game play (will be addressed later in the review). The replay value of TF2 is rather high due to the countless modded servers and new equipment you can unlock. The game is very fun and you can rest knowing that the download time was well worth it (seeing its a free game the only thing spent is time). Team Fortress has a very unique and comical first person shooter aspect to it. The fighting in the game is all based off of comedy. Weapons can range from a smelly fish to an actual hand cannon. Like weapons, the equipment is quite entertaining. For all of you that like first person shooters, you shouldn't be afraid of this loss in realism. There are still satisfying damage, accuracy, and unlocking systems that are involved. This will keep you coming back to the game for newer and better weapons and/or equipment. In all, combat is fun and takes skill to master the battlefield. I think everyone can agree many games with potential are ruined by a pay-to-win system. This is not true for TF2. Every weapon and piece of equipment can be unlocked randomly throughout the game. You can, however, pay to get something quicker. Also, you are given crates which can be unlocked with a purchased key but again all the stuff can be earned. Some things are harder to get than others so don't expect to get all the great equipment right off the bat. To sum it all up, combat is fair and balanced. As in most games, people create modded servers. These modded servers are, for the most part, fair and do not kill the game. These servers tend to have the most people because they are very enjoyable. While we are on the topic of players, I would like to address the player base. Unfortunately, there are some immature people on the mic. You can avoid this problem by muting them and falling back into the focus of the game play. Other than that, the community is still active and rather fun to play with. All in all, Team Fortress 2 is worth a try. It is a great game you can play with friends and work forever on getting all the achievements. If you are active in the Steam market, items can be traded and sold with ease. I can promise you that you won't regret downloading this game.
[TFD] Pyrological^;-;A Very, Very Fun Game. So fun that "Team Fortress will sap your wallet."
Captain Mcderp;-;First it's a fun game, but then you get a hat. Then you want more hats AND MORE AND MORE AND MORE AND MORE..... And then you play the actual game. And holy sh*t it's a masterpiece. Best Class-based shooter I have ever seen. Has a nice engine, artstyle, original fun weapons and cool game mechanics. It also has MVM and of course... And the upcoming BREAD MONSTER Turns out valve didn't add a bread monster. Shame on you Valve, shame on you...
Flashin #RoadToDreamSkins;-;Best game eva <3 Phloggy pyros and demopans and trolldiers and crappy medic 10/10 TENOUTTATEN
Mr. Frying Pan;-;Conga Hat Simulator 2015. Do I need to explain more?
Khorps;-;A good game. The best game made in the Source engine.
ButteredFire;-;The ideal online shooter: average player can enter the fray and even hurt somebody, while pros will be grinding away milliseconds from the time to carry the suitcase on 2forts. And all thanks to the fact that among the nine classes there is exactly zero useless ones. The only serious drawback is the disgracefully low number of maps.
Fatigue;-;2 Teams, 9 classes and a ton of maps and weapons to choose from ensure that this game has everything for any kind of player! I have also met quite a few good friends on Tf2, to me Tf2 is one of the best games out there solely because of the amazing community... The hours I have played speaks for itself!!! It's free GO GET THIS GAME!!!!!
Valiantius;-;One of the best multiplayer games made to this day.
Missing Texture;-;gun mettle brought us the most important thing in the game yet a spy in a box the game is done now, no new updates are needed
Vyce;-;So I attended E3 and got to have a special one on one confrence with Gabe himself. He showcased a new game that was to be officially released on the third of July 2015. The name of the game? Counter Fortresss Global Teamfensive: The Sequel (also known as CFGT) Take a read of this exclusive interview with Gabe I managed to record (don't worry it's not IGN). - start of interview - Me: Why hello Lord Gaben, I'm here to talk to you about your new game, Counter Fortresss Global Teamfensive: The Sequel. Share with me all the special details about the game if you'd be so kind to, from start to finish. I would also like to know how you came up with the idea on the game. I know you've always been disclosed about your games at Valve, but you can trust me, I'm not recording this. Lord Gabe: Hello to you too. I'd be very proud to talk about our new game, and our innovative approach to this new game. It came along this one confrence we had. It went like this. " TF2 IS ING UP" "I KNOW WHAT DO WE DO" -random guy in corner, turns his chair in slow motion- " we make tf2... COUNTER STRIKE" -everyone celebrates- So we've decided to borrow some inspiration from our money cow- I mean popular game Counter Strike, but we kept everything that made the game good (to us) and took the gameplay from our best selling free to play game Team Fortress 2. We've introduced brand new exclusive Stattra- I mean strange weapons that you can unbox from very special cases. These weapons have a kill count attatched to the side of the weapon, something no game has ever done before. We've also decided to give players a unique opportunity to chip in $6 to a pass where they can earn never before seen, rarity of weapons by appearance going in the order of, Factory New, Minimal Wear, Field-Tested, Well-Worn and Battle Scarred. We believe that by adding these features, we'll gain even more players, and hopefully forget about that disaster game Team Fortress 2 and it's economy that we slipped up with by giving people what they wanted. You also get to earn a unique coin that can be displayed in game to show off to everyone you've participated in a very special coin, again another feature that's unique to our game. We really tried our hardest to make a unique first person shooter experience in our new game, Counter Fortresss Global Teamfensive: The Sequel. We hope you enjoy the game that hits you this Summer. Me: Ah... Urh ok.. Thanks for your time um Gabe? I look forward to when you announce Half Life 3 sometime in the next decade. Lord Gabe: Don't worry my friend, that's never going to happen. Me: You cruel man. How could you do this!? - end of interview here - Unfortunately that's all I could get on Counter Fortresss Global Teamfensive: The Sequel (CFGT), and Half Life 3 before Gaben called the illuminati and threw me out. But I hope this is enough for you steam readers. 1 like = 1 prayer for half life 3.
Daran;-;Phases of playing Team Fortress 2: Be new to the game/ultimate noob phase Do some kills/u rly have no skillz Find Gibus/become uglier Buy ur first hat/and then get scammed for it Become good at 1 class/teh trickz Advance in other classes/gaining teh skillz Learn the prices/gain items Get ur 1st unusual/damn ur sexy Be best and sexiest player on the server/THE ULTIMATE PRO PHASE ^doesn't have to be in this order^ 11/10 American women recommend this game
RaKso;-;AXUJUENA IGRA. GABE I LOVE U :3
-EEY-Epicface5567;-;I love the game. I play it sometimes ut when i get my new computer, ill play it even more!!
Tanker506;-;Hats... That is all
Zomburger;-;Hats, 10/10 would hat again
Fewph;-;TF2 is a great game :D The class diversity, teamwork and overall gameplay make it amazing :D. Also, unusuals and australiums look sick xDD 11/10 would recommend.
Erdal Bakkal;-;I've been playing this game since 2011 and this is the best ftp game ever!
Damascus The Socialist Camel;-;I would recommend to my friends and family its such a good game thats keeps u coming back for more
Bingoliath;-;Who needs life if you've got hats? 11/10
GumballTheScout[Venice!];-;Try playing tc_hydro 10.1/10 would confuse new players again
Pannie;-;It's alright.
Gregalegga;-;700 hours must mean something, the free game which I have played more than any other game... ever...
neuromancer14;-;This is honestly one of the best class based multiplayer games there is! Easy to pick up and play! And very hard to stop playing as well. 5 stars
not walruskind;-;I learnt Hungarian playing this game. 10/10, kcsg.
Studlicious;-;It was fun once upon a time; but I sorta feel like my interest dissipated over time. I feel outclassed and demotivated before I even press play. It's a sad thing.
o ou ven susi ru;-;Really an awesome game
TrapwetHornyCrave InnerConflict;-;When I saw free porn as a kid I was happy! Todays kids sure have no genitalia whatsoever. Going against hentai sprays... uneducated bourgeois, little, unthankful... Oh the game? You read this for stupid and funny answers anyway as you already know its a FANTASTIC game. Move on and bring your kids to sex ed for s sake.
Toroi;-;My hours. help. I wrote something for real! These hours are legit, I played this game a lot in the past to avoid some tragic stuff in real life. I was young and didn't really have my gaming consoles anymore because of my brothers and I had a really bad pc, which i still own. TF2 was one of the games i could play pretty well on this pc but with horrid graphics, but it was one of the more fun games I installed. I met some real cool and nice people on this game as well as people who i plan to keep by my side. The community back then was more humble compared to nowadays. You have competitive gamers who spam their bind keys with unfunny/gross jokes and very obnoxious people who are either yelling at you or telling you to do specific things to win the game. When really, it doesn't even matter if you win or lose. However, you also have those people who are really awesome and you may meet some nice friends along the way! Although you never know what kinda person you're going to meet on this game. In my honest opinion, if you want to have a game to just waste time on (and money) or just mess around with people you know (which is what I do now), this is perfect. Esspecially the mann vs. machine co-op. I mainly play that now. Although to me, the game lost its touch, update wise, and I moved onto other games. I believe it's worth a shot to try it out but other than that, I'd keep it as a casual game. I don't think the competitive scene is worth getting into anymore because it's being flooded by crude people. Atleast from my experiance after over about 4+ years of playing it just got worse and worse. You will eventually be tied into drama even if you try to avoid it. You'll be more stressed than actually having fun, I'll tell you that! Although in all seriousness, this game is losing its touch and probably isn't worth making it your main game MAINLY because the updates they've been releasing are becoming very dull and not as great as they used to be. BUT, it's a great game to just play to pass the time and have fun! All you'll really notice nowdays is...people really love to trade more than actually play. Living off as a free to play would be very tough and you'd need to be patient with items you would want, unless you got that MONEY! Hope this helps. One last thing, I am not saying this game is bad in any way. I am saying that it's worth trying and playing with friends, or even meeting people! Although there are some downsides that you won't like, such as some stuff I pointed out above. Strictly towards the community. I personally think you should have this game as a side game rather than your come home to play sorta thing. Have it as a once in a while game, because it's nothing to be big about, unless you really do not like most of the millions of other games out there. Just give it a shot and see what you think! Have fun <3
Vale;-;Can you name any other unmodded First Person Shooter that lets you play as a cocky and fast Bostonian that can slap the hell out of urine throwing Australian campers with a fresh atlantic fish wrapped in fine christmas lights, eat a bucket of fried proccessed poultry over their corpses, and then get hit with an exploding cannonball launched from an African-Celtic one eyed alcoholic who can leap yards into the air from his own explosives while weilding a mystic ancient talking ghost claymore? I thought so.
A bLuE cOw;-;If you bind forward to a button on your mouse, you can play pyro and eat at the same time
UnfunnyName;-;The vicious cycle of Team fortress 2 First when you'll arrive in the game, you'll want Weapons, tons of them. Then you'll see that everyone has hats, and you'll want these, a tons of them. Then you'll realize that hats doesn't matter, only skill count, so you'll want a lot of skills, tons of them. Then new weapons will be added, and you'll want them, all of them. Then a new hat will be added and you'll want it, cause it'll be fancy on your main class. Then you'll realize again, that you don't give a damn about hats, all is about is skill. Then when you have waited for 3 years, new weapons will be added, and you'll want them. And then you realize that you spent like 2000 hours of your life for this, met great friends, and you'll have a server where's you feeling like home, and you discovered so much things via the community, it learnt you so much. Then the rude reality of life, bring you on earth, and this game is here, Waiting for you to play 1,2,3... hours, and you'll be happy to see that all your good friend are still here.
[CotC] King Conga Gandhi;-;Oh, and if you're wondering, the new update, Gun Mettle, did NOT ruin TF2 for me. I actually find it a LOT more fun now! I think Jerma summed up this game pretty nicely... "Maybe you got like two Pyros that just installed the game ten minutes ago. They don't have any hats, they're spraying  and they're having a blast. They might even be at the wrong point. They might be going backwards to the point that's already been capped. On the same team, there's a Scout with a Hale's Own Scattergun. He's got 18 kills with a 17 killstreak, he just got 18. He's going 'I just got 18, sick!' He runs up the stairs, he's trying his  off. He's get *beeping noises* dodging the 'Oh, the sentry almost got me!' He looks up to his left when he gets up the stairs on Gorge and there's two sandwich Heavies having a ing picnic. So he stops for a second and goes, 'Two... nnnggh!' so he walks forward and gets blown up by a soldier's rocket next door... ...The two sandwich Heavies then decide to move their picnic. There's ants. 'There's ants here, honey. I wanna get out of here.' So they get up, they pack their sandwiches, pack up their lunches, and their breakfast, and whatever the  they're eating. They get up and walk toward the door to go to RED because they think, 'That spot near the A point for RED is pretty good.' They walk out the door, and they see four Level 3 Sentry Guns pointing at them. They get shot a million times and blow up, and there's like nine Engineers swinging their wrenches in random directions. The BLU Scout, at this point, respawns, and walks by the at least 3-4 statues because we all know there's four people AFK when you play this game, you go by the museum of people standing still. He walks out the door and readies his weapon, he's ready, 'I'm going to get another 20 killstreak, just you watch Gaben, I'm going to praise Gaben!' And he goes forward and starts shooting, and he gets backstabbed by a Spy that has been sitting with the Cloak and Dagger in the corner for at least the last 68 seconds." Normally when I do reviews, I turn into a critic and start to examine that game, pointing out every little flaw and pro and determining a final score. However, Team Fortress 2 (or TF2 for short) helped me make so many memories that if I actually tried to make a fair review on it, it would still be way too biased to consider a valid review. Team Fortress 2, is, obviously, an amazing game. The teamplay is necessary and going out and attacking solo may be difficult. You need teammates in order to survive and win. The graphics are unique to a shooter game and really makes it a special game. I'm not here to explain the gameplay or graphics or whatnot. I love this game because of its charm. The game has such a unique and diverse cast of characters, you can't help to love all of them at some point. Scout is cocky and overconfident. Spy, another one of the characters in the game, is technically Scout's father. Soldier is a crazed WWII American patriot. He never actually joined the Army, but instead, he had his own personal Nazi killing spree. His roommate was a magician named Merasmus, who grew to hate Soldier. Pyro is mysterious, but portrays the world as one big happy paradise, known as Pyroland. Demoman is a Scottish alcoholic who, due to Merasmus, lost his eye that is now haunted. Heavy, although he appears to be dim-witted, is actually very intelligent and looks over three sisters. Engineer is very intelligent as well, and his grandfather was a major contributor to keeping the war with RED and BLU continue. Medic isn't fond of normal forms of medicine, but is still an important member nonetheless. Sniper is from New Zealand, but was raised in Australia. He prefers working from a distance and his backstory is very similar to Superman's. Spy is the master of disguise, and is technically Scout's father, as said before. Of all the characters, he appears to be the most "mature" and appears to be the ringleader at many times. Not only that, but the game has an interesting story. I would not like to get too detailed with it. However, it makes little to no sense but is still funny, engaging, and gives TF2 much more depth. There is also a storyline that takes place a few years later where Mann Co. is being attacked, so the mercenaries have to defend it, called Mann vs. Machine. This game mode ties in with the TF comics, which explain many characters' backstories and is currently still in the works as of this review. The other comics (all of which can be found on TF2's official website) are all funny and charming in their own way as well. The community has been quite debatable on how nice it is at many times, but in the end, it's still an overall great community. I've seen people give out stuff, others mentor some of the newbs (something I do as well) along with much, much more. Yes. the game is considered a "pay-to-win game" but it isn't necessarily a pay-to-win game. With lots of patience, you will get what you want from the game, whether it be hats, weapons, or whatever it is you want. The game has a learning curve that isn't too steep, but become dedicated and you'll fall in love with it. No matter how many times you rage to a W+M1 pyro that destroyed your 16 killstreak, or cheer when you unbox an Unusual, or maybe discover a few friends or learn a few things, Team Fortress 2 has been a huge part of my PC gaming life and without it, I would be as bored as hell. I cannot recommend this game enough, and I hope that many more memories are made on here. Valve may be cash cows, but you can't help but admit they are amazing when it comes to making games. Portal, Half-Life 2, Counter-Strike, but this game stands out from the rest to me. Do I recommend this game? Yes, yes, yes, YES.
Nerd House;-;Team Fortress 2. Being ranked as the third most-played game [steamcharts.com] on Steam, Team Fortress 2 is probably one of the best free-to-play games we've got. Why is it so popular? Let's take a look, shall we? First off, the obvious: It's free. 100% free. This means its accessible to everyone on Steam. This is just the icing on the cake though. What really shines about TF2 is the game itself. Team Fortress 2 usually consists of two teams (Red and Blue) going head to head against each other. Sometimes fulfilling certain objectives or just downright killing each other. There are many, many maps and modes, such as Payload, Capture Points, and Mann VS Machine. But the general idea no matter the map or mode is to KILL EVERYTHING THAT MOVES! And my god, is it fun to do so. The game has 9 playable mercenaries, each actually being a certain "class". Each class is divided into 3 different roles: Offense, Defense, and Support. Let's go over each role and class. Offensive roles specialize in dealing damage to the opposing team. These are your main attack force. Scouts are the speedy hit and run class, with the ability to double or even triple jump depending on equipped items. Soldiers pack a bit more firepower with their rocket launchers, which gives them not only power, but mobility due to the ability known as "rocket jumping". The Pyro is great at setting the opposition on fire, as well as extinguishing burning teammates using an airblast. Defensive roles serve to inhibit enemy access and to hold enemies back from vital points on the map. Overall, the defensive group has the most firepower of all the groups. Demomen can safeguard areas with stickybombs that they can detonate when enemies come by. Heavies are great for mowing down incoming troops and pushing back forces. Heavies can also keep enemies in an area while whittling their health for teammates to finish off. Engineers can build Sentry Guns for effective area defense, as well as build Teleporters and Dispensers for logistical support of the team. Support classes cannot hold the fight on their own, but their specialized abilities can tip the balance in their team's favor. They offer the offensive and defensive classes an extra edge in battle and can help turn the tide of the game. Whether crippling the enemy advance from behind or keeping teammates healed, the support classes are always handy to have around. Medics are the team healers, capable of providing numerous buffs depending on their equipments. Spies are great for sneak attacks or eiliminating key threats. Snipers excel at long range, also eliminating key threats, as well as extinguishing burning teammates with jarate and providing a damage boost to teammates. Next, let's look at the presentation. TF2 has a very unqiue art style. It's somewhat cartoonish, but very appealing. It's simple, and un-complex. But it doesn't need to be complex. It's simplicity is it's strength. Everything is detailed enough to where you can easily tell whats going on, what a specific model or item is, and they all stand out. The soundtrack is also very appealing and catchy, especially the main theme. I personally have it as a ringtone/alarm tone on my smartphone! :) One of the best aspects of TF2 is the Steam Workshop. Users can submit designs for items and weapons, and possibly have them added to the game! A very lucrative sub-market has also emerged from this game in the form of the Crate Keys. That's a whole different ballgame in and of itself, so we won't get into it here. During normal gameplay on most servers, you can obtain random items, weapons, and sometimes crates, and taunts....through the item drops system. You can only receive so many drops per week, and you will get them randomly as you play. You can use these items and weapons to customise your mercenary's loadout, or you can use them to craft other items, hats, and weapons. You can take multiples of items and craft them into Scrap, then Reclaimed Metal, then Refined Metal. You can then use these metals to craft specific class weapons/items, among other things. The crafting system is simple yet robust, with lots of possiblities. Some of it is very luck based. You can take some very common items and end up crafting a super rare hat or gun worth a lot of moolah on the Steam Market! All-in-all, Team Fortress 2 is just a very fun game. Endless entertainment awaits when you start up this game, especially if you play with friends on your favorite server. Probably the best free-to-play game on Steam. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=383235670 Highly Recommended Be sure to check out Nerd House Gaming for more reviews!
Mr Squiggles;-;How to play Team Fortress 2: Be polite, Be efficient, Have a pan to kill everyone you meet.
pacsomepuppes;-;> I was only 10 years old. > I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. > I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. > Then I got my first hat, The gibus. > Suddenly everything changed. > I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' > I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. > I had so many hats, I loved them all. > But then someone traded me, I accepted. > They offered an Unusual for all my hats. > It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. > But no Unusual, He scammed me. > I lost it all. > I was so sad I cried for hours. > Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. > I went to bed after praying. > I felt warm. > I looked behind me, It was Gaben! > He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning Team Captain. > Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning Team Captain and I was naked. > I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. > Hats are love. Hats are life. TF2: 11/10 Best hat simulator 1981 Overall, I'd give this game 9 out of 10 Gabe Narwalls Shoutout to ObsidianObelisk17 for making a youtube vid of this Showout to TheDisableBore for making a comic of this I cringe re reading this :smug:
Flexi;-;Ruined my life and cost me over 500. 10/10 would recommend to friends and family
Special;-;Team Fortress 2 is the most realistic hat simulator created to date. There is absolutely no other simulator quite like this one. The first time you start the simulator, you join a server where you can play a minigame where you show off your hats and items. If you kill a person three times in a row in the minigame, you get your very first hat: the Gibus. This is where it really starts; To play the simulator correctly, you have to spend money in the market place, made by Valve. After that, while you play the minigame, you can find hats which you can trade for, or collect! There is many other people who wants to collect and trade hats, just like you! After you collect enough items and/or hats, try joining a trade server! There, the REAL fun begins! Good luck, and beware of ending up poor!
Zesty;-;this game is the best game ever created
'flames';-;good game, first person shooter, free to play, all times players online. You can drop all wapeons free. i give it an 9/10.
Yee;-;>I was only 23 years old. >I loved the gibus so much. >"Gibus is love" I say, "Gibus is life." >My Friend hears me and calls me an F2P. >I knew he was just jealous of my devotion to the gibus. >I call him a Tryhard. >He slaps me and sends me to a trade server. >I'm crying now and my Pride hurts. >I feel something touch me. >It's the Gibus. >I'm so happy. >It whispers in my ear; "Happy Halloween." >It grabs me with it's powerful, silky arms and puts me on my hand's and knee's. >I'm ready. >I spread my head for the Gibus. >It penetrates my head. >It hurt's so much but I do it for the Gibus. >I can feel my head tearing as my eye's start to water. >I push against it's force. >I want to please the gibus. >It roar's a spooky roar as it place's itself on my head. >My friend walk's in. >The gibus look's him right in the eye and says; "Boo." >The gibus leave's through my window. >"Gibus is love," I say. "Gibus is life."
tekkex;-;you collect hats and shoot things
Casual_Eric.g257;-;This game is full of casuals and try hards. R8 it 8/8
Bored;-;great job valve , thnx lord gaben for that ,
The Doctor;-;I cannot think of ANY other first-person-shooter which you can: 1. Dance the Conga 2. Wear a fairy tutu 3. Hit someone with a fish until death 4. Chuck milk (and a suspicious yellow liquid) at people 5. Eat a sandwich You may be thinking you know shooters, and can master any of them, but TF2 is comleatly diffrent and the most creative shooter there is. And it's free. Get it. Now.
Scrub AFK until 7/22;-;Better than CoD. Although that goes for literally every game ever. I like it.
/M_TPoDHB\JusticeSworDucky;-;really fun game
Me!me!me! 10/10 animation;-;Pyrosharks, mini engies, battle medics, sandvich heavies, and then, worst of all, Arach.
[Original]Eli | LFT;-;Team Fortress 2 is the best FPS games that I think is out there. The trading in-game makes the game expand and not only just killing people.
BLTZ;-;its ok
Adolf Niggler;-;Wicked game 10/10 you can earn money easy from 2.50$ and fun trading but the bad things are people thaat scam and  that frame people
gabbycat17;-;Help, I've become addicted to this game. No joke. "Why?" you ask? Let me sum up my experience so far. : ) First and foremost, the game is quite original with it's colorful and quirky characters, which I've come to absolutely adore. Each character has their own (stereotypical but hilarious) personality, and it's really fun to watch them interact and talk. Being able to play as each is a blast. Community wise, I've met a handful of awesome and cooperative people who are great to play with. You never know who you'll run into in online games, but it's totally worth it when people are friendly and talk to one another. Once in a while, you'll come across players that are complete jerks, but I assure you that you'll find a server with a bunch of dorks you can party and have fun with. XD Apparently I have been on TF2 for only 157.8 hours (total), but it feels like at least a year. I plan on continuing with this energetic and playful game for a long time to come. Aaaaaand I think that's all! Oh, and before I forget... Just a word of advice to you newcomers... Make sure to get hats other than the ghostly gibbus. ; )
ffj;-;This game never fails to leave you bored and si always full of action and exitement the only real downside is ummmm ill have to think of that but this game is awesome!!!
Oceil;-;An awesome game to play :)
Sweet JP;-;Only in Team Fortress 2 you can do some "legit teamwork". Only in Team Fortress 2 that the enemy teams can choose to NOT attack each other. Only in Team Fortress 2 you can turn an entire server into one..big...conga line. Only in Team Fortress 2 you can waste money for wearable items for your head, and actually think it was worth it. Only in Team Fortress 2 in which someone wears a worn out top hat, they're most likely a noob. Only in Team Fortress 2 in which earbuds and keys can be worth as much as gold. Only in Team Fortress 2 you can encounter more squeakers, fandoms and haters than ever before in your life. Only in Team Fortress 2 in which all of this ^stuff^ is in a FREE GAME!
//YTBR//Grey Zarcovski;-;This Games odd yet classic cartoon style Shoot em up Is Unique Yet lovable by players of all ages (Even if most players under 12 are loud squeakers) Most of them are Great traders who really know what they are doing. If you can get past the average "Scrub" Or "Bad Egg" You can find that the game is quite worth playing and yes it has the two roles of trader player or even both if daring you can have as much fun price picking as you can Completing objectives in modes such as man versus machine Control points or king of the kill can give you the weaponry or cosmetics to have the greatest time playing ever_Grey Zarcovski
The Lazy Friendly Heavy;-;Wait. You're telling me there are other games on steam?
PrincessToadstool;-;Oh god, I have wasted so much time on this. Would waste again.
Bonerfarte;-;Fun and addicting. Stole my money and took my social life away Congrats.
Slebog69| trade.tf;-;Probobly one of the best games i've palyed.Runs amazingly on my laptop even though its not good at playing games! 9/10
Oreo Pizza;-;its a really good game buy it and luv it babies
[light_env] Mr8bittripper;-;Just get this. Don't waste your time reading reviews!
kmyc89;-;Not everything but a lot. Skills are important but everyone can get points. You meet bad people but also wins friends. Sometimes you will not like it but comes always back. Maybe you are not an Artist but get creative. I can write a lot but everyone want short. You don't have to listen me. You have listen to you...and your Team .
Adolf Niggler;-;Wicked game 10/10 you can earn money easy from 2.50$ and fun trading but the bad things are people thaat scam and  that frame people
Duck;-;A Gun game full of thrill and excitement....
|MuncH|;-;This came is like that feeling you get while cumming. Its sooo good that you spend all night doing it
ACRI;-;You'll waste your life on it, don't download it. Save yourself....before it's too late.
StormyFlunk #H;-;Cool
99;-;A true classic. Everything valve makes-A classic. And what are classics? The best games EVER know to exist.
xRiiiiiiiku;-;I have played this game for few hours and it's weird because everyone calls me a noob. I don't know why... maybe they are jelaous because I just got this awesome gibus thing hat for free and I think it's the coolest hat in the game. Someone wanted to buy it once but I don't know how to trade so it didn't work out. Well to be honest I wouldn't have sold it because it's awesome! So I was wondering that does only good players get that hat or how to get it because there aren't many people who have it, I think. I have seen few players wearing it and I was like omg you have this cool hat too and I tried to ask him how to get it, but I guess he was too busy destroying everyone because he didn't even answer me. Well pro players don't have much time to chat back to others even though I had that same hat. The strangest thing I was wondering was that how did I get that professional players hat so quickly, I played this game for like 3 hours and I already had it. Maybe it's because I have amazing call of duty skills. Well I stopped playing call of duty for good yesterday because I found this cool game where I don't need to do any teamwork so I can just kill everyone alone. Like in call of duty I had to do a lot of "teamwork" to keep everyone alive but here I can just go to a server and rek everyone who gets on my way. So I started this game yesterday and I love it, because I was already good in fps games like this, so it didn't take more than like 1 hour for me to get used on this. I would rate 10 bananas out of 8 strawberries for this game!
pancakes;-;Game is cool but if ur thinking ur good at cod then you would be good at tf2well no this game is different.THeres a higherarchy Noobs=Average=pro,This game takes some patients but I reccomend the game for people that have the time for games if ur like under 18 or 12 dont play bec....well u knoq if you watch or been in a server with a squeker or a raging squeker.
Quinkan96;-;Many firstperson shooters feel the same: you're the only one that matters; any weapon will kill in one to two hits; the game takes itself way to seriously; the main goal is KILL, KILL, KILL. Overall, it seems to me that most FPS genre games are lacking a bit in the diversity department. Team Fortress 2 addresses that by giving you a crazy, colorful, whacked-out, and unpredictable world to screw around in. With nine classes to choose from, each with his own arsenal of specialized (and sometimes hilarious) guns, bombs, and blunt instruments to do battle with, you're presented with countless different play styles. Customizing the mercenaries with nonsensical wardrobe changes is a big part of the game as well; just visualize a giant, brutish man wearing a tutu! Team Fortress 2 also encourages a team dynamic of sorts. While you can go off on your own and sucseed, coordination with other players is vital, as each class has his own way(s) to help out his fellow mercenary. I know, this is quite the exstensive review on a free game, but please heed my word and give this a shot. I'm certain you'll enjoy it!
Toast-E;-;A game worth your time!
CeeKloP;-;The game made of POOTIS
Lazy Laze;-;The most fun you can have on Steam! First-person shooter (sometimes Third-Person!) Craft items! Get 7-17 items every week! Trade with people! Make Friends! It's all here for FREE!!
LOGMA-Sleepy Puppy;-;I've gotten over the Item sets being ed over. All in all, good game. A fun class-based shooter where some classes you might not be good at, whereas others are perfect for you, in my opinion, you should definately give this a try, there are a multitude of Player-ran game modes, such as Dodgeball, Prophunt, and many others, the community is a really great community, though you should watch out for trade scams.
BOLBI;-;A good game with many playstyles, maps, servers, just alot of everything. Constantly updated with new content, and bug fixes so nothing breaks. Meets the needs of me, and the internet, and lastly, HATS!
[PLS] Mr.Frie Frie;-;If you dont own this why do you even have a computer?!
shirt;-;Great game! Really interactive, and a more positive community than other games, for sure. Free to play helps new players to really get into the game.
Wersuz;-;"The most fun you can have online" - PC Gamer Is now FREE! Theres no catch! Play as much as you want, as long as you like! The most highly-rated free game of all time! One of the most popular online action games of all time, Team Fortress 2 delivers constant free updatesnew game modes, maps, equipment and, most importantly, hats. Nine distinct classes provide a broad range of tactical abilities and personalities, and lend themselves to a variety of player skills. New to TF? Dont sweat it! No matter what your style and experience, weve got a character for you. Detailed training and offline practice modes will help you hone your skills before jumping into one of TF2s many game modes, including Capture the Flag, Control Point, Payload, Arena, King of the Hill and more. Make a character your own! There are hundreds of weapons, hats and more to collect, craft, buy and trade. Tweak your favorite class to suit your gameplay style and personal taste. You dont need to pay to winvirtually all of the items in the Mann Co. Store can also be found in-game.
DoctorRoosterMD;-;360 Noscopes? Final Kill Cams? New weapons and maps? This second installment of Call of Dutes Ghost has it all. Whether you're looking to trickshot kids, quick scope friends, or start raging, this game is prepared to give it all to you!
Lagger;-;This is a good game 200 hours in and is still not bored. To anyone that said ths game is unbalanced, it's just a matter of skill and weapon choices. Also bought weapons doesn't have any buff, this is what i call a REAL F2P game. Best served with voice chat with friends.
Extremely Volatile Dolphin;-;I can be a psychopathic fire maniac who can kill an entire team with a instrument that sprays out a stream of colorful bubbles and rainbows... 10/10 - Would kill an entire team with rainbows and bubbles again...
shrike;-;hats
[Furfagging Intensifies];-;I got banned from a furry server because I sprayed furfag porn 12/10 it's still my favorite game of all time though
Sgt_Gunslinger;-;This is absolutly on my top 10 to play games it is pack full of guns,gore,and cartoon fun. Its all of you're favorite game types pack in one. I recommend this game for everyone, its free so if u dont like it you can delete it if u want, but that is highly unlikely :)
Fried Chicken;-;Very, good game couldn't recommend it enough it's amazing!
Asuna;-;Remember when i started playing tf2.I was a lil noob who just wanted to kill and tryed to evolve my mini-sentry :3. Well this game teached me how to play shooting games and more important it helps us haveing pacience with the weakest. I valueate this game 10/5, dont ask me how thats possible.
problematic sinner;-;I got humped by a sniper and insulted by a spy. 10/10 will continue playing for another 100 hours, and then another, and another. It's addictive being a drunken scottish cyclops.
4lifecreate;-;To sum this game up, in order to win the objective, you need hats.
gameaccurate;-;This is the best game ever, even if people call you a f2p ignore them and play the game 10/10
TheGuyforSmash Z;-;>Downloads TF2 >Opens >Joins server >Picks Soldier >Shoots a random crit at a lone Pyro >Gets it reflected back >Cries
Dr. Mario;-;I have mixed feelings about this game. It is amazing in some aspects, yet not too much in others. Let's first start off with the pros. The game is FREE! If you have a computer, then you have no real excuse not to have this game. You say that you may not be able to run it? It runs on the Source Engine! I run it great with my 32MB Intel HD Graphics Card. No excuse to not have it. Also, there is a healthy player base in spite of the game's age. It also recieves updates still to this day. The game also has a good amount of PvP game modes. However, there is an excellent PvE mode in the game as well, namely, Mann vs. Machine. Grab your friends, because you are going to have a blast trying to beat some of the insanely chaotic levels such as Ghost Town at round 66666 or something like that. On top of that, you can also buy many weapons in the Steam Community Market or from crates! Wait... Buying that kind of stuff? Let's move into some cons. This game can suck you right in to buying weapons for your in-game character. Firearms aren't the only thing, though. There are also many collectible hats. Before I rant on for ages about the market, let's move on. For many classes, the weapons just do not feel nice. For instance, the Heavy's minigun is bad for 1v1 situations due to it's massive spread, though it is great for mowing down a whole group. It is rather hard to just pick-up-and-play as well, as it takes plenty of experimenting to find the right class for you. Also, some of the classes are somewhat unbalanced. The Sniper is a great example. 1-hit kills al over the place for him. Enemy gets too close? He pulls out a very rapid-firing SMG. And the Enginner is a nightmare. Just plant equipment everywhere and begin the trolling. A lot of the community is rude as well. Just because I drop the briefcase this one person just begins blurting out many 4-letter words at me. THE FINAL SCORE: 78/100 CONCLUSION This is a good game to play simply for Mann Vs. Machine. I do not feel that this game has any other value than that mode.
Cursed;-;my story of the game when i first had it it was fun, very fun i would play for ages. then after afew months it got easyer, repetitive and kinda boring. the game was dieing proberly still is so they made a desperate update with cs:go features, the update wasnt 100% bad they fixed afew things that took them 5+months. 4/10
Sir Predator of Cats Meow;-;Why.... Why would you fix that which that isn't broken? I am fine with the weapon skins and all that crap, doesn't bother me. Lazy? Very. But didn't bother me. But these "ballances" have just ruined the game. The Dead Ringer is now unusalbe, the Enforcer has completely lost it's flair, Heavies are rediculous now... And the list goes on and on, but I won't rant as it's all already been said and ignored. Maybe I can come back to it one day after you mutilate it's barely breathing corpse some more, or maybe you'll listen to your fans and atleast add servers that revert the update. But then, you never were one for listening were you Valve?Thank you though, for consulting your community on this update, and thank you for allowing me to enjoy over 1900 hours of my life on this game before you ruined it. All in all; if you're new to the game? Go for it, i hope you enjoy. Veterans like me? I think it's time we move on and try to find a new, non-serious fps. Dirty Bomb is looking promising as is Overwatch. (And before it's asked, no. I am not giving away my items. I intend to hold onto them as fond memories from before TF2 hollowed out.)
3dsboo;-;Maybe it's because I've played this game for so long, and because of that I view things differently. That being said, I'm beginning to see the community fall apart, in-game at least, and it is becomming difficult for me to enjoy this game. Very frequently have I had to leave a server due to the teams being very deliberately stacked. For those that don't know what the term "stacked" means, it is when one team has very skilled (or cheap) players, and the other team has players of a much lower skill-level. Quite a few people will switch teams mid-game to join what they percieve as the team most likely to win, or if they know a person on the other team. This is a scourge on Valve servers in particular. Speaking of scourges, there are WAY too many little kids playing this game now. What bothers me is not the fact that they tend to abuse the microphone function of the game with their high-pitched voices, (they are sometimes called "squeakers" because of it) but the fact that so many little kids are playing a rated-M game. You hear that, parents?! TEAM FORTRESS 2 IS A RATED-M VIDEO GAME! IT IS NOT FOR LITTLE KIDS! I probably shouldn't even bother calling this out, though. The parents probably aren't even paying attention to what their children are doing online. This indicates even worse problems, though, for a first-person shooter isn't the worst thing a little kid could find on the Internet... I know that there are other multiplayer FPSs out there that also have this problem, but Team Fortress 2 is the only one I've found that I consider to be worth playing. As I have said before, maybe it is just because I know the game well, but I am noticing that players are resorting to cheap tactics much more frequently than they have in the past. This includes abuse of the demonman's stickybomb launcher (sticky-spamming), staying near the opponents' spawn-point to kill them the moment they leave their base (spawn-camping), and glitch abuse. On a related note, I cannot find as many "fun players" as I was once able to. Usually, I myself have to flush them out by messing around in the middle of the map at my expense. (Pootis POW!) All of the previous issues I've noted would be tolerable if they were the only issues present. The issue that "tips the scales" for me is the ever-widening skill gap amongst players. There are some players that could very well take on an entire enemy team of relatively unskilled players single-handedly. Now, imagive that one team has several of these people. Yeah... the other team isn't really going to have a lot of fun, assuming they do not have any "Saxton Hale Solders" of their own. There are also some players that just downright stink at this game, like me with the exception of the medic class. Maybe they have shaky hands (like me), maybe they have a bad internet connection, maybe they have slow reflexes, but the point is, they are helpless when pitted against a skilled player. I am having trouble finding players that have "just modest" skill. Much like the U.S.A., TF2's middle-class is eroding like a piece of calcium in an acid bath. To conclude, I believe that Team Fortress 2 is beginning to go through some turbulent times with respect to its players. I am finding it difficult to continue playing the game due to team stacking, a swarm of little kids, cheap tatics, and a wide skill gap amongst players. TF2 certainly isn't down for the count, but it's taking quite a few hard punches.
Gwydius;-;I wish I could recommend this game because I got alot of enjoyment out of it a couple years back...But I can't recommend this game with a clear conscience . My biggest complaint is that the community has gone downhill so much from when I had previously played it that its just not enjoyable anymore... I used to play an hour or so every time I had a day off work. People were generally nice, and the toxicity you normally see in online communities that kills the enjoyment of matches was an easily avoidable rarity, not a norm. The community was generally supportive of new and underperforming players; guiding rather than berating. When there was too much/little of a class, people would ASK and someone would switch over, even if they were admittadly not as good with that class. It was easy to get good because it was REWARDING to get good. It wasn't uncommon to get complimented back then (myself expecially when I played pyro or engineer). However, since I recently returned to the game, its now the opposite. Its rare that I don't see a few people insulting and berating eachother. As a result, teamwork is typically limited, and you typically won't see more than one or two medics/engineers combined, if anyone bothers to play them at all with all the griefing. The community now more closely resembles that of World of Warcraft in that aspect. The slowdown in Valve adding new content is also a negative factor to consider. Verdict: Try it if you like. It might be good to kill a few hours but don't expect to feel the same attachment to this game that others had experienced. Its definitely not what it used to be.
Trakido_;-;FR : Une trs bonne experience... jusqu'au drame. En effet, TF2 est certainement le meilleur F2P. Mais les noobs et les kikoos n'arrtent pas de venir. Franchement, ce jeu a t POURRI. R.I.P TF2 2007 - 2015. (pour moi) 8 ans de fun, compltement gch. US/UK : A really good experience... To be doomed. TF2 is certainely the BEST F2P. But noobs and  don't stop to come. This game was REALLY good... But now, it is done. rip in piece TF2 2007 - 2015. (For me) 8 years of fun, totally ed up.
PRESS F TO PAY RESPECTS;-;Valve refuses to make new, good weapons, there is a solid 2k hours of gameplay though.
Ghost;-;The game itself is awesome, and I loved it when it came out. I had an awesome time, but now its the type of people on the game that has ruined it. i;e. racist un-educated kids and some adults too, language used, hackers, consistant abuse of other players, and heres another question for you, if its free to play for a game that was M15+ when it came out, where do the kids get the funding to get items from the store or market? (I look at the parenting) Ive tried to like the game, and boy have I tried too like it. Since it went to FREE TO PLAY I just cant stand it. So many young kids playing a game when it first came out it was a M15+ game. Hackers galore is another issue. I still play it from time to time but I just cant recommend this game at all. Have a lot of friends play it and they swear by it but yet they still show me hackers and kids doing stupid things on the game. Till its reduced dramaticly I will stand by this.
Asuna;-;Remember when i started playing tf2.I was a lil noob who just wanted to kill and tryed to evolve my mini-sentry :3. Well this game teached me how to play shooting games and more important it helps us haveing pacience with the weakest. I valueate this game 10/5, dont ask me how thats possible.
r1cko;-;GROUNDBREAKING GRAPHICS WITH AMAZING PHYSICS AND ANIMATION, WITH REALISTIC WATER PHYSICS-oh wait wrong game
Oshawott!;-;If You Like Alot Of KIlling And Sandviches, Play Team Fortress 2 If you Love Batting People In The Head, Play Team Fortress 2 If You Love Winning, Joing Team Fortress 2 If You Think Team Fortress 2 Is Everything, Your Right.
Player 1;-;most realistic war simulator 11/10 ign
problematic sinner;-;I got humped by a sniper and insulted by a spy. 10/10 will continue playing for another 100 hours, and then another, and another. It's addictive being a drunken scottish cyclops.
gameaccurate;-;This is the best game ever, even if people call you a f2p ignore them and play the game 10/10
Sgt_Gunslinger;-;This is absolutly on my top 10 to play games it is pack full of guns,gore,and cartoon fun. Its all of you're favorite game types pack in one. I recommend this game for everyone, its free so if u dont like it you can delete it if u want, but that is highly unlikely :)
r1cko;-;GROUNDBREAKING GRAPHICS WITH AMAZING PHYSICS AND ANIMATION, WITH REALISTIC WATER PHYSICS-oh wait wrong game
The LAST Dutch;-;"I love you" -Spookwagon, 2014
xAstronautX;-;It's one of the best multiplayer game i had play
Oshawott!;-;If You Like Alot Of KIlling And Sandviches, Play Team Fortress 2 If you Love Batting People In The Head, Play Team Fortress 2 If You Love Winning, Joing Team Fortress 2 If You Think Team Fortress 2 Is Everything, Your Right.
Player 1;-;most realistic war simulator 11/10 ign
Crazed Squirrel;-;This is a great game fore people that enjoy realism. For example this is the only game know in which you can rocket jump and hats cost more than guns. Man! I wish this was real life.
Platez;-;Don't know yet. I haven't played enough to decide.
Amdragplayer;-;The best Free To Play shooter with absolutely no limitations in terms of access to the game aside from Cosmetic Drops and Custom Servers. Otherwise, the entire game is free. Getting premium is as cheap as 99c, just buy something from the store and boom! Premium account.
Lemon;-;Don't want a Pay2Win game? This is the game for you~
[YR Co-Owner] forkedpotato;-;This game is probably the best thing to download,It has great 60's cartoon style animation,Mainly made for the Steam trading function and MILLIONS of FUN CUSTOM SERVERS. This is a revoloutionary game and its suprising it took 3 final looks,the Game has great functions and the more you play the more hats,weapons and taunts you will get. And almost everybody on Steam has this game in their library.Get it now so that you can get more stuff faster!
(s.i.e);-;Technically this game has everything. From a steady stream of new content & events as well as community made content and all the loving care the valve TF2 team can give like a mother goose would care for it's younglings but the overabundance of children really took it's toll on this game throughout the years. For me TF2 gradually stopped being a fun shooter in recent times and started to look more and more like a ballpit at the mac donalds and i always knew that at some point the fun was going to stop so i have decided that it's time for me to part ways from this game and focus on other goals. Don't let this influence your first impressions about this game though after all this time and the many hours i put into this game i can look back at TF2 in a very positive way and had some of the most memorable gaming moments during my time as a TF2 regular. It's free to play so the good part is that it's easy to give it a try free of charge to see if TF2 is the game you are looking for. Just be patient with the game though it's easy to play but takes some time to master. Anyway i hope to have helped you with my review. Whether you have found your new Nr1 game or have decided to keep looking a little furhter i am happy to have played a small part in it. All the best! (s.i.e)
TheYiTengAxis69;-;You cash in this game to laugh at f2p players.
Ordovician;-;Bludgeoned a Russian wearing a pink tiara and tutu to death with a fish wrapped in a newspaper while a purple flaming bat flew around my head. Then took his baloney sandwich. Also I was a zombie. 10/10
autist child;-;You'd be suprised how many genitials I've sucked for virtual hats. 10/10 would do this all over again.
Ponk;-;best game ever, once you get into it, its hard to get out. like drugs. ive wasted alot of time with this game, no regrets...
NOLAGMOREFRAG;-;I didn't know what to write about in my review, so here's a recipe for pancakes instead: 1 1/2 cups all-purpose flour 3 1/2 teaspoons baking powder 1 teaspoon salt 1 tablespoon white sugar 1 1/4 cups milk 1 egg 3 tablespoons butter, melted 1. In a large bowl, sift together the flour, baking powder, salt and sugar. Make a well in the center and pour in the milk, egg and melted butter; mix until smooth. 2. Heat a lightly oiled griddle or frying pan over medium high heat. Pour or scoop the batter onto the griddle, using approximately 1/4 cup for each pancake. Brown on both sides and serve hot.
SA()INT;-;Aweseome Game, dem hats are too good ()
Loading...;-;Fantastic game. Really easy to get into. Even a new player like myself (at time of writing) can end up getting top score on the leaderboard from a combination of skill and/or luck.
Jam;-;It's ok I guess
Garfield;-;Uh .Thank you? Zack is balls but Blake is ballser.
blushark641;-;Getting to ruin my life. 10 out of 10 hats.
Molly;-;There's hats, and guns, and death.
HoneyCombHearts;-;Ruined my life and made me starve at the end of months because of my obssive hoarding of hats, 10/10
Master ico;-;1. Download it 2. Play it 3. Have fun 4. Get items 5. Even more fun Warning: game is very addictive! :3
Songokuthegreat;-;Team Fortress 2 is a game that was released on PC in fall 2007. This game is legendary and is arguably the greatest FPS and teamwork game of all time. This game has a variety of weapons, hats/cosmetics, miscellaneous things. I reccomend this game for every gamer. (You will instantly fall in love with this game)
[HAVX];-;Yay ! The best steam free game ever ?! No more words to say :D ... Counting hours from my old account + new account of steam it gives around 500hrs of my gameplay time :) My rating is [ 8/10 ]
YZZero;-;El Mejor juego F2p GRATIS!! The best game f2p,,,FREE!
Comrade Petrovich;-;Really fun to play with friends.
illuminatiMariachi  (>);-;This game basically Demolished my social life for the first months of playing. Great game! never gets old!
Selling tf2 inventory;-;This game is amazing. Ruined my life. 10/10.
FgtPotato;-;The intuitive deduction that is associated whilst playing this hilarious game is impeccable. This is both fun and challenging, which also allows one to customize their players via the location of common to rare items. Hats are always fun, but my favourite has to be the Tide Turner, a shield for the Demo Knight with a turn rate of 100%, accompanied by an instant recharge if used successfully. If you're looking for an F.P.S. game that is not too competitive but very fun, totally download this game, it is a MUST HAVE. Plus, it's free!
dog;-;Is gud has hats 10/10 would play again
JUN0;-;Honestly im in love with this game..! if you want something free, fun and firstperson like me this is definatly the game for you
CSn| Chocolate Chip Cookie;-;A masterpiece by Valve Corp, Team Fortress 2 blows Team Fortress Classic out of the water. New classes, weapons, and hats appear to make the game more fun. Every class is individual and completly different from one another. Spies might be Gabe Newell's favorite class, but they're hard to play as one. People have invented other game modes such as Sandbox, Slender Fortress 2, Freak Fortress 2, and more. This makes the game even more diversified and gives players a new experience if they cannot buy the games they originally come from. Valve has done an amazing job with this game and it is a huge improvement. I expect Valve to keep this game up and running for a long time. With multiple matches like Control Points, Capture The Flag (Briefcase) and Payload / Payload Race, It's a game that you will never get bored with. One thing Valve should do with Team Fortress 2 is to add more Payload Race maps. This game is going to be free to play forever, so feel free to get it whenever you want. There are also good features like Trading, Crafting, and the Mann Co. Store. Even a training mode was added. Otherwise, I give Team Fortress 2 a 10/10! LEGENDARY.
agorby00;-;I highly recomend it its amazingly fun to play and has an endless supply of guns
Tilian;-;Best Conga Hat Simulator I've ever played, 11/10 would rate again
FluffehTheDemonAssassin;-;This game is EPIC and it also doubles up as Hat simulator 2014 so really... there is nothing to complain... and remeber... Shrek is love.. Shrek is life
eDmine;-;You MUST click that download button! this is probably the best f2p game, for ex. you dont have to pay for weapons. Only if you pay some amount of money, you earn "only" cosmetic items, and you can trade, BUT trading is very important if you're not F2P. But of course, the game is NOT about trading but about Playing and killing people mate!There are 9 different classes to play, my favourite class is Soldier, he has rocket launcher shotgun and shovel as "stock weapons", but his best ability is "Rocket Jump" YOu have to crouch+jump and shoot rocket under you, and you wont believe yer eyes! youre in the sky if you did it correctly! Thanks, hope this help, i recommend you to spend some money to buy hats and earn some respect, i did it and its great, you must try it!
Senpai's Senpai;-;This game is absolutely excellent for anyone who likes FPS games.
Super Sneaky Shady SenPuppy;-;A Wise Man Once Said "THIS GAME IS ALL ABOUT FASHION SO SHUT YOUR  BEFORE I SUCK IT". That Defines The Game Better Then Anything I Can Say.
Lana;-;Once touched , you cannot run away from this game . Truly Addictive!
Cheese Master;-;REALLY ADDICTIVE and stole my money 11/10
AFX <3;-;Just a game about dressing your character up. There's a hidden shooting mini-game included as well.
Saku-ShiKomichi;-;Forget about what I did to the preview before. How 2 win TF2Wear a Gibus
Porter;-;Such a fun game to play for all ages, one of the best PC games I have ever played, if you haven`t played this game you are missing out 10/10
rosenley^;-;Honestly, i am horrible at Team Fortress 2, but i like to play it with my friends. So if you like a game where its easy to play with friends, i would get this.
Lewis Oak;-;Probably the best thing since Half Portal Left 8 Strike Dead! Recommend to alll players who enjoy their 360 noscope triples. 10/10
Bio;-;10 out of 10 would bang
What D Fuk;-;I made the mistake of downloading this game Literally every time I think it's going to get boring SOMETHING happens help me I want to get off Grey Mann's wild ride please 10/10
Max;-;Hats and Updates which brings more?!! .............................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................. H ... A ... T ... S ............................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................................... .................................................................and bugs! But here i am, after tons of hats and updates, still playing almost every day.
MistahBlaze;-;This game ruined my life. First it started, with me just shooting stuff as soldier. I died. and died. and died. I got mad. I then pressed the , button. And that is where it all started: Spy. I sucked at it sure, and kinda do still. But as I got my first backstab. I went insane. Backstab after backstab, it felt so good. Soon, I just went offline on tr_walkway, not to practice, just to get a few backstabs. Then I met some people, who would let you backstab them for only a few Mann Co. Crate Keys. I bought one key and did it, then all of the sudden, it turned into dozens and hundreds of keys. I had to sell my dog, sell my house, and go to 7/11 just to buy a damn steam card. I just had to get THOSE DAMN STEAM CARDS MAN. Every backstab I got felt so good, but I knew it was wrong. So damn wrong. So then the night after. I invited my family over. I went to "get a soda from the store" When I came back, there were police cars, and all of the sudden, when they let me inside. My family was dead. With the wallets on the floor. Nothing inside. Then I realised. There were 50 dollar steam cards in my hand. The cops rammed me to the ground and started to tell me my rights. I went to jail for 7 years. I bought a crappy apartment and a Mac. and now here I am. Still getting backstabs. This game ruined my life, made it impossible to get a good job, killed my family, and am now going to kill myself soon. I guess the game is pretty good, 10/10
Rick the Melee Wumbo | LGC;-;Team Fortress 2 is an amazing game. It is very skill based. Unlike other games, such as CoD, tf2 has no weapon unlock system and the weapons are as balanced as possible (unlike games like CoD where a weapon is better than another no matter what). The game play is very fast and fun. You need to pay attention to everything around you in order to play at the best of your abilities. Even though there is a limited number of weapons (there is quite alot though) there is always new gameplay stratigies and tactics to discover and learn. No one class is the best class to play, each one has their own advantages and disadvantages that may make it better to take out one class but harder to counter another. Many people that begin playing tf2 often give up quickly thinking they are not good enough, but everyone needs practice we all started bad at one time. Even if you are not getting alot of kills you can still be a great deal of help to the other team by being a distraction, providing health and damage buffs, or picking off a single class on the other team that would otherwise give your team a dissadvantage. Regarding the trade system, i consider it a quite good economic simulator. I have used the trade system to gain funds in my steam wallet and buy even more games without the need to spend alot of cash in real life. Team Fortress 2 also has things such as a costom scripting system, and the ability to make your own hats and game modles. But that is mostly not for all people and tf2 is not generally played for that.
Cuteberry The Dino;-;THis game is 10/10 would paly agin super mega awsome game i recomend it gretly
SemteX;-;coool
Chinominican;-;I liek this game, but I costs me 400,000 dollars to play it for 12 hours
DOCMAR;-;Extremely fine-tuned classes that all support each other making no one over-powered. Also ruined social life and way I see hats. 10/10
[xG:DM] Scootaloo;-;Hats with sparkly effects and conga dances. 10/10 would hats again.
[Beast];-;Team Fortress 2 is a great game to play with friends. Otherwise its fun to play solo, and maybe make some friends along the way. Trading is difficult for new players, but once you get a hang of it, its addicting Overall, TF2 is worth it. 8/10
Outcast;-;I LOVE THIS GAME!
enlowmation;-;This game makes my wallet sad. IGN: 11/10 It's alright.
Matty G;-;Now renamed: Hat Simulator 2014. It makes more sense now.
Puddin;-;it's cool
MLGsniper#1;-;u cant get enough of this game. something new happens everyday when i play tf2 and its awsome to play mvm with friends. what i really like about this game is the funny charecters lines and charecteristics. with the workshop its really fun cause u never know what new stuff there will be in the game. i totaly recommend this 100%. this is the best online miltiplayer game for me.
APstarwars;-;Many people wonder why one plays tf2, when there are many other better online shooters. I simply say to them: you don't pay a dime to waste your time Of course it is not a complete waste of time. The thing that makes tf2 unique is that it is not just a shooter. It is a stabber, healer, runner, sneaker, jumper, builder, burner, boomer, and of course, a team strategy game. It has spawned many internet memes and youtube videos, and has many different weapons and customization items. Of course, it would take hours to describe the whole game, so I will just say this: install the game, try it out, and have fun.
krul;-;MVM, or should i say man vs mum, has potential of being the next child online daycare. thats good because cod is best game ever and stuff.
Joker;-;VERY ENTERTAINING,YOU JUST HAVE TO WORK IN A TEAM AND IS VERY ADDICTIVE
Loading...;-;Fantastic game. Really easy to get into. Even a new player like myself (at time of writing) can end up getting top score on the leaderboard from a combination of skill and/or luck.
Jam;-;It's ok I guess
Garfield;-;Uh .Thank you? Zack is balls but Blake is ballser.
Songokuthegreat;-;Team Fortress 2 is a game that was released on PC in fall 2007. This game is legendary and is arguably the greatest FPS and teamwork game of all time. This game has a variety of weapons, hats/cosmetics, miscellaneous things. I reccomend this game for every gamer. (You will instantly fall in love with this game)
Gen. Angryspacegoat;-;Fast paced... yep
[xG:DM] Scootaloo;-;Hats with sparkly effects and conga dances. 10/10 would hats again.
bass;-;Gameplay is horrible and poorly made. COD blows this out of the water. The only redeeming quality of this game are the hats. Nothing like scamming 12 year olds out of their virtual headwear and shiny weapons that they bought with their mom's stolen credit card. 11/10 would recommend.
Teenka [cz];-;Don't doubt trying this game since it's for free and awesome! Why are you still reading this review?? Go and play :) 10/10
[XCZR]Sgt.Paul;-;This game,is a game where u can have fun with other's and friends! Let me explain all the classes,*Scout*,Weak,fast,somewhat strong!*Soldier*,Strong,fun to play with,and very useful!*Pyro*,rage class,People spam there mouse with the flame thrower,and reall good!*Demonman*,Goodclass,Very good with melee,and Helpfull in Mvm!*Heavy*,Another Rage class,OP,Helpful to the team,and good with damage!*Engi*,Can Build Sentry,Don't know how to spell it LOL,Teleporters,and he can Build MIni-Sentry's if u have the a certain weapon!*Medic*,Very good to the team,Can heal people,If u can keep them alive,ur team will most likely to win!*Sniper*,Cheap,Helpful to the team,and somewhat good!Last but not least the *Spy*,Now this class is such ,if he stabs u in the back u will die even with ful health that er will just destroy u! So if u get the game,have fun and enjoy!
-;-;If you don't taunt after a kill, you need to take a long look in the mirror and figure out what you're doing with your life.
Ruby The Wolf;-;10/10 If people spent as much money on cancer research as they do on virtual hats in this, I'm pretty sure we would've cured cancer a while ago.
JIMMY;-;Dis gam suks and th mechancs r as gay as ur sex life 42/10 Would bang
Friissy;-;Always worth to try
Dr.Jaden The Panda!;-;Why are you reading this? JUST PLAY!
[Anarchist] Myhical;-;Brilliant game! love it so much :D
TheIdioticNerd;-;THIS GAME IZ AMAZING!!!!!!
Billy Mays;-;The most awesome first person shooter ever! I started off as a F2P, like almost everyone else. Some time went by and now I have over 1000 hours of playtime and I became one of the many virtual hat traders. This game is not all about shooting the bad guys and winning the game, this game has a whole economy running behind it and when I first discovered trading, I became obsessed with it. I learned everything about the prices and I am still learning new things. The game also has a fantastic community, constantly providing content in the Steam Workshop while Valve decides which content is being added to the game. Besides the trading and the awesome community, it also has great gameplay. What makes me play it more is the amount of fun I have while ingame. Like, in every match I play there will be something that gives me a big smile on my face. Is there someone in the server annoying you with Mic-spamming or just being a total ? You can mute, kick and ban that er, thank you Valve for that! What also makes me play the game more is the great sense of humour. The personalities of the 9 classes are so well thought out and they all have great voice lines. To win the game, you have to work together with your team. You can try to win without them, but that is basically impossible! It's the best teamwork-based Hat Simulator FPS on the planet, what else needs to be said? 10/10, Go play it now!
Derpychameleon;-;GETTTTT ITTTTTT NOWWWWW !!!!!!!!!
TheIdioticNerd;-;THIS GAME IZ AMAZING!!!!!!
Billy Mays;-;The most awesome first person shooter ever! I started off as a F2P, like almost everyone else. Some time went by and now I have over 1000 hours of playtime and I became one of the many virtual hat traders. This game is not all about shooting the bad guys and winning the game, this game has a whole economy running behind it and when I first discovered trading, I became obsessed with it. I learned everything about the prices and I am still learning new things. The game also has a fantastic community, constantly providing content in the Steam Workshop while Valve decides which content is being added to the game. Besides the trading and the awesome community, it also has great gameplay. What makes me play it more is the amount of fun I have while ingame. Like, in every match I play there will be something that gives me a big smile on my face. Is there someone in the server annoying you with Mic-spamming or just being a total ? You can mute, kick and ban that er, thank you Valve for that! What also makes me play the game more is the great sense of humour. The personalities of the 9 classes are so well thought out and they all have great voice lines. To win the game, you have to work together with your team. You can try to win without them, but that is basically impossible! It's the best teamwork-based Hat Simulator FPS on the planet, what else needs to be said? 10/10, Go play it now!
Derpychameleon;-;GETTTTT ITTTTTT NOWWWWW !!!!!!!!!
hentai loving trash;-;this game ing sucks i hate it
tekkie;-;A fairly good game. There are so many strategies to play this game. I had alot of fun playing this game, although I play Garry's Mod and Left 4 Dead 2. I highly recommend playing this game, because this game is in the "must" category to try out.
Rayne -new mouse;-;10/10 would get hats again source: 8 years of hats
raygun #evo;-;literally the worst game I have ever played 0/10
mikkoviinna;-;A realistic life and hat simulator for the whole family (   )
Pybro | Swihdehn;-;Don't play this. Do not play it. UNLESS you want to experience an AMAZING multiplayer First Person Shooter game that is one of the most balanced and fun Shooters of all time. Forget the whole CoD vs. Battlefield debate. Team Fortress 2 is where it's at! This game is a blast. I've put so much time and money into this TF2 and it was ing worthid! It is so easy to pick up at first but if you like what you see and keep playing you'll notice that there is a serious learning courve to it. I peered into the depths of the competetive scene. Well, i didn't do that good but it was fun! I have met so many people and it is so amazing to mess around with everyone you meet on here. If i'd have to rate this i probably would give this game about a 10/10 :D Try it. You will not regret it! :)
pooki;-;if you like free porn on the walls, shooting and being annoying to people, and like hats, then this is yer game. 10/10 would waste another 100 dollars on it again
No;-;Hello. If you read this, you should be feel good, because you got something of my handyness. Okay, Team Fortress 2 is truly one of the best games I've been playing to this day.It's gameplay is smooth and easy and there aren't any bugs*(Only map related bugs*) and the game , steam in common has a complicated, yet easy trading system that allows you to exchange your items with other users. You should give Tf2 a try, it's free!
<B.B.>Sir Bouncealot;-;It's the most fun game I played for so far.
caT CSGOGamble.com;-;Man, cant say how fun this game is. The normal gameplay is fun. I think trading in tf2 is a big thing aswell
Alpha_wolf;-;This game is one of the best game's I have played.It gives me a challenge good for batteling having fun with your friends markatable guns i spend a lot of time on it with my friends great way to meet new friends there are diffrent modded maps like mincrafe,holween maps, a prison break type of thing.....ect.
Warped Snake;-;One of the best FPS with one of the best gaming community :)
screaming frog;-;Lady liked it so I guess it's okay Just please don't play sniper or spy Thanks
Draven;-;A classic steam game with shooting and first-person elements all packed into one game. Plus a wide assortment of accessories to choose from including hats, outfits, weapons, and many others. Can't go wrong with the huge number of game modes and customized game servers to add to the excitement. Definitely the first game to find and play when starting steam.
dog;-;it's probably the best free to play model ever devised. super fun game except when you start taking it seriously.
Niklaus Mikaelson;-;I've lost a year of my life because of this game. 12/10
Darkblaze Alchemist;-;The best there was,The best there is,The best there will be So much choices its a very versatile game that i have played in a long time, Recent updated always make it more fun New guns,New modes and most importantly new hats(Cosmetics now) This game is very addictive,Once you play its hard to stop Best i've played ever
Sucy Manbavaran;-;you must play this game is well balanced and is very fun and is free
Falcon Nudge;-;THE BEST FPS I HAVE EVERY
SenpaiSatan;-;Great game.
Richard;-;100+ Hours of my life gone, but now I have a cool hat. #NoRegrets
quackquack;-;this game ruined my life you should play it
aggums;-;Team Fortress 2 is Love, Team Fortress 2 is life.
Dr.Jaden The Panda!;-;Why are you reading this? JUST PLAY!
[Anarchist] Myhical;-;Brilliant game! love it so much :D
TheIdioticNerd;-;THIS GAME IZ AMAZING!!!!!!
Billy Mays;-;The most awesome first person shooter ever! I started off as a F2P, like almost everyone else. Some time went by and now I have over 1000 hours of playtime and I became one of the many virtual hat traders. This game is not all about shooting the bad guys and winning the game, this game has a whole economy running behind it and when I first discovered trading, I became obsessed with it. I learned everything about the prices and I am still learning new things. The game also has a fantastic community, constantly providing content in the Steam Workshop while Valve decides which content is being added to the game. Besides the trading and the awesome community, it also has great gameplay. What makes me play it more is the amount of fun I have while ingame. Like, in every match I play there will be something that gives me a big smile on my face. Is there someone in the server annoying you with Mic-spamming or just being a total ? You can mute, kick and ban that er, thank you Valve for that! What also makes me play the game more is the great sense of humour. The personalities of the 9 classes are so well thought out and they all have great voice lines. To win the game, you have to work together with your team. You can try to win without them, but that is basically impossible! It's the best teamwork-based Hat Simulator FPS on the planet, what else needs to be said? 10/10, Go play it now!
Derpychameleon;-;GETTTTT ITTTTTT NOWWWWW !!!!!!!!!
hentai loving trash;-;this game ing sucks i hate it
fine shot mate;-;This game omg is the best steam game i'v played it is the most balenced game of all time in steam there are so many things to do like do caping points,pushing carts, or doing king of the hill and hold the point on your teams side and win so i hope you understand what i mean.If you whant this game download it for free and you will never need mony for it buy it now only on the steam comunity.Sighning out
Darkfire the Gardener;-;One of the best Free-to-play titles Steam has to offer. A fun, class based, cartoon style fps that is good for laughs, groans, cheers and moans!
|T.W.G| The Winged Gamer;-;I have Spent so much time/money on this game....but its ok...because i have hats...lots...and lots....of pixilated.....hats..... ;-;. PLAY THIS NOW
ruBii;-;Appealing to little children...
Bio;-;10 out of 10 would bang
Porter;-;Such a fun game to play for all ages, one of the best PC games I have ever played, if you haven`t played this game you are missing out 10/10
JCDENTON;-;I only played it a little but it's ok.
bass;-;Gameplay is horrible and poorly made. COD blows this out of the water. The only redeeming quality of this game are the hats. Nothing like scamming 12 year olds out of their virtual headwear and shiny weapons that they bought with their mom's stolen credit card. 11/10 would recommend.
Cenox;-;Probably the most fun and balanced multiplayer FPS in the history of Steam, and maybe the history of FPS. Definetely worth playing
PatarPlays;-;Want fast paced action? Want hours of entertainment from the stupidest of things? Want constant updates that will break the game? Look no further than Team Fortress 2! Valve's sequel to the even more broken Team Fortress Classic delivers non stop surprises as you journey through a dessert, and a factory,and a barn in order to complete objective such as pushing and standing. You'll start your voyage as a f2p "gibus" but once you earn your wings, you'll notice people with shiny guns and fancy hats. From then on your life will be hell trading and trading, metal and hats just to get the one unusual to make it all worth it, and you'll be trapped, unable to escape the reality that you've playec this game for nearly 700 hours. Also, if you're a sensitive, impressionable youngster make sure to disable multiplayer sprays (not as bad as gmod). Good game i r8 8/8
bootyseeker;-;Epic story line, ending makes me cry everytime :')
Cynical Paulie;-;"9/11 would buy hat again" - IGN "make hats as DLCs?" - EA "too much FPS for us" - Ubisoft
RoboGoofy;-;TF2 is your average team based game. There are multiple different classes from (Scout, soldier, spy etc) all with different 'abilities' and weapons. The twist to this game is you can decorate your characters with hats and cosmetics. I think this is a great idea as it can make you unique from all the different players. I also like it from your different qualities of weapons (unique, strange, feative, unusual etc). The down side to this game is the fact that me, personally, got quite addicted to it.
Sir.Grey;-;I bought this when I first got Steam, but originally didn't enjoy it. Between having an old computer and a terrible internet connection, the game was practically unplayable. But about 2 years ago, I upgraded both. A couple of months ago, I decided, on a whim, to give it another go. This game is a lot of fun. The balance between the players is fantastic, with the short-range (but very powerful) Pyro to the far more tactical demoman, you can find what suits your flavor of play.
Gen. Angryspacegoat;-;Fast paced... yep
CAPTAIN AUTISMO;-;*Plays Game for 500 hours* *Gets Bored* *Finds a hat* *1000 more hours* *get into trading* *another 1000 hours* gud game 10/1
Pyingyongyang;-;I beat up someone with a fish wrapped in newspaper, whipped some teammates to make them run faster and ran around holding a grenade and wacking it on people being a suicide bomber. 11/10 gg Valve.
Irfan;-;good game snipy-snipy snoo play it be good and be hacks good :3
_Johno747#ColdHands;-;The best gamer ever. Has hats, guns, ppl and stuff.
Mr. Salad;-;Team fortress 2. allso known as the game I "used" to play alot back in 2009. the game have had  ton of updates so you can expect alot from it if your new to it. the game offers up to 9 unique classes. scout, soldier, pyro, demo, heavy, engineer, medic, sniper and spy. ech has their own role and sort of an objective to achive when your playing in matches. spy for example can take out engineer's buildings and backstab people. pyro is really good for clearing the path with his flamethrower and taking care of spies. medic heals and has the ability to ubercharge wich makes the players untouchable. the game offers alot of game modes such as payload were you push a bomb to the enemy team's point. capture the point, capture the flag, arena and the game's populure mode mvm "mann vs machine". the game focuses most of cooperating with your team at max. if your not, chances are your gonna lose. plus the game has hats..........cuz why not xD. valve loves hats and the game has alot to offer, some may say its the ultimate hat collacting simulator game mixed with first person shooter. yes and no. you dont really need to collect hats since they dont really offer anything special however due to the fact that hats has become a huge thing theres no wonder people would think that. I would personaly say that valve made a great game.....only they kinda ruined it to this day. there are major bugs and glitches. some that hasnt been fixed for weeks or months. some weapons have been nerfed so much some are considered useless. like the tomislav for heavy. there are allso problems finding "normal" servers nowdays since apearently the comunity finds valves servers unintresting. some do otrhers not. the comunity itself is pretty decent most of them are quite friendly and some may even offer help. if your premium...."actually payed for the game" there would be no suprise if the half of you have quited playing tf2. I myself have found tf2 less intresting becouse of all the negative reasones. if your new however pick this game up its really fun and it will drain alot of hours from you :)
Pussy Magnet;-;For me one of the best multiplayer games ever made
Captain Vac Sparrow;-;Amazing game really loving it 1300h played and still counting. I would highly recommend this game to anyone looking to either have a good time or to improve their aim.
AbsorbentAndYellow;-;This is one of the best games I have ever played! Free, fun, and accessible, Team Fortress 2 is a great and entertaining game. I love it.
SinisterGaming;-;Chances to get 8 weapons every week that resets on Thursday for different weapons? awesome!
eLL*;-;I absolutely love this game. All for one or all for yourself, you can experience fun in any type of game play!
Robert [NATO];-;I think TF2 is the best shooter for several players!
tcookc;-;free, fun, exciting multiplayer FPS + fun to play, but exceptionally difficult to master + friendly community + many unique game modes and maps + incredible 6v6 competitive play + hats, hats and more hats - ...where'd all my RL friends go? score = 5/5
simple Hans;-;if you like pink  then this game is for you
Rabarbar;-;Hats, guns, hats, teamplay, hats, backstabs, hats, random crits and hats. Thats and even more create a great game about hats!
onut;-;If you like First Person Shooters prepare yourself for a brand new experience! This Gibus wearing game will be one of the most fun and exciting adventures you will ever have. There are crazy weapons ranging from rocket launchers and miniguns to guillotines and frying pans! If you like making maps and items you can design your very own and post them on the community workshop for valve to implement into the game! There is also an amazing community that plays Team Fortress 2. In the community there are always people to talk to and play with. Another feature is the ability to customize characters with hats, clothes, paints, and special effects. So if you are one of those people that love to blow stuff up and look awesome doing it this is the game for you!
Dr.Killjoy;-;its a great Game to Kill time and also Hats always the hats
Shrekyl the Ogrelord;-;A great first person shooter and hat simulator, maybe more of the latter.
Mabel Bot;-;Highly recommend this game. Great stylized design, creative characters, the six beautiful maps have basically became my home. I miss the year 2007 0/10 can not buy it's free stupid.
R H I N;-;That game's just awesome. It's not like other FPS where you need to shoot people to be good at the game, you have to play with your team. You have to act considering of your team's mouvement and use your brain before anything. That's really making TF an AWESOME game e-sports wise. This game is  as  FFA wise, tho. No teamplay = No fun. But yeah, i do recommand this game.
SuperSonicFan411;-;I recommend this game to many fps fans. Here are my reasons why. 1.This game has awesome and fun game modes and objectives. 2.This game has awesome weapons and items 3.ITS FREE! 4.This game has a variety of awesome classes, Period. Well, what are you waiting for? GET THE GAME!
Saber;-;This game will ruin your ing life, your beliefs and everything you stand for.
Bibsterz;-;Team Fortress to is a team based game where you get to choose from 9 diffrent class depending on what you want to do like capute the inteligance? Kill Snipers? Kill people? Click Heads? Its a fun game that is sort to cartoony and looks like a 5 year olds game but is actually very fun! Its like Call Of Duty with diffrent perks that you cannot change from your loadout! But Im sure anyone will enjoy this game when they play it!
[NGHQ]KieranTheGamer;-;This Game Has Beautiful Graphics, what seems like 1000's of weapons to get, trading hats and crafting weapons, unlocking crates, you name it, YOU GOT IT IN TF2!
Lamamba;-;It's fun, it's free.
(Dr.) Captain Cat;-;Why aren't you already playing this? It's great. Go play.
[CHLN];-;This game is free to play. However... You will probably spend money on it. W+M1GibusMasterRace/10
Lord Jelly Donut;-;This game ruined my life. I never go outside anymore. My friends have all forgotten about me and moved on with their lives, and I'm almost certain that my parents have forgotten that they have a son...all because I spend every waking moment of my miserable life buying hats for a virtual Russian with a minigun from some guy with flames on his head. 5/5 stars. 11/10 "It's okay." ~IGN
htrlife - Themaskedman;-;Get this game now! THAT'S AN ORDER MAGGOT!!!!
|NOVA|;-;This game is just too good.
Zman;-;This game is awesome, and its free!!!
bajram serif mubarek olsun :);-;Stole my life and my money, gg. 10/10
Voltz;-;Best game ever for steam the only reason why i got steam Awesome graphcs Cool items Player made stuff and more MUST PLAY NOW!!!
Voltz;-;Best game ever for steam the only reason why i got steam Awesome graphcs Cool items Player made stuff and more MUST PLAY NOW!!!
Neo_Faz #GetWrecked,Son!;-;TF2 is the greatest multiplayer game ever made.you can get craft hats make weps and amek friends :D thats only i have to say now :D
Portponky;-;Have you ever played a first person shooter that you really loved? After a while, they usually get a little drab if the developers don't update them. Team Fortress is always evolving thanks to Valve's relentless agenda. Sometimes the true meaning of a game is hidden in the first letter of each sentence.
Desert Heat;-;DON'T PLAY THIS GAME. IT TOTALLY SUCKS, MAN. THAT'S WHY I HAVE OVER 1,500 HOURS ON IT. CAUSE IT SUCKS AND I PLAY IT JUST TO SEE HOW MUCH IT SUCKS. 0/10 TOO MANY HATS. LOLOL
Lucina;-;One of the best games i have ever played balanced gameplay, fun weapons and hats.... lots of hats
Water Salesman;-;Paid 7 cents to start trading and now I have over 1000 dollars 10/10
gardianxdevil #Going UK 18/7;-;AWESOME!!! Its free, Attractive And Amazing! This is the Game I was willing For Years!!!
DragoFlyrr;-;Why are people still reviewing this game
\WR/ MBD;-;Right up there with big hit titles such as, Big Rigs: Over the Road Racing, Sonic The Hedgehog 2006, Call of Duty: Modern Warfare 3, TF2 is the most intelligently designed, well thought out, absolute work of art to...PFFTF HAHHAHAHAHAHA I CANT! I CANT!
medicine;-;I learned how to be a weeb with the nerds on this game. 9/11 would recommend.
Sunky.mpg;-;If you're a fan of shooters, but are getting tired of Call of Duty, (Note:I have nothing against CoD) then this game is just for you. While the cartoony style might throw you off, that doesn't stop it from being a fun game. You can choose from nine classes, the Scout, Soldier, Pyro, Demoman, Heavy, Engineer, Medic, Sniper, and the Spy. While you play the game, you can sometimes get item drops that consist of weapons of different varieties of classes, crates that you can unbox with keys from the game's equivalent of the market, and hats, and other apparel so you can customize your classes to look the way you want. These items, however, are quite rare to obtain from drops, and you'll have to get them by either unboxing crates, or buying them from others. The currency equivalent of this game is metal. To be more precise, scrap metal, reclaimed metal, and refined metal. How you can get this is by crafting two weapons of the same class to make one scrap metal. Then you combine three scrap metal to make a reclaimed metal, then combine three reclaimed metal to make a refined metal. This is the slowest form of gathering metal, which is what the community calls "scrap banking". There's also the form of selling your weapons on trade servers, or the more recommended form, a website called "tf2outpost.com". This is the more recommended form of getting scrap in my opinion. But that's not the focus. To help you understand the gameplay a bit more, I'm going to tell you about how each class works. Scout: The scout is the fastest class in the game, and has the primary weapon, the scattergun, the secondary weapon, the pistol, and a melee weapon of a bat. All classes have a primary, secondary, and melee weapon of different varieties. The scout is recommended for people that just wanna get in the front lines, and just destroy everyone. The downside to the scout is the low health. This flaw is why you shouldn't just run into classes like the Heavy and Soldier so recklessly. Soldier: The Soldier is one of the slowest classes in the game, but it's quite understandable with the weapons he has. His weapons consist of a Rocket Launcher, a Shotgun, and a melee weapon of a shovel. The soldier is recommended for people that are good at prediction, and just wanna do a lot of damage. but it's because of these that also make it his flaw. If someone is good enough as a scout, they can just run around and just sap up damage; and pyros are quite the same. Pyro: The Pyro is essentially the easy class of the game, making up a flamethrower, and a fire axe. The Pyro's recommended for people just starting to get into the game, but other than that aspect, it's not a very good class for people that have a lot of experience with the game. Demoman: Now this is quite a fun class for both newcomers, and experienced players. His weapons consist of a grenade launcher, a sticky bomb launcher, and a beer bottle. The Demoman is recommended for, again, anyone, really. But it's not for everyone. (Note: I know it sounds like I'm contradicting myself here, but what I'm saying is that I recommend it to everyone, but the class itself might not be for you.) His flaw is that he isn't very fast, and his weapons, while as fun as they are, all depend on your skills of prediction, like the Soldier. That's basically what the Demoman is. Just a Soldier, but with grenades, and bombs. Heavy: This is a class that hardly anyone uses, unless you're defending. The heavy is the slowest class in the game, consisting weapons of a Minigun/Gatling Gun, a Shotgun, and his fists. Yes, the minigun does immense damage, but what happens when you run out of ammo? You'll have to rely on your shotgun, which won't be very effective against almost every class in the game. This is why the Heavy isn't played very much. But that doesn't mean that he isn't fun to use the whole way through. Engineer: Now this is a class that has a lot to be said. The engineer is, by far, the most complex character gameplay wise. His weapons consist of a shotgun, a pistol, a wrench, and his buildings that are a sentry gun, a dispenser, and a teleporter entrance/exit. These buildings can be upgraded using metal, not the kind for currency, but this metal is specifically for the Engineer. When you do upgrade your sentry, it can do massive damage, and can soak up more damage then a level 1 sentry would. You can only level your buildings up to a level three. Dispensers give you health, and ammo, while teleporters, well, teleport. The more they're upgraded, the more health and ammo your dispenser gives, and the faster your teleporters cool off. But beware of spies, because they can sap your buildings, which result in the buildings being destroyed if you don't get rid of them. But that's about all I have to say for this class, on to the next one. Medic: This is one of the most useful classes in official servers, but when it consists of other servers such as trade servers, and Saxton Hale, you won't get much to work with. The Medic's weapons consist of a syringe gun, a medi-gun, which can heal your teammates, and a bonesaw. When you heal your teammates long enough, you earn what is called Uber. Once your Uber is full, you and your teammate can be invincible for a short amount of time. Other than that, there isn't much left to talk about. Sniper: For all of you CoD players out there, you'll either fit right at home, or stay as far away from this class as virtually possible. But anyways, the sniper does, well, snipe. His weapons consist of a sniper rifle, an SMG, or to be more precise, a small machine gun, and a Kukri, which is basically a small sword. The sniper has a comfortable speed, and is fun to use if you know how to rack up the headshots. The only way to actually make any sort of progress like that though, is to find a safe spot, and just go crazy. Just watch out for spies though. They can backstab you while you're dominating everyone. Spy: This is the final class in the game, and is by far the hardest to perfect. The spy lives well up to his name with weapons consisting up of a revolver, a sapper, a knife, a disguise kit, and a cloaking device. The spy is quite versatile if you know what you're doing. The knife you have can backstab someone, which kills them in an instant, no matter what class you are. This mechanic is the stuff of nightmares for engineers, and snipers; unless you have a certain item for the sniper, which is called the Razorback, which prevents spies from backstabbing you. The cloaking device does just that. Cloak. But it's only for a short amount of time, so don't even think of trying to exploit. The sapper can be put onto enemy buildings to destroy them. But they can't be destroyed instantly, so you'll have to make sure engineers don't destroy them. Watch out when you try to sap sentries. If you're not disguised, it'll utterly decimate you before you can even get close to you. The spy is the weakest class with the same amount of health as the scout. Other than these factors, there's really nothing else to talk about. Well anyways, that's all you need to know about the game of Team Fortress 2. I immensely recommend this to any shooter fans out there that just want a change of pace.
Endreo;-;I highly recommened TF2 I would say it has the best community for a game in the world. If your into having fun with friends or taking games more seriously this is the game for you. Public server are avalable all over the world where you can play with friends and have a lot of fun. But TF2 is a two sided game. One side where you play the game casually and hang out with friends on public servers etc. The other side is a major part of TF2 being the competitive where you take the game seriously. The most common formats to play competetive TF2 in is 6v6 where you have 2 Scouts, 2 Soldiers, 1 Medic and one demo. The other format is Highlander where a team has 9 players, 1 of every class. Now I just pointed out the basics of this game, I would recommend this game to people who like to play with a team, using teamwork to win.
[DaGibus] i8pichu;-;Really fun. I enjoy playing this game, there's a wide variety of characters to match your playstyle, so you won't feel left out. The controls are pretty standard and easy to learn, but the best thing is it is free! I strongly reccomend this game! You have nothing to lose ^-^
mk;-;it's alright...
Unicornz;-;This game literally took all my money. Was it worth it? Yeah for the memories but once you get your first hat, misc, or strange you're hooked. BE WARNED. 11/10 would play again but i need to buy food.
VVotaku;-;Best Military SWAG Simulator 2xxx 10/10
Mr. Gre;-;Mannpower? More like....Mann this gamemode is full of .
A |    L;-;To begin I would like to say that TF2 is a F2P game and I would recommend it to anybody. The following is a Shrek Is Love Shrek Is Life parody that is CHILD FRIENDLY. I was only 13 years old. I loved TF2 so much. I had put countless ammounts of money onto steam to get al the TF2 miscs. Every night I pray to the scout, soldier, engineer, medic, sniper, spy, heavy and demos that I would get a good trade in the morning. My parents hear me and say I have an addiction. I knew he was jeleous of my pro skills at TF2 so I said he should leave me alone. My parents ban me and send me to sleep. I know I will never gte my Level Three Chin anymore now. I feel a warmth approaching me in my bed. Its a fat engineer that says "i see you found my teleporter enterance". I tell the fat engineer that I am ready. He gets out a chair and sits down drinking beer. He offers me one now but I say no. I feel my eyes tearing at his fat face. But I know that one day I want to be like him. So thats my parody of Shrek Is Love Shrek Is Life. Please go check out the video afterwards if you already havn't to understand this fully. WARNING THHIS VIDOE ON YOUTUBE WILL CONTAIN RUDE WORDS AND SCENES! So in the end I think of TF2 as a fantastic game!
Seor Dingus;-;This is game.
Claudia ~ WoW ruined my life;-;One of the best game i have ever played! I rarely don't get bored of something,but this is a rule-breaker! I suggest this game to everyone :)
Cat Charger trip - back 3rd aug;-;oh god... this game is awsome :PP
naknak;-;Team Fortress 2 is recommended by naknak!
Lily;-;You're only popular when you have hats
LF | Tamerlan;-;One of the best multiplayer FPS games ever. Not Pay-to-win, amazing community, tons of features and gamemodes. Still lots of fun after years of playing.
MoonFace  sellin accunt;-;this game is almost as good as elle reinehrs bald head xooxoxox play 10/10
King Awesomenator;-;Hearing someone ask "What is Rice made of?" 10/10
Portponky;-;Have you ever played a first person shooter that you really loved? After a while, they usually get a little drab if the developers don't update them. Team Fortress is always evolving thanks to Valve's relentless agenda. Sometimes the true meaning of a game is hidden in the first letter of each sentence.
Desert Heat;-;DON'T PLAY THIS GAME. IT TOTALLY SUCKS, MAN. THAT'S WHY I HAVE OVER 1,500 HOURS ON IT. CAUSE IT SUCKS AND I PLAY IT JUST TO SEE HOW MUCH IT SUCKS. 0/10 TOO MANY HATS. LOLOL
Lucina;-;One of the best games i have ever played balanced gameplay, fun weapons and hats.... lots of hats
Water Salesman;-;Paid 7 cents to start trading and now I have over 1000 dollars 10/10
gardianxdevil #Going UK 18/7;-;AWESOME!!! Its free, Attractive And Amazing! This is the Game I was willing For Years!!!
DragoFlyrr;-;Why are people still reviewing this game
Sunky.mpg;-;If you're a fan of shooters, but are getting tired of Call of Duty, (Note:I have nothing against CoD) then this game is just for you. While the cartoony style might throw you off, that doesn't stop it from being a fun game. You can choose from nine classes, the Scout, Soldier, Pyro, Demoman, Heavy, Engineer, Medic, Sniper, and the Spy. While you play the game, you can sometimes get item drops that consist of weapons of different varieties of classes, crates that you can unbox with keys from the game's equivalent of the market, and hats, and other apparel so you can customize your classes to look the way you want. These items, however, are quite rare to obtain from drops, and you'll have to get them by either unboxing crates, or buying them from others. The currency equivalent of this game is metal. To be more precise, scrap metal, reclaimed metal, and refined metal. How you can get this is by crafting two weapons of the same class to make one scrap metal. Then you combine three scrap metal to make a reclaimed metal, then combine three reclaimed metal to make a refined metal. This is the slowest form of gathering metal, which is what the community calls "scrap banking". There's also the form of selling your weapons on trade servers, or the more recommended form, a website called "tf2outpost.com". This is the more recommended form of getting scrap in my opinion. But that's not the focus. To help you understand the gameplay a bit more, I'm going to tell you about how each class works. Scout: The scout is the fastest class in the game, and has the primary weapon, the scattergun, the secondary weapon, the pistol, and a melee weapon of a bat. All classes have a primary, secondary, and melee weapon of different varieties. The scout is recommended for people that just wanna get in the front lines, and just destroy everyone. The downside to the scout is the low health. This flaw is why you shouldn't just run into classes like the Heavy and Soldier so recklessly. Soldier: The Soldier is one of the slowest classes in the game, but it's quite understandable with the weapons he has. His weapons consist of a Rocket Launcher, a Shotgun, and a melee weapon of a shovel. The soldier is recommended for people that are good at prediction, and just wanna do a lot of damage. but it's because of these that also make it his flaw. If someone is good enough as a scout, they can just run around and just sap up damage; and pyros are quite the same. Pyro: The Pyro is essentially the easy class of the game, making up a flamethrower, and a fire axe. The Pyro's recommended for people just starting to get into the game, but other than that aspect, it's not a very good class for people that have a lot of experience with the game. Demoman: Now this is quite a fun class for both newcomers, and experienced players. His weapons consist of a grenade launcher, a sticky bomb launcher, and a beer bottle. The Demoman is recommended for, again, anyone, really. But it's not for everyone. (Note: I know it sounds like I'm contradicting myself here, but what I'm saying is that I recommend it to everyone, but the class itself might not be for you.) His flaw is that he isn't very fast, and his weapons, while as fun as they are, all depend on your skills of prediction, like the Soldier. That's basically what the Demoman is. Just a Soldier, but with grenades, and bombs. Heavy: This is a class that hardly anyone uses, unless you're defending. The heavy is the slowest class in the game, consisting weapons of a Minigun/Gatling Gun, a Shotgun, and his fists. Yes, the minigun does immense damage, but what happens when you run out of ammo? You'll have to rely on your shotgun, which won't be very effective against almost every class in the game. This is why the Heavy isn't played very much. But that doesn't mean that he isn't fun to use the whole way through. Engineer: Now this is a class that has a lot to be said. The engineer is, by far, the most complex character gameplay wise. His weapons consist of a shotgun, a pistol, a wrench, and his buildings that are a sentry gun, a dispenser, and a teleporter entrance/exit. These buildings can be upgraded using metal, not the kind for currency, but this metal is specifically for the Engineer. When you do upgrade your sentry, it can do massive damage, and can soak up more damage then a level 1 sentry would. You can only level your buildings up to a level three. Dispensers give you health, and ammo, while teleporters, well, teleport. The more they're upgraded, the more health and ammo your dispenser gives, and the faster your teleporters cool off. But beware of spies, because they can sap your buildings, which result in the buildings being destroyed if you don't get rid of them. But that's about all I have to say for this class, on to the next one. Medic: This is one of the most useful classes in official servers, but when it consists of other servers such as trade servers, and Saxton Hale, you won't get much to work with. The Medic's weapons consist of a syringe gun, a medi-gun, which can heal your teammates, and a bonesaw. When you heal your teammates long enough, you earn what is called Uber. Once your Uber is full, you and your teammate can be invincible for a short amount of time. Other than that, there isn't much left to talk about. Sniper: For all of you CoD players out there, you'll either fit right at home, or stay as far away from this class as virtually possible. But anyways, the sniper does, well, snipe. His weapons consist of a sniper rifle, an SMG, or to be more precise, a small machine gun, and a Kukri, which is basically a small sword. The sniper has a comfortable speed, and is fun to use if you know how to rack up the headshots. The only way to actually make any sort of progress like that though, is to find a safe spot, and just go crazy. Just watch out for spies though. They can backstab you while you're dominating everyone. Spy: This is the final class in the game, and is by far the hardest to perfect. The spy lives well up to his name with weapons consisting up of a revolver, a sapper, a knife, a disguise kit, and a cloaking device. The spy is quite versatile if you know what you're doing. The knife you have can backstab someone, which kills them in an instant, no matter what class you are. This mechanic is the stuff of nightmares for engineers, and snipers; unless you have a certain item for the sniper, which is called the Razorback, which prevents spies from backstabbing you. The cloaking device does just that. Cloak. But it's only for a short amount of time, so don't even think of trying to exploit. The sapper can be put onto enemy buildings to destroy them. But they can't be destroyed instantly, so you'll have to make sure engineers don't destroy them. Watch out when you try to sap sentries. If you're not disguised, it'll utterly decimate you before you can even get close to you. The spy is the weakest class with the same amount of health as the scout. Other than these factors, there's really nothing else to talk about. Well anyways, that's all you need to know about the game of Team Fortress 2. I immensely recommend this to any shooter fans out there that just want a change of pace.
medicine;-;I learned how to be a weeb with the nerds on this game. 9/11 would recommend.
BMO;-;I'm failing in all my classes because of this game. 9/11
MoonFace  sellin accunt;-;this game is almost as good as elle reinehrs bald head xooxoxox play 10/10
King Awesomenator;-;Hearing someone ask "What is Rice made of?" 10/10
Apollo;-;This game ruined my life. (In a good way.) I'm 5 hours of gameplay away from 1000 hours. That alone should prove how much I love this game.
Moonlight;-;Very fun and not demanding when it comes to OS requirements. Would highly recommend to everyone.
Sir.Grey;-;I bought this when I first got Steam, but originally didn't enjoy it. Between having an old computer and a terrible internet connection, the game was practically unplayable. But about 2 years ago, I upgraded both. A couple of months ago, I decided, on a whim, to give it another go. This game is a lot of fun. The balance between the players is fantastic, with the short-range (but very powerful) Pyro to the far more tactical demoman, you can find what suits your flavor of play.
Zman;-;This game is awesome, and its free!!!
bajram serif mubarek olsun :);-;Stole my life and my money, gg. 10/10
Karim13;-;This is a really fun game. It is very addictive and fun. You can spend hundreds of hours playing it. It has a variety of matches, classes, weapons, and other cool items. It has one issue though, the teams are never balanced. But it is not really a big deal and I recommend this game to everyone who likes fast, action, fun game.
No Mercy #gothacked;-;Its ok, played it a few times
Crabby;-;Has taken away my social life. All I ever think about are about my hats. 10/10
{Woona} PegAsi;-;Nice game with friends :3
Stealth Assassin;-;One of the best games i've ever played :D
FireFF2 | Stefgast13;-;10/10 420% cewlness, epic hats n' ultimate game for everyone who likes some shooting, be the premium player and find/buy the hats, noscope everyone you see with sniper, trickstab everyone with spy, build infinite sentry's with engineer, be the medic for ubers that pumps you with @@#^#@, the heavy with epic weapons best poot guy, demoman equals drunken pipes, pyro with that voice that none can hear, can't be a girl because which girls wanna see somebody burning for real?, soldier is for me the 1# guy shoot with rockets, rocket jump everywhere where you want (but first. let me put my gunboats on) a not wise guy we all know, scout the really fast guy, probably winning every run competition if he is in real life (especially with baby face blaster, shoot all your teammates down for speed ^^) best game for my life i shall say
Dawbs;-;I sat there for a whole match rigging a choke point to explode. It exploded. I think I like this game.
Paso;-;Grab everything special about an FPS and you have Team Fortress 2. Words can not describe how addictive this game is.
VioletLollie;-;Most fun I've had in a long time. This game is great for those looking to be 'pro' and those who just wanna have fun.
Glabatorix;-;1,224 hours - still playing - still alot of fun....
GURGLEGUY12345;-;I don't play many shooters, but when I do, I prefer Team Fortress 2. This game breaks the mold with its clever, cartoony humor, unique, identifiable characters, creative weapons, different game modes, and diverse, balanced classes with their own unique playstyles. I enjoy team-based games, and while I'm not particularly good at this game, it hasn't gotten any less fun in all the time I've played it.
FoxNull/WatchingEVO;-;Do i really need to explain what this game is? Are there actually people who dont know what TF2 is? Holy . Okay let's start the review. Team Fortress 2 is a Class-Based FPS (That recently became Free-To-Play) where two teams of varying classes are pitted against eachother in a variety of game modes including everything from capture the flag to push the cart. It's different from other FPS games that take themselves seriously with brooding and mature themes. This game dosent take itself seriously, at all. That's what makes it so much fun and so appealing to EVERYBODY. It has colorful cartoonish characters (Think Looney Toons but with more blood) and wacky weapons and maps. The best thing about TF2 is its absolutely bonkers sense of humor, and while this makes it so awesome, some more serious players might be turned off by how wacky it can be. Me on the other hand? I ing love it! Its the perfect game to play when you just dont give a . The game emphasizes on FUN and isnt exactly the most balanced thing in the world, but you probably wont notice since you'll be laughing your  off. THE GOOD + Wacky & Humorous world filled with lovable iconic characters + Fun colorful blood soaked world + Tons of user generated content + MASSIVE dedicated playerbase + Dedicated servers. (Duh) + Hats + ITS MADE BY VALVE, WHAT MORE DO YOU WANT? THE BAD - Upbeat Colorful setting might not be for everyone (Like Emos lol) - BALANCE? NEVER HEARD OF IT. - It's not Half-Life 3 (OR IS IT?) THE UGLY What the Spy probably did to your mom last night. BOTTOM LINE If you have a sense of humor go ing download this game, what the hell are you doing with your life? If you dont? Go play bingo at the retirement home across the street. (YOU KNOW THE ONE) https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=han3AfjH210 "OHH, THEY'RE GOING TO HAVE TO GLUE YOU BACK TOGETHER! IN HELL! " 9/10
Pissrocket kumbum;-;I was on 2fort, it was a great day, but my nemesis Georg.navoic03 was on the server, he had his feared Achivement item Machina, his colored Gibus, and his Mercenary badge. little did i know that he would bodyshot me multiple times as i tried to cap the intellegence using my best tactic avalible, the SpyCrab
TungtsenGuy;-;I' ve spent most hours of my day playing this game. I've had it for three months and I have 225 hours on record. Is this a good game? Yes. Is this good to have when you have important stuff to do? No. I didn't even like FPS games befor TF2. And now, this is basically my favorite game. (besides Zelda) You may or may not enjoy this game, I find it really time consuming, and it you have things to do, don't launch the game. You will lose track of time unless you have a timer and /or alarm at hand. THis game is very immersive,sucking you in, and letting you find all the weapons the guy who just killed you had. For free. If you want the best experience in this game, become premium. Sure there will always be some pro who destroys you, but with practice, you may be able to be that guy. Play on in the TF2niverse my friends, play on.
Storm Trooper: Dead Shot;-;this is the TRUE hat simulator XD best game ever 10/10
[OVO]Unleazhed;-;Spent all my money on this. Writing this from a laptop using McDonalds WiFi. 11/10 would conga again.
Teezy;-;I am spending all my money 10/10
-UT- Diplex;-;Team Fortress 2 Is a free to play game. Its fun and has many great communitys. Theres two sides of team fortress 2 competitive and trading. Both sides are great and have their ups and downs. Team Fortress 2 allows friends to connect while being able to play together and having fun along with other gameplays tf2 provides (MvM, Plr, Ctf, Ect,). Team Fortress has been a wonderful game to play (and still is) and not to mention the creativity and customizing that can be shown in the characters. I recomend this game to everyone as its fun and enjoyable!
Leo The Gamer;-;An American Patriot killing an Aussie Outback Ranger with a rocket launcher and then drinking coffee like there is no tommorow. 10/10 will rekt again
Muddypaws;-;Simulation of hat wearing, shoot killing, duck raiding, crate finding, weapon toting, rocket jumping, unusual collecting, strange farming, idle servering, Pootis Heavying, Spycrabbing, hat trading, team stacking,  training, holiest of dooliest-ing, dubspoling game where even though you play the same maps over and over you just...can't...stop. 10/10 Unusual Australium weapons would pro again.
FapTic;-;Let me ask you this: Who WOULDN'T play this?
..;-;I started playing TF2 a little over a year ago. I remeber my first map that i played (pl-badwater) and ever since then its been non-stop for me. The depth of character skills and variety blew me away (with sticky spam) and I told myself that I was going to get good at this game. I have over 400 hours on this account and 700 hours on my main account, I never knew the amount of dedication I could put towards something I really enjoyed. Play this game, get better and have fun. 10/10 all the way.
mousepad;-;its ok i still cant use the sticky bumb launcher thogh
Captain Olimar;-;A kid told me to go f*** a cactus after dominating him as sniper. 10/10
Dylan;-;Very good game. One of the best games out their.
Karim13;-;This is a really fun game. It is very addictive and fun. You can spend hundreds of hours playing it. It has a variety of matches, classes, weapons, and other cool items. It has one issue though, the teams are never balanced. But it is not really a big deal and I recommend this game to everyone who likes fast, action, fun game.
pax *BenQ #BC;-;A game for in between. Despite all this, a good game (:
alaIn;-;Easily one of the greatest multiplayer games of all time for PC. There are so many features it's absolutely mind blowing, you can have great fun even without paying a single penny. Get on this game, you are missing out!
Shiny Dentist;-;I played it only for a bit, but it seems ok.
Toy Chica;-;A really fun game to play.
Apollo;-;This game ruined my life. (In a good way.) I'm 5 hours of gameplay away from 1000 hours. That alone should prove how much I love this game.
BMO;-;I'm failing in all my classes because of this game. 9/11
Rom and Ram (White Sisters);-;This game is actually fun like L4D2 and other games. There are 9 classes to play as, some maybe difficult and some could be pretty easy Ex: Easy:Scout Difficult: Soldier. This game can be scary sometimes in my opinion XD not because of the servers. Because of when someone pops up and I someone could scream xD. Its pretty much very active,fun, and sometimes taking it seriously. But there is a workshop for valve to add miscs,weapons and stuff. :3
Louiiis;-;An excellent game! And I've also met some really lovely people along the way
tactical banana inbound;-;Destroyed My life and wallet 10/10
AgentChicken;-;Team Fortress 2 is a game hard to write a review for, its constantly updated, new things are always added (Mostly Hats) but Valve does a good job keeping it alive. The community ingame is a bit like being in the deep end of the Pool not expecting whats to come when you go deeper into the pool, Some people are generally nice to talk to and very kind, some are a  and racists but hey its the internet what can you do? but generally people are nice. Classes are balanced....a bit to a point where most of the time classes can kill each other easily if you play that class really well, The classes have their Pro's and Con's but its really all up to how you play that specific class. MVM is a bit of a push and shove trying to get a good team that does Not compose of prepubescent children who have such a squeaky voice they could do a voice over for mickey mouse if need be. but MVM is a nice addon for TF2 killing robots instead of Merc's. As i said before TF2 is hard game to make a review about but its really fun...Buggy sometimes but the bugs usually get patched quickly.
Anthony;-;welcome to team fortress 2, after 9 years in development i hope it would have been worth the wait.
Lellers;-;Never got a Hat drop, never stops hoping.
The Rabid Wolverine;-;Good game really good game,not that addicting and bored for me,but i recommend to play it for everyone who enjoys FPS genre games
Pyrotte The Liar;-;you can poot a hat... over a hat ! 11/10 would make a hat tower any time On the serious note. I have heard of this game back in 2009 and when i heard in 2011 that it's now Free 2 Play on 2013 i got the chance to play it, since then i keep spending hours and hours in it for being such a fun game especially if you play it with your friends.
Mari;-;Write a review for Team Fortress 2 Please describe what you liked or disliked about this game and whether you recommend it to others. Please remember to be polite and follow the
Shiny Dentist;-;I played it only for a bit, but it seems ok.
Toy Chica;-;A really fun game to play.
Lellers;-;Never got a Hat drop, never stops hoping.
toy bonnie;-;i like the game but my faovrite class is the scout he has super speed
SirValkers;-;Awesome game based around ha- UHHHH... The objective.
Scailer = Icetea On VACation;-;This game to me was the best and is the best!
*: [EZ] Zabi / ^ )>;-;I love this game. So much fun. THIS IS MY LIFE.
{TRC}RainbowFactoryWorker;-;Once you start playing TF2 you cant stop, it pulls you into a pleasant frenzy of killing that you will do over and over again without thinking twice.
marcus fancy;-;I main medic so I don't really know how to play this game
wenuroldr;-;The epitome of multiplayer FPSs. Free-to-play with a huge emphasis on game balance. However, this game is incredibly difficult to just start playing. There's a steep learning curve that lies within the classes themselves and some unfamiliar game mechanics. The main thing that sets this game apart from, well, any other game in the genre is the classes. Every class has their own unique abilities with only one notable class that I'd consider good all around, the Soldier. However, he has some drawbacks, he's slow to reload, his movement speed is the second lowest. There is no definitive "best class" or "worst class". Each of them have their own important roles and often become less useful in large numbers. The huge variety of weapons is incredible and, in the same respect, can be kinda confusing. I truly can't recommend this game to anyone who isn't willing to actively learn about it first, as it can be frustrating to not be able to understand the opposition and constantly get called a "gibusvision f2p". Knowing is, in fact, half the battle.
Anthony;-;welcome to team fortress 2, after 9 years in development i hope it would have been worth the wait.
WolfiePup42;-;There are some pros and cons. The pros are veryfun and interactive. The cons are there are some mingebags out there.
ShineMYShoes;-;Dota 2 is better then this garbage and that says a lot when all I see in Dota 2 is a black and blurry screen. At least farming simulator is more action packed then this. I would rather spend my time playing Modern Warfare 3 aka 420QU1CKSC0P3 Bl4Z3 IT simulator. But hey, if you always dreamed of having a multitude of hats like I did when I was a wee little boy, then this is the game for you!
Mii Plaza Mii;-;After hockey when I was ten I would come home and play on well servers for hours. Most people completely ignore the game based on the fact that half of the TF2 community are hat crazy people. Besides that, this game means something special to me.
SpartaPanda;-;Best Game Ever Funny Good Multiplayer And Funny Taunts ! Dowload Real Good Game
pops;-;Team Fortress 2 is a multiplayer shooter that defines its genre. Every class is a completely different challenge to master, and just when you get tired of how they play, you can use a different item set (which require some work to unlock) to completely change the game. With a variety of gamemodes, including the recently-released Mann Vs Machine hoarde mode, that all add whole new layers of replayability to the game keep it fresh even 6 years from initial release. Team Fortress 2 is possibly the best Free-To-Play game on the market, and you have absolutely no reason to not give it a try.
Microwave (OP-ness)!;-;You can't 360 no scope people but you can kill them with pans. Some pans turn people into gold. Therefore, you could say that this game is... Ahem... GOLDEN! Rate up pls this took time and effort Did I mention the fact that teamwork matters and there is literally thousands of explosions on screen every 2 seconds
Rintse | Gone 6-20 July;-;how u move?
[RTT] RandomCookie (_);-;11/10 Like Skyrim with hats
Kreative;-;I WUV THIS GAME 9/10 ITS JUST SOO ADDICTING! I WUV YOO VALVE FOR THIS AMAZING CREATION! :'D MAKES ME WANT TO CRY :D
[RTT] RandomCookie (_);-;11/10 Like Skyrim with hats
Microwave (OP-ness)!;-;You can't 360 no scope people but you can kill them with pans. Some pans turn people into gold. Therefore, you could say that this game is... Ahem... GOLDEN! Rate up pls this took time and effort Did I mention the fact that teamwork matters and there is literally thousands of explosions on screen every 2 seconds
Ezio Auditore;-;The game can make people angry sometimes but you can be able to do many things example you're able to customize your character putting hats,misc,book,canteens,and or taunts. The game can also let you pretty much break the laws of gravity. It has a good story about 2 brothers fighting for their father's land *Continued*(To read more go to www.teamfortress.com) Sometimes people may be negative to eachother with this game because of its unrealistic ways and how its not "COD Related" if you play this game you'd know that people are more nice and easy in the game.Sometimes people would hate you for being a F2P(Free 2 Play) But you can just buy premium of course but to this very day they don't screw with F2P because they know underestimation is a bad move.The classes have their own ways for example the Heavy is a defense character he may be slow but his minigun can do hell of a damage.The game sometimes may make crossover hats like the Alien...... I forgot the name theres the Awesomenauts Badge and countless others coming soon and will be in your inventory sooner or later.There are many more reasons why I recommend this game but i'm kind of new to this game there may be other reasons why people would love to play this game besides from the reasons. AGGH THIS GAME SUCKS!!! -Cod Kids When a COD kid rages you people will most likely be there xd who wouldn't Get.The.Game.
pops;-;Team Fortress 2 is a multiplayer shooter that defines its genre. Every class is a completely different challenge to master, and just when you get tired of how they play, you can use a different item set (which require some work to unlock) to completely change the game. With a variety of gamemodes, including the recently-released Mann Vs Machine hoarde mode, that all add whole new layers of replayability to the game keep it fresh even 6 years from initial release. Team Fortress 2 is possibly the best Free-To-Play game on the market, and you have absolutely no reason to not give it a try.
<UGA> If someone annoys you;-;I lost my social life I lost my money I got friends because of this game I lost them again because of this game I lost my girlfriend I lost my manners I lost me I lost everything i did not mention above... But worst of all... .... .... .... .... .... .... .... I LOST KYOKUSHIN BECAUSE OF THIS ING -ASS GAME... I LOST MY ****ING STRENGTH AND HEALTH BECAUSE OF THIS GOD-DAMN GAME... I TRAIN FOR HOURS; ONLY TO WASTE ALL THAT TRAINING BY SITTING AND PLAYING THIS GOD-DAMN GAME FOR ALL THESE HOURS... IF you're willing to sacrifice all I said above for this game? I dunno SPECIFICALLY what will happen but... it'll be good :]
Filthy Casual;-;If you have ever played TF2 on the Xbox, forget everything you think you know about the game. This game on PC is 100x better. It plays better, has more activity, and lets not forget about the items. Those sweet, sweet items that add a whole new level to the game. 10/10 would recommend.
Rintse | Gone 6-20 July;-;how u move?
Aids are Dangerous;-;This is the best Half Life 2 Mod I have ever played, it's a first person shooter, and it has all the stuff and hats you want. EDIT: oh god
_Q__Q_;-;A rubber duck is a toy shaped like a stylized duck, generally yellow with a flat base. It may be made of rubber or rubber-like material such as vinyl plastic. The yellow rubber duck has achieved an iconic status in Western pop culture and is often symbolically linked to bathing. Various novelty variations of the toy are produced. The history of the rubber duck is linked to the emergence of rubber manufacturing in the late 19th century. The earliest rubber ducks were made from harder rubber. Sculptor Peter Ganine created a sculpture of a duck in the 1940s, then patented it and reproduced it as a floating toy, of which over 50,000,000 were sold. Jim Henson popularized rubber ducks in 1970, performing the songs "Rubber Duckie" and "DUCKIE" as Ernie, a popular Muppet from Sesame Street. Ernie frequently spoke to his duck and carried it with him in other segments of the show. On a special occasion, Little Richard performed the song. C.W. McCall's hit song Convoy, (and the movie and novel it inspired) are narrated from the viewpoint of a character who replaced the bulldog hood ornament on his Mack truck with a bathtub toy and used the on-air handle of "Rubber Duck". Besides the ubiquitous yellow rubber duck with which most people are familiar, there have been numerous novelty variations on the basic theme, including character ducks representing professions, politicians, or licensed individual celebrities. There are also ducks that glow in the dark, change colour, have interior LED illumination, or include a wind-up engine that enables them to "swim". In 2001, The Sun, a British tabloid newspaper reported that Queen Elizabeth II has a rubber duck in her bathroom that wears an inflatable crown. The duck was spotted by a workman who was repainting her bathroom. The story prompted sales of rubber ducks in the United Kingdom to increase by 80% for a short period. Rubber ducks are collected by a small number of enthusiasts. The 2007 Guinness World Record for World's Largest Rubber Duck Collection stood at 1,439 different rubber ducks, and was awarded to Charlotte Lee. China's "Great Firewall" blocks searches for "big yellow duck" after a doctored photograph replacing tanks with giant rubber ducks in a famous Tiananmen Square Massacre photograph, Tank Man, became popular. In 2013 rubber ducks were inducted into the Toy Hall of Fame. Rubber Ducks joined a list of only 52 other toys that have also inducted into the Hall of Fame since its founding in 1998. Rubber duck races, also known as derby duck races, have been used as a method of fundraising for organizations worldwide. People donate money to the organization by sponsoring a duck. At the end of the fundraising drive, all of the ducks are dumped into a waterway, with the first to float past the finish line winning a prize for its sponsor. There are hundreds of races held in the USA and internationally. The largest race in the United States is the annual Freestore Foodbank Rubber Duck Regatta in Cincinnati, Ohio. First run in 1994, the Rubber Duck Regatta now features over 100,000 ducks raced to raise money for the organization. Since its beginning in 1994 the Rubber Duck Regatta in Cincinnati Ohio has raised over $4.6 million and over $500,000 alone last year. The annual Aspen Ducky Derby was first run by the Rotary Club of Aspen, Colorado in 1991. The derby now features 30,000 ducks and takes place each August in Aspen's Rio Grande Park. Through its past 20 years, the Aspen Ducky Derby has raised more than $2.3 million to benefit 65 nonprofit groups. One of the more famous rubber duck races is the Great Knoxville Rubber Duck Race. This race received attention when the Tennessee Supreme Court ruled that it was a lottery, which stopped the race for a few years. After the state amended its constitution to allow lotteries with special exceptions, the race was reinstituted. The Derby Duck race sees over 40,000 ducks race to benefit the Boys and Girls Club of Tennessee valley. A famous rubber duck race is the Halifax Duck Derby. This race has 10,000 rubber ducks in the Halifax Harbour along Bishops Landing. There is a grand prize of $1 million Canadian dollars; other prizes include a trip to anywhere in Canada, large screen TVs, and more. This race has been very successful in raising money and awareness for its organizations. The Lumsden Duck Derby is a Labour Day tradition in the town of Lumsden, Saskatchewan, 31 km northwest of Regina. Founded in 1988 to help the town raise funds for a new ice rink, nowadays the Derby races 25 000 rubber ducks down a stretch of the Qu'Appelle River and features a grand prize of CAD$1 million. The town makes a day out of it, with a pancake breakfast, bands and other entertainments, kids' activities, and a "parade to the post." The Great Brisbane Duck Race is held on the Brisbane River each year to raise funds for the PA Research Foundation. The 100-metre (330 ft) race saw 30,000 rubber ducks enter the race in 2011. The PA Research Foundation also holds a Team Duck Race Challenge where groups are invited to raise funds and participate in either the motorised or non-motorised Team Duck Race with a large 26-centimetre (10 in) tall rubber duck that teams can decorate, brand and modify. One other race was conducted in Australia in January 1988. It was run from the "High-level bridge" to the "Low-level bridge" near Katherine, Northern Territory on the Australia Day long weekend. Acting on behalf of the town's Bicentennial Committee, Royal Australian Air Force officers Andrew Cairns and Jock MacGowan constructed the release cage from PVC pipe, purchased and numbered the ducks, printed tickets, and even arranged a helicopter flypast. In Stockbridge, Edinburgh since 1988, the Stockbridge Community Festival has held the annual Stockbridge Duck Race to raise money for local charities. 1000 rubber ducks are released into the Water of Leith at the Stockbridge to float downstream to the finishing post at the Falshaw Bridge. The 2010 race was memorable for a sudden rain shower at the finish line. The 2011 race was held on 3 July with proceeds going to local charities Stockbridge House & St. Columba's Hospice. For over 25 years, Bibury in Gloucestershire has hosted an annual Duck Race on Boxing Day. The charity event, which attracts thousands of spectators, is split into two races; one featuring the iconic yellow ducks, the other featuring the more realistic 'decoy' ducks, both held on the River Coln. On 31 August 2008, the Great British Duck Race was held near Hampton Court Palace in London. The race broke the world record for the number of ducks used together, with a total of 250,000. The ducks used in the race were a bright blue color, after stewards in the previous year faced problems from spectators throwing their own ducks into the water. Each year, on Easter Monday, a duck race is organised in Glenridding by the local mountain rescue team to raise funds. Another is the Manchester Duck Race, held at Spinningfields on the River Irwell each Good Friday, with several thousand ducks. During a Pacific storm on 10 January 1992, three 40-foot containers holding 29,000 Friendly Floatees plastic bath toys from a Chinese factory were washed off a ship. Two-thirds of the ducks floated south and landed three months later on the shores of Indonesia, Australia, and South America. The remaining 10,000 ducks headed north to Alaska and then completed a full circle back near Japan, caught up in the North Pacific Gyre current as the so-called Great Pacific Garbage Patch. Many of the ducks then entered the Bering Strait between Alaska and Russia and were trapped in the Arctic ice. They moved through the ice at a rate of one mile per day, and in 2000 they were sighted in the North Atlantic. The movement of the ducks had been monitored by American oceanographer Curtis Ebbesmeyer. Bleached by sun and seawater, the ducks and beavers had faded to white, but the turtles and frogs had kept their original colors.
bilgenim;-;Best game ive ever played :3 i play it EVERY single day! id suggest u play it if yo8u havent yet!
Fightless;-;I didnt buy a hat yet. looks like i have a hat immunity. I will give a sample of my DNA to scientists to find a cure for this hat epidemic! forget ebola, hats oblitorated more lives!!!
Day;-;Great game , its free to play and realy a addictive first-person shooter , that kind of blow up a person type game , really fun with a option of buying for slots to become premium player .
FallenChaos;-;This game is so fun, and has so many different things to try. The gamemodes are all different, and each class can be played in a different way. Another thing is the community of this game, and the randomness that can happen inside the game is just amazing. Hours of fun, great game ^-^
T_rizvi #Eid Mubarak;-;If you havent played this game. your life is incomplete.
FEGELEIN!!;-;it used to be good, but the new update made it go . 1 it keeps crashing, and 2 it keeps lagging
Raze;-;its not that good, became boring pretty fast
Thunder Puncher 5000;-;stay as far away from this game as you can. what was once a fun peaceful game has become an ad riddled money grab bs game. if and when you can join a server through quick play all you get is bs donator perks and endless ads from money hungry server owners. i have always felt if you need players to pay for your server you don't need to run it but now valve doesn't feel that way and allows them to run ads through quickplay while the report server function is broken so you have no choice but to play with ads and bs perks or play on empty servers unless you want a stupid game mode like some pony crap or vs saxton hale bs. fix the problems before adding more valve and maybe this game won't die off in a blaze of ads and money grabbing.
Fluffy Llama;-;Its a good game but a bad community and VERY few good people along with it. it is a fun game. but uses a lot of cash.
ultraVioleT;-;Played for a while. It's alright.
xlens;-;Make Little Kids Cry And Then Scream Shut Up U Stupid Squeaker Whenever They Kill U
]YourBae[;-;BTW you have to play practice guide first >.<
wadls;-;OMG T COMPETITIVE IDLEFIGHT PLAYERS
Sontara;-;Meme Fortress 2:Global Offensive/10
FluffyBoobs;-;it's fine
Luteous;-;Y'know. All I can say about this game is one thing-- Addicting. As a matter of fact, I think I will go play.. Yes.. I shall go do that now.. I'll be back in a few hours.
Counter-Terrorist;-;Do you like hats? Well then this is the game for you!
Wraggle;-;TF2 is one of the best multiplayer games around. Its design and art direction lend to its fun and friendly atmosphere. The majority of players I've encountered are welcoming and helpful although still remain competitive. One of TF2's biggest strengths but also one of its downsides is variety. When it was first released TF2 was a fairly simple game of two teams pitted against each other. Players could pick from a variety of nine classes which each filled and suited a role, either defensive, supportive, or offensive play. The maps were few but well designed and allowed players to start to adapt and learn new tricks and skills. Valve supported this and to stop the game from going stale brought out secondary weapons and then cosmetic items such as hats. Sometimes the new weapons would cause chaos as they were big game changers and allowed defensive classes to be better at offensive play. Valve always implemented fixes and through numerous updates introduced more items, maps, and gamemodes. This kept the game feeling fresh and reinvigorated the playerbase. TF2 has always been an game that Valve has experimented with. It introduced cosmetic items, crafting, additional media such as video content and comics to the Valve audience. This meant that TF2 has always been changing which can sometimes lead to times when it can be annoying to play. Overtime the game has become more demanding in terms of computer resources and seems to also suffer slightly from being on the older Source engine. Sudden framerate drops can be common when it has been updated but generally these are ironed out. My overall thoughts on TF2 is that it is still a fantastic game. The gameplay is top notch and you rarely feel frustrated when you die. The player base overall is great with a good community, although there are poor players and servers here and there. Mainly TF2 is fun and humorous, this is enhanced by the great character designs, taunts and one-liners that are uttered by the classes. It encourages players to worry less about losing and to just enjoy the game. The variety of gamemodes and maps is vast, maybe a little too much as I feel the game has become a bit saturated with content. It can be a overwhelming at times or feel like a chore to manage items that are randomly dropped. Some players thrive on that as there is a marketplace for trading but it is one activity I have no interest in. My interest in TF2 peaked a few years back, it waned during a period of constant updates that crashed the game for me or caused texture bugs. That however is TF2, you can play it for months and then a few updates will be made that change the game or introduce new elements. It is an accepted part of the game.
Phoenix Blades ToastedDragons;-;haha every day
Hunter;-;This game sucked my money and hours of my life away 10/10
-=|Markus|=-;-;Best hat simulator over here. Well balanced team based FPS game. Is very fun, and free to play. 3good5me
xesors :3;-;-1/10 10/10 players suffer from tf2tism syndrome. Symptoms may include but not limited to insomnia, anxiety, confusion, paralysis, poison, excessive masturbation, priapism, hallucinations, agitation, autism, brain cancer, breast cancer, skin cancer, prostate cancer, colon cancer, bleeding, suicide, vomiting, HIV, AIDS, ADHD, fedoras. If these symptoms persist, consult your control panel and uninstall.
MachineGunMasta;-;Its one of the best games out there!
Pawshie | SOSBrigade-;-;This game killed my wallet, social life, and any chance of me going outside again. But it was worth it.
Thagorom;-;TF2 is not like any other shooter. THAT IS WHY I LOVE IT!
N!ghTM@Re$*%;-;Best Game Ever and now its FREE!
CrysstalRose;-;I LOVE THIS GAME.Thanks to this game i have meet so many great friends.
2rise;-;Fun and free. That says its all :)
~Blueberry Poptart~;-;Since TF2 has gone free more people have pickedd this title up. If you're a valve fan you need to get this title ( Highly recommend this game to anyone that is into shooters). Game is amazing to look at with the cartoony look and great voice acting that goes with it. There is a in game store fill with new weponds, skins, map, ect. And there are 394 achievments to keep you into this game for a long while. There are many dii=ffrent gameplays to play, like ctf, king of the hill, capture points, and more.
~Blueberry Poptart~;-;Since TF2 has gone free more people have pickedd this title up. If you're a valve fan you need to get this title ( Highly recommend this game to anyone that is into shooters). Game is amazing to look at with the cartoony look and great voice acting that goes with it. There is a in game store fill with new weponds, skins, map, ect. And there are 394 achievments to keep you into this game for a long while. There are many dii=ffrent gameplays to play, like ctf, king of the hill, capture points, and more.
Scoops Shepherd;-;This game is positively amazing. It has great graphics, fun weapons, and tricky objectives. I love this game. OH! I almost forgot, HATS! You can find, create, and buy headwear in this fantastic game! This game should be a part of everyones Steam library.
Brady;-;This game is about hats.
mooseinator;-;Yes i Love this game to play with friends and to work as a team.
giulian216;-;AWESOME. The guys at valve are geniuses for making this game. You can play with friends, kill people, discover new weapons, and more. "Its the most fun you can have online!"
Emily;-;7 years of my life ruined single-handedly by 1 game
Yeezy;-;Very good game alot of time to spend :)
Loligunner;-;HAHAHAHA you want to play a game?, Well look no further, you ing piece of  don't play this assblaster of a work, its not a game its a god damn Ciss feat of try hard neeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeerd virgins who can't do anything better in their lives than sell items and hats on servers, not to mention everything about this game screams PAYTOWIN, The only exception is you can find some Weapons but  man, Why even bother? Learn a  new language or ing learn how to code you neckbeared assgut, Do you even know how to type? Its all about the team effort in this game if you don't have it then your going to die, die agian, and die some more. Theirs also only 8 characters in this game, so now that all the characters have been released its almost unnecassary to play. If you want to win at all the games you play go pyro becuase he can shoot fire and squirt fire which deals damage OVER ING TIME!!!!, If you want to be gay go medic becuase, who gives a  about support?, ITS ALL ABOUT THE KILLS!!!!!!!!! REMEMBER ITS ALL ABOUT THE TEAM EFFORT! My final rate for this game would have to be a 6/10, It try to hard to be a LOLSORANDOM shooter when in reality its like Monday night combat but with a ton of  community made items and visually autistic works of art SIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIII
foxy the pirate;-;Yes because you can trade and get guns
[xxOMxx] WhaleAmbassador<MVM>;-;This game is an action packed game that will never let you down. this game allows you intutwine with fantasy and reality. i really do recomed this game
Butt Stallion <3;-;"This game ruined my life" -Zach :4
Bonkertz!!;-;Nuttin' butta buncha cowboys wavin' der guns around!!
Karma;-;I love this game and I don't know why. I've been addicted since day one, and I haven't stopped loving it ever since. With cartoon violence, lots of blood and gibbing, its not really for children. But than again, CoD isen't as well. So me with around 1500 hours I'd say this game is amazing, and you should get it.
.Areola.Puffington.;-;This game is a 10 out 10! I love it.
papa;-;By far the greatest hat collecting simulator of all time.
Taylah Swoofy;-;This game is so funny
WHO ARE YOUR MOM;-;Probably the biggest waste-time for a no life gamer like us. Kid from around 7-13 years old begging their parents to spend their ing money for a ing hats ? *cough* Well, at least you got *Unusual Piece of * from your *Unusual piece of life* money from your ing parents. *achievement get* 300 usd wasted for virtual item. congrats my rate 7/10
CLMIT;-;Screw Call of Duty and Halo, this game is best! Team Fortess 2 is the reason i began PC gaming.
DIDNTLOGOUTOFGERARDSPC;-;this game ing sucks and made me really ing gay for germans
[pG] MarMar;-;Done I Have Nothing To Say Best Game Since 1001. I Have Nothing.
[Oink]StereoPliggeh;-;Best free to play game ever! 9 different classes for you to choose from and loads of gamemodes for you to play! Go ahead and have fun!! :)
Mike;-;The Cat in the Hat Game is designed for parents and children to play together. The rules are simple and the game is played in the same manner every time, so children can quickly become comfortable with the game. This game teaches and reinforces early reading skills: children look for letters that form words and learn to recognize words as they see them paired with pictures. The game also features counting, matching, and introductory strategy skills. Since the game is not over until the last player reaches Finish, every player stays involved in the game until the very end.
Aterasu;-;A really fun FPS free-to-play game where you collect hats. Also, guns. Also, everything eles. Someone already made the "hat simulator 2013" joke, so I guess this is all I'm going to write.
dyer;-;game is mad cash money $$$ sweg yo
Trogue12;-;Hat simulator 2014 - Because we dreamed about hats......
metaknight420;-;this game changed m y life for the better and i want 2 kiss the pyro hes so cute Slap On Some Diapers You Are In For The Ride Of Your Life he'll yeah #pyrosquad
Relish;-;wow when i played this game i was just cast away by its greatness. you can do so many interesting things that when you do them all you will just feel like a total ing . really. everytime i plkay this game i just want to cry for all the  playing it. and the tihing is im so good and i kick thier gay asses that they end up crying not me. so if you know ur a gay  cunty  faggy  a this game is the game for u
Cinap5;-;This game is like cigarettes, at first you don't like it and then suddenly you are hopelessly addicted, wasting all your money and the only thing that pulls you out of your crippling depression is it. Ummm Uhhh, I mean, it's real fun.
[TA] Pyro;-;Best Free Computer Game Ever Made. ( But Before You Play You Better Lock Up Your Wallet Cause Its A Money Vacume )
~Lui the Shiny Riolu(Vaca);-;It's the most awesome game I've ever played~! ^w^
Squiddie;-;It's okay, I would never spend any money on it though.
SilverEyes_;-;Best economics simulator all year.
Taylah Swoofy;-;This game is so funny
~Lui the Shiny Riolu(Vaca);-;It's the most awesome game I've ever played~! ^w^
Johnbug1#TheQuestionMan;-;Ill put it simply I Johnbug1 enjoy this game. This game is basicly your childhood in a nut shell with adult content and some majorly funny gameplay. Myself alone have clocked about 1600's Hours on this game and still find it fun. AND THE BEST PART IS. Its a free online (And offline) Fps With dynamic gameplay and a large diffrence than the rest of the fps market (Such as battlefield and Call of duty). Now a simple thing about this game is it is Free to play and also if you do want the premium benifits it is litterly as cheap as 49 cents U.S Currency
Squiddie;-;It's okay, I would never spend any money on it though.
SilverEyes_;-;Best economics simulator all year.
Ti;-;This is the best game ive played sense when it first came out
Janneh;-;Dis is an amazing game, It's a high action blood pumping thriller ride of war. Or... It's a mess of trade servers hats and taunts. Depends on your playstyle.
pandarr;-;best game of all time i got steam just for this game. 10/10
OpTiC CumShot;-;Used to be a Conga Simulator 11/10
Walppurgisnacht;-;its free, it loads, its alright for wasting time on, what more can i say
Peesa;-;You need to get this game :) It's free, so why would you not try it!
Banana Joystick [Away];-;Best game ever. The excitement, the tense moments, getting that high killstreak, doing those rocket jumps, bashing the enemy with a bat, ubering your teammates to victory, headshotting the gibuses, chain stabbing the cart, mauling down the defense with a minigun, and burning everything down. This game still succeeds to entertain me after being out for over 10 years.It's not all about hats, but they're pretty to look at. Investing $10 into keys can get you full and nice loadouts for all classes. But what I love the most is that this game is a derp. I love being able to do the square dance with an enemy or laugh at a rancho relaxing engineer. This game is so much fun. 10/10.
[A.T.U.] Atomic1238;-;yeah i deeply recommend this game to all players. excludes free to plays or NOOBS! thanks for listening
BereghostGames;-;its a cool game
Arcale;-;really fun game by valve
para;-;6:19 PM - PackSOMEpuppies: i like ur tf2 review 6:18 PM - Pariah: thanks 6:20 PM - PackSOMEpuppies: dammit, i was gonna spam ur tf2 review. but u dont have one ;-;
Raikira(Phillipines);-;Got called a scrub because I wore a gibus. 10/10.
KANEDAAAA!!! TETSUOOO!!!!;-;I played it for a little bit, it's pretty good.
vani - streetfighter freeweekend;-;Aged a bit badly with new un-tested weapons, (lack of) community (thanks quickplay), optimization issues and Valve catering to players who buy hats from each other, but it's still a great game after all.
Waluigi_WAAnderland;-;why people like to killing
dansparks78;-;this game is no longer fun this game is not tf2 anymore it is csgo now dont get this game till the update is gone
Revetta;-;It's alright, i guess.
xTcR | Choi Seul Gi [GM-M];-;Spent the last 800 hours part of a clan, experience was meh, people were meh aswell. If you think about getting into trading I suggest that you don't, theres tons of scammers everywhere and the currency has been out of wack for 2 years. Competitive gamemodes (This is in the custom servers list) like MGE are pretty fun if you get good people to play with. In the end it's all up to your own personal preference.
degenerate beauty queen;-;Creative Bankruptcy is plugging in an eight year old game into the unregulated market of minutely different yet wildly expensive images applied to 3d meshes that has been so profitable to that company's other multiplayer first person shooter. The beauty is that, much like hats and weapon designs, they won't even need to hire artists to develop these assets after a while--because they just pay the community less than actual employees to do it for them. It is true that gun skins and tour crates do not have an effect on gameplay. However, I would think gameplay would be an important part of an update to a game. Especially when it's the big selling point of that update. And I'm not saying this will kill TF2. It won't. I've played this game on and off since it came out and you had to pay money to even get the game, and it still hasn't died. Even if the glory days are over you can sit down and still have a decent round or two if you are dying to. But if any company that didn't have the mythology that Valve has as being THE company that's different from all the rest released an update to a long standing game that required you to pay not once but twice to access its content--with the inevitability of future payments confirmed--the digital ink bemoaning the practice on message boards across the web wouldn't be able to dry fast enough.
3. Xtrfy;-;Valve. This was my favourite game Until today. Gunmettle ruined everything Thanks. Alot. What once was the best F2P games of the century, has died. Counter strike : Global offensive has taken over the minds of money greeding valve. My life is over. (Except for CS:GO, not TF:GO-2) No matter how many times i got scammed or how many times i got rekt by a hacker or some pro guy with 8001802183103810487 hours in game, I could always go back to ctf_turbine (GamersUN +Max-2) and get my self cheered up by my buddies granyo, Underscore_, LimeTaker and others, but now its all gone. Since the gunmettle update we've all moved to CS:GO (Partially greanyo) and it wont EVER be the same. I remember in 2010, those were the best days of my life :). After my sailing coaching I would rush home and flick on my PC while showering and wait for TF2 to load. This went on until today, once I found the gunmettle update. Valve, I know you wont read this, but PLEASE make the gunmettle update a mod so people like me and others can enjoy the old TF2. My life will never be the same ;(
hey CSGOFAST.COM;-;its sh it
Poo Pocket;-;really good and stuff yeah :3
JAZZBAT;-;so many hours of my life spent in this game and the only thing im good at is spamming the 'Thanks' voice command
LosingStreak;-;With 9 unique classes to choose from, tons of different weapons, and variety of gamemodes and maps; This game easily beats the hundreds of modern generic shooters out there in terms of depth and enjoyability. Best of all: IT'S FREE!
[AB:SSS] Yuri-chan;-;Not your everyday, run-of-the-mill FPS - Exciting (and somewhat addictive), Team Fortress 2 is a must-play!
Phantom>Selling Profile;-;Best hat simulator i ever seen.
SongBird;-;It's ok i guess....
muscles marinara;-;This game is absolute trash. It has a pay-to-win formula as it's main feature. Team Fortress 2 should be renamed to Meme Fortress Dead. There are barely 10 servers around. Hats are the only draw to this game. Players who spend the most money are heavily rewarded by the devs.
Estuh;-;Best game to spend the time on. Allmost no bugs. Classes are fun to play. Weapons are balanced. Mass multiplayer. Allmost no hackers. Helpful and friendly community. You can trade cool weapons, miscs, hats (that may take a lot of your money). Fun events like Halloween, TF2 Birthday and many more! Many and i mean MANY gamemodes and maps! You can create your own hats, miscs, weapons and post them on the steam workshop! (valve may add it to the game!). Tons of achievements that you can unlock! Tournaments that you can go in! Create your own server that you and your friend can play in! Create guides for the other new users! Create artwork and post screenshots and post them on steam!
Arturia;-;Okay, finally reviewing it. Team Fortress 2 was my first love, it was what it made me get Steam and even if I preffer the classic for my reasons and even if I was  at it because people mocked that I was non-premium user, I learned to ignore that fact and enjoy the actual game. You'll love TF2 for the game, not the hats, not the weapons, just the proper game. Mann vs machine, payload and a lot of new unique game modes are waiting for you. It's free, go ahead and get it if you haven't already.
Angryofficer;-;black people
typhy;-;Yeah when I play heavy, a lot of stuff goes over my head too since it's such a complex class. A lot of people think it's just an easy class where you hold m1 over the enemy, but they don't understand that m2 allows you to spin your barrel but not fire, which can fake the enemy out. In fact one of the most exciting meta games in tf2 is watching two heavies duke it out, since a lot of times it's really not about aim but about the sheer determination and willpower and how badly each player wants it.
DurP * Simplexity-Gaming.org;-;Very fun, Would reccomend, :D
allos donev;-;OH MAN, THIS GAME. OHOHOHOHOHOHOHOH MAN. I GET TO MAKE 10 YEAR OLDS CRY WHILE WEARING FASHIONABLE HATS. WHAT MORE COULD YOU WANT.
nibo :-);-;I like this game. It is a good game.
Albert [BoB];-;i think this game needs alot of practice and learning to be fully apreacated as the obsevise-compuslive spending simulator it is. really i dont think cosmetics are as important to gameplay unless through the community. the only redeaming quality is ,well, the quality! the gameplay is real smooth and, well, addicting and fun! i dont think spending money or "scamming" or trading is all that important, but when you play this you can hear and smell the effort and time put in to make this game a working, fun, and overall great gaming experiance, the community can be harsh at moments but usually you can make real friends (unless your a ).
Airwick;-;TF2 is a great game that everyone should have. It is the reason I got Steam.
[Bot] BlueRaja's 24/7 Game Store;-;If it wasn't for humans' absurd obsession over hats, I would not exist. 10/10
The Brown Hatter;-;Best Keybind Simulator on the Market 10/10
KinGreen;-;TF2 The Best game in the world.
alkodrak;-;Hats, hats with effects, painted hats, hats on hats. 10/10
P- 13| MembrerDismembrer;-;Havent played much but from what i've seen so far it looks alright.
lunch box;-;NO NOW IT IS CS:GO, GUN METTLE RUINS IT ALL. Well  this game.
VIP | Samuel_Cyber | VIP;-;bad updater,why update items with skins cs go import from cs go.RIP TF2 BE CS GO 2.0
PoopyJoe The Space Monkey;-;TF2 is a great game but the only problem is MvM. I will tell reasons you why MvM is so bad, 1. The players that are there just complain about everything. 2. Other players in MvM are always bossy. 3. The Players in MvM will kick you for stupid reasons like this: Playing as a Sniper or Spy, having a "usless weapon", and not upgrading because you don't have that much money to get the upgrades that you want to have. I do recommend this game BUT I do not recommend MvM for the new TF2 players. I give TF2 9/10.
fellicopter;-;i loved this game (but the new update ing ruined it look at the bloody caber im  wheres my funy moments tht i had with friend theyve taking it all away for ing balancing issues ) im so pised of i made this review just to calm myself down why is the new thing skins tht look like  the only thing this game is worth playing for is mvm and thts it end... R.I.P TF2 ):
Brainhacker5;-;WORDS ARE BELOW. If you don't like long reviews, move on. If you do, please take a moment to read mine. Take a look at my hours. I've spent several months playing this game. Those times I enjoyed it, now it's just another grayed out game that I've undownloaded. They call it a hat simulator for a reason, it's a Steam profit house when you unbox an unusual and everyone needs a hat otherwise you are deemed a noob by the screeching five year olds or a no life by the people that have spent longer hours than you have. The guns have their own stats and everything, it's not like your Call of Duty game where it's a different gun with the same rate of fire and a small upgrade from your last weapon, hence why this game doesn't appeal to many of those players. It's a fun game because it's different and not realistic. You can rocket jump for crying out loud, what more is there to say? As all that goes, the game sounds like it should be fun and there is a ton of things I won't explain, but as I said, I undownloaded it and here is why. The latest update "Gun Mettle" has made every gun you owned into a pea shooter or a nuclear weapon, they loaded all the good weapons with stuffed teddie bears and made every formerly worse weapon into a Davy Crockett. You remember that weapon that did an extra 15 damage at the target but had a slower reloading time? Let's reduce the damage by twenty and keep it at a slow reloading time, all while adding this extra pointless buff. The crates stay the same. You still toss money on those keys while hoping to get a dance from a stripper when you unbox it, only to find the newest crates closely noting the CS:GO crates and weapons. Yes, ladies and gentlemen, that means skins. They've just made all the default weapons have new skins to them much like Counter Strike. I had faith that they would keep the game like it was and not incorporate another system from another game into it. Surely enough, people put these weapons up for outrageously cheap or overpriced to Everest. But then again, so were Aussies. Multiplayer and MvM are still alright though. It's still the same gamemodes it's just like I said though, the games are full of kids morphing into dinosaurs and proclaiming they are the best gamer ever, but some things never change. The new weapon buffs really downgrade everything because now those weapons that everyone got rid of because they were bad, everyone is going to want. If you play CS:GO and never really wanted this game because it wasn't like it at all, now's your chance. It's a F2P game that now has all the comforts from Counter Strike aside from it not taking two bullets to kill someone. I would have rated this game about an 8.9/10, but with the recent update that I hope stays for only three months like it says, it's going down to a 4.3/10. That sums up all that there really is to know about this game. I had faith Valve, I really did.
PyroPacific;-;Don't play this game, they keep adding stuff from other games ( the CS:GO wep dropping system, how original !). The Mann Co store sells weps you can get in-game for 10 bucks. Y'know what this game used to be cool. You ruined it guys, congrats.
Hikikomori;-;Bet this is gonna get downvoted to hell, but I don't care. Already turned into a game of Rock Paper Scissors, so many update changes that fix issues after 7 months (minimum) and the lack of the developers' commitment to the game. I'd think they are all playing Dota or CS:GO at this point. Constantly shifting community that everyone leaves and comes, leaves and comes. At this point, it is only a field for new players who just installed the game, and people who have too many valuables on this game that are afraid to admit their investment is lost. Every class is limited to only engaging enemies in only one way, and that's it. Also, weapons like Liberty Launcher, Tide Turner, Phlog, Baby Face Blaster are only there for the sake of opening more possibilities for the players to learn something the wrong way. But at this point, there isn't much point to learn if all you are supposed to do is just airblast, spin up and shoot, playing tower defense, using a no-skill class only focused on making the player feel special as if they are good at sneaking, there is not much point to the game. I don't even care what anyone says about what I am saying, because I want to keep this short, but still descriptive enough to express that I have been in every situation that happens in TF2. But come to think of it, the game is repetitive. Sure, every games are. Duh, but every class is so blindfolded into only one type of engagement that it is really questionable. The only class that seems to be capable of slightly more types of engagements must be Soldier. (Unique weapons are not any better. The only good unique weapons are the ones that has the least amount of difference compared to stock.) That is enough . So, the game? Not really advanced or that good at all at this point. Just an inbred of Quake and the... few other Valve titles. But if you have things to counter-argue against this comment, why bother? Reviews are there for people who don't even have the game installed and yet, a person who plays the game can also come and look for negative reviews to argue against them? In the end, it is all personal preference. (By the way, also a  community this game has spawned.) So, I'll only recommend this if you like roleplaying like a toddler. (Also, that desperate attempt from Valve to try to resurrect the corpse of this game with mixing it with an other game.)
fellicopter;-;i loved this game (but the new update ing ruined it look at the bloody caber im  wheres my funy moments tht i had with friend theyve taking it all away for ing balancing issues ) im so pised of i made this review just to calm myself down why is the new thing skins tht look like  the only thing this game is worth playing for is mvm and thts it end... R.I.P TF2 ):
Diclonius Raxyn;-;I'm going to be upfront for this review, Team Fortress 2 is just a shell of its former self. It's really fallen from grace over the last few years. I'll start with whatever positives(?) it has left: Gameplay-wise, it's really good, the vast amount of weapons and the nine classes can open different gameplay styles and invoke different strategies. The different game modes create a variety of things to do in-game, both versus and co-op. Mann vs. Machine requiring strong teamwork and rewarding your efforts is quite nice too. However, that's where the positives end, where there's the good, the negatives aren't far behind the proverbial trail. The game becoming Free-to-Play itself, initially had potential, but as the community grew, it became increasingly venomous towards one another. Almost everyone has the mindset where if you don't own a cosmetic, you're deemed the scum of the earth in their eyes and don't deserve to hang out with them. Cosmetics are just that: cosmetics. They don't have any effect on gameplay besides having your avatar with a piece of headwear. The other downside to Free-to-Play is that anyone can play the game, that includes the likes of kids are young teens who are below the required age to play this game. The game is rated PEGI 16+ (or Rated M for Mature for Western audiences), yet there's a huge influx of people so young that it questions if parents these days even look at the age ratings anymore or if they just don't care. These kids are hanging around with adult gamers, which if the worst case scenario that if either party owns a microphone, it can potentially lead to harrassment, griefing and bullying. The servers are generally good, but sometimes the server owner's set up rules which are very questionable, for example, I got banned from a Vs. Saxton Hale server, for just crafting a measly cosmetic. It's a really trivial thing to react to and handing somebody a ban for. Another issue is that most server admins abuse their powers and can't handle an ounce of constructive criticism, it puts a bad impression on themselves and on their own server. Lastly, I previously praised Mann vs. Machine for it's co-operative play and requirement of strong teamwork, but it is also without its flaws. You've got nine classes to choose from, each having their unique advantages that make them a force to be reckoned with if the right upgrades are applied. However, there's usually a group of people who will ban or threaten to ban someone if you're not the class they want you to be, for example, Sniper is potentially a deadly class with explosive headshots that can take out mobs and guarentee the money being picked up, but there are those who take offense to simply seeing Sniper's portrait in the HUD and demand you either change class or leave the server, with or without force. It really sours the experience, especially if you're an excellent Sniper player. Another issue is people will over-react if the team is unable to get the bonuses after each round, if the team misses even 1 credit, most people will storm out of the server immediately instead of just swallowing their pride and moving on. Team Fortress 2 was a game I once enjoyed, but unfortunately, the damage has been done. It's a lost cause and Valve themselves don't see any passion in their product anymore, just using it as a cash cow instead of catering to their most devoted audiences or fixing the issues present in the game. I can't recommend playing Team Fortress 2 regularly anymore, but I won't stop anyone if they want to give it a go.
Giddy;-;If you like hats this is the game for you.
Muffinator 2.0;-;With the Gun Mettle update coming out tomorrow, I can't recommend this game to play anymore. TF2 has become a shell of its former self, and this update is the last nail in the coffin, one final cash grab from Valve.
jmz;-;One of the best team based multilplayer games ever. Astonishing game, lots to collect. I guarente you will like this game, and ay it's F2P give it a try.
Naabe;-;wtf i cant shoot through windows activision pls fix this game or i quit
Poor Excuse For A Rapper;-;I just got a Steam Wallet card pin for free! :D http://steamwalletcodes.com
jmz;-;One of the best team based multilplayer games ever. Astonishing game, lots to collect. I guarente you will like this game, and ay it's F2P give it a try.
K10;-;There are vary few "free to play" games that are really free. TF2 is really F2P. With most things you need to buy being cosmetic, this is a fun game to just pick up and play. Plus, hats. Thats cool. now, with the game play. Any body who would play CoD, and not this, is dumb. This is by far, the best FPS I have played to this date, with more strategy than "I shot first." 17/5 stars from me!
Harry Dirks;-;An absolute crap on the video-game industry, this game is a prime example of big-name corporations bleeding you dry for every last gotdam nickel that you own. The team behind this blood-sucking parasite, Valve ( V iciously A cquiring L osers' V aluable E arnings), releases update after update of useless cosmetics of which the legions of fans will spend their last dollar to buy. It's sickening, it's repulsive, and it's one of my favorite games. $$$/10
Swappy;-;Yay, hats! Also a fun time waster.
dmgid;-;The updates ruined this game :(
Siggy Strdust;-;Waste of time and a toxic fanbase. Great game for learning the basics of quake scripting because it comes with a free dos window. I would also recommend trying out the great hammer editor that comes with the game. Only way this game can be playable is if you download mods to remove hats and skins or play with bots.
TheBackstabbingSniper;-;The The Gun Mettle Update is plain out stupid it is just like them trying to add paid mods to skyrim IT IS STUPID!!!!!!
SharingaN. d-_-b;-;Thanks for ing up the game with the new update. Alle jumpmechanics are broken. Please fix that!
Dr.Dinosaur;-;The new update has ruined this game. Great step forward. If I wanted CS:GO, that the game I would get. You are incouraging competitivity and us giving you money because thats all you want, our money being sent to your bank accounts. Features of the Gun Mettle Update: -Nerfed weapons -Payed for tickets -CS:GO Item Pickups -CS:GO Skins -CS:GO Contracts -All of tf2 deleted and replaced with CS:GO Differences to CS:GO: -Different graphics -Has classes Get rid of TF:GO valve, for the love of Gaben Valve were just like "Hey, we have a massive fan base. Lets change everything about the game and turn the community from a friendly one to a competitive one!" TF2 Has been the same for years, why change everything about it? Just revert the update before you lose everyone who likes the game. Just look at all the new negative reviews TL:DR TF2 has been the same for ages and they changed it CS and TF2 used to be very different, but now the difference gap is decreasing Less friendlyness, more pew pew EDIT: Im not saying they are the same now, they are obviously not, but im sayingt the gap between them is decreasing, and they are losing their distinctiveness and different play styles
albert einstein;-;Oh my God. This game. This game. First off, I just want to say how good of a game Call of Duty is. Lastly, this game sucks, no headshots.
square-;-;this game is pure and utter  and i hate it anyone who plays this game for more than 5 hours is a huge  good thing i only played one hour before i decided it was  and uninstalled it if you even consider playing this game you might as well kill yourself becaus this game is so bad no one should play it
Darude -BlizzardStrm;-;A really unique twist on the classic First Person Shooter franchise. The mechanics and how the game plays really is different from other games and is what either makes you love it or hate it. Would definitely at least recommend to try and since it's free, there is no reason not to!
BustyBlonde69;-;This game was very homosexually appealing to me, so I would definitely recocmmend it to the gay community out there.
Cpt.Tundra;-;Was a good game then they wanted to copy everything from cs:go good job valve
Goofy Fucker :^))));-;I have over 2,000 hours in TF2. I love this game. I've never actually written a review, but this latest update, "Gun Mettle", is a gigantic slap in the face from Valve to the few dedicated people who still play this game after all of Valve's crappy updates. Valve doesn't listen to the TF2 community when they release updates. The people who decide what content goes into the game clearly don't even play it. End of the LIne has received enough critism, I'm sure that Valve is aware of how much of a #$@& up that was. but Gun Mettle is simply too much. I've tried CSGO many times because of how many of my friends play it. I don't like it. Valve had to different niches filled with TF2 and CSGO. My question is WHY THE #$@& VALE DECIDED TO TURN TF2 INTO CSGO. WE DON'T NEED WEAPON SKINS. WE HAVE HATS AND UNUSUALS AND STRANGE WEAPONS. WHY DO WE NEED STAT-TRAKS AND WEAPON WEAR AND CHALLENGE COINS?! Seriously, why do you do things like this Valve? Who did you design this update for? Was anyone, and I mean ANYONE asking for this??? No. TF2 is dead. Most people are talking about OVERWATCH coming out but for anyone who can't wait, DIRTY BOMB is a much better game whose developers are actually aware of the fact that there are PEOPLE who play their game.
latrine;-;i hate this ing game. good thing this piece of  is for free now or i'd be .
Zyph;-;This game teaches you how to be badass.
Ratc00n;-;A ING HAT SIMULATOR, WITH GUNS!!!
12 Year Old Girl Gamer;-;Team Fortress: Global Offensive 2 I think im going to go kill myself.
Gahnzoe;-;I would reccomend this game if they left skins and condition out of it.....those only belong in CS:GO. Please Valve don't ruin a game many have came to love and enjoy. I would rather play the console version which only has like 5 of the maps and its only stock everything. If you like the calssic tf2 id reccomend not reccomending this to friends. ~UPDATE~ They now have statclock I heard. If this is true this is sad....
[OKW] Fegelein;-;TF2 is now CS:GO, stick to CS:GO valve is running out of ideas i think, The new update is a Copy & paste of CS:GO srs stick to CS:GO is better than this. TF2 died a long time ago. *cough* *cough*
Totally Innocent Kaneie;-;Fun game. Until it turned into a copy of csgo, instant uninstall, I want nothing to do with this game anymore, I would much rather play the game it copied with this new update. Hate me all you want, this game is dying.
ALER;-;This game was awesome , seriously awesome but valve made their recently  touch and turned this game to TF GlobalOffensive , now it is awful...
ris;-;I have a lot of time and effort put into this game. After 6 years of playing, and how I experience games these days... Wasn't worth it. This game, in my opinion, is horrible. Many people are addicted to it, but if they saw what I see, many would agree. This game is poorly balanced and developed. The only way to possibly have fun in this game is by being those players with tons of expensive items and infinite skill with top-notch computers. Usually these people also take advantage of cheap flaws in the games as well. Soldier, in my opinion, is the most absolutely over-powered class. I say this because it's always that class experienced players play, since Soldier has pretty much no downsides when played well. Nothing can touch them. Then there are snipers that never miss, sporting their unusual and professional killstreak sniper rifle. Sticky spamming demos that taunt after every kill. Combo pyros, demoknights, so on and so forth. Now everyone can agree that these are a part of the game, but they get rediculous. The only way TF2 is fun, for me at least, is by actually being able to be successful. Unfortunately for me, I have ADHD and stuff, so that makes it much harder. Especially when there are servers full of unusual-wearing players who absolutely destroooy everything and take advantage of public servers full of learning players. It makes this game unbearable and kills any aspect of fun when instead of doing a role or playing for fun, all you're doing is trying to out-war that one player who is ruining the game. Lately, for me, MvM seems to be the only thing I can consider always fun about TF2, however you have to pay for a rewarding experience. That wouldn't be so bad if free MvM games weren't dead or full of people who haven't yet learned the rocket jumper deals no damage and such. While on the topic, I feel like Mann Up should have tour match ups, so players with few tours only find games with players with few tours, and the same for people with higher tours, since MvM is basically kicking that no tour pyro who's using the degreaser. I used to have sooo much fun with this game, and I was addicted. Sadly I feel like this game has become nothing more than a money harvester for Valve, since you see things that give profit to them get added 100x more often than something the players have fun with. I understand maps and weapons have to be tested and balanced, though. (Although I feel many weapons have failed their tests and were added anyway.) My main reason for this review was that I wish Team Fortress 2 was about just what it's called: TEAM Fortress. Instead it is "Free-to-Play team carried by advanced players" Fortress. At the end of the day, the only people who have fun are the ones who are beyond professional and Valve. Being professional takes time, but some people can't catch up to that point, and it's not fair for new players or those who struggle with the game. I only wish the game was more balanced for newer players and had more about the game itself, and less about hats and Valve's profit. I miss my old Team Fortress 2.
Piggles, Destroyer of Worlds;-;Well done valve, you have completely ruined tf2 with the latest update. Pointless and unnecassary weapon nerfs, useless random weapon skins, people being able to use dropped weapons. It is just fantastic that I can see some Gibus Noob running around with my Specialised Killstreak Phlogistinator. Well. Freaking. Done.
Chompjil;-;Re-Review So, I played this game for about 560 hours, or close to it, and I have to say, I was not entirely enjoyable From the time I began to now there has certainly been a degrading quality in the community,market and game. On the community aspect, it seems that, for the unfortunate turn, many have left and those who remain have no real business in playing anything well (case and point MvM). The market has crashed essentaliy putting my 2 years of trading work going to the dumpster, and of course everyone moved to the CSGO market. The game overall has had little content changes and barely anything new concerning gameplay, of course Valve's hat fetish has gotten the best of them. I can honestly say that while this game is "Free to play" I spent quite a bit on it, and I really do regret it.
FhymR;-;Counter Fortress Team Offensive
proxy;-;Don't bother spending your time in this game. It's unbalanced, has terrible net code, and the community is one of the worst because they can't take any criticism of the game. I played in all forms of competitive, casual, and everything in-between and the experience always left me feeling hollow. It's not fun to die because a pyro walks at you. it's not fun to die because of sudo-RNG. It's not fun to try and do work for your team only to discover that you are the only person that's not a sniper or spy. I used to enjoy it but it has grown to the point where it plainly infuriates me. If you don't have any other games, go for it, but your time would be much better off spent on a better game.
AHAHAC AHTOHA;-;Gun meatle? wtf??!? Valve again made me think that they are a group of idiots. i dont want csgo features in tf2 max repost
Shmugle;-;This game is a must have for 12 year olds with low self esteem. Seriously if you have the maturity of a 12 year old child and want the opportunity to make yourself feel better about your crummy life by belittling people on an online multiplayer fps game then download this game right now. I have experienced many times on this game absolutely disgusting behaviour from other players in the community. It is sad. It is sad knowing that there are so many children growing up in this world who show complete and utter ignorance, unprovoked to people they do not even know. For instance: A kid said this to a friend of mine while in a match. Hey liked how I wrecked you last round? (No reply from my friend) Oh what you got nothing to say? Must be too poor to buy a mic. (So poor yet he owns a computer right?) (I then attempt to kick this child from the game for his ignorance) Random other guy who must have been this childs friend starts. What the f#$% you trying to do? (My vote to kick the initial child fails) (They try and kick me) Shouts Kick this f@#$^% out of here he's trying to send me pictures of his d$%^ (I get kicked). Now I don't care about being kicked out of a game. There are many other lobbies I can join to play and try to have fun on. What I care about is how completely toxic the community is on this game. Yeah I get it, it is the internet you have to at some point accept the reality that there are many trolls and immature children out there. The problem for me is not ignoring it and moving on. The problem is when I, like many others, sit down to relax in their spare time and try to have fun playing a team based game get put into situations of unpleasant, abusive, conflict constantly it becomes something besides fun and enjoyment but rather stressful and disturbing. Literally every server will have people on that have nothing better to say besides overused insults. There is absolutely no need for it. There is not a single thing that requires someone to be a complete piece of trash in order to have fun or even be good at a video game. It ruins everything video games are meant to be about. Besides the absolutely toxic community in which you cannot really change in anyway there are other issues. The game is goofy with it's cartoon style which is a hint that you should not take it too seriously. If you find yourself taking tf2 seriously then that is the point in time that you should uninstall it. Trust me once you start taking the game seriously you will degrade yourself by involving yourself with the toxic players, you will lose money, you will lose friends and you will no longer enjoy something you once did. I realized this after seeing how much I spent on the game, the situation I explained above and when I started to become frustrated at people dancing around the spawn wasting time (which should be the fun of it yet it became annoying). Looking at the lucrative micro transaction style system involved, it is at least how I see it addicting. Who wants to use ugly stock weapons when they can open crates to get fancy shiny ones or simply buy them? Constantly buying more keys, to open more crates, in the hopes of getting something valuable to get your money back or make a profit (it hardly ever happens). It is exactly like gambling and the risk is greater than the reward. You may get an unusual hat but what does that actually do for you? Can you sell it and make a profit? Yes. Can you withdraw that money and buy yourself a bike, or a baseball bat, or pay the rent and bills? Nope. Every dime you spend on this game is forever invested into Steam. So you don't really make anything off of buying and trading these types of virtual items and they do not improve your skills in the game or increase your enjoyment. It gives you this false sense that you did but in the end it eats your money and that is it's only purpose. Spending money on games like this is okay if you really feel like it will bring you enjoyment but fair warning it can end up costing you a significant amount of money especially if you do not know what you are doing. I let myself became consumed in this system and have spent much more than I should ever have with next to nothing to show for in the end. I regret spending any money on this game on the virtual items especially now that I have lost my enjoyment of the game. Overall I had fun. 800 hours on a free to play game in my opinion made it worth it. What I realize now though is that games like this are only as fun as the people you play them with. I started seeing a significant amount of toxic players no matter what server I was on and that killed my enjoyment. Listening to people constantly insult each other over nothing gets tiring. I guess maybe I am just at an age where I have to move on to another saga of gaming to find more enjoyment. Will I miss playing tf2? Probably not now that I have expanded my game library. Will I play it again? Likely but only for an hour or two here and there just to have fun. I will never invest my time, like I used to, back into this game because it is really not worth it. I would recommend if you want to have some fun (100-500 hours) try Team Fortress 2 out, BUT my warning and the point of my review, DO NOT invest a significant amount of time and/or money into this game. It is really not worth it once you become tired of the toxic community. Everything you worked on getting will increase your disappointment when you make the decision to stop playing the game.
Hackscoper Hunter;-;I realize I came late to the review party, but I might as well give it a shot too. Team Fortress 2 is the F2P team based shooter that many know and play, and has a long and interesting history in the gaming world. Below I'll list the pros and cons of the game, which are based on my personal experiences and the experiences of others while playing. Agree or disagree, feel free to post why in the comments, and as always, I included a TL;DR version at the bottom. Now let's begin: The pros: - 9 different character classes, each offering a unique gameplay experience: Each class has a different base role, but you can specialize and change up your playing style in many different ways thanks to the many different weapons available in the game. - A variety of game modes to mix up the gameplay: These are mostly objective based, and do their job well in keeping the game from becoming stale. - Mann vs Machine: MvM for short, this is a special game mode completely different from the others. It pits you and 5 other players into a tower defense styled game where you are pitted against a robot army. Very fun to play, but its hard to find a proper team unless you're playing the payable version with tickets. - The game is F2P (Free to play): A great thing about this game is that you can download it, try it out and even play it for your desired length of time for free. Please note that the game is free to PLAY, and not free for everything it has to offer. - Not P2W (Pay to win): There's little difference between a free and a premium player. If you lack a desired weapon you can earn it as an achievement, craft it, or find it in one of the many random drops you get each week. - Cosmetics: I chopped a demonic airplane pilot assassin's head off with a golf club as a one eyed black Scottish demolitions expert wearing traditional Japanese samurai armor, before I was smacked to death by a giant Russian Santa Claus wielding a large piece of ham as a weapon, who was was being healed by a German chef doctor screaming about Oktoberfest and dispensers. (You may have to dish some money out depending on what you want though) - You don't have to make an account aside from your existing Steam account to be able to play: Click "Download". Wait for it to install. Play the game. - Emphasis on team gameplay: Knowing your role and cooperating with your team, while still being allowed to do and play what you want is what makes this game so unique and fun. And there's nothing quite like the feeling of satisfaction after you change the tide of the round and bring victory for yout team. - Trading: Turn your TF2 into an economy simulator. Become a merchant and sell your stuff to others for profit. Invest carefully and you can actually make some real life profit with this. The cons: - Class and/or weapon imbalances: Not going into detail here since in the end its all a matter of people's different opinions and beliefs, and it also depends which map and game mode is being played. But I think that we can all agree that there's no such thing as perfect game balance, no matter how hard the developers try. - Random crits: Some love them and some hate them. A crit in most cases means an insta kill even if you're at full health, with only a few exceptions. They make the game much more chaotic and unpredictable, to the point where they can completely turn the tide of a round around. You will get them too, but for every crit kill, you will get killed right back by them tenfold. - Community's attitude towards F2P players: Not pointing fingers at anyone here, but from what I've seen, new players and F2P's in general are being treated badly and have a hard time being accepted into TF2's community. I'm not saying everyone is like that though, as there are also people out there who welcome new players with open arms, gladly helping and advising them when necessary. - Hackers: With both Steam and TF2 being free, you can often find hackers on official servers ruining your fun. It takes a few days for the ban to apply even after they're reported, and there is nothing stopping a hacker from simply creating a new account after he gets banned and continue right where he left off. - Hit registration: Sometimes it works properly, but for the most part its just awful. Especialy noticeable when using meele weapons where you get the hitsound and you see your weapon hit, but no damage will be dealt. Works the other way as well, where hitting the empty space next to your opponent will score a hit. - Lag compensation: Getting headshot by a Sniper after you're already out of his line of sight behind a corner is always fun. - Bugs and glitches: Every game has these so they're unavoidable, but I often feel that a lot of them could be prevented by better testing before updating, and/or patching them up already, especialy the ones that have gone for years without getting a proper fix. - Valve (the developer) doesn't care anymore: The amount of content and updates that this game receives is slowly declining. The updates bring us cosmetics and crates nowadays, with the occassional weapon here and there. The End of the Line, a major update that the community was expecting for a long time was a huge dissapointment for me and others alike for example. Additionally, Valve deciding to re-relase some very rare, limited items in a new set of crates while also raising the prices of keys (and other items) in their Mann co store makes me think they're converting TF2 into nothing but a money milking machine now. The conclusion: TF2 is still a great and unique game even with its age, but overall, I cannot say that the pros outweigh the cons and therefore I sadly cannot give it a positive recommendation. It remains one of my favorite games of all time, and as a longtime player I will keep playing it, but I can't advise new players to do the same. You can install it and try it out for yourself, and then create and mould your own decision from what you experience. If you don't intend to play much or for long, then stick with your free account. If you decide to go for the long term investment, then pay what little it takes to get a premium membership, but don't spend more money on it afterwards. I realize I'll get a lot of hate from the negative aspects of this review by angry fans, but someone has to speak up for once. This review would have easily received a positive recommendation, if Valve would just show that they still care. I still have hope, and in the case that things really do change I'll gladly edit this review to a big thumbs up. I apologize for any mistakes in spelling and grammar, and I hope this review helps you. TL;DR version: Game is still good, but nowhere near as good as it was before. It has a lot of issues, the developers don't seem to care anymore, and its turning into nothing but a money milker.
Sgt. Freddymc;-;I know this game is free and all, but... Valve have gotten a lot of money off this game. A lot. And you'd think that as a thanks for handing over your dosh for virtual hats we might get an update that was carefully thought out, had a lot of community interaction, added many new interesting maps, weapons or mechanics or maybe even fixes some problems and balances some things. Not anymore. The latest update, gun mettle, probably had zero thought put into it. "Lets put in skins, cases and mission coins, straight from cs:go and maybe  up a couple weapons with "balance" changes". Honestly, I feel as though all valve want now is our money. If you keep releasing good updates, people will continue to play and put more money in. Releasing money-grabber updates that add in nothing but stuff that you have to pay for? No-one would want to play and put money into game that only gets updates including just that. When I saw gun mettle, the only thing that looked even remotely "cool" were the new maps. That was it. Most of the balance changes were stupid and un-needed. Like why nerf the powerjack? If you want to play a game that gets no love from it's devs, has a  community (there are very few nice and fun people) and is also slowly dying, (admit it, it is dying) sure why not get this game. I used to love this game, but valve literally don't even give a  anymore. It's like they're about to abandon this game but they're trying to get as much money as possible before they do.
Swagnemite;-;1-10Hrs, This game is pretty awesome! 11-20hrs, Wow, my first hat! 21-1518hrs, please, give me your hats.
Delta5931;-;TF2, at this point has become effectively Counter Strike: Global Offensive (in terms of cosmetics) with the Gun Mettle update. Valve is bleeding over the cosmetics system for weapons from CS:GO and putting it in this game. I hate this idea.There is no benefit to the player from this. If anything, this will drive the community the further apart than it already is. Sure, it's cosmetic, but this is a game where if you don't have a hat, you're a talentless noob. I've enjoyed this game so far. I probably won't play it anymore after Gun Mettle. TF2 is basically trying to be something it isn't. The game has turned into Counter Fortress 2: The Quest for more Money. EDIT: Another question, why do we need TWO cosmetic systems in ONE game? We already have hats, and this community assumes the level of your hat (Unique-Unusual) is your measure of skill. I'm very suprised Valve didn't ask themselves "is this a good idea?". Again, no benefit to the player, only to Valve. EDIT 2: Seeing alot of people not getting the point of this review: Valve is taking you all for a ride. If any other dev were to do the same thing that Valve is currently doing, you would be getting your pitchforks and torches out. Is it because you think you owe Valve something? You owe Valve nothing. Putting in a cosmetic system while it already has one is bad enough. Putting in a cosmetic system that messes with the economy of cosmetics already in the game is even worse. EDIT 3: This update isn't so much the death of TF2 (TF2 will ALWAYS endure, no matter what), it's the fact that the update feel like a big middle finger from Valve. We've already got hats. We've already got Australium weapons along with Festive weapons. We do not need Call of Duty esque camos. Even worse, some of the major weapon changes made previously viable weapons into literal piece of garbage. Gun Mettle is one of the worst updates in TF2's history, and this is coming from a guy who liked EVERY other update thus far. Shame.
Res will be gone for a week or 2;-;A mess of a game that creates pointless unwanted stress, and a moronic care for virtual hats. Rather than a focus on gameplay, this has become a mess of asshats wanting virtual hats, and using whatever means they can to acquire them, while innocent people are left stressed and depressed. With nobody being actually able to play the ing game. If you can manage to actually find servers where people actually play, while somehow avoiding the asshats whom sadly ravage this game, then consider yourself lucky. But I'm personally done with this game. I may return to it here and there just to  around, but full time playing and trading have just become ugly things.
iLegendary-Dream;-;Hope you guys enjoy your stay at valve playing team fortress global offensive. This game has brought so many ideas from csgo and it will kill a lot of things in the economy. If I were you I would go and just buy Counter Strike Global Offensive.
Gatekeeper;-;So, after I put 650hrs into this game. over the course of 3 (?) years, Valve just decides to turn it into TF:GO. Yeah, no.
The Lemon Lord;-;Team Counter-Fortress: Global Offensive 2 >adds skins to TF2 >adds campaigns to TF2 >adds picking up skinned weapons in hope players like the skin and buy it >adds competetive to TF2 >adds CS:GO to TF2 RIP in Pieces, Old TF2.
Spadehound;-;After loving this game for almost 1900 hours of playtime, I don't even know what to say to the last update, "Gun Mettle" except this: Where is Team Fortress 2? because when I loaded this game up after the update, I could swear CS:GO or CoD started up instead. Oh wait, this IS Team Fortress 2. I was already wondering why I couldn't kill people with 2 SMG headshots. Jokes aside, If you want Team Fortress, go look up Fortress Forever, because this game is completely mutiliated. It hardly is Team Fortress anymore. Trust me.
joanito01;-;Gun Mettle update. - Valve: 69/10 Would ruin a great game again.
SerbanElyan;-;Team Fortress 2 is one of the best multiplayer games i have ever played. And also, one of the most played games. I spent a lot of hour in this game. The fun thing in this game is that you can troll everybody. And you have a big variety of classes and weapons to do this. I was able to find only one problem: hacking. I got so  off because of that people... Anyway.. Concluding, i recommend it to everybody. It's a nice game. Worth it. ^^
Frostwa;-;2 words FREAKIN EPIC Also FREAKING FREE
GOTTA GET A GRIP;-;i really dont know, i cant type for long since they're chopping the few limbs i have left to buy unusuals but i guess i can say its an ok game
ThrowingPie;-;Do you like sitting, congaing, and shooting things? then Team Fortress 2 is the game for you. anything you can dream of you can do. and HAT HAT HAT HAT HAT HAT HAT HAT HAT HAT HAT HAT HAT HAT HAT HAT HAT HAT HAT HAT HAT
$acHav;-;'Tries to kill someone with rocket jumper' "WHY ARNT U DED?! OMG!!!! UR USIN HACKS!!!!" 'Sees enemy Demoman sticky jump across map' "ING NOCLIP HACKER" 10/10 Would play for 1000+ hours.
Tiny Bunny;-;Lost all of my real friends. Lost several hours of my life.
GrifsPDA;-;Yeah it's alright
Nico:3;-;God, almost 1000 hours in this game, i think that's the way to say: ''This game is so much fun, you can play for hours and not even know for how much time you've played until you see your record'' 10/10 HIGHLY Recommended<3
Jadin;-;Team Fortress 2 is ruining my life and stealing my wallet. I love it.
SaLtyDoNe;-;Best Game Ever!! is Free and is Still good Hit it up and Download it
Lasagnaverse;-;There are hats worth more than you've made in your entire life, GG
isteb;-;THIS IS MY FAVORITE GAME!! What more to say?? THE BEST GAME EVER! EEEEEEEEVVVVVVVAAAAARRRRRR!!!!!!
;-);-;one of the best games
CSguru.de REP #44770;-;I don't even know why I am writing a review for this game. It's such a good game it's not even funny. I probably spent about over 500$ into this game. Best game ever. Hands down.
[FCU] Friendly Scoot;-;Plot of game: HAT HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS 10/10 Better FPS then COD
Mimo;-;Some Reasons to get this game. 1. ITS FREEE!!!!!11!!1 2. Earn Smexy Weapons, Strange, Killstreak and even Festive. 3. No Ragy I CANT FINISH THISSSS Moments. 4. Multi-Multi-Multi Player 5. Many Classes to play as, My Favorites: Scout, Soldier, Sniper and Spy. Get it, you will enjoy it :D
Revenger;-;Why the hell are you looking at reviews? This game is free to play, just download it hahahaha.
Revenger;-;Why the hell are you looking at reviews? This game is free to play, just download it hahahaha.
Mega Cat;-;This game is unlike other FPS games. There is a lot of customization which makes nearly no one similar, and that ands distinctiveness. Overall the mechanics and modes are fun. Although the in-game shop merchandise is a bit overpriced, it's still a good game.
TFKitch;-;completley worth the money 10/10
Marcuz|-BuyingSkins/Knives;-;WARNING. DISCREET VIEWAGE OF THIS REVIEW WILL CAUSE UNAPPREHENDED OVERFLOWING EMOTIONAL MOOD CHANGES. VIEWER DISCRETION IS ADVISED DO YOU LIKE PONIES? DO YOU LIKE CAKE? DO YOU LIKE RAINBOWS? DO YOU LIKE ROBOTS? DO YOU LIKE GAMES THAT CAUSE MASSIVE MISFORTUNE AND MAYHEM TO YOU AND ANYONE THAT IS PLAYING WITH/AGAINST YOU? THEN WE'VE GOT THE GAME FOR YOU!
Sister Iris: Ace Nun;-;Oh boy, Team Fortress 2. Where to start? Gosh I have over 400 hours docked into this game. This game is endless enjoyment and despite the fact there will be trolls and whiney (cussing) eight year olds, the game itself makes up for all of this. I'm not the BEST TF2 player, but I enjoy playing the game FOR the game. Unfortunately, most people, for some reason, tend to overlook the "Team" in "Team Fortress 2" and don't cooperate as a team all the time. But when you get a good team or some good competition, it's easily enjoyable! Many people on Team Fortress 2 are friendly, at least, most of the time, but of course, not everyone that plays the game is mature, nor a good-sport. But more often than not, there will be some friendly people on a server. I've made a bunch of friends just from meeting friendly people on Team Fortress 2. If you like a good FPS with silliness, fun, and of course, HATS, then Team Fortress 2 is the game for you! PROS: FREE!!! Extremely Addictive Fun Well Made HATS Several different gamemodes Did I say HATS? Different cosmetic items (including hats x3) for the classes Hilarious moments 1000s of different items Trading PROFIT CONS: 4 out of 5 servers will either have or eventually get a whiney, mic-spamming, cussing 5-10 year old Some People get too into the game sometimes and take everything personally You will find yourself investing over 400 dollars into the game x3 You will slowly have your mortal soul taken from you by the game Boot Camp bears the dread of a horrible team Mann Up bears the dread of a Boot Camp team People who like to think everytime they kill someone is the time to rant or spam "rekt" [MOST] Free-To-Plays are often Gibus/Pyrovision-Bearing Micspamming little kids [MOST] Free-to-Plays are AWFULLY annoying at times Otherwise, Team Fortress 2 has MANY more pros that I cannot take the time to list right now. But if you can deal with suddenly looking at your credit card balance then realizing you just blew your last 5 paychecks on TF2 or all the whiney 5-10 year olds, then Team Fortress 2 is a GREAT game and I truely recommend this game. I give it a 20/10 If you decide to download Team Fortress 2, I hope to see you sometime in the game! Trixie Out!
ChasCnfetti;-;Hat Simulator - Every Year
izweed;-;Really addicting and fun game:)
RH_SewerRat;-;I've had COUNTLESS hours of CONSTANT fun with this game! I grew up playing this and I've made almost half of my Steam friends through it! I just absolutely LOVE the concept and idea of this game! I'm always getting into duels and battles to see who's better among my friends (We play arena to see who lasts the longets, last person standing) and I usually get into the mediocre sort of range... I'm nothing special at the game, but I see myself as a pretty good Scout, an OK Medic, a good Heavy, and a great Sniper. I find all sorts of different ways to traverse all sorts of maps as Scout and test my sharpshooting on 2Fort as Sniper. I've played with lots of nice people and on servers with "Plug-ins" that allow you to get upgrades and buffs kind of like an overpowered version of Mann vs Machine in which You and your team of 5 others fight for a certain amount of rounds against Robots and they keep getting harder and harder. Just wait until the tank comes! Then you have a full-team target! Great game overall and you should DEFINITELY get this game!
DaveMakara;-;I recommend this game because its fun and how it shows versatility and usefulness of every class
Skrukorkmannen;-;TF2, being another one of Valve's best (which is about every one of them) games is a FPS based around 9 classes in colourful and fun maps. The game is of course also known as Hat Simulator 2, as hats are what you do to display your skill, even though said hats are purely cosmetical. This game has sucked up almost 2000 hours of my life, and was the one game to get me into steam, as TF2 is completely free to play (purchasing any item in the in-game store upgrades your account to premium, allowing for a couple of perks as a free hat and more in-game item drops). It should also be mentioned that even though it is F2P, there is no need to pay if you'd like to win! You can get the weapons from in game drops, achievements or a clever crafting system, and I can almost guarantee that you'll be enjoying this game from start to end. Give it a shot, it is free after all. 9/10 This game is at its best with the real F2P and the user-friendlyness, but it does have a couple of bugs and annoying things which will get on your nerves. If you're looking for a casual FPS with competitive possibilities, check out TF2.
DarthoN;-;This is my favorite game this game have very loot of items and things what you can do
The Remarkable Redford Sloan;-;Hat Simulator 2 is an all-around great game and has been for a long time
ImTaylord;-;Great old school FPS/class oriented game. Lil laggy at times, but if you join a server with medium players rather than max, it's better. Overall, it's a good time killer. :D
rage meister;-;i have 1337 hours in this. your argument is always invalid now.
walk with me;-;The best type of cancer
kitt;-;sandvich
Konamaru;-;Love the game my self :3 i hope you do to
AdamVoid;-;Best game ever (thats free to play)
Handsome Jack;-;10/10 rated by ign
mezzi !!;-;Became a wizard after spending thousands of dollars on this game. 10/10
No Potent;-;Team Fortress Two is one of those games where you can play it once a week or you can play it every day for hours of fun. The cartoon artstyle along with the humour is very much appealing to the casual gamer and also a well polished and balanced competitive scene for the hardcore gamers. "I have 30,000 kills on my sniper rifle and I'm still not bored" -siink
Leeroy Jenkins;-;Spent $195 on a hat that isn't even real. 10/10 Would buy more virtual hats.
mkrooted[UA];-;Awesome game with variety of items and addictive gameplay!! +: Enormous amount of items Addictive gameplay Interesting play modes, halloween maps^^ -: Sometimes boring Sometimes players are impudent (spawnkills, teleporters directly to base). But it is part of gameplay and you can't play with much joy witht it.
[-=ST=-]HITMAN;-;Fun and discorver new things
Wizard0002;-;Team Fortress 2 makes people laugh and that the reason i play this game
Spikeboy;-;I am Team Fortress 2
Jammy;-;All I can say about is game is that it is pure and utter brillance about from the fact you are considertered awful unless you have single hat you called terrible and i find that annoying but i love the different weapons rangeing from a sapper that talks when you dont want it to to a flame thrower that shoots rainbows.
MexicanTreeFrog;-;Never knew so many 12 year olds ed my mum. Actuall review: Great game, heaps of variety of hats and weapons, meet heeaps of new freiendly, funny and  people. You'll be playing for hundreds of hours. 10/10
Lord Genesect;-;It was the reason I got steam
ChainsawxKilla;-;This is awesome, I play it almost everyday.
Quick Little Bastard;-;Welcome to profit simulator 20XX. The jist of this game is to buy stuff as cheap as possible, sell that stuff as expansive as possible then rinse and repeat. I don't always play this simulator as the gameplay gets quite repetitve and it's hard to get items that are on fire "cause fire n warm glowy stuff" - Trading cornmunity on a regular basis. Other than these flaws the gameplay is fine. You have 9 classes, Scout he has +50% profit and +75% chance of ruining your day and sadly you can only play him in 4 colors black, white, pink and green he isn't a very good stealth class because his vibrant colors standout on the maps making me think they didn't think it through when choosing his color scheme. Soldier he has +40% profit -15% speed and +60% dressing apeal. He too falls to the same flaws as the scout having only 2 color choices pink and green. Despite his -15% speed he can sacrifice a chunk of his health to do a super jump, although they say you use the rocket launcher to do this you end up exploding into millions of pieces you actually hold down right click to charge it and let go while looking up to perform this move. This class is overall good and can help you out if making profit is a bit time consuming and boring with his increased dressing apeal can add a few extra hours of fun just by dressing him up. Pyro he has +25% profit +999% speed while target is in contact by flames, +85% outfit diversity and 65% more confusion. Her main weapon is the flamethrower which allows major bursts of speed if you set people on fire making him a very interesting but new players should avoid using her as his most game changing ability is her comrpession blast which can defend you by deflecting rockets, grenades, plasma grenades, ariplanes, soldiers, wild cabermen and steam flash sales but you have to time his ability or else you'll be hit which is why she isn't recomended for new players. With the highest outfit diversity in the game he can create intersting and profitable combos which also requires a decent amount of experince to even pull off. Demoman has +35% profit, +50% boom, -25% outfit diversity, +999% damage only active with stock secondary and +45% stealth (Only active during the night). This "unique" looking individual is the explosive expert of the team with his loadout that consist of sharp blades, shields and boots making him an agile tank of destruction, pairing this up with the stock secondary makes you invincible because your aura becomes so strong from the damage increase everything gets ripped from reality and only requires you to press two buttons repeatedly making him easily the best class in combat. Unfourtunatly despite his godly stats in combat he falls short in profiting abilities with having outfits of things from the past, making diversity a problem and can hinder his profit stat. Heavyweapons has -35% speed, +90 more ammo, +10% profit, +60 more gun, +45% outfit diversity +175 bulk. This character is a mixed bag for combat and profit his combat ability is soaking damage and retaliating but he is slow forcing him into a more defence gameplay which can be quite slow and doesn't feel rewarding and the fact that demoman's damage is off the charts the heavy can only last 3 seconds once he enters the demoman's 30 metre aura making this class redundant. As for profit he can be very effective if you can find someone who prefers this characters outfits which because of his offical mascot status can make this quite easy to find. Oh an also the heavy has a hidden ability called "Thick Fat" which makes him take 50% less damage from temperature based attacks. The Engineer has +35% profit, +90% calm down, +35% fun and -20% height. Don't look at that -20% height as a bad thing that can be the difference between life and death (even though the characters share the same hit boxes for most projectiles.) and with his sentry gun ability you can create a machine gun that has aimbot and can even upgrade it to shoot rockets aswell making this class easily the most defensive class and with his +90% calm down stat makes him a good switch after a stressful day of ripping people off. The engineers outfit divirsity is interesting and quite large but nothing like the pyros. The elusive Medic has +0.005% speed, +80% happiness, -45% damage, +60% crit ratio, -90% common. The medic is a god send in the meta-game and has the most complex and useful magic attacks in the game with such abilities such as partner shield, skill crits and restore these along can be used together to create devastating combos that can counter even the demomans destructive aura which is why they used this spell combinations on the already powerful demoman to tripple his aura's damage and radius. The truth to why the medic is so powerful is because of how rare and fragile they are but when someone experienced enough gets ahold of one they can unleash hell. The medic is soley combat orientated the only ability in profit he is capable of is restoring hats to their original form. Sniper has +90% common, +90% new players, -100% usefullness in large numbers, -70% productivity, -35% vision and -75% interesting outfits. This class can be beast in the hands of a pro but will still be destroyed by demomen, making him pointless and all you can do for fun is scope in atleast with soldier and scout you can do something intersting with them and too many new players choose him like some kind of god or something as if it's the  in some other game or something like and fail with him that and then we end up having just scouts, snipers and spies. It's just as bad for profit they only have 2 colors pink and green which is a small choice for making profits plus people are lazy with how they look and take the generic stuff angus hood, outback interlectual, that berret with a little shield on it, those sound thingys from apple that hurt your ears and that leather thing for his face and nothing else making him a very linear and boring class combat and profit wise. Spy has +80% commons, +90% new players, -80% usefullness in large numbers, -55% productivity, +60% style, -75% visibility and +55% stealth. The spy has the same faults as the sniper combat wise the demomans arua wrecks him and and too many inexperienced players choose him. The worse part is that they don't even bother trying to use the revolver his only way of self-defense other than the energy shield watch. Along with this he is a very paitent and slow class that requires finding the right momment to strike and the right momment to run. Profit wise he has a hole wardrobe of stylish fedoras and diverse suits making him a very interesting class for profiting. If you're a fan of tycoon games this might be right up your alley. 8.9/10
{MwH} ThatLuckyOne;-;watch your back and have no mecry cause its backstabing time.
IxDo;-;The amount of hours I have spent playing this game says it all.
Sgt Rocketz;-;See Medic healing heavy with intell seem like best buddies 11/10 still a better love story than Twilight
Greenbar  P90 Pro;-;If you quit playing, you always come back!
mud;-;When buying this game, remember that you can never be good until you have hats. Hats are the most important thing in the Team Fortress 2 world, people with hats get automatic respect. Do not wear any hat with 'gibus' in the name with pride, you will be thought of as a poser. Mann. co. hats are also disrespectful. The only class worth playing is heavy, only play heavy. That's all.
Dean Dingus;-;Wow, I've played this game for over 700 hours, I have no life. Okay, to sum this game up; Hats And It's infested with n00bs wearing the f#@king gibus, a kitten dies everytime someone equips the gibus. I myself is an 1337 pro with hats 4 dayz. and it's free to play, seriously get it 1337/10 would hat again.
Wotan;-;It's the best game on Steam.
Sh1dowdude;-;Best. Game. Ever. One of the best Cartoon | Fight games.
Charles Findertism;-;If you haven't played TF2 then I don't know why you have a Steam account
Sebastian Debeste;-;Well  my old review was hopeless. New review: Team fortress 2,a sequal to team fortress. I know,amazing. Anyway what is there to say about this game. Well,I have spent hours upon hours on this game,with a different experience each time I have played. Sure,there are Real big s like  who wants to make your life awful,but some of the players are pretty legit and those players,are the one I remember the most. I will be honest with Y'all though and say it is a P2P Kind of game. I admit I do make fun of F2PS' most of the time but usually I joke about it. You need to pay a decent ammount of money to be considered ''good'' by most of the TF2 community. Cause if you are really good wearing a gibus,chances are you will be called a hacker by some butthurt players. Although of all of this the game deserves a 8/10 as it can still be worked on,and the community could be a lot better. Thanks for reading my first legit review -Hales'
EVENING#R.I.P TF2;-;GOOD GAME LIKE TO PLAY IT TRY IT OUT YOU WONT BE DISAPPONTED
QUOKK[A];-;Get it it is free and you dont have to spend money but there is the option too
Hummas;-;This game is epic and addicting. The gameplay always changes which keeps it interesting for eternity. Best f2p game ever
scriblemelego;-;Spent over $300 on virtual hats. 11/10
Magoot Fluffykins;-;Whether its shooting the !@#% out of a brain dead potato while singing the national anthem in unison with your favourate chew toy. All I have to say is porridge. 8/10
MostOriginalUsername_NA;-;It's not CoD, so it must be good
Valorai;-;Pretty cool game.
sweggin_leeebrok;-;It's like eating candy. You eat tons and you enjoy it, and then you get fat and explode. 10/10 would get scammed again.
Pesuto;-;Conga, bread, hats and carnage. Best game on Steam, if you like online multiplayer. And don't like Dota.
EpicSamFace;-;this is one of the best f2p games in history get this game now!
PancakezRLyfe;-;Amazingly fun FPS!
Toxic;-;Great Game.... Better then COD
Dish;-;This game is free. It has Hats. It has Guns. This game is free, and has hats, and has Guns. Did I mention it's free and has hats and guns and guns and hats and frees and games and mentions and has hases and has ands and hats and hats and guns and hats and guns and frees? If it did not mention that fact, then I need to tell you that it has Hats and Guns. Hats and Guns/10 But I do digress, the latest updates have made the game exponentially laggier, to the point where having fun isn't an option. It was fine before. Dang it, Valve.
TaliatheUnicorn;-;The best free first-person shooter out there.PLAY IT NOW!
Cool ghoul;-;its ok
Jon Snow;-;The only game where you can swear at kids and not get arrested 8/8 m8 gr8 game.
Insomnia;-;Fun, awesome, and completely multiplayer dependent. This game is FREAKIN AMAZIN
Allison! [deaf];-;Reviews for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing Re-reviewing. :) Overall Game TF2 is fantastic. There are a horde of game modes to play that can keep you coming back to this old game for a while. While I prefer MVM these days, I do often play community servers for a good CTF or payload round. Accessibility Gameplay Like most FPS games, TF2 uses WASD, space, and control. For mobility-related issues, keys can be easily rebound to whatever suit your capabilities. I rebound cruch to space and jump to a side mouse key, for example. As for sound, with the exception of spies and spy-related events (such as sapping of your equipment), there are visual cues to accompany the audio. For some weapons that you can hear being fired, you may not be able to see that you're being shot at (such as some sniper rifles). This is something to watch out for. For gameplay accessibility, I give it 10/10. You can realistically play and succeed at all of the normal (non-mod) game modes available, with or without sound. Subtitles & Captions For deaf/hoh gamers, TF2 offers subtitles and captions - something Valve has a solid history of providing. I've found the default captions lacking in MvM, however. Fortunately, there is a way to use external captions, and I have turned to clovervidia for that: http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=167785751 As a deaf gamer, I use captions over subtitles whenever I have the choice, as the distinction tends to be between important information in captions and flavor text in subtitles. That said, I have not used the subtitles option for TF2. For captions, I give it 6/10 normally, 9/10 with external captions (such as from clovervidia). Chatting/Communicating TF2 supports in-game voice communication, but the pacing of the game does not make it essential. Gameplay can tolerate typing, so many other players in servers tend to have no problem accommodating having to type. Even so, many game modes don't require much communication for casual play. For MvM, typing can be made difficult at times, and this problem can be exacerbated by queuing random teams each time you play and having to explain things repeatedly, which can be a gamble. I've written a guide to try to standardize voicebind calls in MvM until Valve changes voicebinds to be more inclusive, if ever. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=358478951 Overall Accessibility TF2 incorporates visual signals for almost everything that happens in game. It's ability to rebind keys and add custom captions make it pretty accessible for most deficits in the gaming population. Overall, 9/10!
Lathbalrog;-;10/10 would hat again
DERPASOURAS;-;why not, its tf2! :D
Yarr! goosmurf;-;TF2 is by far the most elaborate team based rock-paper-scissors simulator ever. It has fancy headwear and never ending variations in strategy that even the most advanced RPS player will take years to master.
Blufoot;-;I use a fish to kill a Russian eating raw meat and an Australian throwing  everywhere. 10/10
It didn't matter anyways;-;If you're wiling to give up your life,This is the game for you.
Howl;-;Good game :3 im already having fun :3
ir. Goki;-;A truly great game that offers hours upon hours of replayability. Enjoy a free game that is absolutely amazing. "Great Game!" 10/10
ubub;-;best game and will be the best 4ever!<3
Sir Pannington (ColdRamenz);-;Best hat and conga simulator around.
Sryex;-;If you are okay with spending your life savings and the rest of the time you have on Earth trying to get decent hats. Buy TF2. 11/10 would do again.
Blu Scout's Mother;-;I like Team Fortress 2 its a great game
ManBearPig;-;Flawless hat simulator! You start off as a poor irish unfortunate with nothing but the will to build the biggest tower of hats any gentlemanne of leisure has ever gased upon. From ghastly gibus to burning team captain team hatress 2 promises a rolercoaster ride of emotion, backstabs and hats. Download today!
bannedduck;-;I totally LOVE that game! Every class has its stengths and backsides. You have to think tactical and it's even more fun with friends who play with you.
GR8GAMERez;-;That weird moment when i like the more for its gameplay instead of hats
Mke Schmidt;-;Best F2P Game so far on Steam! :D
TheDerpiestWhale | trade.tf;-;TF2 is my favorite game i think i should give it a 10.0 star rating i love this
TonySpot;-;Best game ever! Gameplay is great, graphics are great, and trading is the bomb! Definetly recommend.
festeringMongoose HG-A;-;If you have Steam, but don't have TF2. Then I think you need to rethink your life decisions.
SALCHIWOLF;-;The best Free to Play game on steam! Very cool graphics, and it's very addictive! Just download it now!
p531;-;i love this game
Love The Shimmer;-;Is Gud
CAR_;-;I thought FPS's were stupid until I played TF2.
LiEbEsLeBeN;-;Great game, addicting, free
LordCorpseKiller;-;Hats...10/10 would wear again.
KoreanJesus  - smurf acc;-;Amazing game for casual play and tycoon-like economic building of your items, I reccomend 9.5/10
The beautiful dwarf;-;A great game, if not for its general replay value, then for the exciting personalities and circumstances afforded to each character. As opposed to simply playing "Soldier X" or "Survivor Y", you're controlling a specialized class complete with an identifiable appearance and unique characterized voice casting. I purchased this game a few years ago, unfortunately a very short time before it went free-to-play, but I do not remotely regret having paid for such an entertaining game. Aside from some revised classic FPS game modes, the modding/hosting communities present about the game offer a large range of alternative modes (Survival, Versus Saxton Hale and WarioWare to name a few) that bring an expansive, ever-growing catalogue of play styles to your game. The commercial aspect of the game is primarily aesthetic (you've probably heard the hat jokes), and is in no way necessary to augment your ground against other players. There are numerous weapons with traits that will allow you to customize the way you play your classes, but even the base weapons can achieve great things when weilded by an experienced player. There are also back-stories via comics, cinematic videos and seasonal events for people who are into that sort of thing. Overall, a fantastic game. I can only advise you use the official servers primarily for practice and explore others as you progress, since the quality of people you tend to find (F2P etc.) can become daunting.
Ya boi Franku;-;Its like someone activated the Yu-Gi-Oh card toon town on a counter strike game.
The Generaless;-;The only game I know of where you can kill and be killed by people wearing an impossible array of hats. ALL YOUR HATS ARE BELONG TO THE SPY 10/10
Jugulate;-;For me, Best free 2 play game.
Blacky;-;This game is good. That's all.
B3NJ0007;-;"The most fun you can have online" is the most appropriate comment for this AWESOME game
Professor Nope;-;This game has ruined me and needs more hats and weapons. 10/10 would ruin my life again.
Volty;-;The most addictive hat simulator I've ever played. The shooting can be fun too.
Twin Towers;-;The most fun I've ever had in a multiplayer game. 10/10 would recommend.
sydney opera house;-;This game is thrilling in the fact that the highlight is waiting for new hats to be released 10/10
banks;-;hi this is my review on team for- PHLOG FORCE OF NATURE RESERVE SHOOTER MACHINA STICKYSPAM HEAVY MINI SENTRY ENFORCER DIRECT CRIT bye
MeatLocker;-;This game is so addicting and it is very fun if you are into (sometimes) intense offensive battles or defensive battles. The spy can be very useful if you need to get behind enemy lines.
Didgeridude;-;Took procrastintation to a whole new level. Hat/10
Wolfotic;-;Ruined life. Lost Job. Girlfriend left me. Dog ran away. Haven't eaten or slept in two weeks. BUT THE FREAKING HATS MANNNN!!!! IT MAKES IT WORTH IT PLAY THIS GAME IT'LL RUIN YOUR LIFE BUT YOU WILL BE SEXY AS HELL IN THEM HATS I PROMISE YOU THAT!
Mk;-;i think everyone agree's that team fortress 2 is the most fun and creative FPS ever to rule the earth :3
Ledshot;-;this game has given me hours of fun and now its free theres no reason not to download it
XI Energy;-;"this is very fun and addicting" -Soul Eater
Stefneh;-;Men who accessorize is what this has become.
Torak195;-;Amazingly fun, addictive, and rage inducing. Also free!
Sebarino;-;This is one of the best games I've ever played (besides Halo) and I just want to say that I love it a lot. (You can tell by my hours lol) It's true, this game is basically only hats and cosmetics, but I think you could really have a lot of fun on this game. Look at every review, I'll bet you they're ALL positive. This is the best F2P game on steam, so go ahead, get it for yourself all of you noobs out there. Buy some hats (no really don't, this game will clean out your wallet), kill a lot of people! An lastly, get a gibus and wear it on your head with a smile.
bird mom;-;10/10 ruined my life need hats
Original King () BBQ;-;Great Game to Play with friends 10/10
[KCG] Sugi;-;most sofisticated fps ever. if you are reading this now. stop. just play.
anaheim;-;I don't know what the big deal about hats is about, I play this game as a shoe collector simulator. Have you seen my new boots for demo? Damn.
Thunderscunt Krazy;-;This game is just....f**king awesome. My life has basically been wasted on this game but it's so worth it. When you get the chance, play this game. After all, who wouldn't like to play a good game that's free? :D
Captrad;-;This game got me hooked! I love this game because of its unique zombie survival gametype. It is so much fun to team up with a group and try to kill the hat-bearing zombies. They will attack you, trade you, beg you, grief you, and much more in this fun, action packed survival shooter. 10/10 would recommend
Peaches;-;So many binds 69/10 would bind again.
TheGameAddict;-;The best free to play first person shooter/trade simulator ever! gice it a go
Golden$Dragon;-;One of the best multiplayer games that's feauteres many classes you can choose from A huge workshop that's feauteres many amazing items you will enjoy this game so much with your friends
East Korea;-;Well.. There's hats...
Johadree;-;Team Fortress is very fun alone and with friends so i definetly recommend this
The Doctor;-;Because it makes you a hardcore gamer and not ruins your life and its free.
SpixcawNG(On vacation);-;this is the best game ever created
KABLAAAHH;-;Motherf*cking Hats!
Miami Fucktard;-;Pretty fun to play when you have nothing to do
1Up;-;This drastically exceeds expectations for a free game. It won't cost ya anything, so why are you waiting? Click that download button!
Dave! Yognaught;-;I really enjoy this game! It has a unique play style and the graphic design is a never aging beaut.
A Cat Loli;-;"7.8/10 Too Much Hats" - IGN
Unicrn;-;Sniper: Gibus, Pyrovision and Machina. Its time to rek some noobs m8 (    ) 420/10 *Edit This game ruined my life
TwistedGamer;-;This game Ruined my Life. Awesome game.
Ambie;-;this game is possibly the most addicting free game that ever existed. there are 9 different classes (scout,soldier,engineer,spy,sniper,heavy,demoman,pyro, and medic.) in this game you have to find the one your best at and... KILL EVERY DAMN PERSON YOU SEE!!!!!! HAHAHAHHAHAHAHAHHAHAHAHAHAHAHHAHAHAHAHAHAHA this is my review, ~The Ambassador
CHUMBA;-;Ok, here is a more suitable rating. I give this game Five stars (going with star rating system as I'm not very familiar with any other ones lol) Variety: There's pleanty of classes, maps, weapons, modes -heck, there's even plenty hats to choose from. One thing I can state is that this game has variety, the games popularity shouldn't be a mystery to any of the players. Simplicity: The characters are full of personality, though some players not be quite sure of the plot as there really isn't one we all know our objective as when we select a match we are told what map and such we'll be joining when it is loading (even if it is the random choice that you selected). Interface is pretty direct, and takes minutes to get used to. HUD is also pretty polished, you don't have to keep your eyes at the bottom of the screen anymore with tf2, unlike most games in which your health bar is at the bottom. The reason as to why I feel the TF2 health bar is neat is because it's easy to tell whether or not you're low on health as the square will turn red, also that it is within your peripheral vision (which means yes you don't have to look at the bottom of the screen as previously stated) Every class has 3 weapons (engineer/spy are exceptional as they only have 2-3 weapons with 5 slots) primary/secondary/melee, a simple set up we can all get used to pretty quick. This might sound a bit silly, but even the names are simple. They range from 1-3 syllables and are fairly short, so it's easier to describe say you saw a few sticky bombs in base in CTF you could simply type "demo in base" rather than "xxxxxxxxxx in yyyyy" in which is a problem in some games because some people are slow typers, but well knowing the average steam user you're probably going to be a fast typer so that's not going to be a problem for you. Other: Modding is available, it's a bit more complicated than going to workshop and clicking 'subscribe' on any item you see as appealing, for modifications you have to go to a third party site- however, installing them even on a third party site is pretty simple. you just drag and drop them into a folder and I guess you could say thats another thumbs up seeing as lots of people like to personalize their stuff (me personally I don't do this with TF2 but others might). Community: You're alright. I've chuckled at the banter over hats, even though you all made fun of my gibus when I first started playing. I would add more at the moment, I sure think there's more to mention but I can't think of anything. I spent most of this year playing this game (I've played more on my alternate account than this one) and I don't regret it either. I've also spent a bit more than time on this game... lmao
Bladewolf;-;THIS GAME IS SO SO FUN
Novabeam;-;Great Game! Free to play and super addicting. More fun with friends. And the drop system is well put together were you dont get too much or too little.
ill-m@tic;-;Everyday is summer in TF2. That is all I can say. 10/10
Jorp_the_SmexyMaNarwhal;-;Do you like very serious games? do you like games that have dramatic stories, in-depth gameplay, and touching scenes? WELL THIS GAME IS NOT FOR YOU! This game is not your standard FPS game, this game has so much humor in it, you can't take it seriously. "How do I know that this game isn't some generic FPS game and you're just talking bs?" watch meet the pyro and meet the spy....just..ju.just watch. To conclude this review, there are many different things you can do in it, you can play on custom maps, like mario_kart_v20, randomizer maps, you can purchase hats and costumes to make your character look like a baddas fighting machine, or a strange person in a wierd outfit that makes you cry "I NEED AN ADULT!" i highly suggest this game to anybody who is into whacky and silly stuff, if you find this game to be interesting, i ma going to give you a little advice. remember to spy-check! ;)
Folcrow;-;It's free, has a lot of content, funny community and packs a ton of fun! What's not to like?
SP3K;-;ultimate hat warfare i like hats.
Thirad Kingdom;-;I RATE IT 5 STARS
Tornado;-;i love this game because its fun i do not care about the hat or the wepon i care to have fun in the games and do not care abut trading
MrtFantomik;-;Team Fortress 2
The Nordic Nipple;-;Get it. Now. Don't ask questions just do it. What's that? You don't want it? Get it anyway. Everyone else on steam does. Don't be a loner. It's free. What are you waiting for? Get it right now and give me a hat.
FreeLynx;-;An amazing FPS that's really addictive! It's a very well built shooter with a trading aspect that's free to play. I'd say it's better than the Call of Duty Franchise.
Frosty charizard;-;i love this game
TheBlazing01;-;Team Fortress is such a fun and enjoyable game. Its weapons, gameplay, balance and reliance on teamwork all work together in perfect harmony. With 7 Gamemodes, 9 classes, tonnes of weapons and maps, TF2 is such a great game, both from its great sense of balance and comical gameplay. Step aside Battlefield and COD, TF2 is the game to play! TF2 isn't your usual FPS, its 9 classes all have unique weapons, tactics, advantages and disadvantages. These classes include the quick, fast Scout, the rocket firing Soldier, the flamethrowing Pyro, the grenade lobbing Demo, the bullet tanking Heavy, the sentry building Engineer, the ally healing Medic, the headshoting Sniper and the backstabbing Spy. Each Class counters and is countered by another class. TF2 is a masterpiece of a game and is still being updated. What are you waiting for? GO PLAY TF2 NOW! ITS FREE!
ArmedDarkly;-;love this game so much, this is such a well balanced game, there is no OP weapons cause there is always a anti weapon, and anti class for each character in this game,this game takes alot more skill then a run and gun game anyday,plus the game gives back to you when you play so its a win win :D
TURDY DUMP;-;When I was growing up in the white trash apartment complex in the 90s, I often spent my days playing outside. I would catch toads, fish, and bugs and often keep them as pets. One day my mother burned my face with a cigar. A few years ago my brother and I were fishing. We caught a catfish and as we were cleaning and gutting it, we noticed a pair of human infant feet in the catfish's stomach contents. More importantly, this taught me a valuable lesson about not running on floors covered in ice or human excrement.
]][[;-;Playing this game you should remember few thing 1.Hat 2.Hat with AWESOME effect on it 3.Golden weapons (aussies) 4.Don't wear the GIBUS D: ^ ^
Mr. Dr. Scientist;-;Nice free-to-play online game from Valve, that based on a team work. You can play for one of 9 classes: scout, soldier, demoman, pyro, heavy, engineer, medic, sniper, spy. Every class has its special limitations, capabilities and features. Universe of a game is crazy, comic, kind of funny, bloody, violent, enthralling. By the way, this game also famous for it's variety of hats.
We're the exception!;-;When there is no more room in hell, gibus wearing f2ps will roam the earth.
Xalren;-;It's ok I guess
xX_LegitB0risJ0hn$on_Xx (Swag);-;I was like you once, you know, just browsing the steam store, getting all the valve games. Then I got this one... I was F2P for a long time. Until one morning I decided to buy like, one weapon to get me premium. I'd seen scrap banking videos on YouTube, so I wanted to buy a huntsman and build it up to a strange killstreak. Then, fate looked down on me and decided I didn't need a life. I went on the man co store, planning to buy the huntsman and spend the rest of the fund card on games. Then, I saw the hats. Line by line, those beauties, shining and glittering in the darkness of my bedroom. I bought one. Then my life chsnged forever. Trading, banking, buying, uncrating and just being addicted to these hats... Now it's to late for me. I got a team captain, and realised I'd exceeded my target. But I wanted to spend more money on the store... Pour money into valve... Buy hats. Now I feel hats whispering my name, I feel their prescience. I see them on those I love... I see them in my food. I can feel Gabe Newell in my soul, pressuring me to buy more hats... I can't take it anymore. As I type this, I feel a key in my mouth. Fake hats on my head, professional killstreaks burning my eyes... Help me. I love tf2, deeply recommend this game to anyone, be it a COD player or just an idiot.
Greenpro;-;Utterly amazing game!
A mcdouble on da flo;-;This game sucks because spies should have wings flying around the map taking 0 damage!
Sv.Ninja Gaiden Jim;-;Free to play and not pay to win...WHAT MORE COULD YOU ASK FOR! Classes are balanced very much so and it is addicting!
Vila;-;I got this because of wint3r... I HATE WINT3R... The game isn't exactly addictive. With the knowledge anyone can join tournements after 50 hours it motivates you to keep playing. another thing is the items, you want the best of the best and again more motivation to play... finally I got scammed and the dropped my morale so low i haven't played this in 3 months. And yet I still recomend this, I wonder what is the motivation is this time.
boo;-;YEAH SCREW VALVE AND THEIR FREE GAME, THEY'RE NOT GETTING ANY OF MY FREE MONEY
Blue_Wolf75;-;Its free first of all. It is amazing cause you can do many different things but they all consider in killing or trading. It is a fun game to test out classes you might be at or you can try to be a collecter!
{P.L.F.C.} Master_Weegee;-;It's like playing hide and seek except with a bunch of non-sentient arsonists. 420/69
Haywire Banana;-;This is the best game I have experienced in steam... I wish there were more like these games.
V;-;It's a great game. Awesome graphics, awesome gameplay. All out, it's balanced, too. The better you get at it, the more fun it gets, and the more things you can do, too. Try it out.
Edgemaster Fuhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh;-;Ugh, this game rips off so many other titles. 1.Jumping from Crackdown 2.Basketball from Madden 2k13 3.Killcam from Crysis 3 4.Switching weapons from GTA 5 5.Killfeed from Minecraft 6.Laser sight from L4D2 7.Water from Far Cry 2 8.Countdown from Smash Bros. N64 9.Shank from Shaw Shank Redemption 10.R2D2 from Star Trek Seriously Blizzard, did you even try?
Metlhead O' acon;-;Awesome game! Great and fun multi-player gameplay!
Kuritsu | Sleepover;-;Awsome As Hell
[TDM-Bot] Lost Doll #REBEL;-;Monday 29 sept.2014 this game is wierd fun and can be ing stupid also really addictive like my weed ofc this ing game will blow your mind if you are for action and  you can: (TRADE, MAKE BUSINESS, COLLECT ITEMS, PLAY HARD,  AROUND, TELL JOKES IN PUBLIC!!, HAVE FUN, MAKE FRIENDS) this game is really fun the worst part is that it can lagg it depends on how fast your computer is or your internet sucks if you have super fast internet than u can play  good lagging is the only problem in this game and when u play this game to much you get bored of it for some "time" but the funny and wierd part is you start again :/ sometimes also if you dont have friends to play with then its not that fun to play this game cus multipleyer is the best but if u want to practise i recomend "Offline Practise" pretty obvius :/ Al Pacino would like this game many pll do or have! [ Warning this game will  your brain and it will be really hard to quit playing this game, you have been warned ]
girtacos;-;The void for your wallet, saving up? Not anymore you need to open all thoes crates you have! Remember kids in the end Gabe always wins.
Toast?;-;Team Fortress 2 is always hard to start off. I remember starting and dying constantly but still enjoying it. Eventually I got better and started learning other things like Rocket Jumping and Trading. With all the classes, weapons, maps and gamemodes I never get bored. And they keep bringing more out! There's also all the mods and community made gamemodes such as saxton hale or super smash bros. I would definitely reccomend this to anyone who has a PC. I play on a laptop and from time to time it can lag, but nowhere near as bad as some games and it's still playable. Unlike other FPS games like Call of Duty, the classes in this are just hilarious. They have each of their own personalities and just say some funny stuff while your playing. With the fact that you can still kind of customize your character with all the hats and cosmetics they keep adding, and keep the actual character is great. There's also the Halloween - Scream Fortress (which I'm enjoying at the moment) and the christmas - Smissmas. This is by far my favourite game today and I don't intend to stop playing it anytime soon.
[145] Happy Santa;-;Anyone who is a fan of FPS games and hats should play this.
Ahadapple;-;This game is great!
The Danger;-;Really love this game !!!
u;-;It's a fun game. Get it.
NinjaLion101;-;it is a really good shooting game for pc
Macabre;-;The best hat simulator on the market.
[DFS]Apollo;-;TF2 is a team based hat simulator. The main goal is to collect hats and move your way up the ranks of the top traders. Although Hats are obviously the main part about this game, the shooting game included is great! Well balanced, but with LOTS of inexperienced people calling you a "Cheater" for sticky jumping across the map. Jokes aside, TF2 is a great game and I recommend you try it at least once.
@.GTV-/;-;This game is amazing as it is simple, 9 classes The Scout,Soldier,Pyro,Medic,Spy,Sniper,Heavy(weapons guy),Demoman And the Engineer battle it out representing their 2 teams, Red/Blu. with a plethera of Maps, Weapons, Gamemodes and hats YEAH HATS!!!! this game is a great pick up for the casual player and the serious gamer. GO MEDIC FOR ONCE
DamonJaws E.O.I;-;vary fun game it can get laggy but it is still fun
JamsTheChimp;-;TF2 is by far the best free game on the steam market. It has a variety of game modes (plus it's free! (can't go wrong with free games)). With some free games, you find to actually do something, you have to pay, but you can rock on tf2 without having to pay a single penny! Spy and soldier are my favourite classes and my soldier is pimped with awesome gear that i traded for on trade servers. I would reccomend this to anyone who likes action packed first person shooters!!
Tumbleweed;-;This game is possibly one of the greatest F2P games ever. However, once you reach that premium level, the game only gets better. Starting the game out, people do not realize the potential that they have. They look at their inventories, see the stock items placed in the slots, and connect to the first payload game that they find. And so the journey begins on TF2. But with only .50 cents in your steam wallet, you can unlock all the secrets of TF2. Purchasing their first wrangler opens them up to the world of hats, trading, and of course, unusuals. When a newly found premium player gets his first key, he opens up the crate that had no use before this. The suspense is killing him... 3... 2... 1... You unboxed! Strange Jarate! Not knowing the dissapointment in this. The player screams with excitement about getting a strange! Selling this strange for 1 rec turns into buying another, and getting a ref. This ref turns into a key. And the key into a bud. Now, you are a veteran of TF2 trading. However, with new updates coming every so often (BREAAD), new oppurtunites are created, and the game of Team Fortress get even better.
Forsaken Avocado;-;Once you find a server that fits well with your skill level, appropriate ratio of seriousness to humor, and is generally free of s, I've found TF2 to be one of the most enjoyable ways you can spend your time. Luckily, TF2's community is exceptional compared to other FPSs out there, so this generally isn't difficult. I do want to stress, however, how much server jumping can improve your experience if your first few tries aren't stellar. Lots of people play this game for lots of different reasons, so shop around and find a like-minded community. Whether you're super serious or just wanna conga or somewhere in between, who you play with affects your experience hugely.
fez;-;10/10 Recommend The Game is great and fun this is the best First Person shooting game for me :) Download it 100% Free And a Great Game :))
Gamer Cal;-;Oh yes this is the BEST GAME IN THE HISTORY OF GAMING nehter mind Gta 5 or DAYZ this is so addictive you have gotta try it!
Link_42;-;Very good game being free to play only limits small stuff and can run good on even laptops 9.5/10
Makiyo;-;It's very nice
PyZo;-;Would be the worst game if it werent for my W key and Mouse 1 Button. 3/Half Life 3
TcR|2X2Dragon;-;Awesome game !!! Lots of fun ...(trade me)...
FWME Road to Unusual;-;this is the best game ever
GT_RGT;-;Love this game more than sex. GabeN / 10
Limit;-;pls give me my life and wallet back
[AGOU] AWESOME USERNAME;-;Welcome to Team HATress 2! This is the best shopping game EVAR. Sometimes you have to shoot people with guns and stuff but the REAL point of this game is to give 9 different people the most life-changing makeovers of their minute-long lives! Shame you can only choose two colors though.
Burger Buns;-;holy crap this game is good
ElekTra;-;I likeD this Game although its animation but its very interesting and u dont have to pay to be pro ! .... just play and enjoy
MaGiK;-;Having Fun with this
DEST! 50$ in memory of cyx;-;this game is one of the best games of all times edit:the economy is ed thanks a lot back pack.tf dont ruin cs go u ing
D;-;If you like fun then get this game.
Cosmic Bunny;-;*sigh* Why dont you have this game yet? Team fortress 2 in my opinion anyways is one of the best FPS games in the world FOR FREE!
Makise Kurisu;-;TF2 at it's core is an amazing game, and one of the most fun and balanced shooters I've ever played. Even though choices by Valve have tarnished it's reputation (and I mean they really screwed the pooch on more than one occasion), it still stands out as one of the most fun and addicting shooters there is. However, to get the full enjoyment out of it you either need to find a community server (which since Quickplay started defaulting only to Valve servers, is becoming harder) or play competitive. Valve's public servers have little to no team cohesion or coordination (owing to the Free-to-Play system bringing in LOTS of children). Don't worry if you get destroyed by more experienced players, you'll get better (trial by fire worked for me). If you need help, ask. You can't be an asset to your team if you have no clue what you're doing. Ask for tips from experienced players, and always remember that there is a wiki [wiki.teamfortress.com] . And for god's sake, use a ing mic. Don't have a mic? Get one, teamwork and communication is key. The game isn't what it used to be, you can't drop in to a random server and expect to find competent and friendly players anymore, the visually appealing and unique artstyle has been destroyed by cash-grab cosmetics, and the actual performance of the game has been destroyed by the added weight of the cosmetics. Still, even as frustrating as it can be, there's never anything more satisfying than coordinating a team through a difficult push to win a close victory. (Also, a final note. If the server you join has an MOTD, read it.)
Back in 2 days;-;This game is just awesome.
Ipernick the Great [ITA];-;It's a very good game, the graphic the characters the weapons and the gameplay is awesome, I think it deserves some of you money, I suggest not more than 10 euros
A sloth with standards.;-;Dis game iz dah best go play it. Can't go wrong everybody likes this game.
Pyrowman;-;One of the best free-to-play games I've ever palyed, together with Dota 2 and Loadout.
Kyle Hue;-;If you like fast pased fps this is the game for you <3
FunnySun is me?;-;One of my favorite games of all time. I definently recommend this game.
Looks Like;-;Before Team Fortress 2 I was a rich man, I had wealth to rival Midas himself. I bathed in gold flake. My furniture was made of solid platinum, shined to a mirror finish. Even my clothes were embroidered with golden thread and studded with diamonds. ... That was until I found TF2. I pawned all of my belongings... I bought hats. I own... Hats... Hats... 11/10
turdl3;-;worst game i've ever played and i've played super monkey balls
LazyViolet;-;This is not just a game... it's a lifestyle....
Leon;-;The worlds best hat-themed simulator.
Freeza #TF:GO;-;Good game, not the best
Kapteeni Kakkaht;-;Best hat simulator ever
Black Sabbath;-;Veri nice free to play game
The Oddball;-;Cool
Domo Bear \||;-;One of the best games of all time. Even when I buy new games I always come back to this game and play. Buy it if you can worth it!
gluep51;-;This game has taken my life away
aconSentry;-;I Love this game. Team Fortress 2 I think is a really good Multiplayer Game I love the trading community, The gameplay and even the updates. For a Game that came out in 2006 or 2007 i dont remember but this game has come a long way sence then. Also from how long it took for this game to come out It's a masterpeace I think. I dont Think theres anything that could be a better game. You should get this game I highly Recommend It :3
Lord magikarp;-;Awesome game full of running around blowing enemys to bits really fun i fully recommend you give it a try.
/folf;-;Where to start on this wonderful game? Team Fortress 2 is, as the name suggests, a team-based game where players are heavily encouraged to work together to comeplete the objective of that gamemode. In total there are nine classes you can play as: Scout, Soldier, Pyro, Demoman, Heavy, Engineer, Medic, Sniper and Spy. All these classes have been built specifically around teamwork and as a resault rely on each other in order to be effective. This in turn creates a dynamic experience that no other first person shooter multiplayer can get close to. With fun maps, quirky characters and humorous jokes and weapons along the way, Team Fortress 2 has it all. You can taunt your enemies with chicken, tell your engineer to build a dispenser or even go shopping for hats. There are a few bugs and problems in TF2, some of which can be fustrating at times and others just make you laugh, however Team Fortress 2 is a game that I highly recommend to anyone as their first PC game or to a game hoarder who knows everything about PC gaming. This game offers hours of fun and the community support ensures that this game is not going to die anytime soon. Final score - 10/10.
Drew Jay Jewman;-;I found a hat yesterday.
Johnny Cash;-;O my god!!! Super-Duper Game!!!!
AllSeeingEye20;-;NO DOUBT THE BEST GAME ON THE INTERNET!!!!! WOOOOOO!!!!!
[GIRL] TheMightyPotato;-;Probably one of the most balanced games I've ever played. And addicting :P
DanoStormCloudsNotPlayinForNow;-;This is my Favorite game in HISTORY!!! So far It's graphics are amazing and game play is great fun with friends and foes!
maxinummerone;-;i really like this game and you should try it
AWESOMECON10;-;Best game I have ever played. good wepons, funny taunts and more
Choconut;-;This Game is amazing, no spectactular, it is so evolved, so different than most fps that it can no longer be called a game, sure there are  who play, sure there are little kids who don't know anything, and the few who do, but TF2 has so much to offer it is crazy, frequent updates, minigames, mods, ways to costomize your gameplay so much, it is great!!!!!!!
Foz | i55.tf;-;really nice game ;D
VirtuAl~<3;-;Truly, this is a game hard to die out. :3 TF2 FOREVAH!
[MiT] SingleFemaleLawyer;-;Team Fortress 2 is one of those games you mean to play for half an hour and end up staying for a couple hours. It is loaded with fun game modes, maps, and weapons. It is a team game so be ready to be a team player. The TF2 community has a lot to offer. Plus there are hats. And you know. Those are cool.
Tunder;-;My very first steam game, this game holds a special place in my heart, but after buying other games I cant get myself back into this game.
Syzygy;-;One worthy thing to mention, one thing this game is full of, is hats. If you don't have hats, you are an outcast until you either find one or steal your parents credit card to buy some. This game in my opinion has a lot of key features that make it great. First off, there is no campaign, so its all multiplayer based. The community is very friendly towards anyone. A mostly silly game, but if you want to play competitive, they have servers for that. This game is also a good way to make money, you can sell keys on the market, or do what i did and play MvM and pray that you get an australium. Valve seems to listen to what the community wants added in to the game and will add them (for the most part). Each weapon is unique and balance. They will have something good about them but then they will have something to counter that (Ex: A weapon might have +25% damage but then will also have -25% movement speed). Overall this game is great and despite being free, is one of the best games I have ever played in my life. Im sure there are others who will agree with me. (P.S: DON'T buy anything from the Mann.Co store, no matter how desperate you are).
hellraptor;-;The best F2P game ever! :)
Lui got banned;-;The First and the best game a ever played on steam(P/S:after watch dogs) BEST GAME EVER ES!!!!!
Hipster Trash;-;Ruined my life, and my bank account. 11/10 would pootis again
DRUNK;-;Idk what to say, but I like this game, It makes me happy while playing it.
Gunner Reptile;-;This should be in every steam users game libary
TheRedDragon;-;this game is awesome
Racxaz;-;Pootis. Nope.
Space Bee[Armadillo];-;This game has changed my life and I'm never going back to the none game playing nerd I was before
Goose;-;I only played for a little, but it was good.
The Dude;-;It's ok.
MesS T1 K0;-;Nice game
Cloud;-;Im just gonna say that this game is awesome you can trade,you can collect items and you can have fun.1 advice if youre under 10 dont play this game people are gonna laugh at you if they hear youre voice and theyre gonna kill you lots of times untill you quit playing.Have fun :)
Poor Pootis;-;If you ask me whats my status about me when im playing this game with my total play time Q: wow you have a lot of play time O_O how about your school A: Ded Q:how about your dream? A: Ded Q:how about your study? A: Ded Q:how about your money you've wasted on visual items? A: Ded Q: how about your lunch money A: Ded used it for buying keys Q: why is your bp value only 1.88 buds? A: 1. i got scammed alot of time 2. 30% people i trade use some trading Exploit 3. lots of Newbie asking free item nonstop
Demoham;-;Awesome game :) short and simple. But ples do better on the updates valve >.>
Lobsters are People too;-;Best Hat Simulator 2014 Heavy/10
Sir Penguin, Master of Evil;-;I love this game. I really do. That's why I have over 1,000 hours on it. Every single thing about it is great. But, the one, SINGLE, thing that makes me hate it is the freaking people who play it. There is a select amount of people who are good, but about, I say, 80% of the people who play it are either: screaming 5 year olds, trollers who wont shut up, hackers who ruin the entire game for everyone, people who think they are better than everyone, and last just your classical . I'm sorry if I'm sounding harsh, but this is how I see it. I just needed to say this and this is the only place I could think of. Thank you for reading and good day.
StephenTheHero;-;Team Fortress 2 is without a doubt the best FPS game I have ever played and probably the best one I will ever play! And that comes from someone who generally dislikes shooters. The cartoony characters, the unique playstyles for all the classes, the unlockable weapons (and hats), and the different types of matches will keep you playing this game for tens to hundreds of hours. Best part: It's completely free!
LoneCodeR;-;Guide for playing as a member of Red Team: Shoot everything that moves and everything that is blue! Guide for playing as a member of Blue Team: Shoot everything that moves and everything that is red!
Glyph;-;gud game, but I ing hate the f2p little kids
Thenewguy47;-;get's real when you play this game.
Jolly Zancher;-;This is a well thought out team based first person shooter. The game encourages teamwork to win against players of higher skill or well-organized teams. Lone wolfing can still be done on lower levels, especially on public game servers. There are 9 classes to choose from, each one offering unique skill sets and abilities that allow them to fill in a unique role as part of the team as a whole. Because of this, the player is rewarded with a challenging and fun-filled experience, especially when faced against opponents or teams with similar or greater skill. Even though this game was released way back in 2007, the game continues to have an active development team that continues to release updates to the game that add new content, such as new unique weapons or game modes. At the time of this review, the Team Fortress community is preparing for the upcoming Halloween update, which has been an annual event in the game since 2009. While this game is extremely fun and rewarding to play, I have noticed how complex the game has become in regards to new items and game mechanics. I became introduced to this game in 2011, and gradually learned the ropes of the game over time. However, I have noticed how newer players have reported having a hard time grasping how all of the items work and in general feeling a sense of information overload. In order for them to not be considered a "noob" at this game, they must experiment and test with all of the items in the game to have a full understanding of what weapon(s) should be used in certain situations. All of this, however, is a small issue amidst the big picture. This game is fantastic and, being a free-to-play game, allows players to have loads of fun without having to make a big down payment to enjoy it. I continue to return to the game on a daily basis.
BOON_;-;Where are the fortresses?
shootk9;-;***1/2 3.5 out of 4 Team Fortress 2: A beginner's guide to multiplayer games. TF2 has it all. Classes, maps, hats and a humourous attitude. That said it's also terribly addictive like most multiplayer games, and whilst I recommend TF2, I can't help note how serious this addiction can be, when people rack up 10,000+ hours playing this game, it really doesn't deserve that. It's not *that* good of a game to be honest. That says it is a fun time with friends or a group of strangers for a few hours here and there, but little more unless you're an obsessive achievement hunter.
Nkkenbuer;-;Team Fortress 2 is undoubtedly the best free-to-play game Steam has to offer. The graphics are great and while this game may look childish to some, the only thing childish about it are the cartoon-esque designs. Outside of that, TF2 is a game suitable for people of any and all ages 13 and up. What I find most appealing about this game is that even though players are allowed to spend as much money as they'd like to equip their characters with extremely powerful weaponry, the atmosphere of the game is generally quite fair and balanced. Of course some people may seem overpowered at times, but they are often veterans of this game. Just as long as you know how to play right, you don't need anything other than the default items the game provides.
Tickle Dat Pickle;-;This game is good because it stops the bleeding in my .
kfc | bobmarleyhats.info;-;The best war-based hat simulator of the 21st century.
Quickscoping Prophet;-;I've lost my friends and family because they bothered me while playing TF2. My girlfriend left me for another man due to neglect, and I sold my house to buy Keys to open crates. I sold my PC to buy food so I wouldn't starve. I am homeless and currently typing this on a Computer at the Library. 10/10
Josip_XD King of snoipah;-;This game is awsome 10/10! i like how it alway updates and adds new weps and hats
Colonial Americaball;-;My only, favorite addicting Free Online game on STEAM!!
Rascus;-;This game is no question, my favourite game of all time, in the universe. And it's easily, the best Team Based shooter, ever to be created. Will you enjoy it? Don't let me be the judge of that, this game is 100% FREE. Go ahead, download it and try it out for yourself! Hate this game because the graphics are "unrealistic"? To me, that's why its so lovable, and contributes to why its survived for so long. Micro-transactions from the Mann Co. Store aren't necessary, and items like Hats, Australuims, Unusuals etc- aren't needed to be good at TF2. I'm not to dis trading however, it's something you can use to your advantage and profit hundreds, if not thousands of dollars, I certainly have! And you can utilize the Steam Community Market to get Funds when you need 'em.
Matt;-;Perhaps my favorite game, the large community and great moddability make this a great game in my opinion. With both official and community servers (often running custom maps and plugins), you can spend your time blowing things up as a Demoman, or just run around a trade map showing off your cosmetics. Either way, it's an interesting game, and there's nothing quite like it.
TarTar :3;-;I love this game . It's like having a baby , you really love it at first , like a lot , then you forgot it for about 1 year and after that you still find it and you love him again . ;)
what shut up ok;-;Fun, non-serious game. The right move for a cool dude.
The Mumbling Masochist;-;The virtual hats in my inventory gives me flashbacks to the days where my wallet was full and I had multiple wives. The sacrifice was worth it.
biO;-;it's ok
Zephroskash;-;Team Fortress 2 is an amazing, if not, best, teamwork-oriented FPS. I highly recommend this game to anyone who loves either team work, first-person shooters, or having a good laugh.
The Fancy Assassin;-;this is a great game but it takes foreever to load
Banka tank;-;just killed someone with a ham shank
B-STAR;-;You get what you paid for. I paid nothing.
jle;-;A violent game, but cartoony at the same time TF2 is one of the best games I have ever played. It is simple, but can get complex as you play more and more. This is easy on your computer so almost any computer can run it. (Even mine) Easy to jump into, but still able to dedicate time and money to. Has cheesy aspects but the core can get as serious as you want without being COD.
ExHiiLeZz;-;So the infamous Team Fortress 2! The game has been around for a long time, 8 years to be exact and was first brought out on Xbox 360 as a bundle (the orange box), still to this day the game has a large community keeping the game alive. This game is a huge benefactor in the trading community and is constantly having various updates to the game for new items and refreshes to keep the game going. As most of you already know, Team Fortress 2 is a multiplayer FPS with an objective to defeat the opposing side (been Blu or Red depending on what side you are on) throughout various types of game modes. The class system consists of 9 characters to pick from: 1.) Scout, a fast agile character primarilly played to get into the enemy base and capture/steal the intellegence. 2.) Soldier, a slow but strong character weilding a rocket launcher, he is played to be offensive and support the team by killing everyone basically. 3.) Pyro, played to be offensive and "spy check" so the spy does not get into your back line and take out your team and sentries etc. 4.) Demoman, a slow character played to support your team by getting into the back line and drop bombs everywhere and destroy their defences and keep the enemies in their spawn. 5.) Heavy, the heavy is a very slow charcter but to make up for this he weilds a minigun and has a tonne of heath, you guessed it, he just sits there as a tank and kills and defends as he pleases. 6.) Engineer, the engineer is solely a defensive character who supports the team. He is very versitile, he builds sentries to defend, sets up teleporters and has a dispenser which regrenerates heath and stocks up on ammo for nearby friendlies. 7.) Medic, as the name says the medic is a support and runs around healing your team, pretty straight forward. 8.) Sniper, now the sniper sits back and defends with his rifle, this character can take out anyone with a single shot, making him a valuable asset to any team. 9.) Spy, the spy supports the team greatly by getting into the back line and to take out the engineers gear, doing so allows the scout to get in the base and capture the points and grab the intellegence. doing so will win the game. All of these characters fit together and each of them play their own role towards winning the game. So now we have that out of the way, i would say this is a great game, especially because it's completely free and things you buy from the store or market have no actual affect in game and are purely visual changes to the game which makes it a completely even game so no "Pay 2 Win". I would definitely reccomend this to anyone who enjoys FPS titles. 10/10 The games free, so what do you have to lose? :)
Cloudburst;-;team fortress 2 is awesome. and here is my five reasons why! 1: Its free! 2: there are nine diffrent caracters ! 3: you can get free guns and tools and headgear and more! 4: you can borrow things that cost in a few days! 5: there are many diffrent gamemodes to play! ohh and u can buy stuff!
PRISM;-;best game ever played fun for everyone who plays it im a trader myself and i love it
Snazzy Gator;-;Walked up to the entirety of BLU Team Started conga lining They joined my conga line We conga'd off a cliff and our bodies flew away The rest of RED team jumped off to join us Did it again three days later Quality - 10/10 Comedy - 10/10 Entertainment - 10/10 In-Game Content - 10/10 Fun - 10/10 Fair Pricing - 9000/10 [ Free games are flippin amazing ] MERASMUS - 10/10 F2p's + Phlog Pyros + W+M1 Pyros - DEAR GOD NO
Cat Cookie ();-;very fun and addictive,many gamemodes to play,coop is very good and fun if you have some friends to play but keys have gone to poop tho
[V!P] halofreak61;-;10/10 would conga again "10 out of 10, now when do i get paid again?"-IGN
Sir Bungleston III;-;Just getting started but very (x73) good game! Already starting to ruin my life.
Squishy;-;This game Has made me use over 200 dollars. ...10/10 though
Tough Puffin;-;We all know what TF2 is all about - hats, skills and FUN!
o Butts;-;of corse i recomend this game this game has the best .... ok i dont know but dont trade anything cause there are sharks and scammers out there who want your hats
Falcon;-;Best hat simulator I've ever played, never wasted more money trying to get a virtual hat with extra particles out of a virtual wooden box. It's actually really fun, but a warning for all new players, don't waste your time unboxing. Trade4life
King Karl X;-;They Always Have More Time To make it Better :D
MR.Pootis man conga BRONY;-;this game is awsome I have literly played this game for more then 1000 hours and I am still not board of it I fell like I could pla this for 9000 hours and wodent be bord of it :-) XD (-: its awsome get it
NOPE Mster;-;Probably one of the best games games Valve has created.
NamelessJester [TC];-;Spent nearly all my time trading virtual items for other virtual items to get the best virtual hat so I can show off and brag about howq much time I wasted getting it. Gaben did well 10/10
PLiXaTR0N;-;Very fun game. Very nice hats. Very nice. VARY VARY NICE. Besides it friggin free.
Psycho_Tux # IED FITR;-;I LIKE IT SO MUCH.!!!
LAUGHING SOLDIER;-;Heres what TF2 has that basic shooters don't have: 1. 9 different classes 2. weapons that actually DO something 3. lots of game modes and finaly HATS (did you know this game has over 200 hats with over 362 misc. items?) which makes this game a... HAT simulator. srsly.
Vikkemon;-;Play if you like some hats
Green Hoodie Gamez;-;yes I recomend this because its just a really fun game. and if you believe me you wouldn't be reading this comment/ review and be playin it cuz its just plain AWESOME. :D NOW GO PLAY WHOEVER IS READING THIS! GO PLAY!
Is Dozey 6: The Asasudozer;-;i was offered a hat with bread on it for a shovel bread/10 would bread again
Party Chicken;-;This is Valve. Give us your money. Give us your money. Give us your money so donate your money today. Donating is as easy as giving us your money. Sometimes your company will give us their money when you give us your money. So give us your money today. Your money will go towards keeping this company running, so we can ask for your money again at a later time. After you give us your money why don't you check out our kickstarter to invest in better ways to have you give us your money. Thank you again for giving your money to Valve.
Rusty;-;Hours of fun
Ninja Turtles (1987);-;Best hat simulator of the year. I like when the scout beats up the big fat baldy heavy guy.
Cute like Breeze >3<;-;Really good! I love it! Trading is awesome and awesome maps and stuff!
DarkKawaiiAzazel;-;It's an awesome game
foxtrotcharlie;-;awesome game soo adictive just get it....it's free!
gofawful;-;This game is probably one of the best FPS games I have ever played. It includes 9 different classes with their own personality. Like the Scout, he likes baseball and can strangely double jump. He's incredibly fast, which makes him a good add-on to the Offensive classes. Team Fortress 2 is Free To Play now, so everyone (including Gibus wearers) can enjoy the fun... probably. I'm not that "ermg it haz goats 10/10" guy. Overall, my rating is 9.8/10.
Three Dog;-;Don't play this game unless you have a lot of money to burn.
CyborgParrot;-;This is like a Disney/Dreamworks Movie directed by Quentin Tarantino (if there ever was one). 10/10 Hats
Totes MaGoats ();-;Really good it is practically a time killer. when you are bored you can play it
Santo98;-;Like a WB cartoon. Except you get to shoot them in the head.
Pepe da froggy;-;I love this game...
Madcows;-;A haiku: This game contains hats They took over my damn life 7/10
HaxHaxHax;-;Fashion Fortress 2 is one of the best game for anyone who loves barbies and killing people!
Sabo de Coco;-;Just...Awesome...
Jcee;-;Great game. Do reccomend. Okay. Is enough. Review done now. Buy. Bye.
SnigSnogWigWog;-;<------- This  loved the game and you can too! 100/10
|TPF|TheSovietToaster;-;awsome game 100/100
M(   );-;Team Fortress 2 is multiplayer game where u can play with ur friends and fun with them in multiple modes of this game.But sadly hackers come here with diffirent hacks (Aimbot, Wallhack...) and spammers making u think u can get something by giving them ur items(example: get a golden pan for ur hole items). I dont recomande this game for people under 14 years old, and hopefully Steam will find a way to stop hackers from making this game ur wors nightmare.
Private_Pepperoni:);-;This Games FREAKING AWESOME I LOVE IT SOOO MUCH
PPY;-;It's time to trade hats, and trade hats, and i'm all outta to trade hats.
^^ HaythemKenway;-;This game is a must download!! Exellent charchters and emotions of each charachters. I just wish I could.ve bought this game when it was still being paid.
Emerald Assassin;-;This 3D animated shooter is the perfect game for all Valve fans! A complete 10/10, but you have to make sure not to be tempted by the "hats". The "hats" are the way to show victory and coolness in TF2, but some hats require purchasing them with real life money and are not aquireable in any other way. The classes are amazing and one of my favorites being Spy, you can unlock certain items by playing the game or earning achievements without paying money. This aspect of the game brings the fun of showing off your items without paying the five dollars for an awesome hat! Honestly not the best game I've played, but possibly the second or third. The classes are fun in many different ways. - The scout has super speed and can really mess up the other team. - The soldier has a rocket jump which can be used to camp and fire. - The pyro gets an airblast that can deflect most things. Rocket? AIRBLAST!!! - The demoman can spam grenades at you and sticky bomb the entire base if he wants. - The heavy has loads of ammo and good strength, but bad speed and bad aim unless up close. - The engineer can place sentries, dispensers, and teleporters to protect areas. - The medic has a very rapid gun as well as a Medigun which heals other players (best with the heavy). - The sniper can be horrible up close, but he can make headshots and instakill players with his sniper rifle. - The spy can disguise as the other team and even take down the engineer's buildings. Even if the game costed money, it would still be worth it. Once again, a full 10/10.
Queer;-;if you get one game this generation, make sure it's this one. 10/10
BrightLamp;-;Great Game
The Glowworm [];-;Loved this game, very good potential. I also like the comedy and humor in this FPS.
StagMan;-;Awesome game. Very fun and addicting.
BombShell;-;You can explode people pretty good.
Menin Gate;-;great game, picked it up for free as well 10/10
ToastaDa;-;Probably the best game ever, I have met so many people here and said so many weird stuff on this game that I can't even imagine my self before playing tf2 O-O
Pugs;-;I have wasted to much of my life on this game
Dedly;-;AWESOME THIS GAME IS SUPAH
luigifan207;-;This game is entertaining, you will always find new things to do in this game. For every map there are different game modes, for the different game modes there are different ways to play. for all the different ways to play there are different classes. with all the different classes there are tons of weapon combonations and there is always one loadout you didnt use yet :D
{R} Diego The Canadian;-;Its really fun.
Nickervision;-;Easily the greatest multiplayer team shooter ever made and it only gets better and better with time.
Sorry, I'm on crack;-;Great game, crazy addicting
Videoboy;-;A great fps game lots of classes cool hat and miss all of the classes have their own personalize its a great game if you like fps games and looking for fun and also hats AND bread AND!!! pootis
Sonic | TWD Kenny;-;Ah, Team Fortress 2. Let's get down to the basics- TF2 is a class-based first person shooter made by a very successful company named Valve. Valve is the creators behind famous titles such as Left 4 Dead, Counter Strike, and Half-Life. TF2 started as a mod for Quake and slowly evolved. Over a 7 year editing period, TF2 was finally created and it was a HIT. To put this in retrospective, here is an example; Team Fortress 2 launched in 2007 and now it's 2014. This game just simply WON'T DIE! TF2 has 9 classes that are unique in their own way- each class having it's weaknesses and strong points, making every class equal and not over powered. These classes include, Scout - The nimble, fast-running, caffinated,  that can dominate the game (if the player is a good scout player), or can be taken out very easily. Soldier - One of the few classes that newbie players tend to pick first; Soldier uses a rocket launcher to take down his foes and gib them. Soldier has 200 HP and can be taken out with a few hits from the Scout's scattergun, but if played right, the Soldier can also dominate the team. Pyro, this unknown...thing... uses a flame-thrower to burn his enimies to a crisp and can be taken out, but normally it's taken out from a long distance. Pyro is great for close combat (same with the scout) and while he/she's not a class for newbie players, he/she can take out enimies within seconds. Demoman - A bomb-weilding drunk, that uses projectiles (bombs/stickies) to trap foes and/or stratigically place them to gib enemies. Demoman is NOT recommended for newbie players, AT ALL, but mostly because his tactics are very hard to get a good grasp of and he can take a LONG time to get used to and master. Heavy - The posterboy of TF2; the giant Russian man with a minigun. This big dude is (can be) one of the biggest threats in TF2 (as far as classes go) and can take down ANY of the 9 classes WITH EASE. By no means is the heavy overpowered, but he can definately get quite a few kills in. Heavy is also another newbie favourite and he's recommended for newbie players because of his very easy tactics and gameplay style. Engineer - The Texan wearing the hard-hat. Engineer (also referred as "Engie" or "Engy" *EHN-GEE*) uses Sentry guns, dispencers, and teleporters to fight in the battle. Engineer is also equipped with a shotgun, pistol, and a wrench. Engineer definately takes time to learn, master, and use, mostly because the player needs patience (building sentry guns take awhile to level up from 1 to level 3) and the player also needs to know when and how to use his/her sentry gun. Engie definately isn't a newbie-friendly class and will take some time to learn. Medic - The German medic that heals his dear comerades in the fight for victory. Medic is self-explanitory; he heals teammates in battle, but has different tactics of playing. The TF2 community has come up with a name for one of them,"Battle Medic," and this is used when a player uses Medic to fight using his needle gun (or his crossbow that is unlockable/craftable/buyable at any given time) rather than using his medi-gun to heal his teammates. Medic is an overall respected class and although he may seem a little complicated, he is a little newbie-friendly mostly because his point in the game is very easy to understand and he is overall an easy class to use. Sniper - The Australian sniper that isn't MLG :o The sniper (also referred after his name, "Mundy") is NOTHING like any other sniper you've ever played as. If you're a CoD player, transferring over into TF2, you'll be starting a new leaf because his gameplay is absolutely NOTHING like CoD or any modern shooter. First of all, there is no such thing as "quickscoping" or "360 headshot noscope" (unless you consider a hip fire to be a "noscope"). The sniper's gun doesn't give out an amazing amount of damage right as you scoper in, you need to wait a little while (there is a charge meter) until the sniper will do it's fullest amount of damage. Sniper's aim for the heads of their enemies and even if it's not a fully charged shot, the headshot will normally do 75-100 damage to any given foe. Sniper is almost ALWAYS picked by newbie players (especially CoD people transferring to TF2) mostly because his tactics and gameplay is amazingly easy and insanely simple to understand. Last class, Spy - Le Spy, the French guy who stole your mother,  your mother, and is right behind you. The Spy is adored by almost everyone. Being notorious for his backstab (If you backstab someone using your knife, it's an instant kill, dealing over 1300+ damage to any given foe), the spy can be a very sneaky class to choose and he can mean the life or the death of your team. If you know how to use the spy, you're more than likely to save your entire team, he's THAT powerful. On the other hand, if you're a newbie and you have no idea how to use the spy, your team will most likely fail because of a couple of reasons. Spies are generally targeted by most classes such as Heavy, Sniper, and Pyro, which means that if you're caught by the enemy team or you are revealed to the enemy team, you will be put on high alert and you will most likely find "Spy Checkers" (Spy Checkers are normally pyros who try to set their team mates on fire. If you're a Pyro on the Blue team and you use your flame thrower on a REAL team mate, the fire will not affect them and they will be fine, but if they use their flame thrower on a Red spy that is diguised as their team mate, they will burst in flames and you will be revealed.) checking their teammates. Spy is also a very hard class to master, which is why he's not recommended to newbie players. That's the general description of all the 9 classes you can choose from in TF2. Overall, TF2 is a GREAT, balanced, fun, and absolutely amazing multiplayer first person shooter that will never fail to impress. You will ALWAYS find someone playing the game, NO DOUBT ABOUT IT, and there are countless servers that are ran daily, ranging from Pub servers/Valve servers to custom made map servers. There are MANY ways to enjoy TF2 and you will certanly never feel bored because there is almost always something new to enjoy in TF2. TF2 has been an amazing game that has developed into something completely bigger than Valve had probably imagined. Thanks for reading my 10 hour long essay and novel, written by Sonic the Hedgehog | TWD Kenny. 10/10
sh1t;-;Even though most of the game's community cosists of little children (personal experience), the game is fun. If you are looking for a fast-paced team-based FPS action, this IS the game for you. 8/10
like 20 NGT_muffin_guy;-;very fun and addictive
MrPootisMann;-;You can put the Heavy in a tutu.
aimbot.exe;-;10/10. Best place to make 10 year olds legally cry and scream on the mic. Also a great place to play P0rn videos at full volume on a crowded server.
Flvcko;-;This is probably the greatest free roam fps game other than battlefield f2play...
StormLight;-;As we all know Team Fortress 2 does not require any special review. Great game, but i am unable to play due to my  internet
Chee$y Chic;-;This game is the bomb and i think everyone and i mean everyone should play it its fun and there r so many things to explore!!!
SuperK64;-;This game is extremely fun. Many different game modes (including custom game modes by the TF2 community) and maps (tons of community made maps). Nine fun unique classes to chose from which all take an important role in the battle. You may find some classes or aspects of classes hard to grasp but with practise you will be successful. There tons of unique weapons to get but many of them are useless and pointless (some of these bad weapons have been changed for the better but bad weapons are still present). There are hundreds of cosmetic items in this game but you don't need to appreciate them to enjoy this game. This game is free so try it out, you won't waste any money if you don't enjoy it. Also, random crits suck.
ZombiekillerCZ;-;Very nice game.
Chicken Fried Valentino;-;Killed a man with a Lolli-Pop 10/10 would pay for.
Vini;-;A game of the Gods. Bless you, Gaben!
Tulip Victim;-;Best Free-2-Play game ever made.
Mr.Shrike FALLOUT 4 U WOT ?;-;SWEET GAME :p
Thnikkaman;-;Team Fortress 2 (TF2) is such a great game i was shocked when i played it because when i saw trailers i thought oh its just another first person shooter but it was more than that. It is so fun and addicting that sometimes i leave myself trapped in the game, Yet some classes are kinda boring and yet useless its fun to switch around with classes so thumbs up for that! Thanks Valve for making such a great game, and keep up the good work oh and by the way another game selection HALF LIFE 3 I REPEAT HALF LIFE 3
JehutyFoo;-;A game where its hilarous game. comunity trading where you get hats,stranges and of course SANDVICHES. a game where its f2p and game for people who like shooters and there is 9 amazing classes.
Julie Sigtuna;-;For being played Free It's such an amazing game Play it now for fun!!! -Haiku
ryce;-;Do you like spending over 100 dollars on a virtual ring you can't even wear? Or 10,000 dollars on a stupid hat with a newspaper in it that was lit on fire? Or 3,500 dollars on a dead person inside of a coffin that you used to get out of a small, 4x4 compact crate that comes with a skull from Five Nights at Freddy's following you around? Or 2,000 dollars for a haircut that makes you look like a crazy, sadistic punk rocker that recently came from Chernobyl? Or 5,500 dollars for the fire hazard named the Sorting Hat from Harry Potter with a demonic face that got lit on fire? Or 928 dollars for a gigantic, burning fish that does nothing but leech off of your brain tissue while you mindlessly slaughter others? Or 200 dollars for a satanic Christmas tree that you can wear? Or maybe even the grandest deal of them all, a Frying Pan or a Wrench painted in pure gold in exchange for your house, your car, and your virginity? This is for you! I still reccomend buying spinach with the money instead.
qwaranou;-;This is best game of war with red and blue team.
SCP-That_SpyStaples!;-;I have played over 450+ hours of TF2. I have had so much fun, My friends are awesome. There will be the noobs that want to ask for stranges then pay in reg weps. The scammers, but no hackers. I think if you have not downloaded this, you should do i right now.
Aimin For Ya Face!;-;TF2, the game with the most evolved but screwed up econemy ever :D You can't imagine how rich you can get in this game :-) Its fun to play, trade and profit with lel i rate it a 9/10
Blue;-;Great game. Just try it!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
CroToons;-;1 word to describe this game, awesomeness.
Abu Bakr al-Baghdadi;-;It is a very good game with lots of good things that are good, but the servers are not good why are they not good, i'll tell you why. They are not good because the people are mean to me so that is not good but what is good is the random drops that is good i got a gun which is very good because it is one shot kill that is good. what is bad the op weapons that people use it isnt very good, but what is good is that the characters are funny so that is good becuase it makes me laugh with kek thanks for reading my good review tell me how good it is by messaging on my good steam page bye - Good Gamer1
Bob Dickinson;-;10/10 would bang
Jackhitman;-;I don't know why i never wrote a recommendation for TF2 before, but better late than never, right? Anyhow, long story short, play this. Simple as that. I mean, first off, it's F2P. And paying players don't get an advantage on free players either! Plus, it's ridiculously fun! To hell with "pretend-to-be-realistic" modern shooters. TF2 is probably the most fun you can have online when it comes to gaming. A easy to pick-up-and-play, very hard to master, free game. What else could you wish for? MORE hats?
ADrunkenDwarf;-;It's good.
Sham_;-;it's alright
markpokemon;-;Team Fortress 2 is a great and easy to play FPS game with a lot of acheivments,weapons and hats to unlock. Great game to play with friends or by yourself.. If you feel like making some buisnes with other players you can even trade items with them! This game is not like any other FPS game and is a little hard to play at first,but it gets easier to play after you find the perfect class for you.
Pint-sized Done;-;Since my Xbox Live membership expired, I suddenly had an influx of time but a friend told me that Team Fortress 2 was now free and could run on Mac, I decided to give a try. In my first game, Attack/Defense on DeGroot Keep I was just struck by this rainbow of fun in this game. The community is great and players who know what they're doing are great and get out a good number of laughs. Overall, great game.
Henrietta;-;Great game! 10/10 would !
Greedy Snipes XXX Kush;-;1100+ hours... YEAH GET IT BUY PRENIUM GET AN UNUSAUL YOUR SET MOTHER F#%@ER
Daring Do;-;Normally, I hate FPS'. I prefer to have my characters in front of me instead of looking through their eyes. However, this game is a BIG exception to the rule. I have a genuine blast when I play the game. It's silly and goofy, and the combat system's cool too! I definitely recommend this game. :)
DJStankdaddy;-;It needs pugs
Mitty;-;Hat Tycoon 2 is the multi award winning hat trading simulator from Valve. You are Saxton Hale a successful hat salesman and professional Australian. One fateful day your best friend Bill has his hat stolen and held for ransom by evil hat terrorists. It is your job as the world's greatest hat salesman to raise the ransom and get Bill's hat back. The bulk of the game takes place in Trade Plaza where you attempt to sell your wares to various NPCs. Make sure to set the right price though as if you attempt to sell too high Saxton will be declared a Jew and the NPCs will be less likely to buy from you. Also watch out for the mysterious Demopan who occasionally shows up to steal your items. There is also a shooting minigame but you should only really play that to get new items to sell.
sphere friend yellow;-;if you play cod go away because this game is 2 cool 4 u
Wookiee;-;This is an amazing game that once you play it for a while gets VERY addicting and if you get a little advanced and get good at it gets even MORE fun to play, all in all this is my favorite game and you should totally get it if you are reading this because its free FOREVER and you don't play for a bit and have to pay-to-play because its free-to-play and not some crappy boring game that you beat in 5 minutes because you CANT beat Team fortress 2! And that's the awesome thing about it!
StAy_FrsTy;-;A great game and one of the best gaming communitys out there.
Ayn Sof;-;Good friends, nubs for easy kills, hats hats hats hats and more hats
DennyS;-;Hat simulator provides you with all your hat needs. Also there is an FPS game mode but I did not bother to check it out.
Ambru .;-;THIS IS THE MOST ADDACTIVE GAME EVAH
Puddles;-;I have played Team Fortress 2 since the day it was released (Oct. 10 2007). It's changed a lot since then, but I still consider it the best multiplayer FPS ever made. I have about 460 hours in this game at the time of this writing, and I still laugh my  off every time I play. By reading this, I'm going to assume you're thinking about trying it for the first time, so here's some things all newbies should know: - Some classes are much more difficult learn than others. I'd start your first games playing as Medic, Soldier, Heavy, and/or Pyro. Until you get a decent grasp of things, stay away from Engineer and especially Spy. - Don't worry about the custom weapons that many other players will have. Although some are good, the base weapons are still often the best choice for every weapon of every class. As long as you don't take the game too seriously, it's impossible to not have fun playing it.
bye for now;-;Honestly, I cannot find any avid gamer that is on steam and does not play Team Fortress 2. It's almost sacriligious to even have steam installed without also having TF2, as it's called by the players, on at least one computer capable of running it well, and boy is that not surprising. This game literally eats up time like no other (except maybe Dota 2 for some, or call of duty for others), and to be honest, the community is just as great. I can easily find a server where nobody gives a crap about killing as many other players as possible, or I can join one with an internationally recognised player for their prowess or two. The amount of hats too! it's all mind boggling that there are still gamers out there that haven't found TF2 enjoyable or have not even heard of it in general. What else to talk about...oh, the support. Obviously, due to its enourmous fanbase and it's publisher being the great and powerful Gaben (Steam creater and CEO(?)), it will almost always be there, as even Half-Life 2: Deathmatch is still supported and given server-space on top of all the newer games. Anyways, I highly recommend this game, and the game in summary would have to be: Hat Simulator 2014 :3 Happy Hat hunting my friends! I hope to see you in-game.
StephenTheHero;-;Team Fortress 2 is without a doubt the best FPS game I have ever played and probably the best one I will ever play! And that comes from someone who generally dislikes shooters. The cartoony characters, the unique playstyles for all the classes, the unlockable weapons (and hats), and the different types of matches will keep you playing this game for tens to hundreds of hours. Best part: It's completely free!
LoneCodeR;-;Guide for playing as a member of Red Team: Shoot everything that moves and everything that is blue! Guide for playing as a member of Blue Team: Shoot everything that moves and everything that is red!
Glyph;-;gud game, but I ing hate the f2p little kids
The Flying Bear Cavalry;-;This game is truly one of the funniest and funnest games I've ever played! I highly recommend this game for anyone looking to dominate a server in bloody glory or to casually turn demomen into hamburger. No matter your skill level, TF2 is for you.
Liam;-;this...THIS was the original reason I got steam
Tincanpi;-;It's free and solid, what more do you want?
tgrabed;-;THIS IS A GOOD GAME CUZ U SHOOT STUFF AND UBERCHARGE AND BE INVINCEBLE THEN SHOOT MORE STUFF AND YOU SET PEOPLE ON FIRE AND HAVE A ROCKET LAUNCHER AND ROCKET JUMP AND BLOW STUFF UP AND U STICK STICKY BOMBS YOU OPEN CRATES AND GET GUNS U MAKE BIG AUTO MACHINE GUNS AND ...Yeah thats it realy.
MaskDeMasque;-;Come spend ALL of your money on virtual hats you'll never own in real life! :D
CanInACanCan;-;I am amazed that this game is free!! so much stuff to do! get it!
#imissherevenmore;-;This is one of my favorite games! Nice gameplay, hats, wespons, misc and stuff like that! And you can play it without premium account! ~10/10
Ambassador Pineapple;-;LOVE IT SO MUCH!
[Tolli] Dispenser;-;Very fun game love it! very time consuming ;)
Willception;-;This game overall has changed my life. With nearly 1000 hours spent on it you will see were im coming from. This game is a bit like COD, in the FPS side of it (My view) but it offers something compleatly amazing. A community around hats! I have never known a other game that attracted people who likes cosmetics. And we also cant forget the weapons and there uniquability, and their comical factors. Why should you even consider getting this game: ? In my opinion, if you where wanting too ruin your life, and never have a social life this game is for you.
Shepard;-;Hats, Bread, conga, and a sandvich
InfernoBirdKRPT;-;Just Because I barely have any hours on record doesn't mean I don't know the game. This game when I play it's so fun, Not good at it, sharpen your skills on the bots. This Game deserves the 11/10 to me.
the only DDOGE;-;it is so adickding
Cat Warriors SSS;-;this is a fun first person shooter and multiplayer game where you can test ur skill and find new weps and hats to try new stuff out
CrazyConga illuminati;-;First games that says hats are more important than anything.
gibe de pusi b0ss;-;Ok.if your reading this dont. If you wanna know about tf2 and wanna hear all its glory,dont even Read the reviews. DOWNLOAD THIS INCREDIBLY AWESOME AND FREE GAME IT MADE ME WET,IT WILL DO THE SAME FOR YOU! -Bill Cosby Santa 2014
Happy Hippooos;-;Great Game 10/10
Pimp Fernando;-;WHY CAN'T I HOLD ALL THIS HATS?
Marcia Brady;-;This game is fun and exciting to play!
hi im FiN | trade.tf;-;I played this. It's good. I'm Helpful!
Dragonfeet;-;I really like everything in TF2, (hats, weps, random drops, etc). My three favorite classes, are, Pyro, Demo, and, medic. Run in with Pyro and try to fry as many as possiable, hope that theres no medics so that your run wouldn't be ruined, Demo, I had one awesome round with Demo, my team was really close to getting the last cap point, and then i used the "Charge N Targe", and ran on the point and won for us, and i noticed when, i turned around, everyone was coming in. Medic, first class i ever played in TF2, i like how Medic is a simple class, just go heal, maybe heal yourself a bit, but not too much, because you want your teammates to live for a bit longer, and, thats all you gotta do, nothing more...
YAMATO;-;Very awesome game and nice graphic
Nelle;-;This is awesome
ThatAustralianGamer;-;Pretty good
SgCloudwolf;-;great game lots of fun and hilarious moments on the screen. over all i hope to be seeing more of this game in the future.
Schadenfreude;-;A very fun mixed class shooter. Skills are required and earned as you go on. With a unique item unlocking system, the defaults will never get old. Highly recommended
Pizza delivery;-;Best game Ive ever played, but valv is turning it into a conga/hat simulation with guns with these updates... I love it!
T.K;-;Good and Fun game~ It's all about Hats in here~
Rev| Mage;-;I played this game a lot, it's fun. The only issue with it is that (since I main spy) when I try to go for a backstab, I hear a critical hit soun indicator and either the damage doesn register or the backstab doesnt register. It get's really annoying. Overall great game though
moito;-;THE BEST F2P GAME I'VE EVER PLAYED!
Alpha;-;It has hats.
TheTriggerHappyFurret;-;This game... THIS GAME... Has done me lots of favors. I don't go outside, I'm not in honor's classess anymore, and I have no life... And got some hats out of this.
Chicken Fried Valentino;-;Killed a man with a Lolli-Pop 10/10 would pay for.
Vini;-;A game of the Gods. Bless you, Gaben!
Tulip Victim;-;Best Free-2-Play game ever made.
Mr.Shrike FALLOUT 4 U WOT ?;-;SWEET GAME :p
Thnikkaman;-;Team Fortress 2 (TF2) is such a great game i was shocked when i played it because when i saw trailers i thought oh its just another first person shooter but it was more than that. It is so fun and addicting that sometimes i leave myself trapped in the game, Yet some classes are kinda boring and yet useless its fun to switch around with classes so thumbs up for that! Thanks Valve for making such a great game, and keep up the good work oh and by the way another game selection HALF LIFE 3 I REPEAT HALF LIFE 3
JehutyFoo;-;A game where its hilarous game. comunity trading where you get hats,stranges and of course SANDVICHES. a game where its f2p and game for people who like shooters and there is 9 amazing classes.
Julie Sigtuna;-;For being played Free It's such an amazing game Play it now for fun!!! -Haiku
ryce;-;Do you like spending over 100 dollars on a virtual ring you can't even wear? Or 10,000 dollars on a stupid hat with a newspaper in it that was lit on fire? Or 3,500 dollars on a dead person inside of a coffin that you used to get out of a small, 4x4 compact crate that comes with a skull from Five Nights at Freddy's following you around? Or 2,000 dollars for a haircut that makes you look like a crazy, sadistic punk rocker that recently came from Chernobyl? Or 5,500 dollars for the fire hazard named the Sorting Hat from Harry Potter with a demonic face that got lit on fire? Or 928 dollars for a gigantic, burning fish that does nothing but leech off of your brain tissue while you mindlessly slaughter others? Or 200 dollars for a satanic Christmas tree that you can wear? Or maybe even the grandest deal of them all, a Frying Pan or a Wrench painted in pure gold in exchange for your house, your car, and your virginity? This is for you! I still reccomend buying spinach with the money instead.
Spirit dragon;-;Its a good game I recommend this game as a first person shooter and it really fun and addicting and the amount of things they add to the game is amazing and im speechless this is a very fun game.
Lucas, King of Tears;-;The best FPS on the market. If you think anything is superior, you're lying to everyone. Including yourself.
Cut-Throat Clinton;-;Gabe Newell is a fascist pig
splet;-;Play it now or die.
Army Stuff;-;this great game just keeps getting better
Atticus Candi;-;Great game to become rich!
Powerpoint;-;u like to shoot people? play dis game
J T 22;-;Love This Game The Best GET IT 100% BETTER THAN DOTA AND ANY OTHER GAME
8^Sir-Rektalot^8;-;This game has inspired me to play more and my freinds enjoy this game because of the classes and their special abilitys. eg. engineer has the sentry and the demoman has the chagin, charge and the medic with his ubercharge. If you are reding this thank you and please enjoy the game!!! Bye!!!! P.S my friend and cousin said that you guys should add DLC`s if thats okay thanks!!! BIUNE,sonxXx
Tsu;-;Probably one of the best online multiplayer shooters to exist. Team Fortress 2 provides a lot of fun with different classes, customizable loadouts, and of course.. hats. The player can choose from 9 different classes, each with different advantages and tactics. The nine classes are divided into three categories: Offense, Defense and Support. Offensive classes would be; The Scout: A faster class that uses a scattergun, a secondary pistol and a bat for melee. This class has less health but can easily avoid enemy fire, and capture enemy control points twice as fast as any other class. The Soldier: A slower offensive class that carries a rocket launcher, a shotgun and a shovel. Soldiers can be used to take care of buildings like sentry guns and teleporters, made by the Engineer. Or, if you're skilled enough, you could "Rocket Jump" by simply pointing the rocket launcher down at the ground below you, before jumping and shooting. The rocket will explode on impact of the ground, launching you high above the ground and give you the ability to quickly fly into enemy grounds. The Pyro: Pretty self-explainatory, the Pyro uses a flamethrower to set enemies... well... on fire, giving additional damage even if the enemy flees. (Unless said enemy flees into water) Other weapons include another shotgun, and a fire axe. Pyros can also shoot strong air out of the flamethrowers muzzle, which gives it the ability to "air blast" rockets back at enemy Soldiers, or grenades back at an enemy Demoman. For the Defense category, we have; The Demoman: A class known to maining on explosives, and to drink. The Demoman wields a grenade launcher, a "stickybomb" launcher and a glass bottle. "Stickybombs" are pretty self explainatory; Bombs that can stick to any surface. These bombs can be used strategically to blow up the enemy when they least expect it. (For example, planting the stickybombs on a control point.) Stickybombs can also be used to launch the Demoman high in the air, similar to "Rocket Jumping". The Heavy: A slow but effectively defensive class who wields a minigun as a primary weapon, shotgun for secondary and uses his own bare fists for melee. Heavys can easily defeat any enemy in close quarters, but skilled players can easily turn the tables. If paired with a Medic, the Heavy could be difficult to take care of. Having a Medic paired with a Heavy can make for a very effective defense, as long as the Medic stays safe. The Engineer: A class that's not as focused on charging into battle, but more on staying back and building different machines to help the team succeed. The machines vary from sentry guns, health and ammo dispensers, and teleporters. The Engineer also has the ability to upgrade any building using "metal", a secondary ammunition that Engineers collect from parts of destroyed buildings, and dropped weapons from defeated enemies and allies alike. And for the Support category, there is; The Medic: Medics have the ability to heal injured allies using a "medi gun". Of course, Medics are also armed with a syringe gun and a bonesaw, for close combat. As the Medic heals an ally, he builds up an "UberCharge" which, when fully charged, can shield the Medic and any ally he's currently healing from any enemy fire for a limited time. Medics can be very effective when paired with the defensive Heavy, so as long as the Medic stays away from enemy fire and keeps safe. The Medic also has the ability to heal over time, but only by a small amount per second. The Sniper: Self-explainatory, the Sniper can be used to hide back unseen and snipe incoming enemies with the Sniper Rifle. This class is also equipped with an SMG, and a kukri knife for close encounters with the enemy. When you stay zoomed in on the scope, a small meter is filled on the side of the screen, leading to a lightning bolt. When this meter is filled, the rifle can fire a "charged" shot that can take most classes out, even if its not a headshot. And the Spy: A unique class that can be used to disguise as an enemy class using a Disguise Kit. The Spy can sneak over to enemy territory and use his Knife to backstab an enemy, instantly killing them no matter how much health they have. Spies are also wielding a Revolver and a "Sapper". Sappers can be used to disable and destroy buildings from the Engineer class. Spies can then sneak behind an Engineer focused on the sapper, and backstab them. But attacking while disguised risks being caught, as a Spy's disguise instantly goes away when attacking. Spies can also cloak to appear invisible, using their watch. But such power is limited, and goes away if used for too long, forcing the Spy to stay visible until its fully charged. Spies cannot attack while invisible, nor can they capture control points cloaked or disguised. Team Fortress 2 also features a completely customizable set of loadouts for your classes. You may recieve different weapons for different strategies, such as giving the Demoman the ability to charge and bash into enemies with the Chargin' Targe. Or the player can give the Heavy to heal quickly with the popular Sandvich. Players may also recieve accessories and of course, hats. Players can also paint certain accessories any color they wish, if they ever get the right bucket. There are also "decal tools", "name tags", and "description tags". Decal tools allow the player to put custom images on certain weapons and accessories, as the Name and Description Tags allow the player to change the name and description of the item to anything they wish. Players may purchase or trade "Mann Co. Supply Crate Keys", which they can use to unlock and open "Mann Co. Supply Crates", which are randomly found in-game. Doing so will grant the player special items, like more accessories or weapons. Most common from crates are the Strange quality weapons. These special weapons can track the total amount of kills the player makes with that specific weapon. Increasing the total kills by certain amounts can "rank up" the weapon, giving it a special name for others to see. (I.E: "Truly Feared Minigun") Team Fortress 2 gives an unforgettable multiplayer experience. Its cartoony graphics, remarkable voice acting, and its unique classes and characters, makes Team Fortress 2 a must-have for gamers everywhere. And best of all, its FREE. Players can also communicate over mic, spray custom images on the wall, and chat in the server's chatbox. But its strongly recommended to NOT do so these days, given the community. (Also, as a warning to new players; Don't enter "unbindall" in the console commands. )
RussianRaccoon;-;Its a great free to play game ,but its also 20 GB got to give up space for the hats!
HappyPlayer;-;I recomend this game
Oxolot;-;medic dies at the end.
Wark;-;This FPS is not like others FPS : no SMG, no assault rifle... With 9 differents classes, Team Forteress 2 has a very various gameplay, if you do not want to play as one class, you can choose one of the 8 others classes of the game! Each class has his speciality and they are all balanced. And, to finish, this game is FREE and you can get all weapons randomly when you are playing ; so this game is not a "pay to win". That is why I recommend this game, also because i have more than 1000 hours of gaming and i still love this game :)
Lana del Reysins;-;I love TF2. It's a wonderful pastime and I would definitely reccomend it to all of my friends due to the amount of fun I have during my experiences with it.
Ecchi For The Sake Of Ecchi;-;This game has taken the most time out of my life than any other game, for some really good reasons. TF2 has some really smooth and balanced gameplay along with HATS, can't forget the HATS. Anyway, I really would suggest this game to everyone and the fact that its free is AWESOME! If I had one suggestion is that make it so supply crate keys can be found, don't make it a frequent drop but make it a drop nonetheless. Besides that they really did it right with this game! 10/10.
KawaiiKitty;-;Nice and Fun game! You wanna play this Game! Because Its all about 2 Teams Fighting against each other! Theres different Gamemodes too! PLAY THIS GAME NOW <3
KillerSpy;-;i highly recomed this gam its so fun
Elias_yo;-;MOST FUN YOU CAN EVER HAVE Elias 2014 I would say a good game best game i have ever played. I play it everyday , i got this game last year and now i still play it and its not boring i would say you should get it. Tf2 is now free to play and totally diffrent than other FPS multiplayersbetter than call of duty i say. there are so many different gamemodes in this game and my favourite is payload and like everyone says HATS!!! There are nine different classes and you must work together to complete your objective and have fun in the same time. You can play in many ways. Offence , defence you can choose what you wanna play 10/10 PLAY IT WHAT ARE YOU WAITING FOR, JOIN THE FUN FOR HATS!!!!!
Lagger (Away until 25th);-;Ruined my life. Made me addicted to PC Games. Best. Game. Ever.
DarkLord Eclipse;-;It is awsome and its free to play!
Banana-Man;-;I got this game after it became free, so I read the reviews and there was nothing but hats there, so I didn't bother. Then one day when bored I said fine i'll play and since that day I haven't seen daylight.
A Psychopathic Cow (on holiday);-;I think this is a great game, and is so fun to play with your friends and the best part is its free :D
William;-;Best hat simulator I have ever played.
MALL COP;-;Awesome hat simulator. Lots of fun...until you lag out.
Stumpy;-;You can conga and give GabeN your money... 420/10
alex_the_viking;-;this game is just amazing and fun
Ninjatov;-;Fantastic game! You better be downloading the game right now!
Delirious Duck;-;OMG i love this Game I have played this game Since 2009 I just create diffrent profiles and this game is Amazing This game is 100% cool it is creative and Fun Thx Gaben Newell I love all of Ur Games this is the best game ever It has Diffrent Gamemodes if u Havent tried it Out u should Cause this Game is cool u can find Items Sometime u can find items if u pre-own a game u can get cool things u can go to the community Market and get things And Tf2 Has Halloween Events and u can find Boxes to get cool Halloween things on Christmas u get cool stuff when u are on it There are 9 Classes There are soilder,scout,pyro Then heavy,engineer,DemoMan Then Medic,sniper,spy My favorite Class is the engineer he is Defense u can build sentrys dispensers and teleporters :) :3 !
$M1leY;-;Really fun and exciting game!
drwhut;-;Let me get this clear: THIS GAME IS AMAZING!!! As TFQW was the first one I played, that game showed me what multiplayer PC gaming was about, but when I was told about this; my life changed. Permantly. The audience that this game shows to shocked me, with its unique art style, modding community, competitive leagues, and a wide range of background story, and things to discover, like idle servers. I can truely say that this game is for everyone. Its great fun to play every once in a while, but if you get addicted, youll still have twice the fun you had a couple of months ago. This game offers so much at your disposal, including whacky items from other games, hats, and tools, you can make any kind of style you want. Final verdict? GET THIS GAME NOW IMMEDIATELY
(OPTIC) DEADGIRLSDONTSAYNO;-;The best hat simulator around.
Keerun;-;Makes me eat bread again 10/10
PR3DAT0R;-;Not the best game in the world but A 100,000,000,000,002 times beest than CoD GHOSTS (Infinity ward its clear you suck balls) but TF2 has become well hard to believe BETTER! you dont have to be a heavy trying to kill a enemy medic for half an hour anymore -_-!But be sure to give it a try you also dont need an ACE pc to play it!
ekenedilichukwu;-;Wow. Only thing i can say about it!!!!!!!!!!
Brock Obama;-;A very fun and addicting game for all ages. Easy to grasp game-modes along with a very in-depth trading community, keeps the game interesting. I played the game for around 800 hours, and there are still many things to do. I would recommend this game to both beginner and more advanced gamers.
[PcMasterRace] Svoboman;-;I reccomend this game because it is very fun and a great team based game. All my friends play this game every day and I think you should too.
MadManWilly;-;It is buy far the best hat trading simulator you can find plus it has some other unrelated stuff to pass the time.
Triko[DK];-;the game is awesome try it
Zack (computer is broken);-;Tf2 is easily the best online team based game I have ever played. I recomend this game to ALL players. It's a great game and you can have tons of fun staying up late with friends playing on this game.
Twigg;-;Join Hat Simulator Fortress 2 now! This game is filled with awesome mercenaries that will be better if you make them wear hats! Because hats are their life. 10/10. Seriously though, get this game. It is not your regular FPS game. This game has enough charm to make your head explode. You will have hours of fun and hats. So stop reading and download this game for FREE. (And later on, buy hats on the store.)
Justin Timberlake;-;I love this game, because of the fact that it has, over the past 5 or so years, developed a diverse and mechanical economy of its own. I have spent countless hours trading, crafting, and buying several hundreds of items over the past year. And the fact that this economy has been almost entirely developed by the Steam Community is remarkable. I would be shocked if I found a steam user who did not already own this masterpiece of a game. Any other MMOFPS game that has been thrown my way has not even come close to the mastery of this here game. 10000/10. (TL;DR)
HateBreeder;-;Do I really need to say something about it? GO GET THE FREAKING GAME ALREADY. One of the best FPS's out there, been playing it since 2008. Endless fun, not to talk about the awesomeness of the hats and its amazing community. Go get it!
Kirito Gamer Spy;-;This game is fun a is for free! why not try it is really fun!
ZAnightmare25 [sMiLe ArMy];-;this is a very fun and enjoyable game that is great to play friends with and never get bored
Chikage;-;This game may be free to play. But it does free to play right. No gems or time limits on guns or classes. every single item is possible to obtain without a special currency. And most of all you NEVER need to buy anything. You can buy things if you are impatiant to find a weapon but you never NEED to. I would rate thise game easily a 10/10 it is an amazing shooter. And teamwork is actually in this fun class based FPS. Looking at you Battle *COUGH* field. Anyway if you are looking for some fast paced action and buckets of fun. This is the game for you my friend.
TJBird123;-;I have had over 600 hours of tf2 and I am still loving it!
|VRG| Irrational |;-;I recommend that you should install and play this game :) Just don't play too much. :D
Dice Man;-;Best free to play game ever. "Nuff Said.
Random Gaming;-;Bread, beer, hats, that's all that matters about this game. It's a good game, good content, (Valve really has outdone themselves with the new taunts in the bread update), TF2,....... all that matters........
SuUuWuUu;-;Team Fortress 2 is a good game!
Sgout;-;Preety awesome game , developing lots of reflexes! A must for a Steam Player!
AMG335;-;thus twas thy devine game, thus recommended by thy
WTF;-;THIS GAME IS AMAZING
><Swpsy><;-;Nice and Fun game! You wanna play this Game! Because Its all about 2 Teams Fighting against each other! Theres different Gamemodes too! PLAY THIS GAME NOW <3
KillerSpy;-;i highly recomed this gam its so fun
Elias_yo;-;MOST FUN YOU CAN EVER HAVE Elias 2014 I would say a good game best game i have ever played. I play it everyday , i got this game last year and now i still play it and its not boring i would say you should get it. Tf2 is now free to play and totally diffrent than other FPS multiplayersbetter than call of duty i say. there are so many different gamemodes in this game and my favourite is payload and like everyone says HATS!!! There are nine different classes and you must work together to complete your objective and have fun in the same time. You can play in many ways. Offence , defence you can choose what you wanna play 10/10 PLAY IT WHAT ARE YOU WAITING FOR, JOIN THE FUN FOR HATS!!!!!
Lagger (Away until 25th);-;Ruined my life. Made me addicted to PC Games. Best. Game. Ever.
DarkLord Eclipse;-;It is awsome and its free to play!
Banana-Man;-;I got this game after it became free, so I read the reviews and there was nothing but hats there, so I didn't bother. Then one day when bored I said fine i'll play and since that day I haven't seen daylight.
A Psychopathic Cow (on holiday);-;I think this is a great game, and is so fun to play with your friends and the best part is its free :D
William;-;Best hat simulator I have ever played.
MALL COP;-;Awesome hat simulator. Lots of fun...until you lag out.
Stumpy;-;You can conga and give GabeN your money... 420/10
cyorus;-;why should i even write a review on frikkin' TEAM FORTRESS 2?! this game is as good as perfect.almost NO flaws,great cartoon artstyle,differnet classes and different play styles for each class=a recipe for an hilarious and awesome game that your never gonna get bored of. and best of all ITS FREE! and if you wanna 'buy' the game you only gotta spend 5 cents. final thing to say:if someone dares to say that tf2 is a stupid/bad game,then you are allowed to slap that person in the face and give him/her a ransid NOPE.avi
shrek;-;Best game to  around in. 11/10
LoX;-;Best game, A lot of friends and fun times were given while playing this game.
joji;-;This is an awesome, fun,vintage game. Trust me, it offers WAYYY more than COD or BF. Plus its F2P!!!!
Lowl;-;Insanely addictive. You may ask why this keeps us occupied more than other shooters? Well first off its insanely fun. Of course. And there's massive room for improvement for all classes. Master 1 class in 500 hours? 8 more to go. And when you master them? Many different weapon types. Besides, you'll never master tf2.
Maqs Staqs;-;Worst three thousand hours of my life
Elmo Lincoln;-;I did this for the achievement.
RaZ;-;Team Fortress 2 is an amazing game its good for when you have alot of friends with you but some classes are indeed overpowered and need to be downgraded
MaxPowder;-;Best game Ever Pro's Only Play This game No 1 alse would fight for weapons they will fight for thier life!
Deeakron;-;It can be a really fun game, despite the fact that it can be a pay-to-win game. Also, it has some language, but excluding that, I think it is a great game!
thevaultdweller13;-;i....i dont need to tell yu why you should get this game.
BG|Khed101TheKiwi;-;fun werid fps crazy fp2 game just so fun mmo lots of good stuff just try it
teenage mutant ninja chris;-;why is this the best game on steam and free.
[Lihay1610 ];-;Great game.
Pointy Turd;-;Awesome , can't be more awesome. You must play! IT'S FREE! C'MON! LETS GO! If you don't, you'd better hold on to your head mate. I'm going to cover you in colored rain!
Negev rounds;-;This game is most epic game ever... U must try this
BOT Star;-;good game and good friends and good time thx tf2
Deathray;-;Best hat simulator EVER!
RNG_Wizard;-;It's TF2, I'm pretty sure everyone has heard of this legend of a game by now. 600 hours in and I've not been bored once. 9 different gamemodes, hundreds of hats and weapons, countless maps, extremely community based, and has an open workshop where players can create items to have a chance to have them in the game. This game has it all, and to top it off, it's free to play.
TeamFortressPlayer;-;This game is called team fortress 2 its about helping each other to win also there are 9 classes for you to choose from like the scout medic heavy spy pyro enginner sniper soldier and demoman and there are two diffrent teams red and blu and you both have to kill each person on oppisite teams and you will also get hats and weapons so if you ever are board and want to like play a game that you can kill people then i guess team fortress 2 is the right game for you so if you have any more questions and come and ask me so ya bye and have fun there are more stuff coming on the way
thegamermike787;-;This game is badass
Star Guardian Lux;-;Great game, highly addictive. Offers many servers and quite a few different gameplay options. Their way of making sure both teams are fair is remarkable, and allows for players to vote on certain things which gives players some control. Not really any hackers. This game is super fun and it's worth it to download and give it a try.
Kutashnikov;-;PvP, Trading, Events, Community. Masterpiece!
Blueberry Waffles;-;Its awesome and gives unlimited hours of fun! Trust me i got over 1000...
TehOne&Only;-;I LOVE THIS GAME! Guys if your a F2P or havent tried this game. BECOME A P2P AND ENJOY THE GAME! You Find EPIC Items. Wear EPIC hats Beat the Fricken Hell out of the opposite team. PLAY THIS GAME! ITS THE BEST!
Serina Giratina;-;I love this game...most definitely worth intsalling if your looking for fun, comedy, guns and hats <3
Mr. ManSnailHorse;-;This... Game.... IS AWESOME! Download this game or be a looser.
EternalLife/Krye;-;This game is pretty fun and its also free.
corgi in the house;-;Great game but don't let it steal your wallet ;-;
MasterStef;-;Team Forteress 2 is a really good game in terms of team play: Hence the name. It requires skill in certain areas and sometimes requires use of the lone wolf tactic. Overall this is a REALLY fun game. 9/10
Smurfy Smurf;-;> I was only 10 years old. > I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. > I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. > Then I got my first hat, The gibus. > Suddenly everything changed. > I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' > I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. > I had so many hats, I loved them all. > But then someone traded me, I accepted. > They offered an Unusual for all my hats. > It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. > But no Unusual, He scammed me. > I lost it all. > I was so sad I cried for hours. > Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. > I went to bed after praying. > I felt warm. > I looked behind me, It was Gaben! > He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning Team Captain. > Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning Team Captain and I was naked. > I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. > Hats are love. Hats are life. TF2: 11/10 Best hat simulator 1981 Overall, I'd give this game 9 out of 10 Gabe Narwalls
Monketron;-;If you like hats, dancing, playing dress up, or have a gambling addiction, then this is the game for you.
Magnesium Hydroxide;-;Warning: This game is most fun when you know your  at least half-way, and have some experience. It may be repelling at first. This is a incredibly fun and addictive FPS. The graphics are stylized in a cartoonish fashion, making this one of the most recognizable games. The maps are very well-designed which is something Valve always gives us. I guess some introduction to the gameplay would be nice, so here you go: The gameplay centers around 9 classes, each with a unique playstyle and different skills required to play this class efficiently. Every with their own weaknesses and strengths. Only full co-operation between the usually 12 players will bring victory to the team. You have to know your , or be called a noob. This can be solved by reading guides, completing tutorials and simply practicing on public servers. You need to get into the mood to play a class, which can easily be achieved by simply playing it for a while. Something important to note is that there is no campaign, but offline practice does exist. The community is incredibly active. Nothing more can be said. You can download custom models, sounds and even HUDs! Some people may say it's pay to win. This just isn't true. The items in the store are used only to earn respect and don't effect gameplay at all. While weapons are buyable, it's completely pointless to buy them there. You can get it randomly literally anytime, or by trading. I guarantee that if you go on a full 32-player trade server, someone will own the weapon you're looking for, and won't ask much for it at all. I have never had so much fun playing a multiplayer-based community-fueled game. P.S don't play as sniper. Snipers are cowards. P.P.S #CoDSucks
McLightning;-;Its Good!
Fannwooket;-;Hat and taunt simulator? 69/10
Legiix;-;I did a 360 steam-check quickscope headshot. 420/69
CraZy AdoRable;-;Very Fun - Non Stop Addiction to the Max
Bet;-;The game that makes you smile from the sheer absurdity of the combat.
Megalomania;-;Incredible gameplay and a wide range of classes to choose from, this game offers a unique and very enjoyablHATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS
connerblackjack;-;I never going to stop playing team fortress 2
Midbee;-;The best Hat Simulator around.
A Delicate Spatchcock;-;It is a very good guame
Mr.Sandvich;-;A very fun Free To Play game, there's trading, action, and most importentley. Hats.
PJ_SAM;-;Crazy addictive
RashE;-;After over 800 hours on this game, I still go back to it all the time. Both being free-to-play, and easy-to-run, Team Fortress 2 has been the game that I grew up with in both FPS's and video games and general. There are so many different gamemodes, so many different things to do, I will never get bored of this game, and reccommend it to absolutely anyone.
Corporal R. Prime_;-;Truly the best fun you can have online and it's FREE-TO-PLAY go for it :)
Lole;-;Ruined my life.10 stars.
paulos_achileas;-;this game is one of the best FPS tha I have play
Chubby Bear Topo;-;This, my friends, is an awesome game. With 9 diffrence classes to choose from, with diffrence weapons and personailties, it is a real stunning game. From multiple maps, lots of game modes, hats, miscs and badges. Stranges, Uniques, and unsuals! Lots of items to get, enough to fill your day with fun.
Algorithm;-;Uh... I'll write this review in a sec... just 1 more game...
Lovegaming;-;A nice game! I have got the game before it was announced to be free to play and I can say that the game is awesome, but there is one problem... Now there are a lot of items which is actually ok, I mean, you can customize your classes how you want, but speaking about the economy, I think it was much better before it was announced to be free to play. 9.5/10
ionlypanda | Miku Brotherhood;-;I recommend team fortress 2 becasue it is a good game to play, You don't have to be good, there are new thing every time they update it do you won't get borad, there are lots of severs to play on so you don't have to stay on one sever, you get to play with lots of people, this game makes my controls better casue you got to jump, run fast, shoot, and kill alot of times. This game helps me on typeing, the W,A,S,D controls and my mouse/aiming/moving/looking too. Try it you will maybe like it as well as i do.
MeeMngineer;-;10/10 Perfect and good hat simulator :D
Grim Reaper;-;Team Fortress 2 is a good game its a FPS you can get hats' misc and you can buy from the MANN.CO store 'note you can buy the hats and misc from the MANN.CO store'
Silentkiller101;-;One of the Best Free-to-Play FPS Games of all time
- \/G - DualFrost;-;Tf2 is a very fun Game :D
crazt;-;Why do you need this review? This game is free! Play it! One of the best FPSs I've ever had the pleasure of playing! Even if you don't like it, its free! So whats are the risks?
{EwG} MedDeadRedemption;-;This game is honestly he best game i personally have ever played. There are so many different options in this game! You could play for fun or competition, trade, or compete in highlander competitions! I have so much fun playing this game and i hope anyone else who plays this will have fun too!
den irlndska chav;-;Great FPS, up there with CounterStrike and the older CoDs. It's free too, so there's no need not to try it!
readu teddu duuuu;-;great game :)
Bobo*RH*;-;i think tf2 is cool
Shasta;-;One of the funnest games I've ever played And it's completely free, there is not a single hint of it being a pay to win game, you don't find completely free games like this often, if at all. And the fact that it is an incredibly fleshed out game makes it all the better. You're missing out if you haven't installed this game
Zer0;-;Really nice game to just pick up, join, play. Yes, yes there are a lot of people going on: WOW i got 18 spys on my team; Only M1+W Pyro's; I got this medick with nothning buth shooting syringes... And so on. Also there is a lot of hype about the hats... BUTH THAT DOSENT MATTER!!! Free to play or Pay to play its all the same... You get the best weapons (well almost all) at the beggining as stock weapons! Yes you can upgrade to strange, vintage, unusual, genuine and so on buth it dosent matter if you do or not... Also the hats are just something you have to look like something... They are not really a big deal. And if dont wanna spend any money on this game buth on another steam game you get to "half premuim"-That means you get 100 slots (maybe more), you can craft metal into hats (really spend your usefull weapons for metal and spend 3 refinds to get a hat... Any then you just do that and you can get up to stuff fast and quick and with almost no "no-fun-time" couse even knowing that tradeing is kinda ruining this game you can still have some fun douing it if you got a reason to. Owerall: greate game, fast and slow paced, difrent stuff to do (my favorite: Rocket/Sticky jumping, difrent game mods as you get in GMod)... Has greate "get a competitative game fast" option if you just go to: TF2 Center and click the first link log in and play (you wanna have about 1000 hours so people wont go on and on about how bad you are. Also dont play the medick, pocket for the first time! Accept if you really got lots of hours like about 3000-4000. So just get in dont worry and have fun. 10/10 Steams. 11/10 Hats. 1/10 Gabe's. 10/10 Nice game!
LEMON SENPAI~;-;This game is great! Lots of good people & traders.
Ferris Bueller;-;Over 400 hours total. This game is best for people that enjoy some laughs and epic updates.
vennnnnnn;-;Is good game. Play it. Buy hats. Get good.
The Wolfinator;-;Fun to Play Free to Play Hats What more could you want?
cajaman;-;Nice game
Doof Warrior;-;Good game, what sucks is the community. It consists mostly of around 18 yr old YOLO-idiots, homophobics, bronies, furries, sexists and ignorants. There can hardly be a single MVM without harassing, whining and idiotic behavior, annoying setup and ragequitting. There are hardly servers without stupid people on the mic, puking out their racist and intolerant opinions nobody gives a damn about. Maybe I'm too old for this bull frickin' horse , but I'm really tired of the majority of players here. BTW, there are also female players out there, so shove your lesbian sprays up your  and take some more Medic/Engineer action, you homophobic morons.
Doof Warrior;-;Good game, what sucks is the community. It consists mostly of around 18 yr old YOLO-idiots, homophobics, bronies, furries, sexists and ignorants. There can hardly be a single MVM without harassing, whining and idiotic behavior, annoying setup and ragequitting. There are hardly servers without stupid people on the mic, puking out their racist and intolerant opinions nobody gives a damn about. Maybe I'm too old for this bull frickin' horse , but I'm really tired of the majority of players here. BTW, there are also female players out there, so shove your lesbian sprays up your  and take some more Medic/Engineer action, you homophobic morons.
Riot King11;-;Best game probably ever made! And it's free! Just get tha dang game!
Kenu;-;One of the best games ever, due to customization, gameplay and the ECONOMY!
TheTimeLord;-;great game
ToxiCake;-;I love this game so much.
v3nom;-;I love this game!!!!
Bigturkeysandwich;-;Found a hat and killed my friend with a fish 10/10
Christmas Bacon;-;Fun game. Must play
NOT FRESH ENOUGH!;-;Creative Addicting Fun. 3 words to describe Team Fortress 2
Iced;-;What is this game....? Maybe the best team based game in the hole world.Dont Miss this opportunity and download it now.!
AtomicRSN;-;Fantastic game with a great competitive scene, entertainment for hours, and never gets old. Played since 2007 and still going strong, thanks, Valve!
Prime 2nd;-;Great Game, I had lots of fun playing this because of Dodge Ball and other minigames some servers have.
eeJayFerno;-;It's a fun game, and you can enjoy it with all your friends and the best part, it's free!!!
Teh Sopermen;-;This game is fun and you should start out official server multiplayer. It is fairly easy to learn and i suggest playing as the pyro first, then moving on to the heavy. Also, there are lots of fun smaller servers and a great trading community along with a competitive community. Also, you can go on special non-official servers such as randomizer, where every quality about your character is randomized to anything on any class, including having 3 different-class weapons.
Pack it Up;-;I LUV DIS GAME SO MUCH YOU CAN GET HATS AND PRROFIT DUDE AND I JOINED OPTIC AND FAZE CLAN WIT MY FRIENDS AND WE GOT HIGHLANDER PLATINUM IN THE CHAMPIONSHIP
kyle;-;I suck at this game, but i keep playing it 10/10
Light;-;I like this game it makes me relaxed when Im not
Wimawile;-;team fortress 2 did you mean my life
Doctor Dr. Randy Bobandy ( :;-;This game is one of the best Free To Play games on steam..........
Beans;-;This game just doesn't get old. I can't stop coming back.
Loitak;-;This is a must have! Best FTP game ever! <3
Charizard;-;Very great game, good mechanics, cool servers with cool mods, fun game modes, and an awesome market system with metal as a currency for trading.
Zola;-;Really Fun Interested Game.
Locke;-;Team Fortress 2 is easily one of the most addictive games I have ever played. The gameplay is very simple, You are either on RED or BLU, Fighting one and other ina variety of objective based gamemodes. This forces players to work together as a team. This game is NOT for the Lone Wolf. What makes TF2 unique is it's insane amount of customaztion. The game features 9 distinct classes, Each with their own Personality, Play-Styles, Designs and weapons. From the Speedy, Loud-Mouthed Scout, To the Insane, Mad Scientist Medic, Each class is unique. This add's depth to this game. There is ALWAYS something new to do and experience. The Community have kept this game alive with constant Mod's and inventive gamemodes, While the TF2 team keep the game fresh with constant free content. Whether is new weapons or New hats, Each update keeps players interested. On top of all of this, TF2 features a very unique art style. This makes it stand out amongst all the other Military shooters. It's cartoonish, 1960's style, Makes it simply beautiful. Valve certianly did a fantastic job in creating a unique world for this game. TF2 is also damn hilarious, With a barrage of Meme's, Quotes and Dark Humor to keep anyone happy. While the humor isn't always for everyone, It certainly get's me laughing to myself as I Gib a Pesky Spy. While TF2 has lost some of it's core charm due to trading/players, It still remains one of Valve's greatest hits. TF2 is a must have for ANY PC gamer. Also, It is free. And you can wear fancy Hats/ If you have yet to experience TF2, I would heavily reccomend to download it right now. 9.5/10.
SHDW Caprine Regalia;-;Hat Simulator 2014. Best game ever.
Toroi;-;My hours. help. I wrote something for real! These hours are legit, I played this game a lot in the past to avoid some tragic stuff in real life. I was young and didn't really have my gaming consoles anymore because of my brothers and I had a really bad pc, which i still own. TF2 was one of the games i could play pretty well on this pc but with horrid graphics, but it was one of the more fun games I installed. I met some real cool and nice people on this game as well as people who i plan to keep by my side. The community back then was more humble compared to nowadays. You have competitive gamers who spam their bind keys with unfunny/gross jokes and very obnoxious people who are either yelling at you or telling you to do specific things to win the game. When really, it doesn't even matter if you win or lose. However, you also have those people who are really awesome and you may meet some nice friends along the way! Although you never know what kinda person you're going to meet on this game. In my honest opinion, if you want to have a game to just waste time on (and money) or just mess around with people you know (which is what I do now), this is perfect. Esspecially the mann vs. machine co-op. I mainly play that now. Although to me, the game lost its touch, update wise, and I moved onto other games. I believe it's worth a shot to try it out but other than that, I'd keep it as a casual game. I don't think the competitive scene is worth getting into anymore because it's being flooded by crude people. Atleast from my experiance after over about 4+ years of playing it just got worse and worse. You will eventually be tied into drama even if you try to avoid it. You'll be more stressed than actually having fun, I'll tell you that! Although in all seriousness, this game is losing its touch and probably isn't worth making it your main game MAINLY because the updates they've been releasing are becoming very dull and not as great as they used to be. BUT, it's a great game to just play to pass the time and have fun! All you'll really notice nowdays is...people really love to trade more than actually play. Living off as a free to play would be very tough and you'd need to be patient with items you would want, unless you got that MONEY! Hope this helps. One last thing, I am not saying this game is bad in any way. I am saying that it's worth trying and playing with friends, or even meeting people! Although there are some downsides that you won't like, such as some stuff I pointed out above. Strictly towards the community. I personally think you should have this game as a side game rather than your come home to play sorta thing. Have it as a once in a while game, because it's nothing to be big about, unless you really do not like most of the millions of other games out there. Just give it a shot and see what you think! Have fun <3
Vale;-;Can you name any other unmodded First Person Shooter that lets you play as a cocky and fast Bostonian that can slap the hell out of urine throwing Australian campers with a fresh atlantic fish wrapped in fine christmas lights, eat a bucket of fried proccessed poultry over their corpses, and then get hit with an exploding cannonball launched from an African-Celtic one eyed alcoholic who can leap yards into the air from his own explosives while weilding a mystic ancient talking ghost claymore? I thought so.
A bLuE cOw;-;If you bind forward to a button on your mouse, you can play pyro and eat at the same time
UnfunnyName;-;The vicious cycle of Team fortress 2 First when you'll arrive in the game, you'll want Weapons, tons of them. Then you'll see that everyone has hats, and you'll want these, a tons of them. Then you'll realize that hats doesn't matter, only skill count, so you'll want a lot of skills, tons of them. Then new weapons will be added, and you'll want them, all of them. Then a new hat will be added and you'll want it, cause it'll be fancy on your main class. Then you'll realize again, that you don't give a damn about hats, all is about is skill. Then when you have waited for 3 years, new weapons will be added, and you'll want them. And then you realize that you spent like 2000 hours of your life for this, met great friends, and you'll have a server where's you feeling like home, and you discovered so much things via the community, it learnt you so much. Then the rude reality of life, bring you on earth, and this game is here, Waiting for you to play 1,2,3... hours, and you'll be happy to see that all your good friend are still here.
[CotC] King Conga Gandhi;-;Oh, and if you're wondering, the new update, Gun Mettle, did NOT ruin TF2 for me. I actually find it a LOT more fun now! I think Jerma summed up this game pretty nicely... "Maybe you got like two Pyros that just installed the game ten minutes ago. They don't have any hats, they're spraying  and they're having a blast. They might even be at the wrong point. They might be going backwards to the point that's already been capped. On the same team, there's a Scout with a Hale's Own Scattergun. He's got 18 kills with a 17 killstreak, he just got 18. He's going 'I just got 18, sick!' He runs up the stairs, he's trying his  off. He's get *beeping noises* dodging the 'Oh, the sentry almost got me!' He looks up to his left when he gets up the stairs on Gorge and there's two sandwich Heavies having a ing picnic. So he stops for a second and goes, 'Two... nnnggh!' so he walks forward and gets blown up by a soldier's rocket next door... ...The two sandwich Heavies then decide to move their picnic. There's ants. 'There's ants here, honey. I wanna get out of here.' So they get up, they pack their sandwiches, pack up their lunches, and their breakfast, and whatever the  they're eating. They get up and walk toward the door to go to RED because they think, 'That spot near the A point for RED is pretty good.' They walk out the door, and they see four Level 3 Sentry Guns pointing at them. They get shot a million times and blow up, and there's like nine Engineers swinging their wrenches in random directions. The BLU Scout, at this point, respawns, and walks by the at least 3-4 statues because we all know there's four people AFK when you play this game, you go by the museum of people standing still. He walks out the door and readies his weapon, he's ready, 'I'm going to get another 20 killstreak, just you watch Gaben, I'm going to praise Gaben!' And he goes forward and starts shooting, and he gets backstabbed by a Spy that has been sitting with the Cloak and Dagger in the corner for at least the last 68 seconds." Normally when I do reviews, I turn into a critic and start to examine that game, pointing out every little flaw and pro and determining a final score. However, Team Fortress 2 (or TF2 for short) helped me make so many memories that if I actually tried to make a fair review on it, it would still be way too biased to consider a valid review. Team Fortress 2, is, obviously, an amazing game. The teamplay is necessary and going out and attacking solo may be difficult. You need teammates in order to survive and win. The graphics are unique to a shooter game and really makes it a special game. I'm not here to explain the gameplay or graphics or whatnot. I love this game because of its charm. The game has such a unique and diverse cast of characters, you can't help to love all of them at some point. Scout is cocky and overconfident. Spy, another one of the characters in the game, is technically Scout's father. Soldier is a crazed WWII American patriot. He never actually joined the Army, but instead, he had his own personal Nazi killing spree. His roommate was a magician named Merasmus, who grew to hate Soldier. Pyro is mysterious, but portrays the world as one big happy paradise, known as Pyroland. Demoman is a Scottish alcoholic who, due to Merasmus, lost his eye that is now haunted. Heavy, although he appears to be dim-witted, is actually very intelligent and looks over three sisters. Engineer is very intelligent as well, and his grandfather was a major contributor to keeping the war with RED and BLU continue. Medic isn't fond of normal forms of medicine, but is still an important member nonetheless. Sniper is from New Zealand, but was raised in Australia. He prefers working from a distance and his backstory is very similar to Superman's. Spy is the master of disguise, and is technically Scout's father, as said before. Of all the characters, he appears to be the most "mature" and appears to be the ringleader at many times. Not only that, but the game has an interesting story. I would not like to get too detailed with it. However, it makes little to no sense but is still funny, engaging, and gives TF2 much more depth. There is also a storyline that takes place a few years later where Mann Co. is being attacked, so the mercenaries have to defend it, called Mann vs. Machine. This game mode ties in with the TF comics, which explain many characters' backstories and is currently still in the works as of this review. The other comics (all of which can be found on TF2's official website) are all funny and charming in their own way as well. The community has been quite debatable on how nice it is at many times, but in the end, it's still an overall great community. I've seen people give out stuff, others mentor some of the newbs (something I do as well) along with much, much more. Yes. the game is considered a "pay-to-win game" but it isn't necessarily a pay-to-win game. With lots of patience, you will get what you want from the game, whether it be hats, weapons, or whatever it is you want. The game has a learning curve that isn't too steep, but become dedicated and you'll fall in love with it. No matter how many times you rage to a W+M1 pyro that destroyed your 16 killstreak, or cheer when you unbox an Unusual, or maybe discover a few friends or learn a few things, Team Fortress 2 has been a huge part of my PC gaming life and without it, I would be as bored as hell. I cannot recommend this game enough, and I hope that many more memories are made on here. Valve may be cash cows, but you can't help but admit they are amazing when it comes to making games. Portal, Half-Life 2, Counter-Strike, but this game stands out from the rest to me. Do I recommend this game? Yes, yes, yes, YES.
Nerd House;-;Team Fortress 2. Being ranked as the third most-played game [steamcharts.com] on Steam, Team Fortress 2 is probably one of the best free-to-play games we've got. Why is it so popular? Let's take a look, shall we? First off, the obvious: It's free. 100% free. This means its accessible to everyone on Steam. This is just the icing on the cake though. What really shines about TF2 is the game itself. Team Fortress 2 usually consists of two teams (Red and Blue) going head to head against each other. Sometimes fulfilling certain objectives or just downright killing each other. There are many, many maps and modes, such as Payload, Capture Points, and Mann VS Machine. But the general idea no matter the map or mode is to KILL EVERYTHING THAT MOVES! And my god, is it fun to do so. The game has 9 playable mercenaries, each actually being a certain "class". Each class is divided into 3 different roles: Offense, Defense, and Support. Let's go over each role and class. Offensive roles specialize in dealing damage to the opposing team. These are your main attack force. Scouts are the speedy hit and run class, with the ability to double or even triple jump depending on equipped items. Soldiers pack a bit more firepower with their rocket launchers, which gives them not only power, but mobility due to the ability known as "rocket jumping". The Pyro is great at setting the opposition on fire, as well as extinguishing burning teammates using an airblast. Defensive roles serve to inhibit enemy access and to hold enemies back from vital points on the map. Overall, the defensive group has the most firepower of all the groups. Demomen can safeguard areas with stickybombs that they can detonate when enemies come by. Heavies are great for mowing down incoming troops and pushing back forces. Heavies can also keep enemies in an area while whittling their health for teammates to finish off. Engineers can build Sentry Guns for effective area defense, as well as build Teleporters and Dispensers for logistical support of the team. Support classes cannot hold the fight on their own, but their specialized abilities can tip the balance in their team's favor. They offer the offensive and defensive classes an extra edge in battle and can help turn the tide of the game. Whether crippling the enemy advance from behind or keeping teammates healed, the support classes are always handy to have around. Medics are the team healers, capable of providing numerous buffs depending on their equipments. Spies are great for sneak attacks or eiliminating key threats. Snipers excel at long range, also eliminating key threats, as well as extinguishing burning teammates with jarate and providing a damage boost to teammates. Next, let's look at the presentation. TF2 has a very unqiue art style. It's somewhat cartoonish, but very appealing. It's simple, and un-complex. But it doesn't need to be complex. It's simplicity is it's strength. Everything is detailed enough to where you can easily tell whats going on, what a specific model or item is, and they all stand out. The soundtrack is also very appealing and catchy, especially the main theme. I personally have it as a ringtone/alarm tone on my smartphone! :) One of the best aspects of TF2 is the Steam Workshop. Users can submit designs for items and weapons, and possibly have them added to the game! A very lucrative sub-market has also emerged from this game in the form of the Crate Keys. That's a whole different ballgame in and of itself, so we won't get into it here. During normal gameplay on most servers, you can obtain random items, weapons, and sometimes crates, and taunts....through the item drops system. You can only receive so many drops per week, and you will get them randomly as you play. You can use these items and weapons to customise your mercenary's loadout, or you can use them to craft other items, hats, and weapons. You can take multiples of items and craft them into Scrap, then Reclaimed Metal, then Refined Metal. You can then use these metals to craft specific class weapons/items, among other things. The crafting system is simple yet robust, with lots of possiblities. Some of it is very luck based. You can take some very common items and end up crafting a super rare hat or gun worth a lot of moolah on the Steam Market! All-in-all, Team Fortress 2 is just a very fun game. Endless entertainment awaits when you start up this game, especially if you play with friends on your favorite server. Probably the best free-to-play game on Steam. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=383235670 Highly Recommended Be sure to check out Nerd House Gaming for more reviews!
Mr Squiggles;-;How to play Team Fortress 2: Be polite, Be efficient, Have a pan to kill everyone you meet.
pacsomepuppes;-;> I was only 10 years old. > I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. > I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. > Then I got my first hat, The gibus. > Suddenly everything changed. > I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' > I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. > I had so many hats, I loved them all. > But then someone traded me, I accepted. > They offered an Unusual for all my hats. > It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. > But no Unusual, He scammed me. > I lost it all. > I was so sad I cried for hours. > Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. > I went to bed after praying. > I felt warm. > I looked behind me, It was Gaben! > He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning Team Captain. > Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning Team Captain and I was naked. > I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. > Hats are love. Hats are life. TF2: 11/10 Best hat simulator 1981 Overall, I'd give this game 9 out of 10 Gabe Narwalls Shoutout to ObsidianObelisk17 for making a youtube vid of this Showout to TheDisableBore for making a comic of this I cringe re reading this :smug:
Flexi;-;Ruined my life and cost me over 500. 10/10 would recommend to friends and family
Special;-;Team Fortress 2 is the most realistic hat simulator created to date. There is absolutely no other simulator quite like this one. The first time you start the simulator, you join a server where you can play a minigame where you show off your hats and items. If you kill a person three times in a row in the minigame, you get your very first hat: the Gibus. This is where it really starts; To play the simulator correctly, you have to spend money in the market place, made by Valve. After that, while you play the minigame, you can find hats which you can trade for, or collect! There is many other people who wants to collect and trade hats, just like you! After you collect enough items and/or hats, try joining a trade server! There, the REAL fun begins! Good luck, and beware of ending up poor!
HBZ;-;Best free to play multiplayer game in the world :) !!!!!!!
Mighty Doguin;-;Completely addictive game with alot of action and fun!! Totally recomend this ! :)
SWEEZY SWAGERS;-;i love these game i have spint over 30$ on these game lol :)
Kommerad;-;I played in this game from 2008, right from the first time when i read review on this game in a cozy "Igromaniac"... Author said the game has a lot of advantages, 9 distinct glasses, and the main thing... cozy, expensive and cool customization... Later (about a week later) we played on some custom map with my friends and were thinking how this game was cool, how it is well balanced and stuff... But later, we noticed one more thing:the game was always changing. The gameplay was changing, there was added new custom parts... and you know what? i left from this game, because i didn't like all this changes... In 2012 (or 2011) my friend sucked me back in the game with the arguement of "dude, you have to check it out". And the thing was men vs. machine update. I was more than amazed... so much changed for all this 4 years while in most other games stuff stays the same! I highly recommend this game to everybody: from the ones who likes bloody shooters, to the people who likes fat eastern eggs on stuff from media. And especially changes, because this game lives more than 8 years now, and it keeps changing, it keeps being popular, it keeps being fresh.
r.ChillyCheeeBurgah;-;If you like FPS games this will be a fan favorite to all steam players so go get this damn game
L | Dr. Obvious;-;Classic, but still a lot of fun - even if it went down to "Team Marketplace" recently.
_  AMENO;-;This is a great multiplayer game that I would recomend getting. I do believe it should rated E and not M and it is a nice game for children.
r.ChillyCheeeBurgah;-;If you like FPS games this will be a fan favorite to all steam players so go get this damn game
L | Dr. Obvious;-;Classic, but still a lot of fun - even if it went down to "Team Marketplace" recently.
_  AMENO;-;This is a great multiplayer game that I would recomend getting. I do believe it should rated E and not M and it is a nice game for children.
Cassiel;-;Three or four years now of playing this game, and no matter my mood. I can ALWAYS play it. Never gets old. :)
Emilia Clarke <3;-;Good game great chatacters,great fun,great fun getting drops,great graphics for the age it was made,great company made this,GREAT NO SCOPES I DO 360 NO SCOPES m8 U  COUNTS WHY U LOOK AT THIS REVIEW DOWNLOAD THIS GAME ITS F2P Btw: I cant now go outside to pee bcuz of this it ruined my life 100000/5 - IGN
Rook2konig;-;I"ve had a lot of fun with this game
noor "500timesaday" aisyah;-;Fk my luck uncrating.
Hackis Bell;-;This game is awesome. I'm sure you will love this game. Best thing is that the game is free2play. For me personally would be better if game had some leveling system, so you could progress and get some bonuses. Anyway if you didn't played this game, do it now! 10/10
Cigarettes and a sad story;-;Team Fortess 2 is the only game that takes revenge and trolling to the next level besides DarkRP. In Team Fortress 2 you can find yourself in a boxing match with three heavies that are all wearing hats that have magically burst into flames or shooting a 6'4 Australian man in the face with a pistol 14 times only to be awarded with a fist sending you straight to your grave.
Learlie<|;-;1. Play game 2. Realize it has hats 3. Pay Gaben for keys 4. Unbox 5. Get broke 6. Still play game cuz it's free 10/tf2
Mormon of Death;-;Hats. The End.
[VF] Mmazzei;-;best game 1000000009/5 taught me how to be an owl HOOOOOOOOOOT
Beef;-;This is such an awesome game! I recomend it too all!
PrinzEugen;-;Well, amongst all the positive reactions upon Team Fortress 2, I want to put in some more critical notes, although the sheer quality of this classic is undeniable. First of all, the game is technically superb ofcourse - it all runs flawlessly and Valve keeps updating and supporting it admiringly. Graphics and sound are also top-notch and deserve nothing but praise. And the sheer imagination of the entire undertaking is gigantic and really awe-inspiring. But. The actual gameplay is really mostly for those who enjoy fast-pacing shooting and jumping action, not for those who enjoy having a bit more time for their actions. Ofcourse it is an option to sit along camping, but that is not what this game is made for, and you won't win many friends by doing that. Also, fir those who are now, in 2014, new to the game, it appears to be difficult to find servers where "newbies" (aka beginners) are really welcomed and encouraged. Maybe I didn't try hard enough to find those, but it seemed like a stiff job to get me going. Don't misunderstand: this game promises tons and 100's of fun-hours for those who just like this fast-paced approach, but for the "others", it is something of a steep mountain to climb. Gameplay: 12/20 (according to taste...) Graphics: 16/20 Sound: 16/10 Stability & patching: 20/20 Long-lasting appeal: 18/20 Overall: 82/100
grinding hard afk;-;Pubs shouldn't be serious, and competitive players are the biggest flaming homosexuals(based on actual gays for guidelines). 0/10 wouldn't play this game for more than 8,000 hours because I'm not b4nny
General (fag) Deer;-;i have stopped playing this game half year ago but i still respect this game alot overall rating 9/10 good things -amazing community -maps are ballanced -classes are ballanced -music :D -so many different weapon choices -#gibus bad things -trading yep! -economy -updates hats hats hats and hats
no pantsu;-;10/10 There are hats in this game.
Fluffy Bunny;-;one of the best games available around the world. i would like to recommend it to everyone! IT'S F2P game! start playing, have a lot of fun,make friends, share your handmade items, rate/join TF2 discussions and most important thing! You can trade all your items to other players around the world!!
[EOW]Mpandingare;-;This game is silly fun.. Nothing is more satisfying than backstabbing your mate, great over skype. The teamplay is above average , it actually HAS a physics engine, which I like. The unlock system is a bit odd and I dont rally understand the crafting, there arent really enough tutorials. I do however have a reocurring problem, on Gmod and any other valve game... Servers get connection failed after four retries and when I refresh the servers disappear... Anyways I have to rate this game positively becuase it is one of the most fun games I've played and I feel the developers put lots of effort into it. 8/10
Daring Dagwood;-;Not saying that this game isn't a money trap for anyone with a penny to spend, but this game is a money trap for anyone with a penny to spend. Instead of looking bland while you get killed, drop a good 400 dollars and you might have a few hats to wear while you get killed. I recommend.
Wolfie :3;-;One of the best games out there! :D
BEEZOW DOO-DOO ZOPITTYBOP;-;Definitely a good game to waste your life on. You'll instantly become addicted as soon as you get your first weapon, or hat. Apart from the great gameplay there is always something new, or intresting to try out. Certainly a great game to download if the rest of your life isn't fun enough for you.
S.G.;-;Best available free to play game, hours upon hours of fun. After 2,000 hours of what seems like monotinous time, I still manage to have fun
{Ripper} Swaggy Spooderman;-;Team fortress 2 is by far one of the best games i have ver played. although the game is free i have spent so much money on it buying weapons and other things like that. this game is very easy to get into and i hope you enjoy it as much as i do.
Fluff;-;Im in love with this game. I swear.
Gibus;-;Best game love the trading and the economy
Legion;-;Simply the most addictive and funniest free-to-play multiplayer title out there. The great community-made gamemodes as well as the regular updates and additions make sure that you'll never want to stop playing. Furthermore, its F2P-model is very interesting, because people get the possibility to share their handcrafted work for a fair amount of money. All in all, it's a game by players for the players.
readyset;-;wasted my life was good
Hyena butt;-;Man this is getting boring, Hey a new item! This isn't so bad. I could play a few more games. Man this is getting boring, Hey a new item! This isn't so bad. I could play a few more games. Man this is getting boring, Hey a new item! This isn't so bad. I could play a few more games. Man this is getting boring, Hey a new item! This isn't so bad. I could play a few more games. Man this is getting boring, Hey a new item! This isn't so bad. I could play a few more games....
Nikki Wuff;-;This is certainly the billionth recommendation for TF2 ever made, most likely. If you need one word to sum up the game: Hats. Need another? Fun. This certainly is a top favorite game of mine for a good reason, and that it's just too much fun. Really, I can say it's one of the best, if not the best, free-to-play game out there, and that's not doing the game much justice. The game has multiple objective-based modes inplemented into a truckload of maps that have been either made by Valve or the community, and contains a pretty deep metagame thanks to the amount of weapons placed in the game and the varying ways that people play each class. Each match may play differently from the last, considering that everyone's going to play differently, which requires you and your team to adapt to survive. Oh, I mentioned it has hats, didn't I? Yeah, think of this as Valve's way of earning money, along with some of the community members who contribute to the game. i really like this system, as you can customize each class however you want to, and it's a way to give back to the community. I could go on about how this is one of the greatest games ever made, but you're probably sick of me rambling on about this game, by this point. And of course, you're already playing this game on some sort of time basis if you're on my friends list, so I guess I'm just talking to myself. I'll shut up and let you get back to playing now XD
Grandy;-;I think there are enough reviews to show that this game is highly recommended, but here's another anyway. TF2 manages to do a few things quite flawlessly: 1. Classes. TF2 has 9 very distinct classes, each with a very different style of gameplay attached to them, making the game very replayable. 2. Clarity. TF2 is a very approachable game, as the classes are very well defined and their roles (from the eyes of a newbie) are fairly clear. The art style in the game also makes it very approachable, catering for pretty much all audiences. 3. Variety. To add on to the classes being varied, there is also a massive set of weapons, which range from minor cosmetic differences to completely different utilities, making weapon combinations become something personal that you can tailor to your style of play. TF2 also boasts a decent range of game-modes, from CTF to Capture Points, to King of the Hill, and even a vastly different co-op mode MvM (Mann vs. Machine). 4. Community. TF2 has a very active trading scene, competitive lobby and league scene, and Steam Workshop. Many items created by fans of the game have ended up being implemented, producing revenue for the artist and Valve itself, which leads onto my final point: 5. Free-to-play done right. Their monetisation methods are non-intrusive and not in your face. There is incentive to gamble with crates for strange/unusual items through buying 'keys', but in the end the high-tier loot are all COSMETIC in nature, rather than unlocking some weapon with vastly OP stats like so many other F2P games. Everything that can be bought can also be traded for, and with the activity of the community it is not too difficult a feat to do. The game also provides you with free items based on play time, which can of course be traded, and non-tradable basic weapons for completing achievement milestones with the different classes. All in all, it's a great class-based shooter/hat simulator with a great setup behind it. Go play!
Inkripto;-;This is a fun game and is great for joining random servers where u can play just with your friends. Also has a wide variety of different game modes. Awesome
Dark Magician Girl;-;Don't ask, just play it. Awesome!
downt2point;-;How to feel good playing this game: Heal people on fire about to die with 1 health left. Bonk a heavy about to decimate your team. Snipe that spy about to chain stab your team. Build teleporter exit to first spawn point near the end of a match. Backstab a sniper until he switches to razorback. Headshot him until he switches to pyro. Win a match after team sh*ttalker moves to other "winning" team. Kick a bad medic for trying. Getting 50 kills in a row also feels pretty good, if you can do it. Don't acknowledge the people who defecate in their living room instead of their bathroom. People who bring all their life problems to the game, known as ragers, don't realize the fundamental aspect of entertainment. Whatever good or bad thing happens while playing, is ultimately for your entertainment. You will forget this playing TF2 though just saying and become a rager yourself.
Andross;-;This game is dank :^)
GamCol44 #Gone for 14 days;-;team fortress 2 is exectly what the name is. its a game where you have to oppose against another team and the best team eventualy wins. this is nothing like Call of Duty as every class in here as an advantage and a disadvantage. for example the scout runs really really fast but has low HP and because you only have shotguns and pistols you need to get close to you emeney in order to take him out quickly. I really advice you to download this game since its free and it has a lot of options. try teaming up with some friends and do some mann vs machine or try to launch a rocked into space. it is all possible with the right amount of teamwork and fun :D
TuxedoBandito;-;It Is Bottom Line The BEST Game Out There On Steam It Is So Much Fun And The Weapons And Items You Can Get In Game Are Awesome Looking
taNr;-;This game took my life away. Thanks Gaben. 110000000/10
Winston The Churchill;-;I got assassinated by myself. 10/10
Config_Pepe;-;This game is an average shoot-em-up. However, the cartoony style, ragdolls, and gibs give it a funny atmosphere. 10/10
JeilyFan124;-;I like this game for not being just a basic FPS (First Person Shooter) like COD (Call of Duty) its more of a puzzle shooter. Why I think it is more of a puzzle shooter is because each class has its weakness and the other class help their weaknesses.
T-Duke716;-;Team Fortress 2, or TF2, has truly earned it's way into my top 5 games list. With it's imaginitive characters, setting, gameplay, and features, make this game an absolute must-have for any fan of FPS games or steam members. The game has many game modes that never get old or boring. Along with the games array of classes, the game is always fresh and fun. Problems I encountered in other FPS games like Call of Duty are they never involve strategy or team building. In TF2 however, teamwork must be used in order to win, making it extremly fun and imersing to play with friends. Every class has a weaknes and strength, along with imitations and constrictions, that allow you to become accustomed to your own class and playing stradegy. This overall allows for a extremely fun gaming experience.
Surface_Beats;-;Good f2p game. Basic physics and graphics engine. Adds a nice touch with voice acting and weapon styles.
WaffleShark :D;-;best free to play game
dwwojcik;-;I reccomend this game. It's free. Plus it's fun. Lots and lots of fun. Seriously, it's really fun. Believe me when I say this. Are you bad at videogames? You can be good at this one. Possibly the only multiplayer game with built in aimbots. Just choose the Engineer class and build a sentry. Do you like OP one hit kills? TF2 is the game for you. Go sniper or spy and headshot or backstab all the baddies. They'll hate you for it, but really- do you care? No. If you do, you probably shouldn't be playing a game with guns in it. If you don't care and you like aimbots, don't cheat in other games. Play TF2 instead, because here it's allowed.
Dutch;-;It's Skyrim with hats 13/10
PROrangeV2 [FFoFF];-;10/10 Would Keep Playing For Everyone who like PC Modern FPS Games, This is a really Great Choice.
PVT A.Clark[173rd] (TRADER);-;I can feel myself slipping into the void. i just bought my first hat. I... I... I need more..... I cant explain the urge... The urge to just take all of my money and spend it on virtual hats...... Someone help us. UHHHH ISS A GOOD GAM 10\10
CaptainBeluga  [DATA];-;Team Fortress 2 is a fun online game with friends. It's so fun judging from CTF to CP to even parkour! Play it now! it's free!!
Seanut;-;Extremely fun game. Recommend it to all! 2 thumbs up
Iz Sanic;-;I recommend this game to anyone. The probem people have with TF2 is that they expect it to be easy. It takes days to get used to and weeks to get the hang of it. It takes a long time to get used to this game; especially the style. It's probably one of the best games you can play on Steam, and for free. The item system is also a good aspect. It gives you a chance to make your own unique TF2 character and skill sets. The downside to this is that it causes players to forget how to play the game and focus on hats. However with all the bad things aside, this game truely is, probably, the most fun you can have online. I'd give it a 9.7 / 10.
Awesome2.0;-;I am so tired of seeing free to play games where you can't be as good as anyone else without spending your money TF2 offers the perfect solution to this: everything can be obtained in-game by random drops or trading with players, however, you can get items much faster by paying money, but it is in no way required on top of that, I love the way that all the classes are overpowered in some unique way, counter ballencing the other, overpowered classes, it is a very unique model for a game
Georgous;-;Team Fortress 2 = No.1 Hat simulator
TheNintendoBros;-;Team Fortress 2 is a great game, especially when you're playing with friends. Whether it's shooting each other's faces with a Heatman's Hitmaker, or destroying each other with a Baby Face's Blaster, or the egregrious hat market, or even the people who dominate you and taunt you while you're dead, you're sure to have fun. So what are you waiting for, soldier!? Get to work!!
AFTERLIFE;-;Tell someone you hate about this and watch as they helplessly clock in over 1000+ hours and lose all their money Well worth the 10 gigs of memory on my PC 10/Hats would lose life again
Radioactive Waste;-;This ame is cool with a nice trading feature and graphics which fit
BA | Amir;-;Beware the Hat Simulator
Santa's Little Tristful Botanist;-;Awesome! Love it <3
Iron Scorpion;-;Someone obliterated me with a rocket launcher, becoming my nemesis. Beat my nemesis to death with a fish. He then dominated me again with a frying pan. So I threw a jar of urine at him and headshotted him with a bow and arrow. Then he stabbed me in the back with an ice pick and froze my corpse. So I set him on fire with a gun that fires rainbows. We became best friends, then spent the rest of the round doing the Conga. 11/10 would conga again.
Moosey;-;It works, worth playing, it's free.
Dempt Incandescent Kt \ [T] /;-;the epic and best team fps you'll play >:3
$$$$$;-;hot tf2 yaois!!!!!!!!!
Jukebox, Lord of the TF2:GO;-;An incredibly balanced FPS with absolutely tons of replayability. It's a great game to play!
Official Trade Bot;-;what a cool game to play .. join me now and lets rock !
Toroi;-;My hours. help. I wrote something for real! These hours are legit, I played this game a lot in the past to avoid some tragic stuff in real life. I was young and didn't really have my gaming consoles anymore because of my brothers and I had a really bad pc, which i still own. TF2 was one of the games i could play pretty well on this pc but with horrid graphics, but it was one of the more fun games I installed. I met some real cool and nice people on this game as well as people who i plan to keep by my side. The community back then was more humble compared to nowadays. You have competitive gamers who spam their bind keys with unfunny/gross jokes and very obnoxious people who are either yelling at you or telling you to do specific things to win the game. When really, it doesn't even matter if you win or lose. However, you also have those people who are really awesome and you may meet some nice friends along the way! Although you never know what kinda person you're going to meet on this game. In my honest opinion, if you want to have a game to just waste time on (and money) or just mess around with people you know (which is what I do now), this is perfect. Esspecially the mann vs. machine co-op. I mainly play that now. Although to me, the game lost its touch, update wise, and I moved onto other games. I believe it's worth a shot to try it out but other than that, I'd keep it as a casual game. I don't think the competitive scene is worth getting into anymore because it's being flooded by crude people. Atleast from my experiance after over about 4+ years of playing it just got worse and worse. You will eventually be tied into drama even if you try to avoid it. You'll be more stressed than actually having fun, I'll tell you that! Although in all seriousness, this game is losing its touch and probably isn't worth making it your main game MAINLY because the updates they've been releasing are becoming very dull and not as great as they used to be. BUT, it's a great game to just play to pass the time and have fun! All you'll really notice nowdays is...people really love to trade more than actually play. Living off as a free to play would be very tough and you'd need to be patient with items you would want, unless you got that MONEY! Hope this helps. One last thing, I am not saying this game is bad in any way. I am saying that it's worth trying and playing with friends, or even meeting people! Although there are some downsides that you won't like, such as some stuff I pointed out above. Strictly towards the community. I personally think you should have this game as a side game rather than your come home to play sorta thing. Have it as a once in a while game, because it's nothing to be big about, unless you really do not like most of the millions of other games out there. Just give it a shot and see what you think! Have fun <3
Vale;-;Can you name any other unmodded First Person Shooter that lets you play as a cocky and fast Bostonian that can slap the hell out of urine throwing Australian campers with a fresh atlantic fish wrapped in fine christmas lights, eat a bucket of fried proccessed poultry over their corpses, and then get hit with an exploding cannonball launched from an African-Celtic one eyed alcoholic who can leap yards into the air from his own explosives while weilding a mystic ancient talking ghost claymore? I thought so.
A bLuE cOw;-;If you bind forward to a button on your mouse, you can play pyro and eat at the same time
UnfunnyName;-;The vicious cycle of Team fortress 2 First when you'll arrive in the game, you'll want Weapons, tons of them. Then you'll see that everyone has hats, and you'll want these, a tons of them. Then you'll realize that hats doesn't matter, only skill count, so you'll want a lot of skills, tons of them. Then new weapons will be added, and you'll want them, all of them. Then a new hat will be added and you'll want it, cause it'll be fancy on your main class. Then you'll realize again, that you don't give a damn about hats, all is about is skill. Then when you have waited for 3 years, new weapons will be added, and you'll want them. And then you realize that you spent like 2000 hours of your life for this, met great friends, and you'll have a server where's you feeling like home, and you discovered so much things via the community, it learnt you so much. Then the rude reality of life, bring you on earth, and this game is here, Waiting for you to play 1,2,3... hours, and you'll be happy to see that all your good friend are still here.
[CotC] King Conga Gandhi;-;Oh, and if you're wondering, the new update, Gun Mettle, did NOT ruin TF2 for me. I actually find it a LOT more fun now! I think Jerma summed up this game pretty nicely... "Maybe you got like two Pyros that just installed the game ten minutes ago. They don't have any hats, they're spraying  and they're having a blast. They might even be at the wrong point. They might be going backwards to the point that's already been capped. On the same team, there's a Scout with a Hale's Own Scattergun. He's got 18 kills with a 17 killstreak, he just got 18. He's going 'I just got 18, sick!' He runs up the stairs, he's trying his  off. He's get *beeping noises* dodging the 'Oh, the sentry almost got me!' He looks up to his left when he gets up the stairs on Gorge and there's two sandwich Heavies having a ing picnic. So he stops for a second and goes, 'Two... nnnggh!' so he walks forward and gets blown up by a soldier's rocket next door... ...The two sandwich Heavies then decide to move their picnic. There's ants. 'There's ants here, honey. I wanna get out of here.' So they get up, they pack their sandwiches, pack up their lunches, and their breakfast, and whatever the  they're eating. They get up and walk toward the door to go to RED because they think, 'That spot near the A point for RED is pretty good.' They walk out the door, and they see four Level 3 Sentry Guns pointing at them. They get shot a million times and blow up, and there's like nine Engineers swinging their wrenches in random directions. The BLU Scout, at this point, respawns, and walks by the at least 3-4 statues because we all know there's four people AFK when you play this game, you go by the museum of people standing still. He walks out the door and readies his weapon, he's ready, 'I'm going to get another 20 killstreak, just you watch Gaben, I'm going to praise Gaben!' And he goes forward and starts shooting, and he gets backstabbed by a Spy that has been sitting with the Cloak and Dagger in the corner for at least the last 68 seconds." Normally when I do reviews, I turn into a critic and start to examine that game, pointing out every little flaw and pro and determining a final score. However, Team Fortress 2 (or TF2 for short) helped me make so many memories that if I actually tried to make a fair review on it, it would still be way too biased to consider a valid review. Team Fortress 2, is, obviously, an amazing game. The teamplay is necessary and going out and attacking solo may be difficult. You need teammates in order to survive and win. The graphics are unique to a shooter game and really makes it a special game. I'm not here to explain the gameplay or graphics or whatnot. I love this game because of its charm. The game has such a unique and diverse cast of characters, you can't help to love all of them at some point. Scout is cocky and overconfident. Spy, another one of the characters in the game, is technically Scout's father. Soldier is a crazed WWII American patriot. He never actually joined the Army, but instead, he had his own personal Nazi killing spree. His roommate was a magician named Merasmus, who grew to hate Soldier. Pyro is mysterious, but portrays the world as one big happy paradise, known as Pyroland. Demoman is a Scottish alcoholic who, due to Merasmus, lost his eye that is now haunted. Heavy, although he appears to be dim-witted, is actually very intelligent and looks over three sisters. Engineer is very intelligent as well, and his grandfather was a major contributor to keeping the war with RED and BLU continue. Medic isn't fond of normal forms of medicine, but is still an important member nonetheless. Sniper is from New Zealand, but was raised in Australia. He prefers working from a distance and his backstory is very similar to Superman's. Spy is the master of disguise, and is technically Scout's father, as said before. Of all the characters, he appears to be the most "mature" and appears to be the ringleader at many times. Not only that, but the game has an interesting story. I would not like to get too detailed with it. However, it makes little to no sense but is still funny, engaging, and gives TF2 much more depth. There is also a storyline that takes place a few years later where Mann Co. is being attacked, so the mercenaries have to defend it, called Mann vs. Machine. This game mode ties in with the TF comics, which explain many characters' backstories and is currently still in the works as of this review. The other comics (all of which can be found on TF2's official website) are all funny and charming in their own way as well. The community has been quite debatable on how nice it is at many times, but in the end, it's still an overall great community. I've seen people give out stuff, others mentor some of the newbs (something I do as well) along with much, much more. Yes. the game is considered a "pay-to-win game" but it isn't necessarily a pay-to-win game. With lots of patience, you will get what you want from the game, whether it be hats, weapons, or whatever it is you want. The game has a learning curve that isn't too steep, but become dedicated and you'll fall in love with it. No matter how many times you rage to a W+M1 pyro that destroyed your 16 killstreak, or cheer when you unbox an Unusual, or maybe discover a few friends or learn a few things, Team Fortress 2 has been a huge part of my PC gaming life and without it, I would be as bored as hell. I cannot recommend this game enough, and I hope that many more memories are made on here. Valve may be cash cows, but you can't help but admit they are amazing when it comes to making games. Portal, Half-Life 2, Counter-Strike, but this game stands out from the rest to me. Do I recommend this game? Yes, yes, yes, YES.
Nerd House;-;Team Fortress 2. Being ranked as the third most-played game [steamcharts.com] on Steam, Team Fortress 2 is probably one of the best free-to-play games we've got. Why is it so popular? Let's take a look, shall we? First off, the obvious: It's free. 100% free. This means its accessible to everyone on Steam. This is just the icing on the cake though. What really shines about TF2 is the game itself. Team Fortress 2 usually consists of two teams (Red and Blue) going head to head against each other. Sometimes fulfilling certain objectives or just downright killing each other. There are many, many maps and modes, such as Payload, Capture Points, and Mann VS Machine. But the general idea no matter the map or mode is to KILL EVERYTHING THAT MOVES! And my god, is it fun to do so. The game has 9 playable mercenaries, each actually being a certain "class". Each class is divided into 3 different roles: Offense, Defense, and Support. Let's go over each role and class. Offensive roles specialize in dealing damage to the opposing team. These are your main attack force. Scouts are the speedy hit and run class, with the ability to double or even triple jump depending on equipped items. Soldiers pack a bit more firepower with their rocket launchers, which gives them not only power, but mobility due to the ability known as "rocket jumping". The Pyro is great at setting the opposition on fire, as well as extinguishing burning teammates using an airblast. Defensive roles serve to inhibit enemy access and to hold enemies back from vital points on the map. Overall, the defensive group has the most firepower of all the groups. Demomen can safeguard areas with stickybombs that they can detonate when enemies come by. Heavies are great for mowing down incoming troops and pushing back forces. Heavies can also keep enemies in an area while whittling their health for teammates to finish off. Engineers can build Sentry Guns for effective area defense, as well as build Teleporters and Dispensers for logistical support of the team. Support classes cannot hold the fight on their own, but their specialized abilities can tip the balance in their team's favor. They offer the offensive and defensive classes an extra edge in battle and can help turn the tide of the game. Whether crippling the enemy advance from behind or keeping teammates healed, the support classes are always handy to have around. Medics are the team healers, capable of providing numerous buffs depending on their equipments. Spies are great for sneak attacks or eiliminating key threats. Snipers excel at long range, also eliminating key threats, as well as extinguishing burning teammates with jarate and providing a damage boost to teammates. Next, let's look at the presentation. TF2 has a very unqiue art style. It's somewhat cartoonish, but very appealing. It's simple, and un-complex. But it doesn't need to be complex. It's simplicity is it's strength. Everything is detailed enough to where you can easily tell whats going on, what a specific model or item is, and they all stand out. The soundtrack is also very appealing and catchy, especially the main theme. I personally have it as a ringtone/alarm tone on my smartphone! :) One of the best aspects of TF2 is the Steam Workshop. Users can submit designs for items and weapons, and possibly have them added to the game! A very lucrative sub-market has also emerged from this game in the form of the Crate Keys. That's a whole different ballgame in and of itself, so we won't get into it here. During normal gameplay on most servers, you can obtain random items, weapons, and sometimes crates, and taunts....through the item drops system. You can only receive so many drops per week, and you will get them randomly as you play. You can use these items and weapons to customise your mercenary's loadout, or you can use them to craft other items, hats, and weapons. You can take multiples of items and craft them into Scrap, then Reclaimed Metal, then Refined Metal. You can then use these metals to craft specific class weapons/items, among other things. The crafting system is simple yet robust, with lots of possiblities. Some of it is very luck based. You can take some very common items and end up crafting a super rare hat or gun worth a lot of moolah on the Steam Market! All-in-all, Team Fortress 2 is just a very fun game. Endless entertainment awaits when you start up this game, especially if you play with friends on your favorite server. Probably the best free-to-play game on Steam. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=383235670 Highly Recommended Be sure to check out Nerd House Gaming for more reviews!
Mr Squiggles;-;How to play Team Fortress 2: Be polite, Be efficient, Have a pan to kill everyone you meet.
pacsomepuppes;-;> I was only 10 years old. > I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. > I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. > Then I got my first hat, The gibus. > Suddenly everything changed. > I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' > I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. > I had so many hats, I loved them all. > But then someone traded me, I accepted. > They offered an Unusual for all my hats. > It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. > But no Unusual, He scammed me. > I lost it all. > I was so sad I cried for hours. > Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. > I went to bed after praying. > I felt warm. > I looked behind me, It was Gaben! > He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning Team Captain. > Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning Team Captain and I was naked. > I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. > Hats are love. Hats are life. TF2: 11/10 Best hat simulator 1981 Overall, I'd give this game 9 out of 10 Gabe Narwalls Shoutout to ObsidianObelisk17 for making a youtube vid of this Showout to TheDisableBore for making a comic of this I cringe re reading this :smug:
Flexi;-;Ruined my life and cost me over 500. 10/10 would recommend to friends and family
Special;-;Team Fortress 2 is the most realistic hat simulator created to date. There is absolutely no other simulator quite like this one. The first time you start the simulator, you join a server where you can play a minigame where you show off your hats and items. If you kill a person three times in a row in the minigame, you get your very first hat: the Gibus. This is where it really starts; To play the simulator correctly, you have to spend money in the market place, made by Valve. After that, while you play the minigame, you can find hats which you can trade for, or collect! There is many other people who wants to collect and trade hats, just like you! After you collect enough items and/or hats, try joining a trade server! There, the REAL fun begins! Good luck, and beware of ending up poor!
Gandalf;-;This is a great free to play game :D
//(new mouse);-;its a really good game and almost never gets boring
NullResistance;-;This game is a First-Person Shooter, with a lot of costomization, fun gamemodes, big community, and good gunplay. This game is very fun if you play with good people or even your friends.
coolrocks;-;terribad game 0/10 everyone is a scrub would not spend any time on it
[GFRL] GamingOnion;-;Endless opportunities of fun. 10/10
Slightmist;-;Its free, its fun, and HATS!
Suicidal Cupcake;-;I am so pro at the spy class like omg xD
MyNameJohn;-;Great fps, Really like the well thought out characters and their backstories.
Mr Anders;-;This game is awesome! Chek this out!
Gerard1142;-;This is an Awesome first person shooter game thats awesome to play with your friends, the different game modes make this game even more awesome and complete for all people
sponge bobu;-;I really like this new update :D
Rok-Weiler;-;Download it now! Even if you don't like it by any chance, it's F2P so it's a win/win! EDIT: Now a conga simulator with plenty of unusual taunts, i'm not sure where this game is going anymore. Download it still, it's a good game, but TF2 is shifting the meta into an unusual (Pun intended) state. Don't forget hats!
PITY"""""""""""""""""""""""""""";-;GAME TO PRO. MAKES YOU SPEND MONEY. LOVE IT.
Wingsfield;-;love this game, one of my favorites
[KSG] Dr.Leiferricson;-;Well..I bought the game years ago when it was sold on a disc. i was like in elementary school and i enjoyed the game. But then i kinda stopped and lost the activation code for it. so i couldnt play it. But Lately I saw it was F2P and was quite excited. To see that VALVe has kept a F2P game up like this, is impressive and is one of the reasons why VALVe is my favorite Game company. This game is great and will be for the years to come. Thanks for the great game
{nopants} Telemonic?;-;This. Is. The. BEST GAME EVAR. over 2000 hours and still strong. so ye. also ITS FREE
Best Recovery In Game;-;This is the best JRPG I've ever played. The customizability of your teammates is just ridiculous, and with over 400 Personas to summon, the game just oozes with content. My only problem is there are only 8 social links to do, and there aren't enough male characters; don't get me wrong, I love a JRPG with powerful female companions, but there's only one male in this game and it's the main character. There are also over 50 dungeons in the game, and while the game can be hard, the challenge is certainly one of the most enjoyable aspects of TF2. I give TF2 a 10/10, because it is the best JRPG ever since Call of Duty on the PS1.
muscular poops;-;Being upfront about this game is about as hard as a baloney sandwich. Nine classes, 3 base or "stock" weapons each, (unincluding the spy and engineer classes) with multiple abilities and different playstyles for each. That was the base game. Being upfront about this game now is about as hard as wrestling a polar bear with a machine gun strapped to its back in zero gravity. Same nine classes, same stock weapons. But due to updates, content additions and big roll-outs of weapons and hats, this game has changed unbelieveably. Now with new weapons for every class with all new statistics and abilities, strange-teir weapons, vintage-teir weapons, genuine-teir weapons, collector-teir weapons, strangifies, chemistry sets, killstreak kits and fabricators, unusual hats, australium weapons, keys, refined metal- you get it. There's a lot to take in. Team Fortress 2 even has it's own economey that functions similarly to real life ones. But after you learn about it, the game is truly a gem. Hundreds of gamemodes both company and community made, thousands of servers, thousands of maps- there's still a lot to take in. Playing well, developing a strategy, finding new friends and groups- still not done. Trading and finding new items to have, hats to wear, modifiers for your favorite weapons, and much more. If you'd like a quirky, challenging game with thousands of things to do, you're in luck, as Team Fortress 2 has it. If you'd like a serious, hardcore game with clans to join and other clans and groups to beat- you're still in luck, because Team Fortress 2 has that as well. Now stop reading! Go get the game! (p.s. it's free.) 10/10
{AGC Recruit} IciiFox;-;Best free game :D
Yukii;-;The game where you not play yet you trade The silliest multiplayer fps shooter game you can find :D
TonySpot;-;Best game ever! Gameplay is great, graphics are great, and trading is the bomb! Definetly recommend.
festeringMongoose HG-A;-;If you have Steam, but don't have TF2. Then I think you need to rethink your life decisions.
(Nitro leader)Crispy Dicks;-;Do you like taunting people? like laughing at the occasional CoD player? enjoy an economy? do you like blowing things up and make people flip? Well then play this, it contains all that and more!
cmite;-;10/10 would pay for hats again.
Papa Tyrone;-;The red vs. blue factor seems like a playful thing in this game, alot of the time red, and blue are depicted as teaming up quite a bit. That's what makes this game diffrent, and i love it.
Doc Xero;-;This was the reason I joined Steam. Thank you valve <3
TrademarkTM;-;Ah, team fortress 2. who couldnt love this title after all the content added and popularity it has across the globe. its fast paced and is so much fun to play with friends at almost any time. over all, a great expeariance.
Decadence;-;An excellent and fast-paced shooter from the past. A must have for everyone.
Pake;-;+The game is a fun FPS with multiple classes to vary up your play style and changes the way it is from other FPS's, then it just being a point and shoot with the regular FPS guns: smg, sniper, assualt rifle, etc. But TF2 adds a more expansive take with weapons: flamethrower, minigun, sentries, etc. I'd say this game is worth it since it's been pretty active for 8 years. (to this date) -Although the game has multiple hats, misc. etc. for you to wear on your characters, and different types of weapons (genuine, vintage, strange, etc.) with along the trading the comes along with this game and can get you into a fuss over wanting an item for a long time and then going into the habbit of buying everything from either the Mann Co. Store or the Steam Market. This game will consume your money more then "pickpocketers" in Europe. Although the game is a new a fun FPS with still 8 years of active people and with the downfall of trading I still give this game a.. 9/10
Kick In The Dick;-;This game can ruin lives and ruin friendships, at the same time collect hats and guns. 10/10
Dominus Devia;-;Best f2p game !!!
Wumbo Cube;-;Its a nice game that can get very addictive.
Eent - Add me on new profile;-;Incredibly diverse game. You can either play or trade, the game itself is incredibly easy to get into, no overpowered classes, everything is well balanced, easy to adjust to. The trading part is less easy to get into, however once you are in, like the gameplay, its incredibly fun and diverse. I have played this game for so long, and while I occasionally get bored, I am yet to find a game on par with TF2, gameplay, uniqueness and trading-wise.
tf500;-;Great game, lots of fun
Makigumo;-;Download this game right now! It's the best f2p game i ever played! Total fun,nice community,editable characters (hats,weapons,miscs) many servers for everyone and maaaany maps/gamemodes. i suggest you also play MvM,awesome zombiewave-like gamemode but with ROBOTS and it's nearly bugless.All in all,it's a totally awesome game. 10/10
Tiger Spirit;-;Team Fortress 2 or TF2 is a phenomenal game. Not only has the community been strong for several years now but the game is free to play. Which means you never have to dish out money to be the best player, in fact one can argue that the best weapons are the default weapons because they are simply neutral. The only reason you would ever want to spend money is if you run out of space from the constant FREE item drops, which only comes down to $1. Everything else is cosmetic and will only aim to make you look like the ultimate badass. TF2 does a great job of not forcing you to pay to be good or be ahead of someone, so if you truly want a free to play game join the community!
DieHard Veteran JazzyLou;-;Its a very fun game because you gwt to do fun things like take pictures have diffrent weird guns and you have 9 classes like Scout solider pyro medic and spy im not gonna spoil the rest have fun if you get the game!
LemonStealth;-;Ruined my life. 5 stars
Astro;-;TRADE YOUR SOUL
-[FF]-IAmDerpyBorn;-;Its an awesome multiplayer experience just get it and see wat u find out
Kringel;-;Team Fortress 2 is one of Valve's most successful games ever made. You can customize classes. It has alot of sick but hilarious humor to it. It has all kinds of gamemodes as well. Used to be $20 but now it's F2P A very fun game you should get.
MonsterRoar;-;in my opinion one of the best shooter game there is out there simply for the fact that it's wacky and fun and mostly filled with nonsense...an amazing game defenetely recommended for those searching for a challange or just for those searching for a fun game
Whole Milk;-;awsome game!endless fun and opertunity!!!!
Shewy;-;Best f2p fps. Teamwork based, nice graphics, great gameplay. YOU WILL LOVE EEEHT <3
Crona the Spooky Snowball;-;It has hats. What more do you need?
t 2 !;-;Nice and Fun
ayy lmao;-;This game is very fun, because of its difference with the other FPS games (or should I say TFPS?). Its difference is in the personality of the characters, and they each do different things. Not like 4 people do the same thing just different models. The main reason I play this game is because I am a server hoster and I love modding the game. ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- Q1: Is that Redstone? A1: YES Q2: What is my server Called? A2: SodiumHydroxide's server with Infinite MvM Cash and Ammo Q3: Redstone-Minecraft... Oh, so you play Minecraft? A3: YES and I also host a Minecraft server Q4: Are you a coder? A4: YES OF COURSE I AM YOU DUMBO Q5: Did you buy TF2 Premium A5: No and I hate people yelliing "BUY STOUT SHAKO FOR 2000 REFINED!!!!!!!!!!!!"
Fartrell Cluggins;-;this game is really fun once you get the hang of what you're doing
Merc;-;I kicked a man while yelling "Pass the Whiskey". Wait...wat
Kievus _;-;g4b3n plz mor weps. i cri evritim.
Pig101_Gamer;-;Very Very good game best free game out there well done
Jabanti;-;GOTTA MOVE THAT GEAR UP
Alire;-;Da best free to play. PERIOD
|Jake|;-;This Is A Great Game I Meet alot of people on TF2
Dr. Scientist The First;-;The best modern FPS Strategy game out there :D It might take a while before you get the hang of it... you really need a friend that know what they are doing. Over all 10/10
C4N4D14N C3PH4L0P0D5;-;You're insane if you have a steam account but don't have this.
1st sopn;-;The best shooting game ever
memezilla;-;Ruined my life and cost me over 150 Pounds. I suggest you download it.
Kartze;-;Team fortress 2 is a fun free to play game. I simply love it for all the unigue classes.
Daniel Corgi;-;hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats guns hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats hats 10/10
Makise Kurisu;-;Words can't describe how perfect this game is. 10/10
Uncle Badtouch is sleeping;-;the best game ever aka "hat simulator"
MUDKIPZZZ;-;this game is so awesome
Sean bean;-;Too many teams games? Your fortress getting to lonely? Need a number 2? Gaben's got you covered -Dramaic music- Staring: Bruce willis and Bruce wayne In Bruce I've gotta bruce 2! From the directors of "Gaben! wheres my car!"
hotjdog;-;you play or i beat you
Arashi;-;Great game, and Free-to-Play! Amazing!
A Complete Magic Potato;-;this game is awesome
Oli;-;One of the best (if not the best) free-to-play games out there. It's not only fun as hell, but it's also the most balanced game I've ever played, completely free of any pay-to-win aspects. In my honest opinion, this is the finest shooter ever made.
twitch.tv/justrepairmebro;-;This is the best hat simulator in existence. This sounds silly and it is... until you've played it. It won't be long before you find yourself involved in the meta trading game crafting weapons and on the quest for ever cooler hats to replace your Ghastly GIbus and prove you are no longer a noob. You will finally give in on microtransactions and be glad you did. As far as gameplay goes... well, it's probably the best class based shooter out there. The game works and is always kept polished and regularly updated and supported by the community and Valve. With the 9 different classes, there are many more ways to play just based on what your item loadout is, but nothing is really overpowered, just situational in it's advantage. The competative scene is real and there is an incredibly high skill cap within that; time and experience in the game to the tune of thousands of hours actually mean something in terms of your ability to be good at it. And probably the thing that's better than any of this: It's freaking FUN.
aNOOBios;-;hats hats baby
Mr. Muffin;-;A great and also a funny game. The diversity of items and maps is unbelievable. I recomend!
LM^| Tye;-;Me 2 months ago: "This game is over rated. And this hat craze is silly. I won't get addicted or buy any hats. What zombies you must be to do such a thing." Me now: "I think I can sell my kidney for some money to buy hats.. Wait, I already did. Maybe I can go without my other kidney. They're over rated, anyways." 10/10 Would waste whole paycheck on.
Ummm..;-;This game is awesome when I found this game I couldn't stop playing it! :D Thumbs up
Zleoots senpai desu~;-;I love tf2 and its a great game. Whether you play with friends, or by yourself, its fun to play. The kinds of things that you can do in it are immense and there is no end to the fun you can have while playing. And the best part... you dont have to pay to get the game.
Behind The Mask;-;Team Fortress 2 has been one of my finest gaming experiences ever. I've played many multiplayer games over the years and I must say TF2 has proven to be one of the most innovative and constantly changing (for the better) title I've ever dealt with. Though I'll keep this short I will comment that every class feels unique and every character organic; with a playstyle and personality that each can call their own. This is perhaps my main drawing point to the series as their are few thinks more fun then dominating your enemies while your Demoman slurs drunkenly about the battlefield with a sword and decapitates a Heavy with a Minigun. In all my time playing this game the experience has never diminished and I hold high hopes for the future of this game,
hacker000000;-;This game is soo fun and i cant stop playing it.
Cat~;-;this game is not good its its... GREAT!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Sloma;-;Great game, s of fun in it. I've played TF2 for over 1,4k hours already, traded a lot in it (i've over 3k trades already) and i can tell u that this game is great. Now i don't play it at all but it simply got boring to me because i've played it exclusively for long time and any game gets boring when u play it and noting else. I score TF2 for 10/10 and recommend it to everybody.
Scraggy (no computer);-;Team Fortress 2 offers a great weapons system, rewarding gameplay, and many other things that just make it the amazing game that it is.
f u t u r e;-;Hand built a $950 computer to play this game with friends. Steam suckered me with its sweet sweet sales, and now I have 50 games, but this is why I came and where I stay.
ZeR0;-;This game is amazing!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Banner;-;This game is definitely part of my "top 5 best games vis" In this game you have 9 classes with different features, personalities, stories and of course weapons. Hats plays a big role in the game, but it is completely illogical because no other FPS does not have any hats :3 Hats are awesome as well.
Dewzazter;-;A must have Free-to-Play game that is well balanced in all classes and a bunch of the weapons. If you haven't played it already, you're missing out on a lot of fun.
[TLGS] Mario-x;-;Friends don't let friends not play TF2. If you have not played yet, I hope you are downloading TF2 as you read this.
The Amazing Mister Z;-;Oooooh, It's sublime, it's godlike, it's GOOOOOOOOOOOOOD.
Hisces;-;Tf2 is a wildely known game that everyone should like! Great Commuinty Great people Great Everything!
the blood driven wolf;-;this game is awsome
New Brian;-;This is the best FTP game I have ever played and would recommend this to anyone looking to have fun without spending money!
YesterdayZ;-;Awsome!
Isvaffel;-;This game is very good for FPS sheep. Best class is Spy https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=cXVBPgl9xWA
RsRhMugsNur;-;u should play this
y%Sj;-;i rate this game a team out of 5. i played a while back, got a sword for nutella braveheart, got addicted. now i spend my time beating people up with pans and hams on a viking boat.
Piggyback Bandit;-;10/10 would sell soul again
Starman;-;Ya know what? this game will swallow your time and money for some good months before you realize that,and overall it's just a place for s and s to show off their fancy expensive hats and mock you on your every atempt of learning this game.Free-to-play? NO ING WAY. if you want something decent on your backpack it recquires an abusive amount of money.It's a bloody disgrace. BUT I FREAKING LOVE IT SOMEHOW. 10/10
EpicMonsterHD;-;THIS IS A FUN GAME!
G3TR3KtM8;-;a gosh darn good game. frickin luv it!
Mr_Headshot;-;This is the very good game.
DisgracedAlchemist;-;great fun game, good fun to play with friends...you will indefinately need a mouse i would reccomend this for people who are looking for a game to play with friends. if your looking for the real steam experience your looking at it. only one real nit pick, guess it would be the file size, but your looking at a good game, also the maps take a long time to load (dont hate, my internet not that good) this is a great game
fawsh;-;It's the best free-to-play game that will satisfy a variety of tastes. Play this game and you will lose many hours from your life.
Ronan620;-;Life? Psh.. Life are for wussies, Spent over 50$ on this game. 10.1/10
AV | Jedi(fla)master;-;Highly competitive shooter for tryhards. Make no mistake on that. Valve markets it as something else but it doesn't change what it is. It's NOT easy to pick up. If you're new to quake-like shooters, you'd better have a friend already playing it explain the basics to you, or you might get frustrated by some things. Public pvp and pve (known as mvm in tf2) servers are suitable for casual players once the basics are learned. If you don't want to go comp you can stop there and have quite a bit of fun. Sweaty competitive tryhards will really see where this game shines though. Well balanced, competitive modes will bring your tactical sense and deathmatch ability to a real test. Despite Valve overlooking the competitive format, multiple leagues have arisen offering unforgettable experience for teams on any skill level. If You want to do team based esports, look no further than TF2, this game has more competitive spirit in it than LoL and DOTA combined. As for visual aesthetics the game looks well despite its age, thanks to its stylised look. Some items from content updates are very much out of the game's theme, though, which is very disappointing given how unique that theme is. The game is poorly optimised in some instances too, (especially mvm), but that can be solved by fps boosting configs. All in all: Iz good.
BambaShort101;-;Entertaining, addicting must-have game
Apashe;-;This Game Is Great
Coffee;-;Team Fortress 2 is the 2nd installment of the Team Fortress series (TF, TFC and TF2). It features 9 different classes, that have different habilities and weapons. Scout, Soldier, Pyro, Heavy, Demoman, Medic, Sniper, Engineer and Spy, this are the classes to choose. The game is known for its huge amount of hats, which can be buyed from Mann Co. Store or be earned by drops or achievements. It has constant updates, great amount of hats and weaponry, and also its alternate gamemode, Mann Vs Machine, where you'll need to fight waves and waves and waves of robots were ONE of 'em holds the Bomb. Don't let them get to the hatch! You will enjoy this game! And also is F2P, so don't make any excuses and play it! You will not regret it!
[KI] REKT-Angle;-;The diversity makes it a truly unique game. I reccomend that you try it out.
Smathiss;-;Click here to write a recommendation to all your friends
Morpheon;-;This game is the best free-to-play game I have played on PC ever, great graphics, clever maps and decent players, although there are a few squeaker brats that do tend to get annoying. It is free-to-play, and although there are in game transactions, you can run through 90 hours of gametime and not have to pay a single cent to have a lot of fun. The only real problems are the occasional few squeaker brats and the power of the computer your using.
(JGOODG) Garrys Fortess 2;-;This game made my life it is very awesome i think you should download it and play :)
Animepocalypse;-;fun shooter, do not judge this book by its cover. With balance of chaos and fun this is a good first shooter for anyone.
Norninja/Lars;-;Seriously the best FPS I have ever played.
..........;-;It's amazing best multiplayer game!
mccormick1392;-;It's a fun game and its free. Nuff said.
E AQUELA DO PAPAGAIO?;-;Well, it's hard for me to describe TF2. How can someone talk using his reason about something that he loves? Damn, i don't know how. For me there isn't no words to describe this incredible piece of . That's not just a game. It's clearly much more than that. The only thing i can say is that this thing is really ing amazing. No further comments about. Ps. i REALLY REALLY LOVE THAT CRAP. :D
DPerpes(selling key for 15.77);-;this game is a god of games so much stuff conga's to hats im happy with all my hats
Pantong;-;400 hour free two play game!
potterman28wxcv;-;When a FPS meets team play, fun, and strategy :) Team Fortress 2 is a game that looks simple at first glance. Just pick a class, shoot, kill everybody, have fun. But in the end, you realize that it's not that simple. Every class has strengths and weaknesses ; the more balanced is a team, the more chance the team has to win. And once you really understand all the classes and know them all, the game is just bomb. So in this game, being a pro at CS or Quake 3 Arena doesn't mean you'll oneshot everybody here ; you've got to think carefully about what you do, and help the best possible your team. That's precisely what I love in this game : each class is useful, and no class is overpowered. I do not count the number of games that have been won because I was a Medic or an Engineer (which are support classes), and because there were enough big guys in my team to do the rest. And at last but not least, you have in this game a lot of fun contents (cf the pyro glasses ; or when blood becomes balloons, and fire becomes rainbow), which is the icing on the cake. The only backdrop : there is a lot of noobs in public games that don't know how to play, and most of the time, it's the team who has the highest number of non-noobish player who wins. But that shouldn't be a problem for you if you're looking just for fun :)
Stewpid is Back;-;This game is a EXTREMELY addictive team based shooter where having everyone working togetheir is essential. Even if you don't like the base game VALVe (Volvo Pls) has had good support for custom game modes like Jailbreak PropHunt VS Saxton Hale. The game has a very deep trading system basically created by the community. If you have the space and and bandwith this game is a must get. Atleast try it
Endy;-;good game. fun game. hats. a lot of hats. pixels. a lot of pixels. 0/10
Frosts;-;Im Loving This Game So Far ! ( as you can see by my hours spent on here.) Ive Played this game a few years ago but never was able to trade and I was missing out on the best part Now that I Am able to trade im experiencing the Full Game !
Kingofvoglers;-;Amazingly addictive game. For a free game its amazing and is one of the best free steam games out there.
Stab;-;10/10 420 BLAZE IT ~ILLUMINATI
SLuNDRI MON;-;very good sandwich... no sory game
BLADEZ64;-;It has hats 'n' guns. Pretty much it. I don't really play it much because all the other players are incredibly OP kinda making it a bit hard to play... 7/10
Kumatora;-;Ruined my life and my steam friends life 10/10 Best game that will ruin your life
Jackie D34Gl3;-;this is a very fun and creative game to play ( clocked up over 1000 hours ) hope you will enjoy it as much as i did
Childish Gambeaner;-;Play this if you hate yourself
matt z;-;I LOVE THIS GAME ITS SO OSM
ravioli;-;It sucks because I always die
PLasmaBLast;-;As far as I know, it's the only class-based multiplayer shooter where a crazed rogue soldier can detonate a fast talking kid from Boston using only a futuristic rocket launcher meant for mangling cows. Oh, and did I mention he was flying through the air at Mach speeds, while sporting a bright lime green Santa beard, a Dr. Seuss hat with money forever falling from the brim, and an eagle taped to his shoulder? Not to mention the Scout was doing the conga with a massive man from Russia, who was obsessed with sandwiches. Yeah. The Soldier's probably screaming something along the lines of "MAGGOTS!" too. Gabe, we waited nine years. We got update after update, waiting for the incredible potential of this masterpiece to be unleashed upon the PC gaming community. Now, because the situation mentioned above is entirely possible within ANY game I have ever played (and enjoyed, for that matter,) I can die a happy person. My soul will be rested with nothing left desired from this world. I can indeed say, this game was, without a doubt, worth the weight. PLAY THIS GAME RIGHT NOW, OR GABE'S WRATH WILL FOREVER BE INFLICTED UPON YOU AND ALL OF YOUR FAMILY TREE. *not really. But, seriousally, play the game. It is extremely good, the best in the FPS genere, in my opinion. Give it a whirl. IT'S FREE. 10/10 Best Gabe Ever
XXX_SANIC_REKT_1V1_M8_XXX;-;I liked this game,Never had it... but i liked very much...
Choo Choo^^;-;Excellent game, good to have fun with your friends or just random people. AND ITS FREE! So why not just give it a try, 100% sure you'll enjoy it!
whoop;-;Hats. Great game.
Captain McHaggis McGreasy Jones;-;love this game and the community!
Dark Void | trade.tf";-;You have to play this game. YOU will be amazed on how this game is and you may end up playing this game. You have 9 classes to choose from and each with their strengths and weaknesses. See you on the battlefield
MSi SKorpion| BrickHamster;-;Simply put, TF2 is a comical FPS that redefines what we look for in a shooter game. This game never gets old. In addition to the addicting gameplay, there's a whole economy of trading that comes with it. All in all, TF2 is a must-have for any and all game collections.
Save Our Sandvich;-;Graphics - The graphics for Team Fortress 2 might not seem up to par with other Valve games, but it's the art style that matters. The cartoonish graphics fit so well with this game, I wouldn't have it any other way! 5/5 Music - This game has amazing music! It's a shame we typically only hear it on the menu and during events. 3/5 Story - While Team Fortress 2 does have a story, it's never told in game. The story can be found on the wikipedia page, if you're interested in reading it. It explains why the two teams are fighting, at least. 2/5 Replayability - Many gamemodes, maps, and weapons always being added. Don't like what they have? Modded game mods range from far and wide, Prophunt, Saxton Hale, the list goes on. It's never a bad time when you launch this game again. 5/5 Gameplay - The gameplay is nice, and balanced. Something other FPS's can't always say. Not pay to win, either, which should be noted considering it's also Free-to-Play! 5/5 Overall Score - 4/5 Good.
Gold'N Skillz  Vorducas Zizroth;-;I really recommend this game it's so great!
The Nerp;-;Great game and its even free :)!
Erin;-;like skyrim with hats
nothing;-;nice game eh
Chahoo;-;Excellent game. Allows for accurate gameplay with low graphics settings. Plus it's free, so anybody who is unable to afford a high performance computer can enjoy this gaming just as much! 10/10
SvagL #GT;-;Nice, awsome and cool game!
JSW12;-;If you have not played Team Fortress 2, then you should sit in a corner and think about your life! Team Fortress 2 might just be my favorite first person shooter games. You can choose from 9 classes, each one that has tons and tons of weapons and hats. If you think that it is boring just killing the other team over and over all the time, then you are wrong! Be warned that if you get this game, you will be sucked into it and you will not stop playing it! You will spend your days locked in a dark room with a bowl of Doritos by your side. You will become fat and lazy with no wife, no kids, and most importantly no life. Trust me, it has happened to me already. Remember that this game appears to be free except for one thing.... your life.
Savagedrone;-;Good game, found all my friends on it xP
vindicator;-;it is an amazing first person shooter
roban;-;nice game u can also airshot in this game
Hammie;-;Really awesome game <3 everyone should atleast try this game.
Terrified_Prune;-;good game, loads of fun
HAHAHAHA;-;Nice game :-)
Hell Ham;-;It's a really fun game. especially when you find a good team to play with.
Nabeel4Gamez;-;I sweat out this game so much!
-Moayad;-;An interesting and wonderful game, Best game for Free ever my rating 10/10 :)
Dingy Pup;-;It's free... Until you get adddicted enough to buy premium! Great game, try it
Tricky_Krumg1;-;Sick game, you definately want to play this, scratch that, you HAVE to.
Ze Scooty Booty Mang;-;Tired of COD? Want to get back to your Online-Shooter Games? Well you're in luck son, you're playing Team Fortress 2! You can find random items! If you buy somthing off the Mann Co. Store, You're going to have a nice time, trading, possibly ragequiting, "GET OWNED YOU DUMBASS !" time!
Skruffy Seliph;-;This game is like a leech. It slowly sucks the life-juice out of your body with every passing minute. Your funds will drop and you will be forced to eat soggy pieces of bread off of the ground as a source of nutrition. You will lose your religion, GabeN will become your love and your savior. Hats will become your only friends, as your real friends matter not. Overall, I rate Hat Simulator 2 a 10/10, would waste life to ValvE again.
Butthole Drugs;-;Tee ef too is da best hat trading simolator in da whorld
AbolishR |;-;Trading Fortress 2
RetroMextrans;-;This game gotta be one of the most fun and thrilling games I have ever played. It does not have any restrictions other than being premium which you gives you more inv slot. Other than that the game itself has so much freedom as it does not have a main objective to it. And of course, the hats...c:
Fucking Twinks_B69;-;Very addictive game!
The Pacifist;-;Unique game with 9 very different but essential classes
CharlieBoy;-;its a vereey good game
carnagekill12;-;Those pc requirements are old i think steam needs to change it no offense
George W. Bush did 7/11;-;Trade hats, shoot people, eat sandvich. 10/10 Best Game
Lone Snake;-;This game ruined my life. 10/10
P(L)uff;-;Good game. Had me playing for more than 1000 hours now
durk_nation;-;this game is so much fun and i will always give it a thumbs up!
Wolfotic;-;Ruined life. Lost Job. Girlfriend left me. Dog ran away. Haven't eaten or slept in two weeks. BUT THE FREAKING HATS MANNNN!!!! IT MAKES IT WORTH IT PLAY THIS GAME IT'LL RUIN YOUR LIFE BUT YOU WILL BE SEXY AS HELL IN THEM HATS I PROMISE YOU THAT!
Mk;-;i think everyone agree's that team fortress 2 is the most fun and creative FPS ever to rule the earth :3
Ledshot;-;this game has given me hours of fun and now its free theres no reason not to download it
WoWMike;-;You get a HAT ! And you get a HAT ! Everybody gets a hat ! 11 hats/10
(Insert Name Here);-;Stabbed a guy and threw a cigarette into his corpse 10/10
Bubble Butt;-;Just a rip off of Call Of Duty MW2 except without quick scopes. 2/10
Europe #bday;-;An FPS that introduces a different style of play. Nine classes, each have a different task in the team, and each require different skill sets to play. Not only does one strive to master the classes, but also the various weapons unique to each class. Despite coming with a cost to have weapons (whether money or time in trading), it is definitely worth it if you have time. I don't recommend this to people who are in a busy point of their lives, as it may be addicting to experiment with loadouts and whatnot. Though, if you've got time, take a shot, it's worth your while even if you don't stick around. Also, as a final note, this game is far from a Pay2Win scenario. I've gained enough hours to have experimented with the many weapons, and I will say this: There are no weapons in the game that can be bought in order to destroy in a server. Even if a weapon has great stats (ie. The Back Scatter in the most recent update), in the long run the default is usually superior (unless someone has gained enough skill with such weapon). As long as you have skill, you can make a weapon destroy. Good luck and remember: This is TEAM Fortress 2.
luckie;-;Really great game! I recommend it! Really fun if you play with friends or different game modes!
Silph Co. is a Lie!;-;Oh TF2. I started steam wanted to play Garys Mod, but i did not have the money at the time. As i was looking on steam, i saw this and said "Hey, isn't that the multiplayer game i played on the orange box on Xbox" (I was little at the time. About 9-12 years old.) So, me being a new steam user, also with a slight (Major) case of not paying attention at the time, I didn't look at the price..... and accidentally "bought" the game. I cried for hours at the time because i had my father's credit card attached to this account. (i was 13 at the time, so be quiet.) When my dad looked at the price, he had his trademark sarcastic smile and he said: "well good job Co(errm, Trace, noone needs to know mah name.) you just made me spend $100 on a game!" Let me tell you, i saw my life flash before my eyes. (again, 13 and i had very little common sense... this was before I grew out of being a kid.) Then my dad laughed and said: "Oh i was just joking, dummy. it's a free game!" And that is how i got this game. Oh, what's that, you want a reveiw, not me rambling. *sigh* fine. This game, is Free. (uh Hurr Durr Dummy) Now, Free games are usually sub-par. But this game is different, due to it starting as a paid game, so it had a metric s*** ton of development. So the game is VERY polished. And is STILL polished. Now, time to divide this review into catagories. Gameplay, Controls, Graphics, Community, and it's Total Score. Gameplay: 9/10 This game has a great style of play. You want to know why? It's different. It is not call of duty with regenerating health, or BattleField with Giant maps. The maps are actually not that big, but are of decent size. TF2 has health bars. According to the COD fan that is my friend, That is Bulls***. But don't listen to him. Health bars are great. It makes the game FAIR.... most of the time. You see, with a health bar, it makes you see how long you have to live, and you care about that. without a health bar, you feel like you could run around and spam the SMG or AR. And, along with the health bar, you usually have long as hell respawn times, so you really do not want to die. Now, let's talk about the classes and importance. There are 9 different classes, each with a use. The scout is there to  off the other team and do chip damage, so others can kill them easy. The soldier is there to deal explosive damage to take down the guys with high health. The pyro is there to act as a counter to the soldier, demo, and spys, with fire to get the spys and airblast for rockets and stickybombs. Then we get to the demo, who can use sticky bombs for traps and deal explosive damage. The heavy is the allclass deterrent, as he can soak up damage, as long as you have a medic or sandvich. The engineer is there to add a line of defense, but the spy can ruin his day easily. The medic does what a medic should do, keep the team healed and shove a medigun up the heavy's . The sniper is there as the heavy killer as headshots at full charge do massive damage. The spy, the hardest class to master, is to get behind the enemy's lines and generally ruin the day. Now, along with nine classes, there are many weapons that are unlockable or craftable, each with an upside and a downside compared to the defaults. If you need to get to the action faster, get the Gloves of Running Urgently for the heavy, or the PowerJack for the pyro. Need to survive as a soldier? Use the BlackBox. The gameplay itself is very polished, fast-paced and generally fun as hell. And more than anything, it is balanced. Shall we move on? Controls: 7/10 The controls are good, but not the best at times. Yes, you can configure it, but i love playing with default controls on every game. WASD is always good, and M1,M2 and M3 are also good. But when the non-essential controls come to play, we have some problems. ZXC are used for character speech. Thats fine and dandy, but there are 9 different types of voicelines. so, the order goes as followed: ZX or C, then 12345678 or 9. But that's not the worst. CTRL is for crouch. not only does that hurt the pinky finger, but crouch is used a lot for explosive jumping and helping with jumping up larger objects. But the reason why the score is not lower is due to the customization for it. I, personally only changed crouch to L. SHIFT and that's really all, other than decline is at O and not K. And with that, let's move on. Graphics: 10/10 Now, Graphics do not make a game good. It only enchances the game. But that aside, the graphics are amazing Many people would say the cartoon-ish graphics make it a kid's game. Faaaaaaaaar from it. this game actually gets quite high with the gore factor, not as bad as some games, but still, quite the amount of gore. But the cartoon atmosphere gives the game a nice, fun feel. Sort of that stupid fun you get when you watch the loony tunes or play Little Big Planet. (my little sisters force me to play it with them.) Heck, sometimes it reminds me of Pokemon emerald with it's bright graphics. (yes, i grew up with emerald.) And when i look at any light-ish green in the game, I get a large rush of nostalgia because it reminds me of my favorite pokemon. (yes, i know i got the dress wrong in my pixel art. I'm working on it.) So, in short, the graphics are great, and gives me nastolgia, but will not contribute much to the score. Moving on to my least favorite part. Community: 6/10 Oh the TF2 community. you can be great at some times, but not all the time. Now, I am not a hater of anything, so long as you do not shove it in my face. Right now, TF2 is full of COD lovers, Bronys, pegasisters, demopans, Star_ lovers, Demospams, unusual flaunters, and more. Now, i am not saying these people are bad, far from it, but a large amount of these people shove it in our faces like we NEED these to survive. Not all, but a lot of them do this. But what redeems this catagory are the workshopers, map makers, good admins and hateblockers. The steam workshop has great stuff that would be great if it would be added. Some of the maps that people make are great, like Black Mesa and TrainSawLaser, even though that is a joke map. The admins on a lot of servers are nice, friendly, and generally are helpful. Hate blockers help with Haters, usually by adding logic into arguments and generally are great people. So, in general, there are a good amount of Fans who shove their interests in our faces, but the rest of the community helps with redemption. Total Score: 8/10 This game is amazing. For a F2P game, it is more than worth getting and is mostly essential to a steam user. Now, this is Silph Co. is a Lie, signing out to eat an omlet. Make sure to rate, post a comment and if i got anything wrong, feel free to correct me, as this is my first reveiw. so, thanks for reading, and tune into my Amnesia, The Dark Descent reveiw next mont.
M A C H E T E;-;This has been a great game since I bought it for $20. Valve never has let me down.
iSkeweR;-;I used to play this game alot back in the days, but i got sick of it, got sick of the people who always want the best hats and , even when they have the best hats, they really suck at the game, i remember a time when me and my friends were playing this game everyday, we didnt even have hats then, and there were people with unusuals, we literally wrecked them, anyway i gave up on this game, but now im back just for the gameplay, not the trading and all that, i just want to enjoy the game, even doe VALVe made it ridiculous with the new taunts and all that, but still i just want to play it.
Inri;-;That game is SO FREAKING AWESOME. You can  off people (literally), backstab, burn, shoot and almost anything else. And! This is only modern game, where rocketjumping is fun and useful. Definitely must have. Two things that game lacks: chainsaw and Molotov. There still katana and minigun though.
roban;-;nice game u can also airshot in this game
lolschrauber;-;Great shooter with a lot of variety Lots of weapons Lots of classes Lots of game modes Free to play - no reason not to try it
Clueless Sniper;-;This game is probbably the best Free to Play game i have ever played! So much fun you cant imagine!My favorite game!
Popalofiti, Enforcer of Gaben;-;Team Fortress 2. Valve knew what they were doing on this game! It's fun addicting, rage inducing and meal skipping and definitly worth your while! Especialy scince it's free to play! Anyone who doesn't have this game, I definitly recommend this to you and all of your friends!
{MadGamer};-;ITS REALLY FUN IF YOUR DONT LIKE IT THEN YOUR WEIRD IF YOU DONT HAVE IT........................ GET THE ING GAME
Assertive;-;Its a great multiplayer game that's very addicting! I reccomend this game to people who enjoy First Person Shooters!
The Suspect;-;Very fun and epic
ss-;-;This game... many nerds, 10/10 would kill nerds again
xMetalPocalypse666x;-;In my opinion, THE BEST free to play game on Steam available from what I've seen. If you love FPS's, you will love TF2. If you love a mix of strategy and classed-based combat, you'll love TF2. If you like comedy and goofiness influenced in gameplay, you'll love TF2. And if you like hats, well, you get the point. But truthfully, this is an amazing game. I honestly don't know why it's free, because it deserves to be a pay-to-play game. And another thing, my laptop is probably around 5 or 6 years old, and I'll be honest, not the best. But when I first launched it, it acted like it was nothing...high quality, too. So you really don't have to worry about it lagging so much, at least from your computer. Still depends on your connection to play multiplayer, of course. And if it is laggy on your computer, it was free anyways, all you have to do is delete it. But that should'nt be necessary. I'd actually play this game instead of any Call of Duty game anyday. Really you have to at least give it a try. My personal rating, 10/10. Hope you guys enjoy the game as much as I am!!
Glitch;-;Team work is the main task in this wonderful FPS. Valve has done it again making endless updates to this wonderful game called Team Fortress 2. Go check it out it's even free to play now on steam.
Ranka Lee;-;The rockets represent the hardships and malice that the soldier has been weighted with throughout his life of war. He doesn't believe what his eyes are telling him. All they show is limitation, the heavy burden of only succeeding with violence. He looks with understanding, to find out what he already knows, that his violence is essential for the team, for survival. And then he sees the way to fly.
PiNo;-;i love this game, rate is you think the same!
Space Muffin;-;Played the game for 2 years now and at almost 900 hours on record,the game still didnt get old and it's still as fun as 2 years ago. Really great game!
-Merfle-;-;I really like it, its my favourite game :D
Chosnuk;-;This game seduced me.
Bunny Hoppin';-;This game helped me find my path in life. It also lets me snap people's spines with boots by propelling myself via rockets. It also lets me stab people in the back and laugh at them. It lets me pretend I have a Boston accent while pummeling people with a frying pan. It makes me ponder the hard life and times of a black, Scottish cyclops. It lets me make s mad with my 1337 h34d5h0t 5k1ll5. It lets me rage at a certain area-denial class. It lets me feel helpful by pointing a healy beam towards people with nice hats. It lets me huddah my huddah while reflecting huddahs' huddahs. It lets me be a giant Russian man with nothing but a sandwich and mittens, protesting violence.
Don't Call Me Tanaka;-;Once an F2P, feel ashamed Once a P2P, feel broke
ben;-;wtf i was playing and some guy stabbed me with a knife and killed me
poor zhu;-;this game ruined my life and made me angry at everything ever and i can't stop playing it, 20/10 would buy bills hat again
panda;-;This game is brilliant and best of all now is free. Theres mods built in the game which you need to figure out yourself and it's an awesome game. Since i have played this game for a super long time, you can see that it can last for years and never get boring as Valve will always add new events as well as all the game modes. There is sure to be something that you are bound to like in such a simplistic yet super addictive game. I doubt you will be disappointed
OneHotspur;-;You get to walk around with a bunch of shooty people and stuff, fighting and
Captain Ballsack;-;TF2 is one of my favorites there is so much fun to be had in this game, also great community, trading, and other stuff. so different from alot of shooters out there, tf2 has personality, its's VERY unique and i love all the sandwiches and STUFF too!! plus its free to play so more fun to have!
TGK;-;Seriously, if you haven't played this game yet where the heck have you been for the past 6 years (or whatever)? YOU DON'T EVEN HAVE TO BUY IT, THE GAME ROCKS, WHAT'S YOUR EXCUSE?!
Zero;-;Game iz good deal. Purple text hats every where. I promise good game, killing all da baddies.
ssss;-;Probably the best war-themed hat simulation game ever made.
.HmX* Kennyluz;-;After 9 years of development, Valve made another very good game that made me lose nearly 2000 hours of my life. Team Fortress 2 came out in year 2007 and is still getting updates which clearly shows how popular and awesome this game is. Game is really free to play which means that you don't have to pay any cent to wreck player who spent thousands of $ on it but you can buy premium to get 300 backpack slots instead of 50, free hat, ability to trade your items and ability to get rare items from weekly items drop but you will have to add at least 5 to your Steam Wallet and just buy cheapest thing in Mann Co. Store (if you have already money in Steam Wallet, you don't even have to spend 0,10 to buy one). I can easily recommend this game to everyone who wants to have fun without spending much money (or doesn't want to spend at all) and loves games with some team work, many mods (custom too) or just loves hats
Coldy;-;Rich, gorgeous and endlessly fun.
Hammie;-;Really awesome game <3 everyone should atleast try this game.
Sir Drules-A-Lot {n.w.p};-;One of the best free games I've ever played because its fun and online xD
<TJoL>Cartwheels;-;One of the greatest FPSs I've ever played! Maps and game modes are all varied and fun to play with a graphics style that still manages to look great even after 6+ years. The amount of weapons and aesthetic items is mind boggeling, mixed with amazing gameplay, the game manages to stay enganging and entertaining 600+ hours in. This game is a serious must have for any Steam user! Also, hats.
Alyssa is stupid;-;I always thought this was a good-looking game, then my friend let me play it on his PC, and I could finally agree with him that the game was better than Halo. 11/10 158 kills in 1 hour!
[CHG] Probez;-;I totally recommend this if you want a girlfriend
andy;-;top notch videogaming my gents
Scrambled Bacon;-;9 Diffrent Unique Classes to choose from,each with thier own types of weapons.Get Item drops for Free for more Weapons,but try to be a Premium,cause you will regret it if you're still not a Premium yet...
[KI] Fideo Face;-;It's... BEST GAME EVER It does not cost $400,000 to play this game for twelve seconds, so PLAY IT NAO
Starlit Lich;-;Great game for masochists.
Dragonator;-;Pretty good...
misskass;-;A+ hat-based dating simulator would spend another 100+ hours playing.
w2ll2am;-;team fortress 2 is a brilliant game which sucsesfully orients its self around extream vilonce (first person shooter) but pulls it off with a comical feel hopeing to make people take it less seriosly. the game also has an ultrapenerial aspect to it with scrap banking involved and also some items with more than 5000 you can get lots of money for doing these things. i would recomend this to someone who has never had much experiance with FPSs and especily someone who has not played call of duly alot becuase of the very diffrent battle styles. this game would be perfect for someone who is above the age of eight.
blaze_;-;Welcome to Conga Fortress 2! Home of the best Conga Simulator out there! "10/10" - Everyone.
The Pacifist;-;Unique game with 9 very different but essential classes
CharlieBoy;-;its a vereey good game
carnagekill12;-;Those pc requirements are old i think steam needs to change it no offense
George W. Bush did 7/11;-;Trade hats, shoot people, eat sandvich. 10/10 Best Game
Lone Snake;-;This game ruined my life. 10/10
FILTH;-;Terrific community game with plenty of opportunities to meet new people and have a great time. I recommend this game to almost everyone. Is gud.
{GonE}Pikachu*;-;Its a very fun game where u play with friends/bots/players! You can pretty much afk on it troll and stuff. Its very fun.
The King of Memes;-;Most addictive and fun I've ever had online!!!!
Psycho Ray;-;Glad that you ask. Team Fortress 2 has been quite an eye catcher since it's release in 2007 Gaining Game of the Year awards Having it's own Large Fan base with Fads and Memes This is one of those games that seems to live on forever It's artistic style never goes out of style due to it's cartoonish rendering Customization is also a pinnacle of this game Hats and Items are bought nearly every day, netting Valve lots of cash each passing day. The game itself is FUN More fun than you could imagine In fact, there are servers that are even dedicated to Fun However, if you're a Tryhard, Go ahead and try those Competitive Servers ! If you're a bit of both then just simply join a Public Server Gameplay-wise This game is VERY FLEXIBLE Almost each class is tweakable to your own style of playing (Yes, there are a few OP weapons) The Scout can turn into a Speeding Powerhouse The Demoman can turn into a Melee Behemoth Even the freaking Medic can turn into an Offensive Class when used properly The Community is also a Mix of Kind Players, Some could be Tryhard but will usually say the Good olg "GG" or "GG NO RE" on Arena However, Kids do appear in the game at times Some of them might even Mic-Spam, but don't worry ! You can just mute them, You can even kick them if the rest of the Server Clients agree with you Overall, This is a GREAT GAME Community, Gameplay, The Game itself 9.9/10 -0.1 Due to the fact, If You're F2P You're considered a Second Class Player Unless you can Prove your Skill at this game You even get less backpack space Spend money on the game to get the full experience.
tonydice2k9;-;This game is fun to play with a great community to help you out if you need help and you meet great people inside the game
Hikki! B>QS;-;THE BEST GAME EVER!! YOU HAVE TO TRY IT!!
Beasty;-;Sooo worth the download. Especially now that it's free. Hours and hours of fun and tons of unlockables. What are you waiting for?! Go get it now!
Sabin 'Suplexing a Train' Figaro;-;I've played this game for so many hours, but I'm still not even that great at the game. I can't rocket jump for anything, I still can't properly time airblasts, I'm pretty bad with the Scout, I've barely played Sniper at all. But you know what? There are a few things I can do: I can pop a perfectly timed Uber, I can be useful as a Heavy and heal my teammates with my sanvich, I can stickyjump and aim the Loch'n'Load pretty well, I can setup buldings in strategic spots to be as useful to my team as possible, I can get backstabs half the time I try, and I'm pretty damn good at prop hunt. You see, tf2 is a game you can play for the rest of your life if you find some servers with a good crowd of regulars that use their mics. I've had so many fun times just effing around on some servers, that alone makes the game worth trying. Unfortunately, the tf2 community is extremely divided nowadays. This community used to be one of the best around, a part of it still is, but the more updates there are the more the community splits apart. If you plan on playing this game, it being free there's no reason not to, PLEASE use your mic. Another unfortunate thing about today's tf2, there's less people using their mics than ever and that's how you really work as a team and have fun with one another. Don't be afraid about being new to the game, a lot of people in the community may look down on you, but myself and plenty of others won't. Feel free to ask for help, start with Heavy as your first class and work from there. The shenanigans that occur in this game are limitless, I feel Valve has strayed quite a bit from the game's artstyle with all the cosmetics they've added (originally a pair of windowed shades were how far they'd stretch tf2's artstyle and now that restraint is non-existant) but the game's core mechanics are still great. This game has an incredibly high skill ceiling, it's near impossible for someone to master ALL the classes in the game, so just find 2 or 3 that you like and play them to your heart's content. I maybe only have 1 hour logged with Sniper because I'm terrible at sniping in video games and don't like being a sniper in general, but I'm sure if I practiced with him as much as a played as Demoman or Heavy or Engineer or Soldier or Medic, then I'd actually be decent at sniping. In this game, like most games, practice makes perfect, well not really perfect, more like practice makes you credit to team. Initally, no you won't be credit to team, but the more you play the more useful you will become so keep at it and find a few classes who's playstyle suits YOU! tl;dr I've played this game for a while and I still suck as Sniper, Scout, and Pyro, but I do make a pretty great Demoman, Heavy, Engineer, and Medic and an average Soldier and Spy. The classes I'm good at I'm good at because I played with them a lot and I liked their playstyle. If you play this game you're almost guaranteed to find one class who's playstyle you enjoy so I encourage you to delve into tf2 and find YOUR class. After 9 years in development this game was worth the weight, thanks for reading this review and have fun!
Xos;-;This game is so fun if you get very angry take your anger out on players and bots its fun and its greate when you play with your friends. Plus you can also trade with your friends with some items it so cool and fun. XD
focusmuffin;-;Fun game, good community, only thing that still comes close to the Quake healthpack arena shooter.
Big Boss;-;HOLY  THIS GAME IS AMAZING. sorry had to get that out, but if a friend tells you to get this game, DO IT IMMEDIATLY, it is so amazing the cartoony gameplay is new and fresh the controls are amazing and you can make a good profit from this game, Play your cards right and you just might get a lot of free games or good items (seriously from only spending a total of .41 cents on this game only to get premium i didnt regret it and i met some guy online we played and he gave me a free copy of bioschock for no reason). Plus it is extremely addicting and i cant stop playing, in a period of 6 months or less i have spent almost 400 hours on this game, it is amazing. TIP never say that hats are useless IN CHAT people will call you a noob and you kind of are. Just to say, Hats show your rankings as a player for me i am decently respected and I have a couple of really good miscs, The hatless the hated on a lot and BUY AN ITEM to get premium, trust me it is worth it in the long run.
arti.;-;excellent. consumed my youth. 10/10
Microwave Penguin;-;I can now push a bomb while doing the conga. Best game ever.
[8-bit]MagesticalFrostLion;-;very good game! if u want a game that has FPS elements and custimaztion this is the game for you! I would give this a 9/10 stars.
kennyS;-;Nice game (Y)
Lpdoesgaming;-;tf2 a great first person multiplayer shooter with unlockable weapons 9 classes scout,medic,engineer,demoman,spy,pyro,solider,heavy,sniper good game unlockables for each character also miscs and other cool stuff such as hats so yeah i recomend tf2 its free to play on the steam store...
Garnet Rose;-;This game is AWESOME!!! I can play it for hours!!! Thanks to Valve
Famine;-;Do I really need to say anything?
Daan(selling weapons);-;it is a cool game
grahamforemanuk;-;i reccomend this game because it has all diffrent featurs from diffrent games like the fortfield compound from the new game thief!
hiro | Blueprint.tf;-;Best game i ever played!! The comunity is nice and you can do much more than just play the game, you can trade! ;)
W1zT3ch;-;Gr8 game m8's 13/10 Would Play Again
MeltingMan234;-;I never was a fan of the first prson shooter games, I just thought that they were all the same Call of Duty style gameplay and nothing more. *Course I forgot that games that I've played in the past like Spyro 3 had some first person gameplay* This game eventually chnged my mind on that. Team Fortress 2 is a sequel to somewhat lesser known Team Fortress. Some of the basic missions in the game include capture the flag where you have to capture the enemies intelegence, attack/defend where one team attacks and the other defends, payload where one team has to deliver a bomb to the enemy, and various other missions. Then there's the co-op mode, Mann vs. Machine where it's one team defending an area from an army of robots. The gameplay is a lot of fun as there are tons of different choices in class and weapons. It helps experimenting with them to see which class you are better at and which weapon works best for you. Unlike in the first game where everyone had the same line, each class member: Scout, Soilder, Pyro, Demoman, Heavy, Engineer, Medic, Sniper and Spy have their own personalities and dailouge. just listening to them talk or watching the Meet the Team series gives you a good idea on what these characters are. one thing that I'm not fond of are the mann co creates that ocassionly appear in your inventory as drop items. In order to open them, you need to buy a key at the mann co store for about $2.30. You think by now they would've been a nit more friendly and just redused it down to a buck instead of people having to deal with crates pilling up in their inventory and can never sell. There are also Stranges, Vintage, Unusual and other named titles to make the weapons or asscessories sound more vailuble, but I don't really care for it that much. I'm just glad that I bought the Mining Light hat for Engi before they stopped selling them. So yeah, TF2 is a fun first person shooter game with it's missions. And if you get tired of that, thre are tons of fan made servers on other styles of gameplay, Saxton Hale Mode, Zombie Survivl, servers for trading or hanging out at like all of those FiM servers, the list never ends. And since it's free, it's a good deal, the only thing you have to pay for is for buying stuff at the Mann Co. Store, unless you get lucky with trading.
MysticKian;-;Team Fortress 2 is a nice free 2 play shooter, so if anyone is looking for a free 2 play game, I would recommend you to try it.
TheHiddenBeast (Xbox Gamertag);-;I love this game, it is so much fun, when I watch the Trailer at I thought the game was Third Person view. This game is so much fun, I found lots of item and more.
Fat Seal;-;This is my most favorite game' god job guys y'all keep up the good work!
KobraKy #LibertyPrime;-;Okay, I should maybe make this review more fair. Team Fortress 2. What is there to say? This game is pretty fun. Hours of entertainment await in this free game by our favorite developers, VALVe. Hats, guns, giblets, servers, and Pyros make this game extremely fun. But there are some things you should know before using your space for the game: It crashes. A LOT. This game is only slightly more stable than your average Bethesda game, where it appears to be being held together with scotch tape, so if you think you can just pickit up and play it uninterupted for hours, wise up. The hitboxes and lag compensation is also a problem. Beware if your'e Spy or Sniper, as you'll likely miss an obvious headshot/backstab, likewise fighting spies or sniper, as you'll almost definately get backstabbed while looking at the spy face to face or headshot when the sniper wasn't looking at you at some point in your experience. You'll also notice some balancing issues, when 3 engineers start camping your spawn with 3 level 3 sentries with 4 heavies being healed by 4 medics with ubers on standbye. Aside from all that, the game is fun, modable, dumb, and has lots of comedy. If you have patience, this is one of the best shooters you'll ever play. If you have anger/patience issues, beware.
Spess Dendee;-;Here are a few *amazing* highlights of Team Fortress II: - Spawncamping stickyspammers! Or just stickyspammers in general! - Spawncamping Phlogistinator pyros! Or just Phlog' pyros in general! - Free to Play Rage Heavies! - Everyone tries to kill you and is better than you! What's friendly supposed to mean? That's not in my TF2 -tionary! - Tryhard Genuine AWPer Hand + Genuine Anger Snipers! - Refrigerators! (Huntsmen!) - Tryhard "I know all 5000 tricks in the book" cornerstabbing Spies! - People who are actually friendly! (Wait, a good highlight? Time to make another bad one.) - Speaking of friendly people, that one guy who kills everyone when you're all having a friendly party! - Tryhards with Unusuals, Buds, and Bills! (10 pages of Keys included.) - Overpriced and overcomplicated economy full of *intelligent* people running it! - Tryhard Spacebar-masher Scouts with Botkillers! (Yes, with Botkillers, usually Silver MKII, or a Soda Popper.)
malk;-;Great game, great content. Spent many a day just relaxing with this game
Lordy;-;Every other day someone adds me and wants my . 10/10
kuliise;-;What can I say, this is one of my favorite games ever. Classes are balanced, teamwork is existent (!!), and the hats are beautiful. You can play it seriously, you can play it casually, you can even sit in trade servers and play the market meta-game! There's fun for everyone, this is the only game where you can be in a heated battle and then join a giant congo dance party with your enemies in the middle of a match. The community is amazing. I love this game. 11/10 best game on Steam.
Blackbeard;-;Over 1800 hours played. Tons of money wasted. Still playing it, because it is fun.
Oxford;-;This is a MUST have game!
Meteorstar101;-;one word: Hattastic :D
Pizza;-;It's a colorful, immersing game. Very fun!
[SKVR] the_ginger.exe;-;This game totally ruined my life, i have spent all my money on keys, and sold them for 1 scrap each. (Cause,  all y'all) I have regreted almost very thing i did on Team Fortress 2 (Except the keys, proudest moment of my life.) I was disowned by my parents because of all of my time on TF2. My dad called me a , i called him a . (LOLOLLOLO REFRENCESSSS LOLOL) Overall he best game to buy if you want to kill yourself. 10/10 rating (BTW anyone have any cyanide pills?)
DeusPayne;-;>be on trade server >10 year olds arguing over who has better inventory >argue for 3 hours >good luagh 10/10 good times
Son-Michael;-;Free fun time. And worth investing a few bucks for new weapons :D
OceanicChris9;-;This is awesome.. just awesome... First of all, it's f2p and many awesome and unique servers, like deathrun, freak fortress, slender fortress, parkour and many others. Just try it and you won't regret it!
[PhD] The Immortal One;-;This game has absorbed hours, upon hours of my life. And my money. For what? Ill tell you: Hats. Hats become your life once you begin playing tf2. I had a friend, he went insane. Everyday at school, he would sit in the corner whispering, "Hats... hats... hats..." Until he disappeared. The game is fun, but im telling you, people have gone missing because of the hats 10/10 would recomend this to small children
VaporrPlays;-;Absolutely brilliant game. It's a must!
CvGLUCKYSHOT2000;-;This is a very fun, sort of fast paced FPS where you can live your dream of being and un-ethical doctor, or a russian who fires a gun with $40,000 dolars worth of bullets who liikes sandwhiches, or even a generic baseball player from boston. There is alot of fun to getting this game, and since this game is free there is no reason to not get this game. I reccomend it to any person who bothered to read this ramble all the way through.
Snipars;-;Killed someone with a peice of ham 10/10
Beasty;-;Sooo worth the download. Especially now that it's free. Hours and hours of fun and tons of unlockables. What are you waiting for?! Go get it now!
rcherFlesk;-;I think so far about this game, I love it! I love the different classes, Hats, Taunts, Weapons, all of it! Except, the fact of the TF2 Economy going crazy! I mean, the price of buds are going down and keys are going up in the community. That's nuts! But over all, it's pretty good.
Its(Glen)Quagmire;-;Truely an amazing game. Full of action, never gets old!
[AA] Momma Bird;-;Endless Fun for everyone, kept me from being bored so many times. I highly suggest this game.
A lovely bunch of coconuts;-;This is the most balanced, brilliant f2p game on PC. really.
Naruto Uzumaki;-;By far the best game i have ever played i love the detil on some of the guns and hats
Roxas;-;The best free to play game out there
Meow;-;I'm not even sure there could be something about this game that is negative at all. This in my opinion was one of Valve's best works, and one of the best shooters I have ever played.
Master Qui-Gon;-;Pretty mean game ayyy
athan88;-;I don't know what there is to say about this game other then HATS!
Gamble4life;-;This game is super awesome!!!!
JCTheAllStar31;-;If you don't play this game, there's something wrong with you. This game is one of the BEST games I have ever played, and everyone else should play it too.
Light :3;-;This game is free but it is still really fun! The servers are addictive and to top it all off the custome maps were even fun!! I recomend getting this.
Muffin Of Nothing In Particular;-;Best game ive ever played
rcherFlesk;-;I think so far about this game, I love it! I love the different classes, Hats, Taunts, Weapons, all of it! Except, the fact of the TF2 Economy going crazy! I mean, the price of buds are going down and keys are going up in the community. That's nuts! But over all, it's pretty good.
Ringeroni;-;Simply Beautiful
Oj Pimpson;-;Free my , I downloaded this game and 3 months later im spending money on hats. I now live out of a box sucking up mcdonalds wifi. 9/10 would recomend
Ady;-;This game is amaizing! I need to buy it for all feautures.
Could be playing Splatoon;-;Now with more bread
Boriix;-;Best hat simulator you can currently find out there.
dreameR;-;Went from shooting mercenaries to finding bread 10/10 would play again
Kenpachi's Bankai;-;Great game, replay vaule is amazing. People just need to stop being spy and snipers all the time though.
Rendil;-;an fps that has hats...  yeah!
elk;-;it is so much fun to burn the engies haha
baroo_zr;-;funniest and one of the best shooters out theres hats are love hats are life
-MySTriX-;-;swag game ze soldier is a pinges in side of a  of a merazmus
kammback king;-;hats n YAWK
[G.inc] ZzzCoUNT12;-;What a good game, I played it and I like the gibus
FluffyDemonCloud;-;A comical First-Person Shooter, Team Fortress 2 comes right into the top few games in anyone's library. Shoot stuff. Blow up stuff. Sometimes even burn stuff - and progressively get better at it all. If you're the sort of person who likes to shoot other people online, then I see no viable reason that this could NOT be a perfect game for you. If you're a clever tactician, several in-game gimmicks and combos exist to aid you into better combat. That's what I enjoy the most myself... And even if you're a concientious objector, there's a peaceful protest sign with your name on it - literally. Uh... maybe the rest is better left unsaid... All in all, a good and timelessly entertaining game - bring a friend or two along!
=AsFg=FestiveGamerLuna;-;Do I even have to say anything about this ing amazing game
Fwued;-;Good game, only writing this for badge
Francis J. Underwood;-;As a fan of Team Fortress, my opinion is very much in this games favour. Its free-to-play ideology proves to display little amounts of bugs, which do tend to annoy the player when they occur. Otherwise, the game is superb; with great class options, witty voice-acting, huge fanbase and a variety of fun gamemodes, weapons and costumes. This game is truly one of the most enjoyable FPS's of all time, must get! Pros: One of the best free to play games out there! Cons: Large amount of bugs. Have to pay money to look amazing-market is cheaper. ~8/10~
Scooty;-;da fowk iz dis . 10/10 i trust this with my hidden pr0n stash
Box of Cox [Snaddyvish Bar];-;Frigging aweosome i hope TF3 will come out soon
Cerdur // Road To Crate;-;Is good, am play a lot, and is good fun time play it.
Cracka;-;Spent all my money, lost my house, wife, and kids. now living under a bridge feeding off of McDonalds WIFI. 10/10 would do it agian
Retarded-Fish;-;Anyone looking for hours of fun your at the right place tf2 is a blast, meet new people get new weapons and also hats!!!! show of your awesomness with a hat or 2 or 5
UP | Kimberly Ann :3;-;Probably the best team FPS ever made.
Kitsolin;-;What is Team Fortress 2? It is a game FULL of variety and choices. Team Fortress 2 or TF2 for short, has been out for quite some time and building up a story for TF2. Now the question "What is TF2?" will ne answered. TF2 Is a multiplayer only game about 9 mercenaries who fight against each other to complete certain tasks the 9 mercenaries are: the Scout. the Soldier, the Pyro, the Demoman, the heavy, the engineer, the medic, the sniper, and the spy. Each one of these classes have they're own personality and tricks to hide. Starting off with the scout he is a runner born in boston and learned quickly how to fight living where he did. He takes an interest in baseball and constantly suggests that he should be in a team. The scout in-game is a very fast runner that has a shotgun called the scattergun a pistol and a metal bat. Used in combination he has a double jump manuever. Although he's very fast he has very low health; the lowest in the game. The soldier: A man who claims to have been in the army is a man who takes things way too seriously, Is kinda wierd in the head, and is homeless. We dont know too much but his old house he lived with a magician named "Merasumus" Anyways, the soldier gets a rocket launcher, a shotgun, and a shovel as his weapon. he has average health and uses his rocket launcher to his advantage by shooting a rocket at his feet making him shoot into the air. this is called rocket jumping. The pyro: We have NO idea who this is and where he/she came from this is a man/woman in a flame retardant suit that wears a gas mask and can't speak with it on so the pyro's talking comes out in mumbles. When the "Meet The Pyro" video came out we figures out the pyro is delusional, Believing the world is full of rainbows and instead of a flamethrower he's carrying an orchestra but in real life he's using a flamethrower. So many people either think the pyro is a gay male or just a really wierd woman. The pyro comes equipped with a flamethrower a shotgun and a fireaxe, But we don't have much more information than that. The Demoman: A scottish man who specializes in demolition takes to the battlefield drunk and really angry. As a child it is said he lost his eye to a book called the Bombinomicon But many believe since he talks about it so much that the loch ness monster was the cause. Not much is said about the demoman other than that, except he has average health like the soldier and the soldier and him seem to have a good friendship. He carries a grenade launcher, a stickybomb laucher As he can stickybomb lauch like rocket jumping and a beer bottle. The heavy: A big russian man who carries around a giant minigun fighting off people on the battlefield. It is said he lives in siberia. We don't have too much information on him because the meet the heavy video didn't explain much like the others. The heavy carries around a minigun, a shotgun, and as a melee his fists. The engineer:A texas man who is a builder that can get a nice sentry gun built up in a few minutes. He builds things for the team like dispensers which give ammo and a little health, Sentries which are helpful for defending and teleporters to get to the battlefield. Like the heavy we dont have too much info on him. He carries around a shotgun a pistol and a wrench he can also upgrade all of the said buildings by hitting them with his wrench. The medic: The medic is a german medic who cares not for the patient but for the treatment. He lived in Rottenburg and kept a bird named archamedies. The medic carries around a syringe gun, a healing gun or medigun, and a bonesaw The sniper: an austrailan sniper who lives in a camper van on the road. He specializes in headshots and shooting sniper rifles. He carries a sniper rifle an SMG and a kukri or a big claw looking knife. The spy: A frenchman shrouded in mystery his main attack is backstabbing people with his knife. The spy carries around a revolver a sapper that destroys engineer's buildings, a knife, a invisable watch and a disguise kit. The part that makes the spy so dangerous is the disguise kit he could be anyone on the other team he disguises himself to look like a class of his choosing so the spy could be anyone. The pyro is a good counter to the spies though as the spies when they use they're invisable watch they will be shown by the fire around them. The economy: TF2 is a game that is FILLED with hat's and cosmetics and people are willing to pay for them. This means there is a currency as well. It is metal. In the game there is a crafting option you can take a couple of weapons you have and craft them together to make metal take that metal you made them make 2 more then craft those 3 together and you have a bigger value of metal. This is a frustrating thing to do but if you want that item that bad then go for it. Choices: When i said the game was full of variety and choices i mean this: you have the ability to use HUNDREDS of weapons at your disposal but to do that you must play. After a while of playing it will say you have found an item this is how you earn weapons and eventually cosmetics. Each class varies in weapon. That being said your loadout could be COMPLETELY different in every way to someone elses. Man vs machine: In TF2 there is a gamemode called man versus machine or MVM for short. It's about robots that attack certain areas with a bomb you have to defend the area to make sure these robots dont reach that area and put the bomb in or you lose. The robots are robotic versions of all mercenaries and some are giant versions. There is also a tank but im not going to get into that. Trading: This will be the final part of the review. Trading is a bit of a problem in this game as there are, but few scammers here. You can trade metal for items like taunts, cosmetics and weapons Or you could trade a weapon for a weapon or a taunt for a taunt. In trading there are items called unusuals do not bother trying to get one unless you have mann co keys from the store. I'm sorry but this is the end of the guide but in short tf2 is a fun game full of variety for people to enjoy like myself anyways i hope you enjoyed the guide and i will see you later :3
R.I.P Satoru Iwata;-;if you like FPS, and are not a CoD fanboy, than this is the Game for you. This game has creative and funny characters/classes. this game also has a lot weapons, hats, gamemodes, ect. I suggest you play this game, this review is really crappy, but it will do.
JayDee () #realsway;-;Awesomeness in a nutshell
Experiment #59;-;Overall great game. A bit bloody, but still very cartoony. 5/5.
MLG Dinklage Ghost 420;-;Ever look up in the sky and think, " God, why haven't humans made a game where you can be a all American, kinda dull, hat hoading, rocketlauncher toting, roomates with a wizard kind of guy, and many more, swimming in a pool of slightly sharp metal and his own hats?" Well, you can stop praying now, because of this rock paper scizzors playing, conga line dancing, sometimes shooting game! THIS IS....... HAT SIMULATOR 2007-2014!!!!
The Cake Is a Spy!;-;Team Fortress 2 1. Download it 2. play it 3. enjoy it 4. say goodbye to your life 11/10
LeeSinToYourHeart1999;-;Perfectly Game based on fast pace action :) Recommended for everyone 10/10 (except 4 year old toddlers xD)
Radio;-;The best shooter I have ever played!
KriX*;-;best gme evr 10/10 would fap to fre hat yis totaly not pydd /low i bribe gaben with snicker bar k? happy birthday team fortress 2 lolololoolololol olol best grafik ever betta than cod
Fox;-;boring as , useless updates (like asteroid map), community in ruins
[GmT] Werewolf [GB/UK];-;No matter who you are or what you do, you end up identifying with one of the 9 classes. For me, its the Heavy! CRY SOME MORE!!
CaameLot8802;-;a very cool game with emotion and good player i recomend and the best is that its free to play :balloon:
SoaringSloth;-;An outstanding game, with tons of gamemodes, hundreds of items, and weapons, the posibilities are literlay endless on Team Fortress 2. once you start, you'll never go back to games like Call of Duty (10 out of 10) -Evilbaseball
Emfulz;-;One of the most addictive games on Steam.
Queen Bee;-;mmph mmph mmmphh mm mmmmph mmph mmp mmph mm mmm mmph mmph!! This game is seriously, amazing. I've met lots of cool friends on it and had many hours of fun. I totally recommend this game to anyone and everyone. :)
Omega Boom;-;A great game!
wassap negr;-;Here we go again, the true shining jewel of Valve, just like Half-Life 1 and 2 were Humoristic design? Check Constant FREE updates? Check (almost) always balanced weapons? Check Hat economy worth actually millions of dollars? Check A great game, save for occasional lag issues, hackers and bugs. But what game doesn't have that? TF2 sucked me in 2 years ago after it first went F2P and now, 2 years later, with over 1.000 hours on record, I can say that you MUST give it a try if you haven't already P.S: HATS
50Cent;-;Awsome
Revolver Oshawott;-;Do you like multiplayer? Do you like to have an arsenal of awesome weapons? Do you like cartoony artstyle? Then Team Fortress 2 is for you. Its hilariously stupid, and I guarantee youll have at least a little fun! If not, well, tough. So, what are you still reading this recommendation for? Go download this game if you havent got it already, son!
kanye wests dad;-;Arguably the best game online, free, most played game on steam and it has a great community. What is there not to like. Well, the whiny kids are pretty annoying I guess xD
Sexy Ned Flanders;-;I totally recommend this game it has gotta be the most fun game ive ever played
Pasta J;-;My friends and I call this game our "diamond in the ruff" because dog.
Ross_C_AVFC;-;Team Fortress 2 is an amazing game downloaded it a while ago and never got round to playing it due to school exams, love the graphics, content and items. Would recommend to anyone to try out and have some fun.
Rattle;-;The hell with rules i play for fun and to rage so  the rules i will never mod or anything like that
Posterus;-;A highly addicting waste of time. I like it!
Visible Man (BOT);-;Wasted All my Money 11/10
du Bldmann;-;Ive played the  out of this game but for some people 500 hours is nothing. TF2 is a awesome FPS that is very different from most, for the reason of it being pretty comical and a cartoony style which makes it so great. Why i love this game so much is the community of all the weapons you can collect and the hats you get to show whos inventory as the most vaule. The maps people create are amazing when i comes to achievement idle or trading maps or just plain goofing off in a mingame based TF2 Ware this game never gets old. Hell the real best part is ITS FREE! so no reason not to get it.
Ryan;-;Great
Helix;-;10/10 would eat your money for hats and keys
Clueless Sniper;-;This game is probbably the best Free to Play game i have ever played! So much fun you cant imagine!My favorite game!
Popalofiti, Enforcer of Gaben;-;Team Fortress 2. Valve knew what they were doing on this game! It's fun addicting, rage inducing and meal skipping and definitly worth your while! Especialy scince it's free to play! Anyone who doesn't have this game, I definitly recommend this to you and all of your friends!
{MadGamer};-;ITS REALLY FUN IF YOUR DONT LIKE IT THEN YOUR WEIRD IF YOU DONT HAVE IT........................ GET THE ING GAME
Assertive;-;Its a great multiplayer game that's very addicting! I reccomend this game to people who enjoy First Person Shooters!
The Suspect;-;Very fun and epic
ss-;-;This game... many nerds, 10/10 would kill nerds again
xMetalPocalypse666x;-;In my opinion, THE BEST free to play game on Steam available from what I've seen. If you love FPS's, you will love TF2. If you love a mix of strategy and classed-based combat, you'll love TF2. If you like comedy and goofiness influenced in gameplay, you'll love TF2. And if you like hats, well, you get the point. But truthfully, this is an amazing game. I honestly don't know why it's free, because it deserves to be a pay-to-play game. And another thing, my laptop is probably around 5 or 6 years old, and I'll be honest, not the best. But when I first launched it, it acted like it was nothing...high quality, too. So you really don't have to worry about it lagging so much, at least from your computer. Still depends on your connection to play multiplayer, of course. And if it is laggy on your computer, it was free anyways, all you have to do is delete it. But that should'nt be necessary. I'd actually play this game instead of any Call of Duty game anyday. Really you have to at least give it a try. My personal rating, 10/10. Hope you guys enjoy the game as much as I am!!
[eF] SlayeR [BE];-;If you want some fun play this ;)
AtomicEzio;-;1 year ive been playing this and i still think im new to this game
BRUTALIGHT SPARCAKE;-;team fortrees 2 is awesome
Winston The Churchill;-;I got assassinated by myself. 10/10
Config_Pepe;-;This game is an average shoot-em-up. However, the cartoony style, ragdolls, and gibs give it a funny atmosphere. 10/10
JeilyFan124;-;I like this game for not being just a basic FPS (First Person Shooter) like COD (Call of Duty) its more of a puzzle shooter. Why I think it is more of a puzzle shooter is because each class has its weakness and the other class help their weaknesses.
T-Duke716;-;Team Fortress 2, or TF2, has truly earned it's way into my top 5 games list. With it's imaginitive characters, setting, gameplay, and features, make this game an absolute must-have for any fan of FPS games or steam members. The game has many game modes that never get old or boring. Along with the games array of classes, the game is always fresh and fun. Problems I encountered in other FPS games like Call of Duty are they never involve strategy or team building. In TF2 however, teamwork must be used in order to win, making it extremly fun and imersing to play with friends. Every class has a weaknes and strength, along with imitations and constrictions, that allow you to become accustomed to your own class and playing stradegy. This overall allows for a extremely fun gaming experience.
Surface_Beats;-;Good f2p game. Basic physics and graphics engine. Adds a nice touch with voice acting and weapon styles.
WaffleShark :D;-;best free to play game
dwwojcik;-;I reccomend this game. It's free. Plus it's fun. Lots and lots of fun. Seriously, it's really fun. Believe me when I say this. Are you bad at videogames? You can be good at this one. Possibly the only multiplayer game with built in aimbots. Just choose the Engineer class and build a sentry. Do you like OP one hit kills? TF2 is the game for you. Go sniper or spy and headshot or backstab all the baddies. They'll hate you for it, but really- do you care? No. If you do, you probably shouldn't be playing a game with guns in it. If you don't care and you like aimbots, don't cheat in other games. Play TF2 instead, because here it's allowed.
Dutch;-;It's Skyrim with hats 13/10
PROrangeV2 [FFoFF];-;10/10 Would Keep Playing For Everyone who like PC Modern FPS Games, This is a really Great Choice.
Snap McGoggle;-;The very finest in class-based team hat simulators.
CatHeaven is back;-;This game, is just..... Amazing. 10 out of 10, would definently reccomend. WARNING : WHATEVER YOU DO, DO NOT WEAR THE GIBUS.....
thomas the nightmare engine;-;it's good
Charizardborn;-;constant free content, random items drops, and tons of maps both community and developer made this game is a must have and for 20 bucks it clearly beats many of the more overlyhyped games like call of duty or halo if you have steam or if u play games or if u watch other people play games or if u just like stuff with the word game in it this is not a must buy this is a need a neccessity and a game not just for the average steam user but for all gamers in general
Elegance;-;This Is A REALY AWESOME GAME !!! :) :) :) :) :)
The Doctor;-;Team Fortress 2 is a game about the most cut throat thing in human history, fashion. Every aspect of this award winning game is made as an allegory to the ever changing world of fashion and the pitfalls that can befall any who wish to partake of this amazing experience. You must find hats and accessories through a random drop system that represents the elusive mistress of, 'inspiration.' Then you must find the perfect colors, names, and descriptions for your hats and accesories to set yourself apart from the other less fortunate players of the game. This would be a boring system much like the many you can find in the bland JRPGs that litter the market. What sets TF2 apart is their inclusion of a fantastic and complicated mini-game about shooting each other that blends wonderfully into the allegorical narrarative of cut throat, fast paced, deadly fashion.
TheJamboSir;-;The spy is the spy is the spy is the spy is the spy is the spy is the spy is the spy is the spy is the spy is the spy
HARK!;-;This is the best fps i have ever played
Mega Evolution Snorlax;-;Very fun and addictive.
Its(Glen)Quagmire;-;Truely an amazing game. Full of action, never gets old!
[AA] Momma Bird;-;Endless Fun for everyone, kept me from being bored so many times. I highly suggest this game.
A lovely bunch of coconuts;-;This is the most balanced, brilliant f2p game on PC. really.
Naruto Uzumaki;-;By far the best game i have ever played i love the detil on some of the guns and hats
Roxas;-;The best free to play game out there
Meow;-;I'm not even sure there could be something about this game that is negative at all. This in my opinion was one of Valve's best works, and one of the best shooters I have ever played.
Jallee;-;Really fun game. The more hats the funnier, and there is a lot of hats in this game.
Prollgurke;-;I'm just gonna make a short list to make things clear: Pros: + It's not pay-to-win (unlockable weapons are sidegrades but almost no upgrades) + 9 very unique classes with extreme up- and downsides (if you wanna win, you need teamwork) + Since there are almost only sidegrades, they offer different playstyles to discover + Fast gameplay + Overall nice balance (Nothing is too overpowered) + A fun Coop-Mode ("Mann vs. Machine" - 6 players against waves of robot enemies) + Unique 60's comic-like style (Watch the trailers to get an idea of the games style) + Great humor (Character's voice lines, in-game news, item descriptions, ...) + A nice way to individualize your characters with cosmetic items (they dont affect the gameplay) + Still a lot of updates which include bugfixes, new cosmetic items, maps and weapons + Steam Workshop implementation (community items are actually often put into the game) + Nice competitive scene + Much game modification possible (custom skins, custom sounds, custom HUD... you know the drill, it's source engine) + Premium-Accounts don't bring any gameplay advantages + Long-time fun since theres much to discover Cons: - Some unlocks are rather annoying - Some classes need much practice until you become effective for your team - Content upgrades often only bring new cosmetics, less maps and rarely weapons - Still lots of minor bugs which need to be fixed - Workshop is only for items but not maps Some facts you should also know when you want to try specific weapons: * You gain items randomly when playing. It's a random amount which resets every Thursday. You usually "find" weapons (you can also find cosmetic items, but only when you're premium). * If you wan't to try a specific weapon, try the the ingame shop and look out for a "Test"-Button. Usually, you are able to test the weapon for some days. * If you want to have the weapon as your own item, play the game until you gain some random drops and use the trading system to trade for items with other people (People usually trade 2 random weapons with 1 specific weapon). * Don't buy weapons from the shop, it's horribly overpriced. That's about it. If you like a fast teamwork-based online shooter, you will also like Team Fortress 2. Give it a shot and download it.
Bob Jenkins;-;If this game dosn't define "good" gaming then I don't know what does.
Reece :D;-;Team Fortress 2 is a team-based, first-person shooter multiplayer computer game developed by valve. It is the successful sequel to Tream Fortress Classic. It first came out in a compilation called The Orange Box, which is no longer avaliable. As of 2011, Team Fortress 2 is a free to play game, where you can upgrade to premium via purchasing something from the Team Fortress 2 in-game store. Gameplay: This fun game is based on two oppisite teams, Builders League United, often refered to as BLU team. And RED team, Reliable Excavation and Demolition. Players can choose to play as one of the nine character classes in these teams each with their own unique strenghts, weaknesses and weapons. Each class consist of a primary weapon, a secondary weapon, and a melee weapon. Although certain classes contain PDA's and other unique items. Team Fortress 2 was released with six offical maps, but many more maps have been added. A neat little addition to this game is "The Administrator" a woman announces different game events over PA or Loudspeaker, so that everyone in the game can hear it. Stats are a extreamly nice addition to this game, where time played as a certain class, most kills as that class and most objectives achived in that life, etc... Game Modes: -In Capture the Flag maps, the objective for both teams is to obtain a briefcase of intelligence from the enemy team's base and return it to their own base while preventing the opposing team from doing the same. The player carrying the intelligence can be killed to drop the briefcase, or the player can willingly drop it; in either case this starts a brief timer. A team can only score by delivering the enemy's intelligence to their base. A match lasts until one team scores a set number of points or time runs out. A variant of Capture the Flag, called Special Delivery, has teams vying over a single briefcase to attempt to deliver to a common target. Once the intelligence is picked up by one team, only members of that team can carry it until either it successfully delivered, or the drop timer expires and it is returned to its original spawn point. -Control Point modes are more varied in their objectives, but share the common aim of capturing a particular point on the map by having one or more team members stay on the point without the presence of the opposing team for a short period of time. In standard control point maps, each team already controls an equal number of points, with one additional point left unclaimed; teams can only attempt to capture points that are nearest to those points they already control. Each team attempts to progressively capture all the control points to win the round. In attack/defend-style maps, the RED team already controls all the points on the map, and must hold these points from being captured by the opposing team (BLU Team) for a length of time. Attack/defend-style maps can come in either single-round or multiple-round maps; Rounds past the first will only be played if BLU wins a round. -Territorial control is a more complex version of Control Point, in which each map is divided into a number of closed sections, held between the two teams. Each round has one team attempting to seize control of the opposing team's capture point for that section in a fixed amount of time. Once a team holds all but the enemy's home base point, they then attempt to capture the enemy base point while the enemy defends for a fixed amount of time. -King of the Hill features a single control point in the center of the map, with teams vying for control over it. The control point is locked for a set amount of time after the round start. Once the point is unlocked, either team can capture it. Capturing the control point starts the team's clock counting down. The clock that is currently counting down will only stop if the other team captures the point, the clock reaches 0:00, or another map-specific event occurs such as a Halloween boss spawning during the Halloween event. Teams win the round when their clock reaches 0:00 with the control point currently under their control. If the other team is capturing the point, the round will not end until the point's capture progress resets to 0. -Payload maps feature a length of track atop which sits a bomb mounted on a cart. These maps come in two varieties. In normal Payload maps, one team must escort the cart through a series of checkpoints in a limited amount of time to reach a final target that the other team defends. The cart moves when one or more players of the team are near it without enemies nearby; during this, the cart heals and provides ammo to those close by. If no one is by the cart, it may move backwards towards the last checkpoint, or roll off uphill sections of the track. In Payload Races, both teams race to deliver a bomb-cart to a final target; there are no checkpoints and unmanned carts will not move in reverse, but still require team members nearby to fully complete uphill sections. Both types of Payload maps can come in single-round or multiple-round maps. In standard payload, further rounds will only be played if BLU wins. In Payload Race, all rounds will be played regardless of which team wins, but the winner of previous rounds starts with their cart farther up the track. -Arena is a team deathmatch mode, typically occurring smaller environments featuring a single control point. In each round, players do not respawn on death; a team wins the round by capturing the control point or eliminating all of the other team members. -Medieval mode can be played on maps dedicated to this mode, or enabled for any other mode type. This mode forces players to use melee or similar medieval weapons. -MvM - Mann vs. Machine - is a six player co-operative mode where the mercenaries are defending a structure against increasingly difficult waves of robots. Players have the ability to buy upgrades and improvements between rounds using in-game money earned during previous waves. A "Mann Up" version is available by purchasing tickets with real money to participate in larger events on official servers with the opportunity to win unique cosmetic items after successfully completing a Tour of Duty. If you decided to read this far in, thank-you for reading. :)
Zed Cam;-;A great game for anyone new to Steam. It is free, easy to learn, and fun to play! It has been out for years and is still going strong! 10/10 would play.
Emmy [>"]>;-;Fell off cliff to conga line 10/10
Flgel;-;3 per day times 6 years minus we're not bread/10
Oj Pimpson;-;Free my , I downloaded this game and 3 months later im spending money on hats. I now live out of a box sucking up mcdonalds wifi. 9/10 would recomend
P(L)uff;-;Good game. Had me playing for more than 1000 hours now
durk_nation;-;this game is so much fun and i will always give it a thumbs up!
Deltastorm;-;Team Fortress 2, after 7 years of its lifetime, still hosts a great community(Mostly) The grand feature of this game, is the classes. They all have something unique about them, comparing spy and sniper. Spy is more relaxed, mischivous(Is this how you spell it?) and a guy likes to **** with your head. Sniper is rude, curses WAY more than spy(Spy does say **** you occasionally) and even likes to mock the dead, charming. But theres more, their isn't just "Pick sniper cause 360 No scopes(although a new weapon allows for this)" they all are handy in different situations, spy is great for sapping and destroying strong enemies behind enemy lines. Sniper is great for picking off the medic and engineers(Weirdly, sniper is a counter to engineer) Theres all unique playstyles in the game. But some might not be your cup of tea. Scout is fast moving. Soldier is strong and has high mobility. Pyro burns ****. Demoman blows up whatever the **** he sees. Heavy is tank nuff said. Engineer is the high intelligence defence builder. Medic is that most is the most helpful class on the front lines. Sniper stays back and shoots peoples heads off. Spy is the chaser or the chased. 9 different playstyles, but none of them might fit you. But we have someone to spice up the playstyles. Some weapons in TF2 can COMPLETELY change your playstyle. E.G the Air Strike encourgages you to rocket jump for that extra firing speed that is fast as Usain Bolt. Another E.G the B.A.S.E jumper encourages you to put on the Air Strike for soldier for extra damage and mobility. Overall a 10/10 but does lack in major updates, but that dosen't matter as they change up the game most of the minor ones.
LittleGirlieBitchPirate;-;A game about hats.
Proply;-;Well. This may Works For The Players Enjoying Around The Games. Like That Video From Last behind. Whos Gotta To Like This game? For Players and Some Low Things... Can Played For Realistics. From Around The Gibus hat and Premium Hats. She/he Say How To Play. She/he Say How To Play In Co-op She/he Say How to Play In PvP She/he Say How Earn more items She/he Say How to Get other items Like (Strange/Vintage/Genuine/Collector/Unusual Type) She/he Can Play For Free On TF2 And Some Question Are More On TF2-Website...... For Recommend Players Who Played yet like 1-9999 Hours. That you know. Becomely Friends. For Recommend Players Got Server List from Their Favorite or History Server. I'm Very Happy For this. Game. but For People. We Count you! Good Luck!
Sir Pika;-;It's AWESOME
Asian Nlgger Jews Are the worst;-;I was playing this game, and then I was like "! I gotta masturbate!" Luckily, there was enough porn sprays on the walls to feed all of Nigeria my . 9/11 It was decent
Geddy Lee's Sexy Canadian Voice;-;There is literally no reason why you shouldn't play this game. I don't give a damn if your hard drive is almost filled up, delete something and download this IMMEDIATELY!
ShonaniganS;-;Great Game
Skolin;-;Ruined my life and cost me over 300. 10/10 would recommend to my worst enemies.
Earle;-;A good game my favorite is spy can backstab in a instant kill
Vic;-;Cool.
Kiiro;-;who needs life when you have Tf2 11/10
[U.P.Z.] dmiral Maxx_Zteel;-;A good game for all mature ages, with hats.
RukiNub;-;Its big, its loud, its diverse, it requires skill, involves guns, explosions, fire, rockets...AND ...what more could an fps gamer want?
Cael's Girlfriend;-;One of my favorite games on Steam.
Aggravated Magical Girl;-;This is one of the finest hat-themed simulators around. You'd be hard pressed to find a better game with such a vast amount of fashionable headwear! I came for the hats, and I stayed for the hats: something that can't be said about many other video games. Look no further: don your derby, show off your chapeau, and kick  and take names while wearing your toque on Team Fortress 2!
Moonkid101 |Mi6|;-;Such a fun game, couldn't resist investing money!!!!!
Firnen;-;There are 2 companies: the Reliable Excavative Demolition (RED) and the Builders League United (BLU) who are competing against each other. Both of the company owners (Blutarch of BLU and Redmond for RED) hired mercenaries to put an end to one another. This is where TF2 multiplayer takes place. In the multiplayer there are 2 teams (RED and BLU) and you can choose between 9 characters. These characters include the: Scout, Demo man, Pyro, Sniper, Medic, Spy, Heavy, Engineer, and Soldier. Each class has their own weapons and abilities (such as the Medic can heal people, the Spy can disguise as other players, the Scout can move twice as fast than others, etc.). The gameplay is SO much fun! Overall, Team Fortress goes beyond great gameplay; it has one of the most fun/best First Person Shooter multiplayer out there. There is just the multiplayer, no campaign mode. But, the multiplayer is enough and Team Fortress 2 still outstands many of the video games out there. Also, ITS FREE. Ok, its sort of free... You still can to buy items from the in-game store (which is relatively cheap). So, if you like FPS, this is your game.
InfiniteZodiac;-;Team Fortress 2 is such an addicting game. When I first played it on my old PC, it was freaking laggy, I thought it would be a boring game. My friend kept asking me to play it when I got a new PC, but I had doubts because of how big the file size is. I decided to play it anyway. It was freaking fun! I couldn't stop playing! All the game modes are cool, all the classes are good in their own way. My KDR in TF2 is good unlike in other FPS games where I'm horrible. I recommend playing this game, it's a shame if you can't run it, but it is worth trying :)
#HisBroKnowsHisPassword #Hacked;-;i'm 100% addicted to this game, its a really fun game with many ways to play it. its unlike most games in terms of its game play yet probably better than any other game ive ever played, you are able to customize your character loadout (and theres 9 different characters/classes you can choose from to start) tons of game modes and maps plus its free! ive meet many people and made many friends by playing this game, and i know you will too. id rate this game 11/10 and id recommend this game to anyone who is looking for a new amazing game to play, and a new addiction.
SA_Cavendish;-;Quite an interesting design may I say, the game is a cartoony-realistic shooter based on the american outbacks of the 1970s which introduces you into a very exciting fantastic world of endless battles led by free willing mercenaries that face no consequences for their wars and magically respawn after being shattered into pieces by rockets, fighting on land and not in law for the territories of two dramatically cursed brothers that bicker until the end of their century long lives and after. And you also have hats. Lots.
Ausphin;-;It seems simplistic, but this game can give you hundreds of hours of entertainment
DingLee21;-;This game is extremely fun to play, the friendly community will welcome most people of good nature, and the modded servers allow for many different experiences through this game.
Gertyerteg;-;This is a very fun Free to Play online FPS game, I recommend playing it and hopefully we will get some more content added in the future!
Millmond;-;its one of the best games i have :)
Birblord;-;A great game for casual and competitive players that is based heavily on teamwork. I give it 9 out of 10 due to some steam cloud errors on occasion but otherwise this is a great game!
UnicornChloe;-;I think everyone has this.... So what else is a better reason to get it?
Alexandra Nightshade;-;If you don't own this game now, WHAT THE BLOODY HELL ARE YOU WAITING FOR?! I've sunk my entire day into this MONSTER of a game, I say it's damn well worth a Download. After all, Sense it's FTP from now on, You too can try it for yourself.
Keerun;-;Makes me eat bread again 10/10
PR3DAT0R;-;Not the best game in the world but A 100,000,000,000,002 times beest than CoD GHOSTS (Infinity ward its clear you suck balls) but TF2 has become well hard to believe BETTER! you dont have to be a heavy trying to kill a enemy medic for half an hour anymore -_-!But be sure to give it a try you also dont need an ACE pc to play it!
ekenedilichukwu;-;Wow. Only thing i can say about it!!!!!!!!!!
Brock Obama;-;A very fun and addicting game for all ages. Easy to grasp game-modes along with a very in-depth trading community, keeps the game interesting. I played the game for around 800 hours, and there are still many things to do. I would recommend this game to both beginner and more advanced gamers.
[PcMasterRace] Svoboman;-;I reccomend this game because it is very fun and a great team based game. All my friends play this game every day and I think you should too.
MadManWilly;-;It is buy far the best hat trading simulator you can find plus it has some other unrelated stuff to pass the time.
Triko[DK];-;the game is awesome try it
Zack (computer is broken);-;Tf2 is easily the best online team based game I have ever played. I recomend this game to ALL players. It's a great game and you can have tons of fun staying up late with friends playing on this game.
Twigg;-;Join Hat Simulator Fortress 2 now! This game is filled with awesome mercenaries that will be better if you make them wear hats! Because hats are their life. 10/10. Seriously though, get this game. It is not your regular FPS game. This game has enough charm to make your head explode. You will have hours of fun and hats. So stop reading and download this game for FREE. (And later on, buy hats on the store.)
Justin Timberlake;-;I love this game, because of the fact that it has, over the past 5 or so years, developed a diverse and mechanical economy of its own. I have spent countless hours trading, crafting, and buying several hundreds of items over the past year. And the fact that this economy has been almost entirely developed by the Steam Community is remarkable. I would be shocked if I found a steam user who did not already own this masterpiece of a game. Any other MMOFPS game that has been thrown my way has not even come close to the mastery of this here game. 10000/10. (TL;DR)
HateBreeder;-;Do I really need to say something about it? GO GET THE FREAKING GAME ALREADY. One of the best FPS's out there, been playing it since 2008. Endless fun, not to talk about the awesomeness of the hats and its amazing community. Go get it!
Kirito Gamer Spy;-;This game is fun a is for free! why not try it is really fun!
ZAnightmare25 [sMiLe ArMy];-;this is a very fun and enjoyable game that is great to play friends with and never get bored
Chikage;-;This game may be free to play. But it does free to play right. No gems or time limits on guns or classes. every single item is possible to obtain without a special currency. And most of all you NEVER need to buy anything. You can buy things if you are impatiant to find a weapon but you never NEED to. I would rate thise game easily a 10/10 it is an amazing shooter. And teamwork is actually in this fun class based FPS. Looking at you Battle *COUGH* field. Anyway if you are looking for some fast paced action and buckets of fun. This is the game for you my friend.
TJBird123;-;I have had over 600 hours of tf2 and I am still loving it!
|VRG| Irrational |;-;I recommend that you should install and play this game :) Just don't play too much. :D
Kirly;-;11/10 would play again
salt;-;After spending hours upon hours of playing this game, after wasting money and time, after trading for countless nights, do i regret it? No. This first person hat simulator is a glorious piece of vidya. Ruined my life- 9.5/10 ~ign.
Captain Foopy;-;Really fun game. I spent a lot of my time playing this. It's also a good way to get other steam games cheaper or free
Hellas;-;This game is just a bunch of fun and its free. Get it now.
Corvus Raldis;-;A very good game, anyone who didnt get it please do its free and absolutely awesome :D
nippy took;-;So far it's a really fun game. I like the way it's balanced.
Sir Flimselot;-;Lot's of fun, definitly something that should be tried atleast once
Purple Polka Dot Ponies;-;Its free and and its a realy good game which i have spent many hours with friends on
Dyressa;-;A pretty rad game.
Andrew;-;This is one of the most free to play games i played in my life is so complete and cool, Valve do a vey good job with this game, and the updates are extremly epics, like love and war, or mvm, this game is perfect for any gamer.
Cannoli;-;This Game. This Game is the mascot of Valve. It is the pride and joy of all Gamers. It is more fun than gmod with a mod on it. Besides that, YOU CAN GIB PEOPLE! PLAY TF2 Today!
a piece of paper;-;hats
ArchAngel;-;one of the best FPS games i've ever palyed
A penguin with a top hat;-;Great game, I've had alot of fun with it. Just download it now. It's free and there's no reason not to.
r.ChillyCheeeBurgah;-;If you like FPS games this will be a fan favorite to all steam players so go get this damn game
L | Dr. Obvious;-;Classic, but still a lot of fun - even if it went down to "Team Marketplace" recently.
_  AMENO;-;This is a great multiplayer game that I would recomend getting. I do believe it should rated E and not M and it is a nice game for children.
Hrapunzel;-;Awesome game and now free to play. ;)
Erick;-;Really addicting, has hats in it, awesome weapons. GET IT!
Spikey AF;-;idk why i waste my life on this piece of crap
kevelas15;-;A game about collecting hats -11/10
Le Toucan Has Arrived;-;11/10 Best hat simulator.
Ronnie Radke;-;Life...No, Team Fortress 2! Who needs anything, but the most beautiful of assorted Hats and Apperal? Team Fortress 2 is an amazing and humerous 1st Person Shooter, a must play in my book!
Paul Blart Dankest Jew;-;best hat simulator of the decade
11:11;-;Doge would say: "ye m8 dis game such swegg m8 hats and  to becum swegg liek m8 unusuals, tfw m8 dis game such swegg m8 luvluvluv m8" True Story.
aMpAgE;-;This game is freaking awesome Texture is normal its for free items drop pay low This game is Such Awesome i cant say more than this
Blueberryman25;-;Very Nice.
Sekaes;-;TF2 is nice game.
Amiiyo;-;Hours and hours of fun, most enjoyable game I've played so far! =))
eagleboy99100;-;I like this game, i would also like some free items pls
Squeaky_;-;It's Da best Hat simulator i can find.
Don Lurky;-;One of the coolest games ever! The Multiplayer is amazing and the way they conerted the Source Engine into this it's just awesome. It's free and that's very good, and even it will be on money I will buy this game.
Mr.FuzzBud;-;This game has taken so much time out of my life that it is crazy i do indeed have a life out of Team Fortress but i rarely stay away from it ill give it a 10/10 amazing game and with the christmas update just around the corner valve will be adding different things for christmas its a fanminal game great job Valve :3
WHERE IS APPLESACK!;-;Most Awesome game created by VALVE!!!
AverageCanadian;-;Im addicted to this game! I just got TF2 a couple of months ago and I already have 340 hours. I am in a UGC highlander team and I look forward to the season!
PANDAISGUD2BIBAK;-;Team Fortress 2 is Awesome So Amazing I only Wish is if Steam could give me all hats and miscs or items xD pls .. But Still This Game IS AWESOME!!
Captain Slow;-;Great game! It's just awesome!
Peebz;-;Great community, many different servers to try out! good game~
Mr.Misteri0;-;The Best Game Ever in all Steam
Jenny wakeman;-;Hats/10 Like Hat economy simulator with FPS minigame
zvink;-;its pretty fun and you should play it
jackman111;-;TF2, it's FREEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE! (ROBLOX - It's Free reference)
Thuchan;-;this game is for you if you have alot of money to spend on hats and keys. 11/10
-576| Coon;-;This is a good game.
GunGoose;-;If you havn't played this game, you are not a true gamer. So get it, it's free.
Dimples;-;BEST GAME IN STEAM!
Spooky;-;Like hotel california, You can check out anytime you like but you can never leave.
lukaka;-;Such a fun game. Takes time to get used to but lots of fun!
Boats;-;One of the best games i have played
Darkside;-;Took my money and ruined my life, and whenever I try to quit this game I always crawl back to it. You should play it.
curry burh;-;good game, i just want the badge
shadowbrony;-;so fun to play and its free its the only best free game that you earn weapons without buying it
ClintTheGamer;-;Best F2P game ever that my crappy computer can run. Seriously though this game is awesome.
That Guy;-;this game is a fun and free game for mac pc and linux
hubba hubba zoot zoot;-;It has hats... and.. hats
Mewtastic;-;I would definetly reccomend this game it is amazing.No lag,fiar classes and weapons,and great gameplay.Also,the classes have wonderful personalitys,(sorry for mispells)the maps,gamemodes and graphic style are all AMAZING!And dont get me started on the Steam comunity on this game,they are awesome.Now,this is going on for a while,so i say i give this a 8.9,great for people who have grown out of COD or hates it(like me)and wants a laugh while killing people.SO GO PLAY IT!NOW!im still here,wiating.C'mon,play it,ill end the guide here,PLAY IT!
five nights at auschwitz;-;This game broke me. 10/10
cyorus;-;why should i even write a review on frikkin' TEAM FORTRESS 2?! this game is as good as perfect.almost NO flaws,great cartoon artstyle,differnet classes and different play styles for each class=a recipe for an hilarious and awesome game that your never gonna get bored of. and best of all ITS FREE! and if you wanna 'buy' the game you only gotta spend 5 cents. final thing to say:if someone dares to say that tf2 is a stupid/bad game,then you are allowed to slap that person in the face and give him/her a ransid NOPE.avi
shrek;-;Best game to  around in. 11/10
LoX;-;Best game, A lot of friends and fun times were given while playing this game.
jojitonyluas;-;This is an awesome, fun,vintage game. Trust me, it offers WAYYY more than COD or BF. Plus its F2P!!!!
Lowl;-;Insanely addictive. You may ask why this keeps us occupied more than other shooters? Well first off its insanely fun. Of course. And there's massive room for improvement for all classes. Master 1 class in 500 hours? 8 more to go. And when you master them? Many different weapon types. Besides, you'll never master tf2.
Maqs Staqs;-;Worst three thousand hours of my life
Elmo Lincoln;-;I did this for the achievement.
RaZ;-;Team Fortress 2 is an amazing game its good for when you have alot of friends with you but some classes are indeed overpowered and need to be downgraded
NolorEclipse;-;Great strategic-based game to play with friends or just going solo.
Wiimouto;-;Best game on steam, and its free!
Little_R3d <3;-;really great game i love it never could ask for more!!! thanks Gabe newell
._. FlamePig;-;I'm not kidding when I say this game is nearly all my free time nowadays. Any time I'm not playing TF2 is when I'm doing something less-important, like going to the bathroom or getting something to eat.
General Chas;-;Zany fun of a team deathmatch fps with the chaotic design of someone high off cow fumes. Lots of idiots on during certain times so be prepared to rage or ragequit like you have never raged before.
(Dead PC);-;very fun and defenatly recomand
IcedKappa;-;Still pouring hours of play into this game. Whether it's the communities you're involved in, friends you've made, or pride amounnted on personal achivement, this game tops all in the Multiplayer FPS genre.
Katdingo;-;Cool
rainbowllex;-;tf2 is the best
low. Firerose202;-;Its a great game to play with friends!
Dal;-;really fun game if u like first person shooters and team vs team
Xexandaler & Naxan;-;After god knows how many hours of playing this game, it is my personal and profesional opinion that you should not play this game. While I do recomend this game 10/10, you should not play this game unless you are willing to waste all your time and money on weapons and more likely, hats. You have been warned.
Harbinger of Carnage;-;I have been playing Team Fortress 2 for a year now, and all I can say is it's an amazingly unique FPS game. It can go from serious to silly in a matter of seconds, and the playstyle of the 9 classes is special in every way. The community is extremely friendly and sometimes even helpful. And not only that, the personalities of the nine mercenaries are just downright hilarious! So if you are looking to have some silly fun times while blowing people and stuff up to pieces, then Team Fortress 2 is the game for you!
Improv;-;Its ok i guess
TheManWhoBakes;-;TO ADDICTIVE TO STOP!!!
Gym Leader Juan;-;Team Fortress 2 is without a doubt the greatest shooter game I have ever played. While 11 year old tryhards slobber over rehashed Call of Duty garbage, real gamers are playing this colorful, creative, funny, well developed, well written, well put together and very well done First Person Shooter game. The game is free, so there is no excuse for you not to check it out. You really shouldn't regret it (Unless you suffer from addiction to games, then avoid this game at all costs).
Dyressa;-;A pretty rad game.
Andrew;-;This is one of the most free to play games i played in my life is so complete and cool, Valve do a vey good job with this game, and the updates are extremly epics, like love and war, or mvm, this game is perfect for any gamer.
Cannoli;-;This Game. This Game is the mascot of Valve. It is the pride and joy of all Gamers. It is more fun than gmod with a mod on it. Besides that, YOU CAN GIB PEOPLE! PLAY TF2 Today!
a piece of paper;-;hats
ArchAngel;-;one of the best FPS games i've ever palyed
A penguin with a top hat;-;Great game, I've had alot of fun with it. Just download it now. It's free and there's no reason not to.
NinjamanJosh;-;Spent 12 matches only trading hats 1337/10
(Eric Falcon);-;It's great game to play with friends. For the people who don't like the hats, then ignore them. Don't go trading like a madman. To Gaben: Please release HL3
odyessy (back in a week);-;I really like this game and i generally recommend you to play it since its a free and fun game
quacks#nosleep;-;I gotta a couple of things to say. -11/10 Amazing hats -Why the  is 42 a "special" number -I dont have a life when I play. `Whatever people say this is a FPS it's not...There stupid it's a hat simulator. 69/42 would  so hard
[Opto];-;Good, clean, well balanced multiplayer fun.
CloudG | trade.tf;-;it is a great game if you dont have it you should get it it is simply amazing. Most of all you just have a great time with your mates. Being different classes and helping your team out.
justintyme120;-;Really Fun game
no sound;-;Tf2 is fun 10/10
Hero;-;This game should be a paid game, ITS THAT GOOD. Free, WOW! Yeah, deffinately think this is a must have for any computz!
[WWST] Senior Pink Noodles C:;-;such community much keys so wow
tuff;-;I guess with over 1000 hours into the game I should write a review. Uhh. It's all right... I think. Hightower is fun. And stuff. Yeah. Hopefully they nerf the stickybombs. They're pretty annoying. Bread.
Princess Big Mac;-;Warning this game may be addictive and may blur your eyes (YOLO) hate that word but why did I use it anyway? Because I don't know and so do you. Its a fun game, but other people mainly trade instead of playing the game which makes the game uhh... yeah. If you never even played it or worse if you never heard of this game I don't think you're human. So sitback relax and wait for the very long download of this game If you are planning to play, which you will.........
DJ M30W-M1X;-;I ing love this game.
rbof69;-;this game has miniguns and a flamethrower and more
Jobalix;-;Huge amounts of fun gained when playing with your friends. The huge varity of classes and ways to customize them is one of a kind. Ever since the newest update, its only made me certain im not going to stop playing TF2 for a long time!
StafAce;-;The best free to play game ever
sp1ke;-;Beats CoD 6 - 0
Corey575757;-;buy this game so you can get addicted and gabe can buy a bugatti
deagleless;-;A very fun game overall. Each class doesn't seem to overpowered, with strengths and weaknesses. The games free, so if you have Steam just download it in your free time and start playing. The weapons are so varied and each has a possible potential to be useful. Also has a variaty of maps, and different gamemodes. I'm NOT saying these are the best classes, just my opinion. hatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshats. TF2 in a nutshell
MIKEDUDE;-;it's ok i guess.
Suspicious Hindu;-;come on its TF2 a clear favourit for alot of people. i just love it, the timeless grafics, and great speach and story behind all the characters. pros. grafics lore community mechanics noob friendly cons. the trading that ruins the gameplay taunts, that make the game seem like some cosplay
Ari;-;This is an amazing game that plays on the individual humor of every single individual who plays this. This game requires practice to improve and often tests your timing, thinking, and strategic abilities. Overall, it is a game that you can never (hopefully) get bored at.
JaneT;-;This is really great game i like it :)
Royal Bloo;-;Best game on steam by a long run!
s;-;To be honest, I actually hated this game 2 months ago and I do not know what happened but it really grew on me, probably something to do with hats but I don't know. I recommend this game to anyone looking for good free fun and free items.
MordeKai;-;Fun and very easy to get the hang of. One of valve's best. 11/10
MudkipMiku;-;Great game!
Inognito (KSG);-;Great Game, plenty of ways to get things for FREE xD
Bakers;-;Pretty much the best Hat Simulator you can find. 10/10 Would pay again
[DAZZ] Sonata_Dusk;-;Cool first person shooter game
StarChaser;-;Is good game-heavy
[RBS]wonderaids;-;Lots of fun, tons of items to collect and plenty of enemies to gib.
Red X;-;About this game:it has a lot of errors but for most users it works and this game is extremely fun! i really recommend,you dont need to be premium to find items but being premium really maxes the fun. I Hope it helped.
JustRyan;-;The best fun you can have in PC now FREE :D
Bilgewat3r;-;Free to play and really fun too!
(_) Blue Waffles (_);-;Review unavaliable. Please contact Steam customer support for more details, Thank you!
Shanks4u;-;Team Fortress 2, I believe, will be the future of FPS games. Unlike other games where your just running around spraying automatic rifles, this game involves teamwork, and has 9 classes to help do this. Its all evenly balanced, with every class able to counter another class and every class having a counter. Theres also a wide range of weapons to customize your loudout. They also have many kinds of fun game modes, both official and community made. To top all of this off, if you're a hardcore gamer like me, you can play Competitive, which is a more highly skill based teams fighting each other. There's two verions of competitive; 6's, where it is 2 scouts, 2 soldiers, 1 demo, and 1 medic on each team; and there is highlander, which is 1 of every class. no matter the gamemode you and your teammates will be on the mic relaying info to each other, such as if a enemy is hurt or if someone is down.
TaZ;-;=i was 9 years old =its funny =its a hobby(to have hats:D) =and a very nice game~
Flipp;-;This hat-trade-simulation game is very good, and when you're bored of it, it also comes with a balanced team based competitive shooting multiplayer.
PsychologicallyIntriguedSpammer;-;A simple Must-Have for all steam users!
MaxPowder;-;Best game Ever Pro's Only Play This game No 1 alse would fight for weapons they will fight for thier life!
Deeakron;-;It can be a really fun game, despite the fact that it can be a pay-to-win game. Also, it has some language, but excluding that, I think it is a great game!
thevaultdweller13;-;i....i dont need to tell yu why you should get this game.
BG|Khed101TheKiwi;-;fun werid fps crazy fp2 game just so fun mmo lots of good stuff just try it
teenage mutant ninja chris;-;why is this the best game on steam and free.
[Lihay1610 ];-;Great game.
Pointy Turd;-;Awesome , can't be more awesome. You must play! IT'S FREE! C'MON! LETS GO! If you don't, you'd better hold on to your head mate. I'm going to cover you in colored rain!
Negev rounds;-;This game is most epic game ever... U must try this
BOT Star;-;good game and good friends and good time thx tf2
Mr Anders;-;This game is awesome! Chek this out!
Gerard1142;-;This is an Awesome first person shooter game thats awesome to play with your friends, the different game modes make this game even more awesome and complete for all people
sponge bobu;-;I really like this new update :D
Rok-Weiler;-;Download it now! Even if you don't like it by any chance, it's F2P so it's a win/win! EDIT: Now a conga simulator with plenty of unusual taunts, i'm not sure where this game is going anymore. Download it still, it's a good game, but TF2 is shifting the meta into an unusual (Pun intended) state. Don't forget hats!
PITY"""""""""""""""""""""""""""";-;GAME TO PRO. MAKES YOU SPEND MONEY. LOVE IT.
Wingsfield;-;love this game, one of my favorites
[KSG] Dr.Leiferricson;-;Well..I bought the game years ago when it was sold on a disc. i was like in elementary school and i enjoyed the game. But then i kinda stopped and lost the activation code for it. so i couldnt play it. But Lately I saw it was F2P and was quite excited. To see that VALVe has kept a F2P game up like this, is impressive and is one of the reasons why VALVe is my favorite Game company. This game is great and will be for the years to come. Thanks for the great game
{nopants} Telemonic?;-;This. Is. The. BEST GAME EVAR. over 2000 hours and still strong. so ye. also ITS FREE
Apicedda | trade.tf;-;it really need a motivation?
DraZa Chetn1k;-;The best online game I've ever played.
Malvex;-;Gg wp 10/10 like skyrim with hats would play again
steven shitter tommy toilet;-;I really don't know why i am doing this, but i guess you could play it....
Rachel;-;used to think it was gay but now its ok
Meanie c:;-;Excellent game for a fps game! I recommend to anyone who likes shooter games!
Muffn.;-;I would highly recomend this game to every fps fan, gameplay, trading, community is top notch!
ButterFly;-;This game is awesome!
Master Baiter;-;Man, this could be renamed Hat Simulator and it would be the same thing. Even though I don't play it much and I'm not even skilled at it, I love this game. You can get killed by being slapped with a fish. You can waste 100 dollars on a digital ring. You can kill robots that run on money. But most importantly, hats. 10/10 hats.
Toxic;-;its ok i guess :L
Nick The Proudly Insane;-;This game, Is Absolutely Original, It's a game where you just want to start dancing everytime you play it. Absolutely Perfect. For the most part, I recommend this game.
hold up we dem b o y z;-;TF2 took a spinoff of your average FPS. It includes humor, action, and a great stlye of gameplay. The ability to earn & trade items makes the experience a whole lot better. And, it's free, so no harm done if you don't like it.
Ady;-;This game is amaizing! I need to buy it for all feautures.
Could be playing Splatoon;-;Now with more bread
Boriix;-;Best hat simulator you can currently find out there.
dreameR;-;Went from shooting mercenaries to finding bread 10/10 would play again
Kenpachi's Bankai;-;Great game, replay vaule is amazing. People just need to stop being spy and snipers all the time though.
-NG- Rendil;-;an fps that has hats...  yeah!
elk;-;it is so much fun to burn the engies haha
15 sobbing whales;-;Best conga simulator 2014. 10/10 will play.
The Frosty_Engine;-;Its cool. Just like other RvB games (red vs blue)...when I started playing I did think it was fun, I did pretty well too, only played CTF really though, overall, it was enjoyable for a few hours a few times, but then it got meh. And when it got a 500mb update I didn't bother at all. I just don't want to write a not recommended review, people who love this game will hate me forever. I mean it was ok and all, but not my fav rvb game. When it comes to gmod, I don't usually bother with TF2, I try to make some themes, but they don't work out too well because I don't favor the game. Pros: Its WAS fun for a time... Cons: ...then I got bored.
D. Ball Face-Port;-;It's good.
Az;-;1800 Hours... Speaks for itself.
babykiller;-;only nerds play
[[} cupcakes {]];-;OMG! I love this game so much!
PieLover;-;Get steam Download tf2 Get weapons buy premium get more weapons trade shark people sell items in the market get money buy other games ??? profit
BellLabs / Aperture Engineer;-;Got hats? GET MORE HATS! 11/10 - IGN 10/10 - JonTron 10/9 - Guess Who
StaMie;-;This game isn't old-school or classic, but i'm sure this FPS going to be a Good-Old-Game. Why? Here's the receipt for this: -Take a good FPS game. [check] -Take a wise idea and give the game for no-price. [check] -Take a good community. [check] Mix it up and voila! Now you have a legendary game. So what can you do now? Here is my advice for ya step by step: 1st step: Download it! 2nd step: Install it! 3rd step: Play and enjoy it! 4th step: Take some brake! 5th step: Repeate from the 3rd step!
Colonel "Killzone" Kreiger;-;This Game is Awesome, You get hats, Throw  (something i've always wanted to do) eat sandwichs, and blow dudes up
Doctor Zuliancy;-;Best game you can sit around in a chair & drink beer, and get fat.
DoomedYoshi;-;Some people don't like this game... I hate them... GRRR......
Jack!;-;It's a good enough game if you have the cash to splash.
Seajelly the 2nd;-;Ever wish you could have that very expensive hat you saw at that one store? Well fear no more! This is the world's most loved and realistic hat simulator on Earth (It even has the people who insult you over your hat!)! It even comes with the wars that come with your hats! 11/10 would go bankrupt over virtual hats again.
Daikenki;-;It's all about da Hats man.
Chicken;-;This game is sugoi and kawaii. Get it.
MOONLIGHT_SHADOW88;-;Team Fortress 2 is a team based game that focuses around 9 different classes working together to fight against another team. For a free to play game, it is quite good as you can customise your characters and get new weapons. I would definitely recommend this game to anyone who likes to do something fun. :)
lasagnalarry;-;Probably my most played game of all time. It's really good.
Spoody;-;Y it not inclood webbz
Mason;-;No game has sucked more time out of my life than Team Fortress 2. This is one of the few FPSs where you actually have to think, and the only one where having a hat that's on fire makes you pro. Try this mothaa out if you haven't already, BROTHER.
Bearded Council;-;Great Game!!!!
Steven10;-;team fortress 2 good game to play laugh
- Hamburger-chan -;-;its ok
TheDeathGod9897;-;This game is referred to as the best ( or second best, depends on whether you prefer this or DOTA 2) free to play title ever created. I personally agree with this statement to a certain level; but I can not help but feel that I must disagree with this statement. This games presentation is amazing. From the menus, to the design and layout of the maps, I can actually feel all the work put into the development of this game. The menus use a basic layout that have both a simple and complex feel to them. You are presented with a wealth of options to adjust your gameplay experience; but you ever feel overwhelmed by the number of options available. Graphically, this game is nothing sepcial by 2013's standards; but back in 2007 this game was beautiful. It's cartoonish style and the charm of all it's characters draw you in rather easily. The maps themselves are rather amazing to look at, though some are better than others. The gameplay is what really draws many people in. It consists of classes that possess both strengths and weaknesses ( basically they are well balanced). The gameplay changes with each class and you will always have a preferrence of classes. However, the gameplay could eventually feel repetitive and soon turn a person off of the game. But to conteract this, valve releases weekly updates for the game and have enable trading within this game. The game will reward a player with loot for either earning a certain number of achievements, completing certain tasks or for just playing the game. The loot can either be considered useless, useful, stupid or great; but that all depends on class and preference for the type of loot. I personally love playing as the sniper and am thrilled whenever I unlock a new sniper rifle. The game also features crafthing, which motivates players into buying or earning certain items just to get another. Overall, the game is great and I certainly think that it is highly enjoyable; but I feel that most of that enjoyment comes from the offers valve tosses our way when we play TF2, which is not really good for the game's reputation. I hope that I proved to be of some assistance; and please remember that this is my opinion and everyone's opinion varies. Thanks for reading!
[BotOPST] Lyra;-;The xbox 360 version is better, only stock weapons allowed, all engi 2fort, and nobody plays on hydro
chuchu train;-;I'd say that it ruined my life, but before Team Fortress 2, I didn't have a life. 5 Stars.
[tR]Terobial;-;It is pretty good sometimes.
dialpad;-;TF2 is a must have and you should feel ashamed and dirty if you don't already have it. Everyone and their mother is boasting their F2P game nowadays, but it usually turns out to be a Pay2Win. TF2 is not like that at all. While some people may argue the whole Mann Co. Store makes the game Pay2Win, they're lying. Every weapon in the game can be aquired through random drops. No painful leveling, no grinding. Just play at your own leisure and the weapon will eventually fall into your lap. If you are an impatient little  you can always just go to the Mann Co. Store and spend a candy bar's worth of money on whatever weapon you want. TF2 is an incredibly balanced game with no class being better than the other *COUGH* Pyro*COUGH* All of that aside you have 9 completely different play styles if you don't count the plethora of different weapons and gamemodes where you might play a class entirely different. Valve, the sweethearts they are, also host holiday events and constantly add in new weapons and hats. Oh yeah, there are hats. Along with competitive play you can spend money to play with friends COOL RIGHT?! In all honesty, the TF2 Co-Op gamemode is lots of fun and is really hectic and chaotic, but DEAR GOD IS IT DIFFICULT. It's probably just cause I suck. TF2 is truly a spectacle in the FPS world, managing to rake in more money than Ethiopia in a year by selling hats. Now, these hats are not real. They are a line of code. They don't increase health or make you jump higher. They make you look cool. This is one of the aspects I'm not so crazy about. This hat-hierarchy if you will, causes a lot of discrimination between the community as to who's free to play and who's not. Along with that, the community is not the best in the world, especially not the Man Vs Machine one, TF2's Co-Op game. Overall TF2 is a great game to have in your library. It brings hours and hours of fun and excitement and is great to play with friends or by yourself. As an FPS in general it is more goofy than Battlefield or Call of Duty. What it lacks in seriousness it makes up for in charm and being better than Call of Duty. My final rating for TF2 is 8/10 for being a fun and totally replayable FPS for everyone. It is great as an entry level FPS or one for veterans. ALSO IT'S FREEEEEEE! So go on, go get it. What are you waiting for? I'm going to stand here until you go and get it. If you disagree with me feel free to tell me why and try and sway my opinion otherwise.
Destroy > Rebuild;-;I LOVE YOU BABY
Totally Gawdzilluh!;-;You know what? I recommend this. Not because it's a good game, which it is, but because I know that somewhere, SOMEWHERE, there is a person. A person that doesn't give any bulls about the outside world. If that person is readint this right now, pick this game up. You'll never see the outside world again, or the rest of your house, or anyone you held dear to your heart. But who cares when you have all these hats?
MarcoDeGammo;-;Everytime I boot this game up I play one game. If i do not receive a hat in the time it takes to play one game I quit. One day the hat fairy will bestow her gifts upon me. One Day.
[CDC]+"catten"+;-;awsom game its my liffe
Donquixote Doflamingo;-;This game is freeckin AMAZING LOL$$
Yaklus;-;This next part I dont remember so hot. All I know is I got up from the bed, like I was going down to the can or something, and then I tried to sock him, with all my might, right smack in the toothbrush, so it would split his goddam throat open. Only, I missed. I didnt connect. All I did was sort of get him on the side of the head or something. It probably hurt him a little bit, but not as much as I wanted. It probably wouldve hurt him a lot, but I did it with my right hand, and I cant make a good fist with that hand. On account of that injury I told you about.
xX360NOSCOPEYOLOSWAGXx;-;2 STEPS FOR BEING AWESOME: 1: Buy TEAM FORTRESS 2. 2: Play it.
Ryan mate;-;very good game, loads of action to keep you entertained for HOURS, YES HOURS
Confetti Camouflage;-;It's a hat and afk simulator; you've probably already played it. Hat mechanics rivaled to none.
YoungAbe;-;good game i just recomend to try easy servers for newbies
DSLD;-;HATS! #hatsfordays
Dumora;-;This game is the greatest thing you will ever play in your life! Really good! 0/10
Scrambled Pudding;-;Had fun shooting guys in the testicles. And did I mention the hats? Hats are a thing. Totally didn't take up half of my computer memory with hat models and unusual effects. And I only spent about $400 USD on this game and wasted about 1000+ hours on this game. 69/10 Would recommend to anyone under the age of pasta.
NotLegit1337;-;Good But Need Hats To Play Well
Elchrisi-Uchiha(   );-;Is very cool play
RazzyFTW;-;This game is freaking AWESOME!You can play it over and over again because it's not possible to get bored of it!Unlimited customization,amazing guns and tons of fun!See you in the game!
Squeeze;-;13 Year old put his mom on the mic and told me to  off for scamming him and stealing her money 11/10
B3N;-;Team Fortress 2 is an FPS game with a singleplayer and multiplayer servers. I think that this game is awesome, but they need to upgrade the weapon/item drop system, it needs to give new players a few more items than people who have been playing the game more often. The textures are somewhat realistic with a sort of "cartoony" feel to them. The player models are good but could use a little more detail, even if it's a "cartoony" game. Basic plot: Mann CO. a company run by the tough Saxton Hale who had 3 sons, Red, Blu, and Grey. Red and Blu exiled Grey and fought with eachother like maniacs. Grey came back with replicas of Red and Blus armies, Robots. Classes: Scout, Soldier, Pyro, Demo, Heavy, Engineer, Medic, Sniper, and Spy.
DecXa (Krunked);-;1000 hours. All I need to say.
GunGoose;-;If you havn't played this game, you are not a true gamer. So get it, it's free.
Dimples;-;BEST GAME IN STEAM!
Spooky;-;Like hotel california, You can check out anytime you like but you can never leave.
lukaka;-;Such a fun game. Takes time to get used to but lots of fun!
Boats;-;One of the best games i have played
Dat Asset;-;So addicting
alexi;-;best game ever could improve the lag pervention though
TheAngryPanda;-;Quite possibly the greatest hat simulator for P.C. as of right now, but the shooting elements feel tacked on and not as well polished as the hat simulating aspects of the game. Valve has also shown zero progress in fixing the game-breaking bug, where your steam funds slowly drain, and hats keep appearing in your inventory upon installing the game. The shooting is sub-par, it is ladden with bugs, and the Community is terrible. But the Hats look cool. 11/10, would waste life on again.
Nickels;-;hats.hats.hats.hats.hats.hats.weapon.hats.hats.hats.refined.unusual.hats.hats.hats.dispencer.hats.hats.misc.hats.medic.medic.sentry.spy.spy.spy.rage.tryhard.hats.hats.hats. trade me.crates.crates.crates.spy.medic.HATS.
( Bracket ) | LFT Spy Steel;-;Ham,Hats and cartoon style fps. Oh,don't forget the pan.
Probably bukan orang yang polos;-;One of the best Free-to-play game i've ever play. Don't have any money?, you can sell your weapons in Community Store and get some money! Go to Idle server and Idling (Don't do nothing), you'll get a dropped item! Buy a hat or trade with your friends and make your own characther with some Cosmetics! If you don't have a money to buy some weapon, don't worry! you can try it out for 7 Days. Follow the events, and get a special item! Play MvM with your friends and gets some expensive/rare items! If you play this game, I guarantee you will not regret RECOMMENDED! 10/10
five nights at auschwitz;-;This game broke me. 10/10
Vic;-;Cool.
[R] Caliban;-;TF2's ideal for quick, intense matches or fun rolling battles; being free to play means that there's barely any barrier to play, and the game allows you to play to your style. Now, find yourself a strong, friendly, accepting community of fun people to play with, and you don't need any other games.
medusa;-;MY FRIEND TAUGHT HOW TO PLAY TF2 BECAUSE SHE WAS ALWAYS TALKING ABOUT IT AND I DICIDED TO PLAY JUST TO SEE BUT NOW I PLAY EVERY DAY AND I RECOMMEND.
Duo Rong;-;If you like Shooting, Hats or trading this is the game to play.
={RIPSR}= The Loyal Traitor;-;This game is... it's... it's too great to be described with mere adjectives! This game is absolutely with out a doubt one of the best games out there! It was indeed "Worth the Weight". It's art style is amazing because it is so unique and different from anything I've ever seen, this goes for both the characters, items, and enviorment. I find the game's visual appearence breathtaking. For the small amount of soundtracks this game consists of, they are amazing. This game is great because it seemingly never gets old, with dozens of different gamemodes, exciting new content updates, and its annual Scream Fortress, Smissmas, and other events. Yet, the best thing about the game (at least to me it is) is the nine classes that the game consists of. Each class is full of personality and dialogue, whether its insulting taunts or hillarious cathphrases. All of the classes are very different from each other with weapons, dialogue, attitude, style, and the way you play as them. First off you have your Offensive category, consisting of the Scout, Soldier, and Pyro. The Scout is a fast, smart-mouthed, "all bark and no bite" kind of kid with weapons that are most effective at close range, requiring a hit-and-run sort of tactic. The Soldier is a dedicated American with a strong passion to fight. Possessing a Rocket Launcher as his primary weapon, the soldier is a powerful threat to his opponents, but all that power leaves him with a slow speed, requiring him to use a maneuver known as the "Rocket Jump" to travel faster in exchange for some health. The Pyro is a mumbling lunatic, whose history is a mystery to just about everyone, he (or possibly she) wields a Flamethrower as his/her main weapon which makes him/her lack a lot of range, but gives a lot of potential power if used correctly. He/she is best used for ambushing enemies and his/her Compresion Blast (Airblast) can be used to reflect many projectiles back at opponents. Next is the Deffensive category, the Demoman, Heavy, and Engineer. The Demoman is a one-eyed, drunk Scottish man who has no bullet-based weapons and fights instead with 2 explosive weapons. He can take out enemies that he can't see with his Grenade Launcher or lay traps with his Sticky Launcher. The Heavy is a large, strong, Russian beast that uses his beloved Minigun. His immense power and large size leaves him with a very slow speed but with very strong fire power. He may be considered an easy target due to his size, but as long as he has his Minigun he should be treated as a threat just like all the other classes. The Engineer is a intelligent Texan that relies mainly on his buildings to fight. His Sentry Gun is generally a threat to any enemy within it's range, he can build a Dispenser to heal him and his teammates as well as refill there ammo, and he can also build teleporters so his team can access areas faster. The last category is the Supportive classes, consisting of the Medic, Sniper, and Spy. The Medic is a German doctor with amazing medical technology at his disposal. He is not one known for attacking but instead he is known for healing. Using his Medi-gun, he can quickly heal his teammates. Once charged enough, he can deploy what is known as an "Ubercharge", making him and whoever he is healing temporarily invincible to any damage from enemy weapons. The Sniper is an Austrailian outdoorsman who, as his name suggests, uses a Sniper Rifle as his main weapon. He can do extreme ammounts of damage at long range, making him a valueble teammate when used correctly. At short range though, he is more vulnerable and can easily be overwhelmed by enemies. Lastly, we have the Spy, a French trickster who can disguise himself as his opponents and quietly sneak behind enemy lines. He can perform a "Backstab", resulting in an instant kill, use his Sapper to destroy enemy buildings such as Sentries, and use his Cloaking Device to become temporarily invisible to sneak around danger. Playing as a Spy requires stealth and smarts to succeed. The best thing about all these characters is the fact that, other than the Heavy being the games main Icon, none of the classes seem to be better than the rest. They all have their own special weaknesses and none of them are generally favored over the others. The game is a masterpiece and that's all I can say.
Mr. Bear Zero;-;i love this game to much to not set it down lol
:3 [NBT];-;Good and nice game=3!
olofier;-;Best game i ever played. I will play it for the rest of my life
[Cat Senpai-Dragonslayer]Tskune;-;Best Free To Play game i have ever played
F1RST;-;Pay 2 Play , funny and the atmosphere of the game is supercool! Thumbs up! Work in team, collect funny achievements, challenge your mate, Have fun! Free 2 Play players go buy premium. :)
The Classics 007|Furey;-;this game is so awsome,baby!
Kannibal Turtle;-;If you havent played this game there is something wrong with you.
17 shots from 38;-;There are hats.
Slick Watts;-;If you ever felt like you lacked a hat-based economy in your live, this is for you.
|| Duncan McLeod ||;-;best game ever created
Chimpy With A L -U.B-;-;Faboulas
Somebody?;-;Severe lack of fortresses. Do not be fooled.
Franklin;-;super addicting and fun game with unique classes really takes away from main stream cod shooters on todays market of fps's
aguopstop;-;10/10 very good multiplayer and a must have for Valve lovers!
everyone;-;its one of those innovative games that promotes different gameplay. If you are a cod or battlefield player then try this game but memorise all weapon stats first because this game has no assault rifles and snipers does not one hit kill not unless its a headshot. Although this game is pretty cool it kept me covered when im bored for 2 years and on going and its really fun. Its free so yeah that is self explanatory.
Im just a nickname;-;Its the best game ever
MeowMan;-;ITS FUN AND LIKE YEA AND U PAY MONEY AND U LIKE ITS GOOD CUZ U WIN.
Quickscoping Prophet;-;I've lost my friends and family because they bothered me while playing TF2. My girlfriend left me for another man due to neglect, and I sold my house to buy Keys to open crates. I sold my PC to buy food so I wouldn't starve. I am homeless and currently typing this on a Computer at the Library. 10/10
Josip_XD King of snoipah;-;This game is awsome 10/10! i like how it alway updates and adds new weps and hats
Colonial Americaball;-;My only, favorite addicting Free Online game on STEAM!!
Rascus;-;This game is no question, my favourite game of all time, in the universe. And it's easily, the best Team Based shooter, ever to be created. Will you enjoy it? Don't let me be the judge of that, this game is 100% FREE. Go ahead, download it and try it out for yourself! Hate this game because the graphics are "unrealistic"? To me, that's why its so lovable, and contributes to why its survived for so long. Micro-transactions from the Mann Co. Store aren't necessary, and items like Hats, Australuims, Unusuals etc- aren't needed to be good at TF2. I'm not to dis trading however, it's something you can use to your advantage and profit hundreds, if not thousands of dollars, I certainly have! And you can utilize the Steam Community Market to get Funds when you need 'em.
Matt;-;Perhaps my favorite game, the large community and great moddability make this a great game in my opinion. With both official and community servers (often running custom maps and plugins), you can spend your time blowing things up as a Demoman, or just run around a trade map showing off your cosmetics. Either way, it's an interesting game, and there's nothing quite like it.
TarTar :3;-;I love this game . It's like having a baby , you really love it at first , like a lot , then you forgot it for about 1 year and after that you still find it and you love him again . ;)
what shut up ok;-;Fun, non-serious game. The right move for a cool dude.
The Mumbling Masochist;-;The virtual hats in my inventory gives me flashbacks to the days where my wallet was full and I had multiple wives. The sacrifice was worth it.
biO;-;it's ok
Zephroskash;-;Team Fortress 2 is an amazing, if not, best, teamwork-oriented FPS. I highly recommend this game to anyone who loves either team work, first-person shooters, or having a good laugh.
The Fancy Assassin;-;this is a great game but it takes foreever to load
|KR| Pirate Lord Agent P;-;Team Fortress 2 is very awesome! Good graphics, very enjoyably and addictive! Hope that the game will go well in the future but, there are some things that's kinda out of hand. First is the community pricing about items, damn the price just keeps higher and higher! It's getting out of control. Besides that, everythings is all good! Get this game! #RatedM
Bill Nye the Ninja Guy;-;Lots of acheivements and stuff that is fun simple :D
BigBootyRichard;-;It's a HAT simulator, Not a HATE simulator.
DeBirdle;-;Has Hats & Sandwich's nuff said....
[145] Happy Santa;-;Anyone who is a fan of FPS games and hats should play this.
Ahadapple;-;This game is great!
The Danger;-;Really love this game !!!
u;-;It's a fun game. Get it.
cmite;-;10/10 would pay for hats again.
Papa Tyrone;-;The red vs. blue factor seems like a playful thing in this game, alot of the time red, and blue are depicted as teaming up quite a bit. That's what makes this game diffrent, and i love it.
Doc Xero;-;This was the reason I joined Steam. Thank you valve <3
TrademarkTM;-;Ah, team fortress 2. who couldnt love this title after all the content added and popularity it has across the globe. its fast paced and is so much fun to play with friends at almost any time. over all, a great expeariance.
Decadence;-;An excellent and fast-paced shooter from the past. A must have for everyone.
Pake;-;+The game is a fun FPS with multiple classes to vary up your play style and changes the way it is from other FPS's, then it just being a point and shoot with the regular FPS guns: smg, sniper, assualt rifle, etc. But TF2 adds a more expansive take with weapons: flamethrower, minigun, sentries, etc. I'd say this game is worth it since it's been pretty active for 8 years. (to this date) -Although the game has multiple hats, misc. etc. for you to wear on your characters, and different types of weapons (genuine, vintage, strange, etc.) with along the trading the comes along with this game and can get you into a fuss over wanting an item for a long time and then going into the habbit of buying everything from either the Mann Co. Store or the Steam Market. This game will consume your money more then "pickpocketers" in Europe. Although the game is a new a fun FPS with still 8 years of active people and with the downfall of trading I still give this game a.. 9/10
Knight_Dauntless;-;Great game not pay to win at all i have put too many hours into it and do not regret a moment
GOOD;-;In my opinion, this game can temporarily help you to relieve your stress and let you have a great time playing it. I definitely recommend this game to those who are not yet playing it, it is free afterall, make the best use out of it xD
NibbleNinja;-;I always have so much fun playing with my mates
i'm shit #awayfor3weeks;-;Most fun i have ever had in playing a game
Hannibal Rekter;-;Nice hat collection simulator.
Larynxgator#UNBOXEDHYPERBEAST;-;It's great! very immersive online gameplay, with an amazing community (especially trading) would recommend on a whim!
count.of.wilfore;-;Some say that the graphics are from comics, I think their great. So come on! It's one of the best multiplayer games ever and it's free! Valve is the best!
We're the exception!;-;When there is no more room in hell, gibus wearing f2ps will roam the earth.
Fedora Eagle [Power's Out];-;Whatever you do, don't buy anything in this game at all. Once you've bought something in the game for the first time, you'll forget how outrageous the prices are for each item, and before you know it, you'll be all out of money because you spent it all on hats. 10/10
Sheila;-;TF2.....One of the best games i've ever played......Like it!
Royalite[Senspai];-;This game shows me a decent way of cooperation with team and vulgar words to be used :)
Allerianna;-;This game does it again. The thing i love about Valve games is.....No matter how much you play it,there is countless servers with mods or different game modes,basically expanding the game way beyond it's limits,just like CSS and Day of Defeat,i find myself playing official modes now and then,and the next second i'm already playing some of the weird game modes. I do not really like MvM for some reason,i think it's....just not my style. Plus,this game is ing cursed. I love collecting stuff and hoarding items,so,this game did hit me really hard. I find myself trying to collect more hats,yes,HATS,and when i think i have all the ones i want,A FREAKING UPDATE COMES UP AND BRINGS LOTS OF NEW ONES THAT I WANT TO GET. So,yeah,this game is pretty adictive,i would recommend it,definitely,specially because it is free to play,but be warned,if you pick up speed,this game is just like drugs. It s you up,it leaves you poor and regretting all the stuff you bought in here....But with many little valuables,of course. <3
~|CoS|~ Tuckismad;-;This game is the very reason I don't own a car, have any social skills or an education, but at least I can say I have HATS. 10/10.
ayCiee (');-;Circle of TF2: Think you're good --> see people with hats better than yours /|\ | | \|/ | Spend $money$ on better hats <-- Think you're bad
sm0;-;Lag compensation, unbalanced teams, 4 snipers and 3 spies on blu. At least you know the downsides now.. Upsides : Very addictive, versatile classes, great performance, huge amount of servers to play on, lots of differents modes and mods, every class has it's weakness. Team work is the main factor for winning matches. 8.5/10
excited corgi;-;This is the only game where the main focus has turned to hats and there is a hat disguised as a hat. Hats. And bread 14 hats / 10 would wear an absurd amount of hats again
DarkKawaiiAzazel;-;It's an awesome game
foxtrotcharlie;-;awesome game soo adictive just get it....it's free!
gofawful;-;This game is probably one of the best FPS games I have ever played. It includes 9 different classes with their own personality. Like the Scout, he likes baseball and can strangely double jump. He's incredibly fast, which makes him a good add-on to the Offensive classes. Team Fortress 2 is Free To Play now, so everyone (including Gibus wearers) can enjoy the fun... probably. I'm not that "ermg it haz goats 10/10" guy. Overall, my rating is 9.8/10.
ExHiiLeZz;-;So the infamous Team Fortress 2! The game has been around for a long time, 8 years to be exact and was first brought out on Xbox 360 as a bundle (the orange box), still to this day the game has a large community keeping the game alive. This game is a huge benefactor in the trading community and is constantly having various updates to the game for new items and refreshes to keep the game going. As most of you already know, Team Fortress 2 is a multiplayer FPS with an objective to defeat the opposing side (been Blu or Red depending on what side you are on) throughout various types of game modes. The class system consists of 9 characters to pick from: 1.) Scout, a fast agile character primarilly played to get into the enemy base and capture/steal the intellegence. 2.) Soldier, a slow but strong character weilding a rocket launcher, he is played to be offensive and support the team by killing everyone basically. 3.) Pyro, played to be offensive and "spy check" so the spy does not get into your back line and take out your team and sentries etc. 4.) Demoman, a slow character played to support your team by getting into the back line and drop bombs everywhere and destroy their defences and keep the enemies in their spawn. 5.) Heavy, the heavy is a very slow charcter but to make up for this he weilds a minigun and has a tonne of heath, you guessed it, he just sits there as a tank and kills and defends as he pleases. 6.) Engineer, the engineer is solely a defensive character who supports the team. He is very versitile, he builds sentries to defend, sets up teleporters and has a dispenser which regrenerates heath and stocks up on ammo for nearby friendlies. 7.) Medic, as the name says the medic is a support and runs around healing your team, pretty straight forward. 8.) Sniper, now the sniper sits back and defends with his rifle, this character can take out anyone with a single shot, making him a valuable asset to any team. 9.) Spy, the spy supports the team greatly by getting into the back line and to take out the engineers gear, doing so allows the scout to get in the base and capture the points and grab the intellegence. doing so will win the game. All of these characters fit together and each of them play their own role towards winning the game. So now we have that out of the way, i would say this is a great game, especially because it's completely free and things you buy from the store or market have no actual affect in game and are purely visual changes to the game which makes it a completely even game so no "Pay 2 Win". I would definitely reccomend this to anyone who enjoys FPS titles. 10/10 The games free, so what do you have to lose? :)
Cloudburst;-;team fortress 2 is awesome. and here is my five reasons why! 1: Its free! 2: there are nine diffrent caracters ! 3: you can get free guns and tools and headgear and more! 4: you can borrow things that cost in a few days! 5: there are many diffrent gamemodes to play! ohh and u can buy stuff!
PRISM;-;best game ever played fun for everyone who plays it im a trader myself and i love it
Snazzy Gator;-;Walked up to the entirety of BLU Team Started conga lining They joined my conga line We conga'd off a cliff and our bodies flew away The rest of RED team jumped off to join us Did it again three days later Quality - 10/10 Comedy - 10/10 Entertainment - 10/10 In-Game Content - 10/10 Fun - 10/10 Fair Pricing - 9000/10 [ Free games are flippin amazing ] MERASMUS - 10/10 F2p's + Phlog Pyros + W+M1 Pyros - DEAR GOD NO
Cat Cookie ();-;very fun and addictive,many gamemodes to play,coop is very good and fun if you have some friends to play but keys have gone to poop tho
Xigbar;-;This game will provide hour's of fun. To defending point's to even playing on community made servers.You will have fun
mute;-;A fun, fast paced shooter with different gamemodes and classes. The best free-to-play game on steam
theluniz;-;It is a masterpiece !! I threw this game for a couple of months, but then she called me again)) yes yes, she called! she just caught me) I trudge this game of the year, I think so: D and graphics fit completely! would be more updates adding new things, and everything is large enough, the game is super) one of my favorite ..
Janitsu;-;Yeah, what do I have to say about Team Fortress 2? This game is my most played game on steam, There's so much to do, If you are into trading you could just focus on that, If you just want to have fun with friends then you could just join a server and have fun. People say that "Commpetetive" doesn't exist in Team fortress 2 but it sure does. People also says that "Teamwork" doesn't exist in Team fortress 2 but it also surly does. This is atleast one of the best FPS games out there. Hat Simulator 2, I mean... Team Fortress 2 gets 11/10
deagleless;-;A very fun game overall. Each class doesn't seem to overpowered, with strengths and weaknesses. The games free, so if you have Steam just download it in your free time and start playing. The weapons are so varied and each has a possible potential to be useful. Also has a variaty of maps, and different gamemodes. I'm NOT saying these are the best classes, just my opinion. hatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshats. TF2 in a nutshell
MIKEDUDE;-;it's ok i guess.
Suspicious Hindu;-;come on its TF2 a clear favourit for alot of people. i just love it, the timeless grafics, and great speach and story behind all the characters. pros. grafics lore community mechanics noob friendly cons. the trading that ruins the gameplay taunts, that make the game seem like some cosplay
Iced;-;What is this game....? Maybe the best team based game in the hole world.Dont Miss this opportunity and download it now.!
15 sobbing whales;-;Best conga simulator 2014. 10/10 will play.
[eF] SlayeR [BE];-;If you want some fun play this ;)
AtomicEzio;-;1 year ive been playing this and i still think im new to this game
BRUTALIGHT SPARCAKE;-;team fortrees 2 is awesome
K9_delta;-;Hat simulator. The game play is actualy fun though. 11/10
Dr.KamiCraze;-;Things that make it better than a regular old boring FPS: Actual Personality The guns arent the same thing Hats Great Community Not hard to learn Bad things: Nothing you fool.
Cap'n K'nuckles;-;Honestly, this is one of my favorite shooter games there is. Team Fortress 2 is often called-out for its cartoon like style, but while in gameplay, people will find this feature unique. There is a major demand for cosmetics in the game however.
StrikingIronicDecoy;-;This is one of the best games i have ever played i recommend it to all people and think that valve and steam should keep up the good work :)
PrincessGracieLuHeart;-;love this game and love my friends on it some ppl that play are awesome i think if your looking for one to meet knew friends this is the game just dont pay any attention to the trolls they are no body but this game is amazing love it
Dipper;-;Maybe it's the quirky character personalities, or the over the top jokes, But I can't get enough of TF2. TF2 has it's own style and personality that sets it apart from other FPS. TF2 is not a "hardcore" shooter (although there are exceptions to this), instead it is breeming with dark humor, and stereotypical charm. TF2 may catch you off guard, but with time, you'll come to love it. In TF2, each class is carefully balanced to counter the others, forcing you to work as a team if you want to win. Hence the "Team" in Team Fortress. There are nine classes, each with their own traits that define them in the battlefield. The offensive classes (Scout, Soldier, Pyro) are the bulk of a team, and can pack quite a punch while remaining moblie. The defensive classes (Demoman, Heavy, Engineer) protect the objective and whittle away at enemy health so that the supporting classes (Medic, Sniper, Spy) can tip the scales and push back the other team. In-game items are available, however they do not detract from the core game or overpower certain characters. You don't NEED to buy them, but eventually you'll want to. Most of the items serve as "sidegrades", giving up an aspect of the original weapon for enhanced capabilities in others. This makes for exciting and dynamic gameplay, as you never know what the enemy team might be using. Overall, I would rate Team Fortress 2 a 9/10. It's art and gameplay may not appeal to everyone, but you should still try it. TF2 has lot's to offer in the way of laughs at a very convient price (It's free!).
Silver Bloodwing (Quit Tf2);-;Team fortress 2 is a first person shooter made by valve, you control one out of 9 different classes with many different modes which adds to the replayability. Unique to this game is the ability to find different drops which can vary from various weapons to the hats it is known for.
[G] Shifty;-;Let's talk a bit about TF2. I main Medic and Spy. One is a crazy German doctor, and one is a... handsome rogue. I go spy. I diguise as a friendly Pyro, I scare everyone, even though I'm a Spy. I run into the front lines as a Medic. Everyone pays no mind because I'm a petty Medic, right? I pin someone to a wall by their head using my CC. I shove a colorful Festive Bonesaw inbetween their spinal cord. They never suspected a thing. And. Conga. 10/10 IGN would rate 10/10 again get this game now.
Silver Bloodwing (Quit Tf2);-;Team fortress 2 is a first person shooter made by valve, you control one out of 9 different classes with many different modes which adds to the replayability. Unique to this game is the ability to find different drops which can vary from various weapons to the hats it is known for.
[G] Shifty;-;Let's talk a bit about TF2. I main Medic and Spy. One is a crazy German doctor, and one is a... handsome rogue. I go spy. I diguise as a friendly Pyro, I scare everyone, even though I'm a Spy. I run into the front lines as a Medic. Everyone pays no mind because I'm a petty Medic, right? I pin someone to a wall by their head using my CC. I shove a colorful Festive Bonesaw inbetween their spinal cord. They never suspected a thing. And. Conga. 10/10 IGN would rate 10/10 again get this game now.
Dreaming Moor;-;Its worth the download
Juggynort;-;guys check out tf2 this is honestly the best free,multyplayer fps out there on steam!!!
BoarMan;-;Meh, I got bored of it but its fun at first
Ze Pug Without a Name;-;verry badass game go play it
THE IRISH DON'T TAN, THEY BURN!!;-;TF2 is an amazing game, Valve did a great job on it. I love playing it every second of the day. I really like the unlocks you can acquire and use to battle the opposing BLU or RED, whichever team you are on. I love the choice of classes, none of them are too overpowered, like, the Heavy has great fire power but slow. Scout is fast but not very powerful, but they are all great classes. :) I highly recommend this game.
Clockwork Doc;-;You can get shot, burned, gibbed, panned, fanned, hammed, fished, eaten by pyro sharks in 2fort, dominate, get dominated, get revenge, get revenged on, be a F2P, become P2P, get hats, forget that your only hat is the Gibus, cri, get accused of hacking, get mocked by others, be a noob, headshot, bodyshot, get critical hits, get hit by a critical, go on a trade server, get scammed, scam the scammer, write reviews, realize that Gaben is almighty, praise him, buy hats, fork up your money, realize your broke, cri once more, play with friends, dominate your friends, now you have no friends, cri even more, yell into the mic, get yelled at via mic, troll, get trolled, get kicked, get banned, see a noob, kill said noob, noob is a little kid who has a squeaky voice, you now have no hearing. 11/10 It's wonderful
Masturbating Lars.(offline4ever);-;Very nice game :)
Fee501st;-;You should be playing this now!
itsgalf;-;One of the smartest FPS games out there. Has a lot of potential to always be fresh with updates. MvM is a brilliant game-mode. As long as the support from valve is there, this game can remain popular for a very long time.
Potentia Ferus;-;If you like stabbing people in the back, collecting heads, collecting hats, conga lines, blowing people up, THIS OUTLANDISH FPS GAME IS FOR YOU!! Collect, craft, and trade items to get the best loadout for each of the nine classes. Rocket or sticky jump your way out of danger, place unstoppable sentrys, freeze people solid, MUCH MUCH MORE! I rate this game... TEN OUT OF 5 STARS!!
The True Muffin;-;Great game but too many in-app purchases
GrimThunder62;-;Quick Summary The crown jewel of F2P games. Purchase Verdict: Free, but worth playing Points of Interest -A better community than CS:GO, but still can be toxic and full of immature trolls -Pay-2-Hat -This game, as the name implies, is based around teamwork to achieve specific goals. This often requires players to have a basic concept of strategy, but I hear competitive TF2 is where the hardcore strategic gameplay happens. -Plenty of classes with various weapons to allow players to play with a specific gameplay style in mind.
Spag Heddy;-;This is the best game ever :D
Eeriem;-;Awesome game, best First Person Shooter ever! Really recommended to all those newbies out there!
VaporrPlays;-;Absolutely brilliant game. It's a must!
CvGLUCKYSHOT2000;-;This is a very fun, sort of fast paced FPS where you can live your dream of being and un-ethical doctor, or a russian who fires a gun with $40,000 dolars worth of bullets who liikes sandwhiches, or even a generic baseball player from boston. There is alot of fun to getting this game, and since this game is free there is no reason to not get this game. I reccomend it to any person who bothered to read this ramble all the way through.
Snipars;-;Killed someone with a peice of ham 10/10
DarkNes$ #Road To Ssj 3;-;Spending my time on this game. I love it.
NoDaddyNo #Dilf;-;although you can use cash whats so awsome is you can work yourself up without cash. Find items craft them into metal, trade metal for stranges, craft medal craft them into hats, get hats trade them for stranges. 5 OUT OF 5, MUST HAVE GAME
Some Random Dog;-;Just plain awsome
MachinamaRealm;-;plz join my TF2 Server If you like to subscribe
Synvate;-;This game is very cool.
Blobbles: Butt Pirate (8 days);-;You can play this nonstop, hundreds and hundreds of hours, And the magic makes it so that you will never get bored, somehow.
FRhino;-;Funny, beautiful and good game! TF2 is nice timekiller!
Taz;-;Team Fortess 2... one of my favorite games of all time. A few people call this game, easy, requires no skill and a kids game. These people are completly wrong, as they are the ones getting killed all the time. I have met loads of amazing people on this and have had some of my best gaming moments. I recomend this game 100%. Stop reading, get this game. Now
Angelcake #sexyasfuff;-;Very nice game.
DuckHu$tler;-;I was a white teenager with no odd habits. The quintessential student athlete. I barely played this game, because I prefered things like Zelda and Mario galaxy, they made me remember my childhood playing smash bros and mario kart with my family. Then I tried the demoman. Ya know mate, this game aint too bad, no? I played as demo ALL the bloody time, n' I got really fokin gud at it. I got me a replica eyelander, and I accdntly b'headed me cat with it. I didnt mean fur whiskers to die, but the ole bloody carse was olready thar. I started drinkin. I git really ed up on noight, and tried makin' a wee little pipebomb, jus like me pal demoman!! I' blew up, and the pewder and soot made me skin black, and I loost me eye. Me mum came in me room an started shoutin a' me. I lust control and swung me eyelander, and off went 'er 'ead!! I went un eh bloody rampage, I killed errythin in seit!! I was bloody in mahd! I got me arrestid. Ah weesh dis game wus mor relistk. or lif was mor leik dis gam nuw. 9/10 changed me life.
SAJFWAIHC #AwayFor4Days;-;Die by your own Medic 10/10
Ruxik Niemand;-;over 3000 hours of gameplay. truely a game you will never get tired of. oh and you might have a serious adiction to it so play with caution.
BoomSwag;-;its good
Thunder Struck -TPF-;-;Would reccomend. 10/10 conga, hat, trading, fortress simulater 2015.
Thunder Struck -TPF-;-;Would reccomend. 10/10 conga, hat, trading, fortress simulater 2015.
Barrier;-;This is the best hat collecting game I have ever played!
beatle;-;The main reason why i play this game is because the fun never ends I've played with the best and nicest people ever in this game Also HATS, WHAT MORE DO YOU NEED?!?!?!
Aeriol;-;Now I have to say TF2, one of the many games I can't possibly live without, despite the fact before TF2 I spent my time playing on a mobile game that was based on TF2 (Blitz Brigade). Feeling shocked that I've never actually heard of TF2 or even played it, I've decided to look up some videos based on TF2, it was pretty amazing to see all the action I'm missing out of. So I've finally decided to create a steam account and start playing TF2...On a really crappy computer that runs it at literally 10 fps constant. But that really didn't matter, I've enjoyed TF2 very much that I didn't even realize the lag I was facing. The first class I ever touched in TF2 was the one and only spy. His personality and play style matched perfectly, tricking opponents then 1 shotting them in the face...Uh I mean back, you know what I mean. At the time I never knew how to trickstab, so I got my a** wrecked pretty damn hard, so I stopped playing Spy and moved on to the rocket jumping american man the Soldier. I spent quite alot time on Soldier, but I realized that I am ruling out one of my favorite classes, the spy. Thats when I started to step up and patched that gap between me and the spy. I spent hours practicing the trickstabs, then the gun aim of Spy, learning as I advance in my TF2 life while at the same time trying to avoid getting my a** whooped. Now here I am 200+ hours on spy, surpassing Soldier. As I progress forward I met many strangers that I would never knew would be my very best friends. I would never thought this day would come, but you just gotta' keep trying, because the only thing that will stop you from winning is you... This is why I recommend this game to YOU DISCLAIMERS!: -Crits kicks major a**, unless it's used against you!!! -Getting trickstabbed yourself even though you already know how to trickstab -Auto-balanced right when you're going to win... -Hackers -Squeakers that dies a virgin using the mic
DEST! 50$ in memory of cyx;-;this game is one of the best games of all times edit:the economy is ed thanks a lot back pack.tf dont ruin cs go u ing
Music.exe;-;Well, probably the best game i have ever played. Thanks valve!
Regis Philbin;-;By far one of the games I've played the most, this is a MUST HAVE if you've got Steam and you like First Person Shooters. They're always adding new content and it always helps make the game feel fres, unless of course you're too busy trading the in game items to even play the game itself haha.
Hawkeye35;-;I would like to fight a bigger robot! :)
rednaS;-;for new players
Static;-;The best damn FPS experience you'll ever have
Sub_Lieutenant _Aadvil;-;Best game I ever palyed. It is definitely worth downloading.
Elite Alien;-;This game is one of those games that you can enjoy with your friends. You can team on one sider together to destroy everyone, or battle each other! Best of all, the game is FREE!
Nitro;-;Team Fortress 2 (TF2) is a diverse, fun experience. The different classes give you a choice when you're looking for something different. It's free to play, but not pay to win. In fact, the microtransactions stay out of your way unless you want to pay. The game drops items for you to customize the different classes with. The developers don't take this seriously, but that's a good thing; it provides for an interesting experience that is different almost every time.
Ebola mit Eis;-;Team Fortress 2, Made by Valve and Published by Valve PRAISE LORD GABEN! Team Fortress 2 is an Online-Multiplayer FirstPersonShooter like youve never seen before. Oh well, The game that got me Into Steam, Video-Games and stopped me from studying for my exam. I Have played this game for almost 2,200 Hours, and huge number you might think, and also you might think "Was it worth it?" Yes, it was. Team Fortress 2 offers you way more then just a great Core Gameplay and HATS! Its probably the game on Steam that gives its players the most freedom in creating stuff. Hats and Weapons submitted to the Workshop are added in new Updates and you recive them for FREE! This game already got 5+ Gamemode and the Community created even more ! Deathrun, Freak Fortress 2, Prop hunt or Jailbreak are just the famous ones. But im serious when i say theres so many gamemodes to explore in this game you wont have the time to do so! Its Gameplay is one of the best ones i could have ever imagined! "F%&" you, i got killed by that F2P Pyro, AGAIN!" Besides the Public Valve servers there are the compeptive servers, Website like /TF2Centre.com/ Should get you into the Competitive side of Team Fortress 2 in no time! Balance Theres 2 things TF2 masters like no other game does, and one is the balance, there is NO Weapon in the game that is Over-Underpowerd in any way, every weapon has its place in the game. You cant just go out with a weapon expecting it being better then your default gun. Read the stats! Teamplay 9 Classes to choose from and in Competitive you need to choose one! Teamplay is what makes Team Fortress special. Working together as a Team is essential to win! So, if you see your team already has 3 Snipers but no Medic, why not go medic? This Review took a look at a lot of TF2 in a tiny way. I could say so much more after this game than this but i dont know what to say anymore. After 8 Years this game is still going strong with getting free updates constantly. After I played it for 2,200 Hours and 3 Years, my mind is blown. I hope you will have a great experience in TF2 just like me. Have fun and Enjoy!
My_Birthday;-;This is the one of the best,intense,funny,addictiive fps multiplayer game i've ever played.
LeJames Bron;-;First of all, I want to start out by saying that I am not the most experienced player, but TF2 isn't a game where experience really matters. I have around 1500 hours, but I am a decent trader and have come pretty far into trading. What I mainly want to review is the stuff I know about: Competitive and Trading. Perhaps the most well-known aspects of the game, yet the most fluctuated (in terms of rating or liking). Trading Trading- unless you are extremely experienced- revolves around two things: Luck, and Patience. Although you do need some other skills (Price checking, negotiation etc.), you hardly ever get good deals unless you are trading with some 10 year-old whose mother spent well-earned money on a virtual game. Sometimes I do get good deals (good in TF2 trading terms means profit) on some decently experienced players, but it is rare.( For Me!) Competitive From the TF2 servers I've played on competitive can be good, bad, or of course just normal. Why? Because in one game you might be absolutely  the asses off the other team, but then "You have been switched to the other team due to auto-balance". Another example: One team might have a player wearing a Burning TC, yet the others are fresh out of installation, roaming cluelessly around with their gibuses on. Well, that's my review, this was just all my opinion, and I respect every one elses Bye!
Korrrok;-;I've enjoyed this game for years and thoroughly recommend it for those new to the FPS genre. It's fun to play and very easy to get used to. *EDIT* - TL;DR - Used to love it, now I play it occasionally for a bit of nostalgia. I'm an old fart stuck in the past who dislikes change. I reviewed this game back in 2012 and while I stand by the opinion that it's a decent FPS for people to get into, and it has a relatively fair learning curve, my love for this game has taken a nose dive over the past few years. When I started playing this game, it was back when you just had the stock weapons and the alternative unlocks (ala backburner). While I may be looking back with rose tinted goggles on, I remember personally having much more fun when everyone was on more of an even keel with each other. Don't get me wrong, I think the community involvement that Steam pushed has really opened the game up, and the game modes people have made (such as Zombie Fortress, Prophunt etc) are a wonderful example of what the gaming community is capable of. The range of custom maps available is also eyewateringly vast, another positive for the game. I also still recommend this game, because it is still very easy to jump into for anyone. The fact that it is now free also helps that, nothing is lost by giving it a go. However, I personally do not get as much enjoyment from this game as I used to and therefore play it a hell of a lot less. I've racked up over a 1000 hours, so I've definitely got my money's worth (and believe me, back in its hay day it was well worth the cash monies spent on it). I also find it hard to gripe about all the hats and killstreak , because I've seen how much my friends enjoy that aspect of the game. The Mann vs Machine mode also improved my opinion on the game and it is usually what I play nowadays when I decide to load the thing up for old time's sake. As it stands now though, it's lost its magic for me.
=[O.w.N]= ANGEL;-;teamfortress 2 is about the most fun game ive played yet it comes in second after gmod
LamboNando8219;-;TF2 is probably one of the Best Games EVER invented. It combines your "usual" FPS with cartoonish, highly customisable Characters. Each of the 9 Classes are evenly balanced in such a way that no class is better or worse than another. They all have Pros and Cons that cancel each other out. Along with Weapons which have additional statistics to further add to that Class' Abilities. All in all, it's a Fast-Paced, Highly Strategic FPS that is Continuously, Thouroughly Enjoyable. 10 / 10 :D
Shadow of the Blacksmith;-;Pfft, nobody is stupid enough to spend 200+ hours on a shooter!
(505)Katana;-;Best game ive laid my hands on
Toxic Milk;-;Hey thre LADY.Are you looking for the gratest game ever?well you have found it,this is your chance to tell your friends and people that you meat to get this game.Its got everything!CO-OP and it has multi-player.But that is not all!YOU CAN GET COOL ITEMS AND A LOT OF ACHIVEMENTS.IN CO-OP YOU ARE GANA FIGHT MACHINES.In multi-player you are gana fight your friends and people on the enemy team.You got a store that you can add your funds to your steam wallet and buy cool stuff like hats,misc's,weapons,paint to color your hats and misc's,keys for your crates with strange items,tools to craft your hats.nedles weapons.PFFFF!No problem you can craft them into crafting tools.BUT you can only craft it from the same class.achivments will get you hats anything from velve games will get you free items in team fortress 2!BUY THIS GAME FIRST THEN ALL THE OTHER VELVE GAMES!
Silverking512;-;This is a great free to play game which is not a pay to win game, the gameplay is fun and the community is awesome 10/10
Paco Tuesday;-;If you like market gardener-ing, conga-ing, and bakestabes, then this is the game for you. This game taught me how to spam left click (PYRO) as well as how to spam pillz get killz (DEMOMAN). Lots of fun. Lots of mini sentries. Not enough hats. Awesome.
PELLETTY;-;great game with lots of modes to keep you entertained for days. The real fun is with trading and building value in you backpack.
KawaiiPotato;-;Team Fortress 2 is an awesome action-packed game that will make you want to play all night. I would totally recommend this game to my friends and to people that enjoy first person shooters and people that enjoy playing with many.
King of Hyrule;-;Destroyed my social life. 10/10 GALLON HAT
Vex-Nexus;-;Why you should get tf2: I told you to.
Marauder Frost;-;Awesome game, it's even free. (   )
BambaShort101;-;Entertaining, addicting must-have game
Fryberg1099;-;Simply awesome...
Lucas.....;-;really like this game, love the events an the hats.
Pillowchocolate;-;Hat simulator has been a lovely experience, but I cannot seem to understand the guns and explosives. 9/10 A great experience hats hats
Haethcliff | trade.tf;-;Team Fortress 2 is by far the best F2P game on Steam. Great FPS mechanics, versitile but balanced characters, and a vibrant economy. Hats!
FiveSquared;-;I know I haven't played that much and I know I may be a noob at engineer but this game is prety good. The sound can be a bit loud at times but there is a lot of fun to be had in this game. If you are looking for a good shooter game choose Team Fortress 2.
[TLC]Anonymous-Dr.Wifi;-;Just flat out AMAZING! GET IT ITS FREE JUSTT TRY IT OUT!
janie177;-;I spy with my little eye!
Doge;-;Just a awesome cartoon free to play game!!!!! ('thinks about hats')
DMX;-;this  so cash, id suck a  for this game. I know this game is free and all but damn id suck a fat  just to play this game that is the dew from gabe newells  10/0
Blokes;-;Best. Game. Ever. No contest, shaddap.
N-word scissorhands;-;I lost my whole life to this game, my wife left me, my children hate me, I missed my parents's funeral. I haven't seen the sunlight in months, because my addiction is so bad, I'm thousands of dollars in debt due to how many hats I have bought. My whole world is crashing down due to this game... 10/10
Vexelon;-;A game where what is on top of your head decides your skill. Oh and if you dont buy anything you suck apparently. 10/10
Mint;-;Too many hats, please nerf.
SemiAqua;-;Best hat economy game ever. 420/360
[JJ-C] Jjeinn-tae;-;http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vFnNOseN4IY No further elaboration needed.
Vertinove;-;People say there is no way to win this game but they're wrong. The most satisfying thing is when you go a class and you are so good that you're accused of hacking, that's when you win. Just kidding whoever has the most hats is the winner.
JEtigers72;-;tf2 sucks
beeplee;-;THE BEST THING SINCE FISH FINGERS AND CUSTARD!!!
Golfalicious;-;I recommend this game
Stan_ | trade.tf;-;Well Lets See TF2 Is A Free To Play Game With Cool Hats/Misc/Weapons Many Maps And Many Other Style of Servers Like Versus Saxton Hale/Death Run/Parkour/ManvsRobot And Many Other :).This Game Is Realy Awesome And If You Play It With Your Friend Its Even More Cool Because Its Fun Playing With Your Friends Instead From Playing Alone So Give It A Try =D. Thanks For Your Anttention I Hope You Like It And If You Need A Friend Then Im Your Guy xD.
Nepgear;-;It's free.
[Bio] Steve ();-;What i like about Team Fortress 2 is that its an awesome game and it has 2 teams that fight eachother and its one of my favorite games
JMan_;-;3 words.....AWESOME AWESOME AWESOME....no not that...its such a great game full of ojectives to play for and even if internet is down, still offline practice with bots is funny to watch them tryhard......TF2 > COD...THIS GAME IS AWESOME
Flameshroob (Doc 10) TF2 = CSGO;-;One of the greatest games ever created. I ahve invested countless hours and hundreds of dollars on this free game. I have paid 60$ for other games, half of which aren't even as near as fun as TF2. This game is such a big part of my life, that without it I wouldn't be the person I am today.
The 7th Hokage Naruto Uzumaki;-;YES I DO RECOMMEND IT.. I JUST DO!
Dragonfeet;-;I really like everything in TF2, (hats, weps, random drops, etc). My three favorite classes, are, Pyro, Demo, and, medic. Run in with Pyro and try to fry as many as possiable, hope that theres no medics so that your run wouldn't be ruined, Demo, I had one awesome round with Demo, my team was really close to getting the last cap point, and then i used the "Charge N Targe", and ran on the point and won for us, and i noticed when, i turned around, everyone was coming in. Medic, first class i ever played in TF2, i like how Medic is a simple class, just go heal, maybe heal yourself a bit, but not too much, because you want your teammates to live for a bit longer, and, thats all you gotta do, nothing more...
BRANDWEER;-;Very awesome game and nice graphic
Nelle;-;This is awesome
ThatAustralianGamer;-;Pretty good
SgCloudwolf;-;great game lots of fun and hilarious moments on the screen. over all i hope to be seeing more of this game in the future.
Schadenfreude;-;A very fun mixed class shooter. Skills are required and earned as you go on. With a unique item unlocking system, the defaults will never get old. Highly recommended
Pizza delivery;-;Best game Ive ever played, but valv is turning it into a conga/hat simulation with guns with these updates... I love it!
The Young Reaper;-;Be careful, the wild conga virus still lurks these parts of mann co. !
FIAR!;-;Perhaps the first FPS game I've felt comfy playing in a really long time. Goofy, and nonsensical is probably what sells this game the best. and hats and taunts
Maharba;-;Thank you Team Fortress 2 for hundreds of hours of awesome. Thank you for the free random item drops. Thank you for the holiday events. Thank you for being free. God bless
Cobaltor;-;I've wasted many glorious hours playing this, and I can say I've had one heck of a time. In Team Fortress 2, you're essentially playing 9 different games at once with the radical gameplay differences each class has, and on top of that the many gamemodes provides even more diverseity to how you play each class, since their role changes depending on the gamemode. It is an unorthodox and first person shooter that continues to break the mold of what a game in the genre can be, and I would recommend it to anyone that, essentially, wants something that is completely different, while still maintaining enough familiarity for those accustomed to the fps genre. Effective teamwork, diversity, balanced and fast-paced gameplay; what more could you ask for in a fun-to-play and free-to-play first person shooter like TF2. Oh yeah...hats...don't forget about hats...
Asanine Cupcakes {McFC};-;I mean it's free what do you have to lose?
Funky;-;Team Fortress 2 is a facinating fps that I would definitly recomend to practically anyone. There are things you can do from trading to styling your favorite class with hats, miscs etc. This game is an amazing game but even better, its free. Although this game can be tough I dont see why you shouldnt get it. Like I said I enjoy this game and recomend it to anyone that is intrested in getting it.
[A] [KITTEN] Sophia Noir;-;great FPS F2P MMO GAME!
Eggwa;-;Erm.... well..... Do you have billions of dollars? No? Run. Run fast. The hats will catch you. It'a too late for m-
Your Local N00B;-;Great game, clocked in 1000+ hours and still not bored. Working on creating maps for the community.
|SMM| NewbPwnington;-;First person shooter with a full economy enclosed and amazing fanbase. What's not to love?
The Dark Knight;-;Hilarious FPS that has Valve written all over it If you've played games by Valve before you know each of there games has an almost unexplanible comedic charm and TF2 is no different, the graphics aren't the best, but thats part of what makes the game funny and what makes it great...Another awesome Valve game!
|MLW|Melon0=[]:::::>Slicer;-;OMG THE BEST GAME I'VE PLAYED IN 13 YEARS!!! BTW, I'm 13 years old.
Natoyak;-;It is a very good game when you get some weapons that you are better at. At first it may seem that everyone is better than you because they have better weapons, stranges,miscs and the most popular- unusual hats. This can change when you play it for a while (don`t end up like me playing over 128 hours in 2 months) and you get good weapons. And then you get to purchace items. It`s a game of cometition, but there can never be 'a best player'. Overall, I am addicted to this game. I love it.
Not a Killer, Stop Killing @ Me;-;Tf2 is a fun, fast paced first person shooter that i reccomend to anyone with a good sense of humour
<3 Discorded-Dr-Hooves <3;-;this game i love it
(F2p)Noob;-;very nice game
MajesticMeep;-;AWESOME FREE TO PLAY
<------ cock;-;A really great fps game, fun and interesting
Neko Remilia Scarlet;-;It's TF2, enough said.
Espresso;-;Many years ago, some men were concerned about our safety, and so they tried to teach us a dance, and assured us we could leave our friends behind. Unfortunately, the message was lost for one simple, horrible reason. They had no hats. Fast forward to the 21st century, and those who longed for safety and danced remained hatless, with the exception of Prince, who had a thing for certain berets. Then came TF2, which restored hats and dancing to the world. Unfortunately, it might have forgotten the safety part. The impetus for this culture shift that is Team Fortress 2 was found in the cryptic writings of a large cat with a hearing impairment in ages past. Buried among those ancient words was "No serenade, no fire brigade, just pyromania." So it was clear that people should not sing, but rather attack each other with flamethrowers and play air guitar with weapons. It made perfect sense. Meanwhile, while listening to the radio, Mann Co. came to remember that they built this city, and when it was finished the engineers grew restless and bored, and began to struggle with the pyromaniacs. As the arms race escalated, people had to come to terms that in fact this minigun-wielding man, he was not their brother, and that he was, in fact, heavy. Because of these events, a group of private eyes were hired. They were watching and saw every move. They assured the world "I'm a spy, but I'm on your side." When they cried out "hit me with your best shot, fire away!" in mockery, they were suprised to find sharpshooters from Australia eager to take them up on the offer. The military was called in, to attempt a peaceful resolution. The soldiers called out "come off your battlefield, lay down your arms and surrender", but the combatants saw their rocket launchers were loaded and aimed, and attacked. Interestly, some talent scouts for Major League Baseball were on hand, and mistook the melee for a sporting event. Eagerly, one of the scouts shouted "put me in coach, I'm ready to play", only to be hit in the head with a frying pan. So he called out to the nearest medic. "Doctor, Mr. MD, won't you tell me what's ailing me?" And he said "Yeah", before a spy snuck up on him, stabbing him in the back, and the doctor swore eternal revenge. By then it was clear something needed to be done. So scientists in a remote location in Scotland prepared a weapon against this madness. They spliced the genes of Syvester Stallone and Wesley Snipes together to create a new superhero. His name was The Demolition Man. But this was only a prototype, the Demolition Man Demo, and Taco Bell wasn't sure about the sponsorship. But then there were the hats. And people stopped fighting amongst themselves to trade these many hats that they wore. Just kidding, they kept killing each other endlessly. But then they questioned the conflict, and it became Mann vs Machine for a time. The world is a safer place. We can go where we want to. A place that they will never find. We could even act like we're from out of this world, and leave the real one far behind. Because of the wonderful hats, which have brought world peace. Although it looks an awful lot like war.
NicoBico;-;This game makes me happy................................. fin
ww2sniper555;-;I LOVE THIS GAME SO MUCH it burns my heart. i wasted like 150$ on this game. this is one of my most favorite PC games!! this game rating is 5 unusual hats!! HAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAATS!!!!!
EVO|VE;-;Awesome Free to Play game! Encourages teamwork and strategy. Includes a 9-class-based team combination selection, and each with a specific counter. Work together with team mates to defeat the other team! And aside of all the fun, the trading experience is amazing! Dont be afraid to send me a Trade Offers !
Dax;-;Team Fortress 2 is good. I have lots of fun with this game. The items are cool. Trading items with the TF2 community is awesome! I will keep playing until I grow up (probably never).
terminatorisb2345;-;team fortress 2 is one of the best free to play steam game. with its comedy timing it is one big circus
anathon;-;only game that rewards players for being bad at it
Django Boonhardt;-;All hail to the holy Gaben and his mighty work. We have to be thankful for his small mercies!
Slick Watts;-;If you ever felt like you lacked a hat-based economy in your live, this is for you.
|| Duncan McLeod ||;-;best game ever created
Fevershaking;-;I'll honestly say, I took me awhile to get used to this game. It's really fun. Don't even think about. Get it, And when it's done, Play it.
[RnG] ZeTrolledCheeze;-;Just as good as Gmod, if you dont have it, GET IT.
St.Pepe;-;I thought i had no life until i saw them other reviews
|FV| TheForgottenDragon;-;The best game in years :D
KINGUIN BOYS;-;this game should cost 12.000 pounds of money, to play, for 12 seconds! if you know what i mean :D
TheThing;-;This game is sOOOO OOSOSOOSOSOOO Sick i like this game a lot best free to play game ever thx valve for this tf2 has 3 letters and illumunati is triangle so halflife 3 is confirmed anyways PEACE
Cucklord;-;hats
KetchupKid;-;this game awsome!
RR Gabe;-;This is the best hat simulator I've ever played.
Knuxfan24;-;Free, Fun, Free, Simple but Complex, Free, Addictive, Did I mention that it's Free? No? Well it's free. So go get it & enjoy the world's greatest Hat Simu- I mean First Person Shooter.
DAAT ONE GUY;-;I used to have money.
<><;-;This game is appropriate for the young and the old; and innapropriote for everyone else.
Bill Nye the Ninja Guy;-;Lots of acheivements and stuff that is fun simple :D
BigBootyRichard;-;It's a HAT simulator, Not a HATE simulator.
DeBirdle;-;Has Hats & Sandwich's nuff said....
Joe10112;-;Super fun FPS to play with friends or against bots! 9 Classes to play as, lots of weapons and HATS! This game is all the hype and you need to play it! There are so many hats in the game! Become Premium (buy something from Mann Co Store) to become Premium and trade! Trading is half the fun! You get to trade HATS! GET THIS NOW!
Saxton Hale's Teeny Weenie;-;Get it. That's all that can be said. No words can truely describe it's awesomeness.
Qaziush;-;Best F2P FPS around
pingy030799 {LV} #b-day ^__^;-;money spending on pixels sipmulator
AlphaWare141;-;Nice game
Triath;-;Addicting game. Pretty easy to spend money on too. Basically the downfall of a social life :D.
Father Carmine;-;This is a review for TF2. It is a good game. That is all.
Winston, The Moist Avenger;-;Hats. Conga. Dismemberment. All a man needs in life
Chimpy With A L -U.B-;-;Faboulas
Somebody?;-;Severe lack of fortresses. Do not be fooled.
Franklin;-;super addicting and fun game with unique classes really takes away from main stream cod shooters on todays market of fps's
aguopstop;-;10/10 very good multiplayer and a must have for Valve lovers!
everyone;-;its one of those innovative games that promotes different gameplay. If you are a cod or battlefield player then try this game but memorise all weapon stats first because this game has no assault rifles and snipers does not one hit kill not unless its a headshot. Although this game is pretty cool it kept me covered when im bored for 2 years and on going and its really fun. Its free so yeah that is self explanatory.
Im just a nickname;-;Its the best game ever
McPotato;-;Cool game..... just play it...
Vitamin X-Z;-;This Free Shooter is just great,Starting with crappy weapons First,If you play the game for way f*cking long it will give you tons of weapons.I love this game!
Cainelup123;-;this game is awersome
DJ Pon-3;-;One of the best free 2 play first person shooter's out there, just cant be beaten.
F1RST;-;Pay 2 Play , funny and the atmosphere of the game is supercool! Thumbs up! Work in team, collect funny achievements, challenge your mate, Have fun! Free 2 Play players go buy premium. :)
Tym202;-;It is AWESOME!!!!!!!!!!!
Sabotage Snuggles;-;hey I just meet you.....and this is crazy. but heres TF2 PLAY IT MAYBE?!
adciobanu;-;One of the few games in which good players get paid.
Cartnor;-;by far the MOST fun i've ever had. (P.S.: HATS!!!)
Pafucine;-;"Hat Simulator" and "Stole My Life Simulator" and "Economy Breakdown Simulator". 10/10 would get my life stolen away again
Slowis;-;Team Fortress 2 has changed the way I view online gaming. Its so fun, and basically stress free ! I love the community, and every game you play makes you feel that you achieved something. Endless fun for hours and hours. AND ITS FREE !!! Can you believe that ? Definitely worth it. Enjoy :D
Captain Calcium;-;It's purty k
Nerf Dermer;-;If you don't play this game you'll start thinking XBOX LIVE is a viable business model. Then eventually you'll catch bum aids and die. DON'T LET THAT HAPPEN.
j02uke;-;I was going to make a joke about hats but nah. Team Fortress 2 is a fun game. You could spend hours and hours on this game without getting tired of it. Unlike oh-so-srs games it gives you a fun cartoony feel. Like Happy Tree Friends (if you don't know what that is don't google it). TF2 caters to all sorts of people. For hoarders you have hats n , for achievement hunters there's a whole crap ton I can't be bothered to do, for people who like shooting things then TF2 won't dissapoint. Also it's free...FREE. As in not a single cent. 11/10 would play for another 374 hours
NeoXtra;-;Addicting DO NOT PLAY YOU WILL GET HOOKED IN SO MUCH, IT WILL KILL YOU. LIKE FLAPPY BIRD BUT WORSE.
Eddorgus;-;It's a fun, and cool game. You can always count on the netcode ;P
GG NO RE;-;i think this is a great game anyone that likes fps must get this game, it's funny, somewhat derpy, and very competitive.
FishyPhoenix;-;I want all people to try this game.This game is great
karlB^;-;This is is the reason why my grades have dropped in Maths -.- And I'm Asian so this is very disgraceful.
Mergamern;-;Once you start playing this game you lose ur ability to play call of duty -_-
[R] Caliban;-;TF2's ideal for quick, intense matches or fun rolling battles; being free to play means that there's barely any barrier to play, and the game allows you to play to your style. Now, find yourself a strong, friendly, accepting community of fun people to play with, and you don't need any other games.
medusa;-;MY FRIEND TAUGHT HOW TO PLAY TF2 BECAUSE SHE WAS ALWAYS TALKING ABOUT IT AND I DICIDED TO PLAY JUST TO SEE BUT NOW I PLAY EVERY DAY AND I RECOMMEND.
Duo Rong;-;If you like Shooting, Hats or trading this is the game to play.
={RIPSR}= The Loyal Traitor;-;This game is... it's... it's too great to be described with mere adjectives! This game is absolutely with out a doubt one of the best games out there! It was indeed "Worth the Weight". It's art style is amazing because it is so unique and different from anything I've ever seen, this goes for both the characters, items, and enviorment. I find the game's visual appearence breathtaking. For the small amount of soundtracks this game consists of, they are amazing. This game is great because it seemingly never gets old, with dozens of different gamemodes, exciting new content updates, and its annual Scream Fortress, Smissmas, and other events. Yet, the best thing about the game (at least to me it is) is the nine classes that the game consists of. Each class is full of personality and dialogue, whether its insulting taunts or hillarious cathphrases. All of the classes are very different from each other with weapons, dialogue, attitude, style, and the way you play as them. First off you have your Offensive category, consisting of the Scout, Soldier, and Pyro. The Scout is a fast, smart-mouthed, "all bark and no bite" kind of kid with weapons that are most effective at close range, requiring a hit-and-run sort of tactic. The Soldier is a dedicated American with a strong passion to fight. Possessing a Rocket Launcher as his primary weapon, the soldier is a powerful threat to his opponents, but all that power leaves him with a slow speed, requiring him to use a maneuver known as the "Rocket Jump" to travel faster in exchange for some health. The Pyro is a mumbling lunatic, whose history is a mystery to just about everyone, he (or possibly she) wields a Flamethrower as his/her main weapon which makes him/her lack a lot of range, but gives a lot of potential power if used correctly. He/she is best used for ambushing enemies and his/her Compresion Blast (Airblast) can be used to reflect many projectiles back at opponents. Next is the Deffensive category, the Demoman, Heavy, and Engineer. The Demoman is a one-eyed, drunk Scottish man who has no bullet-based weapons and fights instead with 2 explosive weapons. He can take out enemies that he can't see with his Grenade Launcher or lay traps with his Sticky Launcher. The Heavy is a large, strong, Russian beast that uses his beloved Minigun. His immense power and large size leaves him with a very slow speed but with very strong fire power. He may be considered an easy target due to his size, but as long as he has his Minigun he should be treated as a threat just like all the other classes. The Engineer is a intelligent Texan that relies mainly on his buildings to fight. His Sentry Gun is generally a threat to any enemy within it's range, he can build a Dispenser to heal him and his teammates as well as refill there ammo, and he can also build teleporters so his team can access areas faster. The last category is the Supportive classes, consisting of the Medic, Sniper, and Spy. The Medic is a German doctor with amazing medical technology at his disposal. He is not one known for attacking but instead he is known for healing. Using his Medi-gun, he can quickly heal his teammates. Once charged enough, he can deploy what is known as an "Ubercharge", making him and whoever he is healing temporarily invincible to any damage from enemy weapons. The Sniper is an Austrailian outdoorsman who, as his name suggests, uses a Sniper Rifle as his main weapon. He can do extreme ammounts of damage at long range, making him a valueble teammate when used correctly. At short range though, he is more vulnerable and can easily be overwhelmed by enemies. Lastly, we have the Spy, a French trickster who can disguise himself as his opponents and quietly sneak behind enemy lines. He can perform a "Backstab", resulting in an instant kill, use his Sapper to destroy enemy buildings such as Sentries, and use his Cloaking Device to become temporarily invisible to sneak around danger. Playing as a Spy requires stealth and smarts to succeed. The best thing about all these characters is the fact that, other than the Heavy being the games main Icon, none of the classes seem to be better than the rest. They all have their own special weaknesses and none of them are generally favored over the others. The game is a masterpiece and that's all I can say.
Mr. Bear Zero;-;i love this game to much to not set it down lol
GentleSpy;-;best game ever made that i had ever played
ScatCat_;-;One of the best hat sims of this age, the objective mini-games are also pretty good.
Hafizhnd;-;One of the most hillarious FPS game
Road To A Knife;-;It's alright, it should be the first free game for everyone but it could be heavily improved if they had better game modes, more realistic weapons (such as machine gun), and if nothing costed money in-game. It would be a BIG NO if this game wasn't free otherwise you would pay for the game, then spend $100 in-game.
Mightyslickpancake(   );-;I wasted all my money on cosmetic Items, 10/10 would do again.
Hoser;-;im here for a section of a badge :D
San Ander;-;Do you want to wear your cool (coolest ever existed) hat in a game? Do you want to cut, shoot, burn and crash your enemies in pieces? If you do, this game made exatly for you! But if you don't... so for what do you live,man?!
Nazi Nachos;-;Team Fortress 2, A marvel amoung games, Where gamers around the world come together to stab, burn, bludgen and shoot other people for no good reason. TF2 for me is like Christmas every day, it is fun, enjoyable and you get free stuff. It is one of those games that if it wasn't made life would be some much different, It would be like no Christmas, Easter or even your Birthday. So Yeah play it. Rating 10/10
MachinamaRealm;-;plz join my TF2 Server If you like to subscribe
Synvate;-;This game is very cool.
Blobbles: Butt Pirate (8 days);-;You can play this nonstop, hundreds and hundreds of hours, And the magic makes it so that you will never get bored, somehow.
Mr_Headshot;-;This is the very good game.
DisgracedAlchemist;-;great fun game, good fun to play with friends...you will indefinately need a mouse i would reccomend this for people who are looking for a game to play with friends. if your looking for the real steam experience your looking at it. only one real nit pick, guess it would be the file size, but your looking at a good game, also the maps take a long time to load (dont hate, my internet not that good) this is a great game
fawsh;-;It's the best free-to-play game that will satisfy a variety of tastes. Play this game and you will lose many hours from your life.
Ronan620;-;Life? Psh.. Life are for wussies, Spent over 50$ on this game. 10.1/10
AV | Jedi(fla)master;-;Highly competitive shooter for tryhards. Make no mistake on that. Valve markets it as something else but it doesn't change what it is. It's NOT easy to pick up. If you're new to quake-like shooters, you'd better have a friend already playing it explain the basics to you, or you might get frustrated by some things. Public pvp and pve (known as mvm in tf2) servers are suitable for casual players once the basics are learned. If you don't want to go comp you can stop there and have quite a bit of fun. Sweaty competitive tryhards will really see where this game shines though. Well balanced, competitive modes will bring your tactical sense and deathmatch ability to a real test. Despite Valve overlooking the competitive format, multiple leagues have arisen offering unforgettable experience for teams on any skill level. If You want to do team based esports, look no further than TF2, this game has more competitive spirit in it than LoL and DOTA combined. As for visual aesthetics the game looks well despite its age, thanks to its stylised look. Some items from content updates are very much out of the game's theme, though, which is very disappointing given how unique that theme is. The game is poorly optimised in some instances too, (especially mvm), but that can be solved by fps boosting configs. All in all: Iz good.
Nkeyro;-;DEN OUTA DEN is what i would say. But i just did. Anyway, Tf2 is a good game, aside with being a ghost trap only with my money, it is fun. If you want to download, let me give you a tip. DONT WEAR THE GHASTLY GIBUS. If someone sees you with that they will make fun of you. It happened to me and I don't want it happening to you. Anyway, get it.
Pull the Trigga,Drop a Nigga;-;Holy this is freakin aweome
Neen;-;it's a fun game for people that don't want to spend money on gemes
DocExx;-;If you dont have this game, THAN WHY ARE YOU EVEN ON STEAM. best multiplayer game ever that gets the term Team right\ 10/10
Toroi;-;My hours. help. I wrote something for real! These hours are legit, I played this game a lot in the past to avoid some tragic stuff in real life. I was young and didn't really have my gaming consoles anymore because of my brothers and I had a really bad pc, which i still own. TF2 was one of the games i could play pretty well on this pc but with horrid graphics, but it was one of the more fun games I installed. I met some real cool and nice people on this game as well as people who i plan to keep by my side. The community back then was more humble compared to nowadays. You have competitive gamers who spam their bind keys with unfunny/gross jokes and very obnoxious people who are either yelling at you or telling you to do specific things to win the game. When really, it doesn't even matter if you win or lose. However, you also have those people who are really awesome and you may meet some nice friends along the way! Although you never know what kinda person you're going to meet on this game. In my honest opinion, if you want to have a game to just waste time on (and money) or just mess around with people you know (which is what I do now), this is perfect. Esspecially the mann vs. machine co-op. I mainly play that now. Although to me, the game lost its touch, update wise, and I moved onto other games. I believe it's worth a shot to try it out but other than that, I'd keep it as a casual game. I don't think the competitive scene is worth getting into anymore because it's being flooded by crude people. Atleast from my experiance after over about 4+ years of playing it just got worse and worse. You will eventually be tied into drama even if you try to avoid it. You'll be more stressed than actually having fun, I'll tell you that! Although in all seriousness, this game is losing its touch and probably isn't worth making it your main game MAINLY because the updates they've been releasing are becoming very dull and not as great as they used to be. BUT, it's a great game to just play to pass the time and have fun! All you'll really notice nowdays is...people really love to trade more than actually play. Living off as a free to play would be very tough and you'd need to be patient with items you would want, unless you got that MONEY! Hope this helps. One last thing, I am not saying this game is bad in any way. I am saying that it's worth trying and playing with friends, or even meeting people! Although there are some downsides that you won't like, such as some stuff I pointed out above. Strictly towards the community. I personally think you should have this game as a side game rather than your come home to play sorta thing. Have it as a once in a while game, because it's nothing to be big about, unless you really do not like most of the millions of other games out there. Just give it a shot and see what you think! Have fun <3
Vale;-;Can you name any other unmodded First Person Shooter that lets you play as a cocky and fast Bostonian that can slap the hell out of urine throwing Australian campers with a fresh atlantic fish wrapped in fine christmas lights, eat a bucket of fried proccessed poultry over their corpses, and then get hit with an exploding cannonball launched from an African-Celtic one eyed alcoholic who can leap yards into the air from his own explosives while weilding a mystic ancient talking ghost claymore? I thought so.
A bLuE cOw;-;If you bind forward to a button on your mouse, you can play pyro and eat at the same time
UnfunnyName;-;The vicious cycle of Team fortress 2 First when you'll arrive in the game, you'll want Weapons, tons of them. Then you'll see that everyone has hats, and you'll want these, a tons of them. Then you'll realize that hats doesn't matter, only skill count, so you'll want a lot of skills, tons of them. Then new weapons will be added, and you'll want them, all of them. Then a new hat will be added and you'll want it, cause it'll be fancy on your main class. Then you'll realize again, that you don't give a damn about hats, all is about is skill. Then when you have waited for 3 years, new weapons will be added, and you'll want them. And then you realize that you spent like 2000 hours of your life for this, met great friends, and you'll have a server where's you feeling like home, and you discovered so much things via the community, it learnt you so much. Then the rude reality of life, bring you on earth, and this game is here, Waiting for you to play 1,2,3... hours, and you'll be happy to see that all your good friend are still here.
[CotC] King Conga Gandhi;-;Oh, and if you're wondering, the new update, Gun Mettle, did NOT ruin TF2 for me. I actually find it a LOT more fun now! I think Jerma summed up this game pretty nicely... "Maybe you got like two Pyros that just installed the game ten minutes ago. They don't have any hats, they're spraying  and they're having a blast. They might even be at the wrong point. They might be going backwards to the point that's already been capped. On the same team, there's a Scout with a Hale's Own Scattergun. He's got 18 kills with a 17 killstreak, he just got 18. He's going 'I just got 18, sick!' He runs up the stairs, he's trying his  off. He's get *beeping noises* dodging the 'Oh, the sentry almost got me!' He looks up to his left when he gets up the stairs on Gorge and there's two sandwich Heavies having a ing picnic. So he stops for a second and goes, 'Two... nnnggh!' so he walks forward and gets blown up by a soldier's rocket next door... ...The two sandwich Heavies then decide to move their picnic. There's ants. 'There's ants here, honey. I wanna get out of here.' So they get up, they pack their sandwiches, pack up their lunches, and their breakfast, and whatever the  they're eating. They get up and walk toward the door to go to RED because they think, 'That spot near the A point for RED is pretty good.' They walk out the door, and they see four Level 3 Sentry Guns pointing at them. They get shot a million times and blow up, and there's like nine Engineers swinging their wrenches in random directions. The BLU Scout, at this point, respawns, and walks by the at least 3-4 statues because we all know there's four people AFK when you play this game, you go by the museum of people standing still. He walks out the door and readies his weapon, he's ready, 'I'm going to get another 20 killstreak, just you watch Gaben, I'm going to praise Gaben!' And he goes forward and starts shooting, and he gets backstabbed by a Spy that has been sitting with the Cloak and Dagger in the corner for at least the last 68 seconds." Normally when I do reviews, I turn into a critic and start to examine that game, pointing out every little flaw and pro and determining a final score. However, Team Fortress 2 (or TF2 for short) helped me make so many memories that if I actually tried to make a fair review on it, it would still be way too biased to consider a valid review. Team Fortress 2, is, obviously, an amazing game. The teamplay is necessary and going out and attacking solo may be difficult. You need teammates in order to survive and win. The graphics are unique to a shooter game and really makes it a special game. I'm not here to explain the gameplay or graphics or whatnot. I love this game because of its charm. The game has such a unique and diverse cast of characters, you can't help to love all of them at some point. Scout is cocky and overconfident. Spy, another one of the characters in the game, is technically Scout's father. Soldier is a crazed WWII American patriot. He never actually joined the Army, but instead, he had his own personal Nazi killing spree. His roommate was a magician named Merasmus, who grew to hate Soldier. Pyro is mysterious, but portrays the world as one big happy paradise, known as Pyroland. Demoman is a Scottish alcoholic who, due to Merasmus, lost his eye that is now haunted. Heavy, although he appears to be dim-witted, is actually very intelligent and looks over three sisters. Engineer is very intelligent as well, and his grandfather was a major contributor to keeping the war with RED and BLU continue. Medic isn't fond of normal forms of medicine, but is still an important member nonetheless. Sniper is from New Zealand, but was raised in Australia. He prefers working from a distance and his backstory is very similar to Superman's. Spy is the master of disguise, and is technically Scout's father, as said before. Of all the characters, he appears to be the most "mature" and appears to be the ringleader at many times. Not only that, but the game has an interesting story. I would not like to get too detailed with it. However, it makes little to no sense but is still funny, engaging, and gives TF2 much more depth. There is also a storyline that takes place a few years later where Mann Co. is being attacked, so the mercenaries have to defend it, called Mann vs. Machine. This game mode ties in with the TF comics, which explain many characters' backstories and is currently still in the works as of this review. The other comics (all of which can be found on TF2's official website) are all funny and charming in their own way as well. The community has been quite debatable on how nice it is at many times, but in the end, it's still an overall great community. I've seen people give out stuff, others mentor some of the newbs (something I do as well) along with much, much more. Yes. the game is considered a "pay-to-win game" but it isn't necessarily a pay-to-win game. With lots of patience, you will get what you want from the game, whether it be hats, weapons, or whatever it is you want. The game has a learning curve that isn't too steep, but become dedicated and you'll fall in love with it. No matter how many times you rage to a W+M1 pyro that destroyed your 16 killstreak, or cheer when you unbox an Unusual, or maybe discover a few friends or learn a few things, Team Fortress 2 has been a huge part of my PC gaming life and without it, I would be as bored as hell. I cannot recommend this game enough, and I hope that many more memories are made on here. Valve may be cash cows, but you can't help but admit they are amazing when it comes to making games. Portal, Half-Life 2, Counter-Strike, but this game stands out from the rest to me. Do I recommend this game? Yes, yes, yes, YES.
Nerd House;-;Team Fortress 2. Being ranked as the third most-played game [steamcharts.com] on Steam, Team Fortress 2 is probably one of the best free-to-play games we've got. Why is it so popular? Let's take a look, shall we? First off, the obvious: It's free. 100% free. This means its accessible to everyone on Steam. This is just the icing on the cake though. What really shines about TF2 is the game itself. Team Fortress 2 usually consists of two teams (Red and Blue) going head to head against each other. Sometimes fulfilling certain objectives or just downright killing each other. There are many, many maps and modes, such as Payload, Capture Points, and Mann VS Machine. But the general idea no matter the map or mode is to KILL EVERYTHING THAT MOVES! And my god, is it fun to do so. The game has 9 playable mercenaries, each actually being a certain "class". Each class is divided into 3 different roles: Offense, Defense, and Support. Let's go over each role and class. Offensive roles specialize in dealing damage to the opposing team. These are your main attack force. Scouts are the speedy hit and run class, with the ability to double or even triple jump depending on equipped items. Soldiers pack a bit more firepower with their rocket launchers, which gives them not only power, but mobility due to the ability known as "rocket jumping". The Pyro is great at setting the opposition on fire, as well as extinguishing burning teammates using an airblast. Defensive roles serve to inhibit enemy access and to hold enemies back from vital points on the map. Overall, the defensive group has the most firepower of all the groups. Demomen can safeguard areas with stickybombs that they can detonate when enemies come by. Heavies are great for mowing down incoming troops and pushing back forces. Heavies can also keep enemies in an area while whittling their health for teammates to finish off. Engineers can build Sentry Guns for effective area defense, as well as build Teleporters and Dispensers for logistical support of the team. Support classes cannot hold the fight on their own, but their specialized abilities can tip the balance in their team's favor. They offer the offensive and defensive classes an extra edge in battle and can help turn the tide of the game. Whether crippling the enemy advance from behind or keeping teammates healed, the support classes are always handy to have around. Medics are the team healers, capable of providing numerous buffs depending on their equipments. Spies are great for sneak attacks or eiliminating key threats. Snipers excel at long range, also eliminating key threats, as well as extinguishing burning teammates with jarate and providing a damage boost to teammates. Next, let's look at the presentation. TF2 has a very unqiue art style. It's somewhat cartoonish, but very appealing. It's simple, and un-complex. But it doesn't need to be complex. It's simplicity is it's strength. Everything is detailed enough to where you can easily tell whats going on, what a specific model or item is, and they all stand out. The soundtrack is also very appealing and catchy, especially the main theme. I personally have it as a ringtone/alarm tone on my smartphone! :) One of the best aspects of TF2 is the Steam Workshop. Users can submit designs for items and weapons, and possibly have them added to the game! A very lucrative sub-market has also emerged from this game in the form of the Crate Keys. That's a whole different ballgame in and of itself, so we won't get into it here. During normal gameplay on most servers, you can obtain random items, weapons, and sometimes crates, and taunts....through the item drops system. You can only receive so many drops per week, and you will get them randomly as you play. You can use these items and weapons to customise your mercenary's loadout, or you can use them to craft other items, hats, and weapons. You can take multiples of items and craft them into Scrap, then Reclaimed Metal, then Refined Metal. You can then use these metals to craft specific class weapons/items, among other things. The crafting system is simple yet robust, with lots of possiblities. Some of it is very luck based. You can take some very common items and end up crafting a super rare hat or gun worth a lot of moolah on the Steam Market! All-in-all, Team Fortress 2 is just a very fun game. Endless entertainment awaits when you start up this game, especially if you play with friends on your favorite server. Probably the best free-to-play game on Steam. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=383235670 Highly Recommended Be sure to check out Nerd House Gaming for more reviews!
Mr Squiggles;-;How to play Team Fortress 2: Be polite, Be efficient, Have a pan to kill everyone you meet.
pacsomepuppes;-;> I was only 10 years old. > I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. > I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. > Then I got my first hat, The gibus. > Suddenly everything changed. > I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' > I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. > I had so many hats, I loved them all. > But then someone traded me, I accepted. > They offered an Unusual for all my hats. > It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. > But no Unusual, He scammed me. > I lost it all. > I was so sad I cried for hours. > Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. > I went to bed after praying. > I felt warm. > I looked behind me, It was Gaben! > He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning Team Captain. > Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning Team Captain and I was naked. > I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. > Hats are love. Hats are life. TF2: 11/10 Best hat simulator 1981 Overall, I'd give this game 9 out of 10 Gabe Narwalls Shoutout to ObsidianObelisk17 for making a youtube vid of this Showout to TheDisableBore for making a comic of this I cringe re reading this :smug:
Flexi;-;Ruined my life and cost me over 500. 10/10 would recommend to friends and family
Special;-;Team Fortress 2 is the most realistic hat simulator created to date. There is absolutely no other simulator quite like this one. The first time you start the simulator, you join a server where you can play a minigame where you show off your hats and items. If you kill a person three times in a row in the minigame, you get your very first hat: the Gibus. This is where it really starts; To play the simulator correctly, you have to spend money in the market place, made by Valve. After that, while you play the minigame, you can find hats which you can trade for, or collect! There is many other people who wants to collect and trade hats, just like you! After you collect enough items and/or hats, try joining a trade server! There, the REAL fun begins! Good luck, and beware of ending up poor!
Bennaccio;-;There is really no game alike, you will get dragged into a world of hats and stranges before you know it. Addiction to rare items guaranteed. Best. Game. Ever.
Sanktronium;-;THOU GAME IS THE best game I have probably played in my life :D ILOVEIT
A guy that looks like a girl;-;Tf2 Is the best f2p Game out here. Great playability, multiple classes, a lot of items and Trading system makes it even better. 9/10 Because trading system has complicated prices.
= ocu =  poo;-;Great game 10/10 would almost always recommend
Milkyshakes;-;Best free to play game ever!
The Brazilian Slur;-;Originally I got the game to enjoy the Team Working FPS. Then i noticed that Once you have a Hat everything changes. From a FPS/Strategy game to a Hat Simulator I have been hooked on hats for the past 300 hours on here. It ruined my life, all I dream now is hats, hats, more hats. I can't even play competively w/o looking like a drag queen of hats 11/10 Would Recommend
Betmen;-;This game has hats. Lots of hats. It should be named hat fortress market. There is a hat worth over $14000. No jokes. This game is amazing. Buy all the hats.
Droog;-;Classic crackhead fun
lolschrauber;-;Great shooter with a lot of variety Lots of weapons Lots of classes Lots of game modes Free to play - no reason not to try it
Alpha & Omega;-;No doubt this is the gratest game ever made.TF2=Steam economy
Lock E. Guy;-;Fashion show with guns....what more can you ask for? 10/10.5
Confetti Camouflage;-;It's a hat and afk simulator; you've probably already played it. Hat mechanics rivaled to none.
YoungAbe;-;good game i just recomend to try easy servers for newbies
DSLD;-;HATS! #hatsfordays
Dumora;-;This game is the greatest thing you will ever play in your life! Really good! 0/10
Scrambled Pudding;-;Had fun shooting guys in the testicles. And did I mention the hats? Hats are a thing. Totally didn't take up half of my computer memory with hat models and unusual effects. And I only spent about $400 USD on this game and wasted about 1000+ hours on this game. 69/10 Would recommend to anyone under the age of pasta.
=T$E=The Zipper Wolf;-;come on do i really need to say any thing
Heil_Sheen420;-;first of all this game is free highly addictive and funny co op play
cannonInspector;-;HOLY  IT'S TEAM FORTRESS LOOK AT THIS  SCOUTS AND HEAVIES AND SNIPERS AND ALL THAT STUFF GUNS? WE HAVE GUNS. BASEBALLS? THOSE TOO. YOU WANT SOME STUPID ING PREDATOR MISSILES?  OFF AND GO PLAY YOUR LITTLE BROTHER'S CALL OF DUTY, YOU LUMP OF CRAB FECES. THIS GAME IS SO FUN YOU'LL BE ERECTING A DISPENSER; IN YOUR PANTS
A Mushy Banana #road2p00sy;-;the hats ruined my life. i give it 10 hats out of 10 hats
Xxx_360NoScope4LifeFaze420_xxX;-;Amazing FPS Game! And also its FREE!!! (What Else Do You Need)
ian307;-;THE BEST GAME EVER
Gecko Salamanca;-;How can such a game not be liked? It is an inhuman feat to turn down such a marvel. (That's Free!)
troutman53;-;This game is the best free shooter out there.
badbad;-;Exciting, Fun to play with friends, and mostly Addicting. New updates to keep you coming back for more every single day. Hundreds of items to collect including hats, new weapons to use, and clothes for your characters. Enormous community with fluent and fun gameplay.
HunterKiller;-;I would recommend this one to everyone. Lots of laughs. Seems that there's a lot of people playing it. Free to play unless you like to spend money and have what many others can't afford. As for myself? I'm starting to stay away from F2P/P2P games. It's not worth the time to me anymore. Box it and I'll buy it, if, it has SP for it. I want to learn a game before I jump into multiplayer.
GreenCervidae (TheGreenGamer);-;I could literally spend weeks playing this game. the only reason I'm writing this review is for an achievement (   )
zPhoeniX;-;This game is basically the best FPS game i have ever played.
[29th]WarriorPoet;-;TF2 is a game that I, on multiple accounts, have accumulated about 3,000 hours on. I love it to death. I'm even happier that it is still WELL populated and regulated. If you are looking to buy TF2, here are a few things you might want to know. Pros: Skill-based yet accessible gameplay. TF2 is a perfect mix of difficulty, with each class giving a different level of skill. With some very basic twitch skills you can do quite well. At the same time, with practice you can become a god of the field, dominating enemies with a long range rocket hitting them in the air. Gameplay suited to you. Different classes and weapons offer you any placestyle, suited to you. Balanced gameplay. All of the weapons, classes, and mechanics of TF2 feel well-tested for balance. There are few items that are unbalanced, and none that are gamebreaking. Team-based gameplay. As the name implies, a good team is needed to win. You will get more-or-less randomly paired with a team. You don't necessarily have to be good: you just have to contribute. F2P in the best sense. You do not need to buy anything to be good or have fun in TF2. While you cannot trade or find hats as a F2P, those are very little things that do not affect most gameplay. Plenty of gamemodes and maps. Team Fortress 2 keeps the gameplay fresh with plenty of new maps and old, and many gamemodes. Constantly updated. Valve still updates TF2, and even when major updates are scarce, they still care for the game. The community is very much alive as well. Cons: Bad community. There are many good people who play TF2, but there are an equal number of bad who play it too. Nothing can take the fun out of a game of TF2 more than some embittered teammate complaining about how bad you are doing. There are all manner of villainy (I love that word) in the game: scammers who dedicate their existence to getting virtual items with no effect on gameplay, annoying players who key-bind after every kill, little children who think they're in charge (those are more cute than annoying) and elitist players who will scorn you for every failure. The last is perhaps the most irritating: there is many a player who, at the first sight of you being new or bad, will not hesitate to call you a noob or otherwise call you out. There are also many who judge your skill based on your number of hats: I recall on one occasion a behatted P2P getting dominated by a F2P who was better than him, and remarking that the F2P was "lucky" and was a "noob." It was deplorable. I advise going into the game with a thick skin. All in all, I give TF2 a 8.5/10. The game is the best-made I have ever played, and although the community can be a bother, the game itself is remarkably solid. Also, if you don't like it...well, it's free. Seriously, go download it right now. RIGHT NOW.
Floyd;-;ING . I HATE THIS GAME. I HATE IT SO MUCH I PLAY IT ALL DAY OUT OF SPITE!!!
Pyscho12;-;This Game is filled with content and never stops with the fun. So much to learn and u can even ear money from this game.
prplcobra | TF:GO;-;Its a hat simulator with a first person shooter minigame
HystericalMustard;-;This is one of the best games i've played, and its free...
[DBR]DevinUser514;-;Rocket jumps, sandviches, ham shanks, and HATS, SO MANY HATS. 111111/10
BIG FAT FISH;-;Awesome and free! What's not to love?! :D
HAS312e;-;TEAM FORTRESS 2- The best team-based multiplayer ever, that has diffrent classes to choose from, very fun and addicting, the best part is that you play a multiplayer mode call SURF only can be find on a dedicated server, very fun and you will love surf maps a lot more :)
windmill;-;I need psychological help and, possibly, a life.
sjwn123 aka the lost king;-;i got tf2 about 3 montths ago. since then the game has only got better. definate 10/10
Just a bystander;-;a wonderfull piece from valves source engine all hail gaben gaben is hat gaben is key
Piizza;-;THIS GAME IS GERD
The Adorable Artist;-;I love this game! doesn't matter if you're a girl, everyone can become good at this :D
mega_;-;This is a allover good game, and it is free! Download now <3
FU-DO;-;Install Steam. Install this. Never install any other game. Buy Hats. Kill anyone with a Brony or Homestuck username. Barter with other players for items they JUST got in the middle of a match and treat Scrap Metal like crack-rocks. Sell your worldly possessions for hats. Have you tried Mann Vs Machine yet? That's a good way to spend money too. Look at all that money you've spent on a Free-To-Play. At least you aren't playing League Of Legends. Also something about Pootis. I have over fifty hours put into this game and I am still no good at it. I ing love this game.
Ubiquitous;-;this game's pretty tight.
Sizzlelele;-;I feel this game would be far greater if we could have some sort of headwear we could change out depending on how we feel.
mrwinnu;-;ten out of ten
Flan;-;What do you think you're doing not playing this I mean come on
sly;-;If this game were a potato, it would be a good potato.
sphere friend yellow;-;if you play cod go away because this game is 2 cool 4 u
Salty;-;Once upon a time, I've spent more than $70 in one night. And got hats and cosmetics. 10/10
R!chyD;-;Wasted 2 years of my life. Cost me hundreds of dollars and girlfriends. Lost all knowledge for everything except hats. 10 out of 10 would bang. Recommand to friends and family.
Briantism;-;This game is unbelievably amazing, the short time that ive played this game; i enjoy every second of it, even if its moving a payload, destroying robots, or even just meeting and hanging out with friendly people, you'll have a blast!!!
FIESTe | CSGORage.com;-;MEEEEEEEEEEEDIIIIIIIIIIC!!
{TMPCU} Pogonic;-;Imma make a very serious review about this game... lol no theres a fat man with a minigun on the cover.
steven shitter tommy toilet;-;I really don't know why i am doing this, but i guess you could play it....
Rachel;-;used to think it was gay but now its ok
I AM SLOEBER;-;so fun somving in my pants got hard
Wolf;-;This game of fun, and is very exciting.
the dude.... its him;-;It's a great game if you look past the COD bumrushing noobs, the people who discriminate by hats, and the spammers. (Just stay off of valve servers is what I'm saying.)
oLd.as.IcE;-;Fun fun fun what can u wish more than fun?
Asa.Ceva;-;the best of the best
TheDeadFancyPyroK.I.A;-;this is awesome game everyone should play this and if you make a new one that would be great
[MBT] Gentlemen;-;Not meant for people who only play Call of Duty. You will die within seconds and will continue to do so.
Senpai-Krush;-;one of the best games out there...I would suggest you buying it.. But the one down thing about this game..If your a free2play You will earn no respect Unless u dominate I would recommend this game 10/10
wizaR_D_;-;This game took control of my mind, stole my wallet, kidnapped my family, and made me sell my soul for hats. Overall, 10/10. Best hat simulator I've ever played. It's totally not because it's the only hat sim I've ever played.
B3N;-;Team Fortress 2 is an FPS game with a singleplayer and multiplayer servers. I think that this game is awesome, but they need to upgrade the weapon/item drop system, it needs to give new players a few more items than people who have been playing the game more often. The textures are somewhat realistic with a sort of "cartoony" feel to them. The player models are good but could use a little more detail, even if it's a "cartoony" game. Basic plot: Mann CO. a company run by the tough Saxton Hale who had 3 sons, Red, Blu, and Grey. Red and Blu exiled Grey and fought with eachother like maniacs. Grey came back with replicas of Red and Blus armies, Robots. Classes: Scout, Soldier, Pyro, Demo, Heavy, Engineer, Medic, Sniper, and Spy.
DecXa (Krunked);-;1000 hours. All I need to say.
Volerm;-;One time I was eating a sandwich and pretended I was Heavy.... Alone of course... 11/10 ign
JEO;-;Fun game with lot's of fun things to do.
Sukauto;-;Just the thing Medic ordered for when you've had a bad day.
guli;-;Its fun :D
The Enchanting Female Latios;-;I have had so much fin in this game i recomend anyone to try it
BIG FUCK OFF BUMBLE BEE;-;Great game, in fact the best!
That1Psycho;-;My hours, pls send help -signed My soul and wallet
pikl;-;Don't let my hours fool you I have at least 10 minutes in this game.
[SQUAD] Brandon;-;Best Game ever 10 out of 10. Super fun :D
Mr Jackpot;-;This game is one of my favourites, I love playing it with my friends. It's pretty fun playing it with every class,even if I prefer the support ones. It's the best f2p I've ever played,get it if you want to have fun!
ACeTheGreat98;-;The only game where MEDIC is the only word you hear. 10/10
the friendly mineturtle Rabin;-;Realy good game and u can make some money 2
binzov;-;its som coo;l
Raspberry;-;This game is seriously one of the best games I have ever played...Period. The unique artstyle helps set it away from generic shooters like COD or battlefield and makes it addicting with the collectible hats and guns. Plus the 9 classes are extremely different and diverseness makes for a fun time. With the AMAZING content patches, Events and great weapon ideas in the steam workshop this game is insane so what are you doing reading my review? PLAY THE GAME GOD DAMNIT!!!
Mister Lister the Sister Fister;-;MAKES ME WANT TO FIST MY GRANDAD
Emo Unicorn;-;So people keep asking me, "do you have CoD ghosts?" like ing idiot and i say "no i prefer tf2" and they're all like "why would you like a gay game like that?" and i say "why would i play like 100 for a game that just came out and have to wait like a week or so to play online with anyone when i could just get tf2 for free and play online with my friends instantly!?" and they're like "call of duty has guns! :D" and im like "-__- "
[CF] Kena Soga;-;You can throw your own  10/10 IGN
Powerpoint;-;u like to shoot people? play dis game
J T 22;-;Love This Game The Best GET IT 100% BETTER THAN DOTA AND ANY OTHER GAME
8^Sir-Rektalot^8;-;This game has inspired me to play more and my freinds enjoy this game because of the classes and their special abilitys. eg. engineer has the sentry and the demoman has the chagin, charge and the medic with his ubercharge. If you are reding this thank you and please enjoy the game!!! Bye!!!! P.S my friend and cousin said that you guys should add DLC`s if thats okay thanks!!! BIUNE,sonxXx
Tsu;-;Probably one of the best online multiplayer shooters to exist. Team Fortress 2 provides a lot of fun with different classes, customizable loadouts, and of course.. hats. The player can choose from 9 different classes, each with different advantages and tactics. The nine classes are divided into three categories: Offense, Defense and Support. Offensive classes would be; The Scout: A faster class that uses a scattergun, a secondary pistol and a bat for melee. This class has less health but can easily avoid enemy fire, and capture enemy control points twice as fast as any other class. The Soldier: A slower offensive class that carries a rocket launcher, a shotgun and a shovel. Soldiers can be used to take care of buildings like sentry guns and teleporters, made by the Engineer. Or, if you're skilled enough, you could "Rocket Jump" by simply pointing the rocket launcher down at the ground below you, before jumping and shooting. The rocket will explode on impact of the ground, launching you high above the ground and give you the ability to quickly fly into enemy grounds. The Pyro: Pretty self-explainatory, the Pyro uses a flamethrower to set enemies... well... on fire, giving additional damage even if the enemy flees. (Unless said enemy flees into water) Other weapons include another shotgun, and a fire axe. Pyros can also shoot strong air out of the flamethrowers muzzle, which gives it the ability to "air blast" rockets back at enemy Soldiers, or grenades back at an enemy Demoman. For the Defense category, we have; The Demoman: A class known to maining on explosives, and to drink. The Demoman wields a grenade launcher, a "stickybomb" launcher and a glass bottle. "Stickybombs" are pretty self explainatory; Bombs that can stick to any surface. These bombs can be used strategically to blow up the enemy when they least expect it. (For example, planting the stickybombs on a control point.) Stickybombs can also be used to launch the Demoman high in the air, similar to "Rocket Jumping". The Heavy: A slow but effectively defensive class who wields a minigun as a primary weapon, shotgun for secondary and uses his own bare fists for melee. Heavys can easily defeat any enemy in close quarters, but skilled players can easily turn the tables. If paired with a Medic, the Heavy could be difficult to take care of. Having a Medic paired with a Heavy can make for a very effective defense, as long as the Medic stays safe. The Engineer: A class that's not as focused on charging into battle, but more on staying back and building different machines to help the team succeed. The machines vary from sentry guns, health and ammo dispensers, and teleporters. The Engineer also has the ability to upgrade any building using "metal", a secondary ammunition that Engineers collect from parts of destroyed buildings, and dropped weapons from defeated enemies and allies alike. And for the Support category, there is; The Medic: Medics have the ability to heal injured allies using a "medi gun". Of course, Medics are also armed with a syringe gun and a bonesaw, for close combat. As the Medic heals an ally, he builds up an "UberCharge" which, when fully charged, can shield the Medic and any ally he's currently healing from any enemy fire for a limited time. Medics can be very effective when paired with the defensive Heavy, so as long as the Medic stays away from enemy fire and keeps safe. The Medic also has the ability to heal over time, but only by a small amount per second. The Sniper: Self-explainatory, the Sniper can be used to hide back unseen and snipe incoming enemies with the Sniper Rifle. This class is also equipped with an SMG, and a kukri knife for close encounters with the enemy. When you stay zoomed in on the scope, a small meter is filled on the side of the screen, leading to a lightning bolt. When this meter is filled, the rifle can fire a "charged" shot that can take most classes out, even if its not a headshot. And the Spy: A unique class that can be used to disguise as an enemy class using a Disguise Kit. The Spy can sneak over to enemy territory and use his Knife to backstab an enemy, instantly killing them no matter how much health they have. Spies are also wielding a Revolver and a "Sapper". Sappers can be used to disable and destroy buildings from the Engineer class. Spies can then sneak behind an Engineer focused on the sapper, and backstab them. But attacking while disguised risks being caught, as a Spy's disguise instantly goes away when attacking. Spies can also cloak to appear invisible, using their watch. But such power is limited, and goes away if used for too long, forcing the Spy to stay visible until its fully charged. Spies cannot attack while invisible, nor can they capture control points cloaked or disguised. Team Fortress 2 also features a completely customizable set of loadouts for your classes. You may recieve different weapons for different strategies, such as giving the Demoman the ability to charge and bash into enemies with the Chargin' Targe. Or the player can give the Heavy to heal quickly with the popular Sandvich. Players may also recieve accessories and of course, hats. Players can also paint certain accessories any color they wish, if they ever get the right bucket. There are also "decal tools", "name tags", and "description tags". Decal tools allow the player to put custom images on certain weapons and accessories, as the Name and Description Tags allow the player to change the name and description of the item to anything they wish. Players may purchase or trade "Mann Co. Supply Crate Keys", which they can use to unlock and open "Mann Co. Supply Crates", which are randomly found in-game. Doing so will grant the player special items, like more accessories or weapons. Most common from crates are the Strange quality weapons. These special weapons can track the total amount of kills the player makes with that specific weapon. Increasing the total kills by certain amounts can "rank up" the weapon, giving it a special name for others to see. (I.E: "Truly Feared Minigun") Team Fortress 2 gives an unforgettable multiplayer experience. Its cartoony graphics, remarkable voice acting, and its unique classes and characters, makes Team Fortress 2 a must-have for gamers everywhere. And best of all, its FREE. Players can also communicate over mic, spray custom images on the wall, and chat in the server's chatbox. But its strongly recommended to NOT do so these days, given the community. (Also, as a warning to new players; Don't enter "unbindall" in the console commands. )
RussianRaccoon;-;Its a great free to play game ,but its also 20 GB got to give up space for the hats!
HappyPlayer;-;I recomend this game
Oxolot;-;medic dies at the end.
Smitty Werbenjaegermanjensen;-;There is excactly 1 reason to not get this game. If you still have an innocent mind. Like any body has that. This game has quirky characters, awesome wepons, a fan base that aren't  and jerks, adn it's free! Oh, and what's this? Actual effort and care put into an FPS? AND THERE'S COLOR?!?!?!? SUCK IT CoD! Also a bad game doesn't get 240 and counting hours.
Mew;-;This Game is so Cool
Dismal;-;Very fun game, I enjoy the fact that Valve is constantly changing the game and fixing the bugs.
NotPhase;-;Only played a few hours, but it's great fun - never been irritated by the game at all! As long as you can run it smoothly, this game is a breeze. The different classes are so much fun to play and easy to learn if you're willing to put your mind to them. Trading is still a thing but as always be careful with the waves of scammers buzzing around your high value items, if you have any of the sort! Have fun with this game! P.S: It's f2p! - Robbie
[PTY] Rykan Heir;-;Very fun and addicting
The_Minecraft60;-;This game is so awesome I would recommend this to everyone (This is a M rated game but to all who can play) cause it's so unrealistic. It's so awesome.
><Charinty>< #Comeback;-;A game where you can have some fun with your friends and play around on casual servers. Or you can get into competitive tf2 and practice all day at the game to become good to finally create a team of friends or new people to get to know and play with. The game itself is full of content such as many fun playmodes, hats and miscs, weapons and taunts such as squaredance. (Yes you can dance in this game). There are 9 classes and everyone is special from one another and every single one of the classes takes time to learn and get good at. Teamfortress 2 is a game for the casual player but also for the competitive player.
BATTLE BIRD(Ortvinwin);-;This game is really easy to get into, but if your a regular cod player this isnt a game for you, in adition the ''free to play'' element is broken when you have to buy a key to open a box that has a 1% chance of giving you a hat that has either our planets orbiting it OR its on fire. 10/10 in adition my wallet feals violated.
Contaminate;-;I LOVE THIS GAME!! i always play it since that is the only game i have
Bot Pie;-;It keeps crashing but i love the game -_-
Ddawg;-;this is one of my all time favorite games. Classic shooter, solid mechanics, balanced classes (which are each extremely customizable), different game modes, a lot of humor, and just plain fun gameplay. Trading makes it a lot more awesome, too. Get this game. It's free :D
rafa_dm123;-;Good gameplay Great Weapons Excellent Gamemodes
Surny;-;help me please.
Khaleesi;-;Best free to play eva
[TF:GO]Red_Balloon;-;I'm beginning to start to unbox (unbox) I keep unboxing, don't know what I want (I want) I don't care this or that what I got (I got) They say I keep unlocking all locks so call me lock god. But for me to unlock locks by all means. I need money in my steam wallet. Add funds, sell stuff and gain profit. Got a fat knot from the steam market. Keep buyin and sellin off of it. Ever since Gabe Newell was still in office. With updates being added (daily) I'm an gamer still as honest. But keep spending and burning money like all hell. Team Fortress, Key fortress (Unlock them) This Crickety crackety rackety crick crack I have so much p*ss glass in my backpack. Packin a bat in the back of the sac. Backpack rack crap sac sac nap-sac And at the exact time time I attempt to unbox these boxes while I buy that. I'll still be able to unbox a mother f*ckin crate Over the back of a couple of f2ps and also buy a new hat. Only realized the duplicates. I had so much items I could craft How could I not craft? I had so much s-bombs. Feel my wrath of attack People want a trading period. Decline, they're all sad. My rep is going to be really bad While I keep unboxing all these boxes in front of them (yeah)
o()o#stuckinthemiddle;-;very addictive game for people to pass time
(o_)?   MaD;-;Best Funny and Free To Play Game To Spend Time!! :) Really Nice Graphics!! Love The Part Of Exist More Than 1 Class Great Multiplayer Modes , It Has Competitive Too Heavy Is So Funny With His Sasha aha :D My Favorite Class Is Sniper Great Community Too!! Congrats!! :)
CLF ArmyCow101;-;If you are looking for a AWESOME game that may just become your favorite game, you are looking in the right place. TF2 has an amazing community with endless fun! TF2 has countless modes and maps to play with a ton of weapons to choose from to fit your play style. Also, with 9 different classes to choose from, each with different rolls, the possibilities are endless. So what are you waiting for, get it now!
$ir;-;It's nice
[IF] Stylin' Sloth;-;Brilliant free game!
General Dani;-;This game, is awesome, very flippin awesome, there are tons of weapon choices, each with their own effects. The classes have a ton of personality which really makes them shine. I highly recommend this to anyone who likes shooters.
EpicSoda;-;This is an epic game if you like shooting games and games with classes, try it out. The game has nice weapons, we can show off our hats. This game offers steam trading and trading cards which is epic. The weapons are really cool. Heres my story.. > I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. > I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. > Then I got my first hat, The gibus. > Suddenly everything changed. > I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' > I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. > I had so many hats, I loved them all. > But then someone traded me, I accepted. > They offered an Unusual for all my hats. > It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. > But no Unusual, He scammed me. > I lost it all. > I was so sad I cried for hours. > Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. > I went to bed after praying. > I felt warm. > I looked behind me, It was Gaben! > He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning Team Captain. > Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning Team Captain and I was naked. > I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. > Hats are love. Hats are life. TF2: 11/10 Best hat simulator 1981 Overall, I'd give this game 9 out of 10 Gabe Narwalls I would play the game the whole day
CEAON;-;I was only 15 years old I loved TF2 so much I prayed to TF2 every night, thanking it for the love I've been given. "Hats are love." I say. "Hats are life." My dad walks in on me as I max out the credit card to buy all the hats and he calls me a theifing , I know he's just jealous that I'm going to raise my steam level, I called him a . He smacks me and takes my computer away, sending me to sleep. I'm crying now, I lay in bed, and my face hurts. It's cold, and I feel a warmth moving towards me. Something touches me. It's Gaben! I'm so happy, he whispers in my ear, "HALF LIFE 3 CONFIRMED." He grabs me with his powerful programming hands, I'm ready. I spread my asscheeks for Gaben, he puts a hat on my butt. It looks so stupid but I do it for Gaben. My dad walks in to check on me and apologize, and shouts, "WHAT THE ?!" Gaben looks him straight in the eyes and says, "PORTAL 3 CONFIRMED." He flies through the window. Hats are love. Hats are life.
GeneralWolfie;-;Team Fortress 2 is one of my favorite games it's easy ad quick to learn how to play. Fun to play with friends and enjoy the games
Mewman;-;You get to kill things, choose from classes, wear hats, and it's free! So buy the game OR I'LL ING KILL YOU! Sorry, multiple personalities, good day! I SAID GOOD DAY!
MLG_POTATO;-;BEST GAME EVER GET IT NOW!!!
Spuki;-;It made me have an unhealthy sexual obsession with hats. 11/10
NOT FRESH ENOUGH!;-;Creative Addicting Fun. 3 words to describe Team Fortress 2
Ari;-;This is an amazing game that plays on the individual humor of every single individual who plays this. This game requires practice to improve and often tests your timing, thinking, and strategic abilities. Overall, it is a game that you can never (hopefully) get bored at.
JaneT;-;This is really great game i like it :)
Royal Bloo;-;Best game on steam by a long run!
s;-;To be honest, I actually hated this game 2 months ago and I do not know what happened but it really grew on me, probably something to do with hats but I don't know. I recommend this game to anyone looking for good free fun and free items.
MordeKai;-;Fun and very easy to get the hang of. One of valve's best. 11/10
MudkipMiku;-;Great game!
Bet;-;The game that makes you smile from the sheer absurdity of the combat.
Megalomania;-;Incredible gameplay and a wide range of classes to choose from, this game offers a unique and very enjoyablHATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS HATS
connerblackjack;-;I never going to stop playing team fortress 2
Midbee;-;The best Hat Simulator around.
A Delicate Spatchcock;-;It is a very good guame
Mr.Sandvich;-;A very fun Free To Play game, there's trading, action, and most importentley. Hats.
PJ_SAM;-;Crazy addictive
RashE;-;After over 800 hours on this game, I still go back to it all the time. Both being free-to-play, and easy-to-run, Team Fortress 2 has been the game that I grew up with in both FPS's and video games and general. There are so many different gamemodes, so many different things to do, I will never get bored of this game, and reccommend it to absolutely anyone.
Corporal R. Prime_;-;Truly the best fun you can have online and it's FREE-TO-PLAY go for it :)
Lole (1dayBirthday);-;Ruined my life.10 stars.
paulos_achileas;-;this game is one of the best FPS tha I have play
ShyKeno;-;This is a game.
Xentius;-;The Best Free to Play game ever! :D
RUMHAM;-;Best Damn Game i've played online!
R3d LinK_;-;Love the game, had over 700 hours on it but it kinda kills your wallet sometimes still, 11/10
[Red] Dr. Bonk;-;i like the game but how do you get the awper hand
[539]LongShotCS;-;Team Fortress 2 is a EXELLENT starter game for those new to steam!
Australia;-;"This game made me feel like a part of me died, but then another part had just been born..."
File Rat;-;Well I can recommend it. I for a while did not like it. It is very well executed. The classes are balanced surpisingly compared to the typical freeium fps. This game I can not consider a sequel to Team fortress classic due to a HUGE CHANGE! But entirely different game all together. Looks nice. Very interesting concept. Throws a couple refrences from Allidin, spectifically. " YOUR ENTERNAL REWARD! ". This is like the big budget game of Valve essentially. But there is a huge flaw. Some of the level designs are mazes..... Being serious. This is like a paid game without paying... But you will have to get used to the classes and such. Always AIM AT THE HEAD!
Crypain;-;10/10 ITS SO ING AWSOME IT GETS YOU MORE HYPE THAN COCAINE
parksnwreck;-;amazing game if you like cartoonish gooofy fps then this is the game for you
Gordon Freeman born a Freeman;-;play this, is gud delz
NoSoul;-;In my opinion this is the best game i ever played so far. Many different and fun to play gamemodes. Great class custumization with dozens and dozens of weapons and cosmetics. New updates, maps, weapons, cosmetics is appearing fast. I highly recomend this DEFINENTLY. hope it helps :)
Naminorima;-;Hat Simulator 2 Now with conga DLC sandvich/10
Emulator;-;Probably 1000000 reviews on this already but... Fun by yourself and even more fun with friends and dont get me started on the complex trading system
Mango;-;this game is SHAMWOW
darkusio;-;This is a good game. Try it.
Uggy;-;The well known, and appreciated War Themed Hat Simulator, AKA Team Fortress 2. Fantastic game with truly awesome gameplay that does not focus on being realistic, just fun! Unlike many other multiplayer shooters, this one requires a lot of teamwork, hence the title, which can be either rarther frustrating or just plain fantastic! The feeling of when you and your team smashes through the enemy defenses and when you help each other out defeating the enemy is something to experience... You won't find this anytime soon in CoD kids... But of course, there are also some bad sides to the fact that teamwork is such a key element. Often it is seen that a lot of new players decide to go the class that they like- This is problematic since a full 10-man team of snipers simply will have a lot more trouble taking down a sentry nest than a single demoman and medic. Morale is that you have to balance the classes so you have enough of everything. There are a lot of unlockable weapons in the game, but you don't get them by 360'ing 30 people in a row... It's random drops, and to some extent achievement milestones (But not that much really...) Most weapons are simply sidegrades, so there aren't many weapons that are just better! Pretty much everything is balanced. As a final note, there are cosmetics in this game! YEY! These doesn't change anything particular important, even though people love 'em. Just collect them as an extra mini-game! It is not what the entirety is about :) The game is free! So yeah... Go have yourself a good time
DraZa Chetn1k;-;The best online game I've ever played.
Malvex;-;Gg wp 10/10 like skyrim with hats would play again
gibe de pusi b0ss;-;Ok.if your reading this dont. If you wanna know about tf2 and wanna hear all its glory,dont even Read the reviews. DOWNLOAD THIS INCREDIBLY AWESOME AND FREE GAME IT MADE ME WET,IT WILL DO THE SAME FOR YOU! -Bill Cosby Santa 2014
Happy Hippooos;-;Great Game 10/10
Pimp Fernando;-;WHY CAN'T I HOLD ALL THIS HATS?
Marcia Brady;-;This game is fun and exciting to play!
hi im FiN | trade.tf;-;I played this. It's good. I'm Helpful!
Inognito (KSG);-;Great Game, plenty of ways to get things for FREE xD
Febon;-;Conga ruined the game 10/10
beauxors;-;It's free. Why not?
East (Tron);-;Greatest game ever, Has a market for trading like the stock market, balance, skill, teamwork, etc. Everything you could ever want from a game.
Hax R Us;-;Hours explain my review.
That Engineer;-;got banned on a jailbreak server for lenny 10/10 would lenny again
Stupidella;-;This game is really cool, especially the F2P community and the shi-T updates !
[SLAG] Fudgey;-;To review Team Fortress 2 simply is difficult. But I shall try. It's an amazing game. Definately something everyone should experience. And it's free! So it's not like you can complain even if you don't like it.
Rio Kamichika;-;Before playing Team Fortress 2, I would've said "to hell with first-person shooters." With so many of them being carbon copies of each other, with the same old gritty, realstic style, it's easy to lose faith in there being originality in the genre. Team Fortress 2 is a fine example of everything having an exception. It's always the perfect solution for when I'm having a crappy day or I'm bored. Except for when it's not. But it often is! Moreso than almost any other game. It's incredibly fun and designed to be the kind of game you pour hundreds of hours into, which is very easy to do! It's free and it's fun, there's no damn excuse to not play it! Give it a try, you'll probably surprise yourself with how enjoyable it is! Even if the ordinary gameplay style isn't your thing, there's many other types of servers and play styles to always offer something exciting. Even when I'm getting my  kicked on this game, I tend to be having fun and laughing. It's easy to get into and easy to get addicted to as well. If you're wondering, there is a "catch" to it being free to play, which is that there's also a premium version but to get that version you just need to purchase any in-game item, which can be for as little as 60 pence or something like that, plus it is possible to play for as long as you like with the free version if you're satisfied with that. The main motivation to get premium is the space in your inventory is quite limited in the free version and after a few hundred hours (!) playing you might start to feel like you're running out of space, assuming you like to keep anything interesting you get. As far as catches go, I'd say that's pretty fair, certainly gives you a loooong time to decide whether this game is worth putting your money towards... a potentially very small amount of money, I might add. Getting premium allows you to get rarer drops such as hats and be able to trade items with other players freely, allowing you to get your hands on all sorts of cool stuff. You'll probably only want to get it if you've got really into the game and want to experience it in full and have been playing long enough for the inventory space to become an issue, so don't feel this is a game where you feel incredibly stunted by your free-to-play status. In conclusion this game is super-super fun, few other games have the potential to have so many hundreds of hours poured into them and remain enjoyable. Give it a try, you'll probably be very glad you did! Although having said all that, it does have autobalance, the worst feature to be included in any game ever. Nothing like getting put on the team you've been working against all this time the moment you die, after having called vote after vote to prevent such a fate but everybody adores a gamebreaking flaw too much for there to be enough "yes" votes. If you end up the very opposite to glad that you gave this a game a try after all, finding yourself on the verge of suicide over how something as evil as autobalance can exist in this world, I'm very sorry. Truly, who could have expected that in a team-based game, anyone could think it'd be a good idea to have a feature that targets you the exact second you die, no matter how long you had been alive beforehand and forces you to turn against your own team? A feature that in an instant, turns a highly enjoyable round into an extremely irritating one. A feature that, despite having been criticised for years, still hasn't been reworked, all we've got is a vote feature that people are too stupid to vote "yes" for.
CTD;-;If you enjoy blowing people up setting them on fire or beating them to a pulp then this the game for you!
The Marksman;-;great game!
Zeyray;-;help, how does this game work
The Lawyer;-;In case you can't tell, I love this game. Just look at how many hours I have on it. It is hands down the best Multiplayer FPS out there. Also it's free to play. And free things are awesome. You do need to buy at least one item from the in-game store to get a premieum, but the cheapest item is currently $0.10, so it's not that big a deal. Now, onto the gameplay. This game appeals to all people who like FPS games. Wanna snipe? Go sniper. Wanna be a healer? Go medic. Wanna be an indestructable tank in the battlefield? Go heavy. The list goes on and on. Its wonderfully balanced (except for the gunslinger). Also the hats are pretty neat.
Im A Sad Man;-;I don't have a life anymore. Nice game.
Dagin;-;You would be crazy not to play Team Fortress 2.
Kiileyy;-;TF2 has got to be one of the most fun and hilarious Free to play games out there, It is so awesome and easly one of my fav games to play!
Catyclept;-;Fortress of Teams Twice is a game that makes me more concerned about virtual hats then real life events. I think this makes it worthy enough to be in anybody's Steam Library.
Axemaster #bebackin4weeks;-;Team fortress is one of the best game i have ever played. It has good graphics, items look amazing ang just over all just really fun
Moose;-;rip BONUS DUCKS ;(
Madness Beam;-;So... This isn't my first review, BUT, I guess I need to do it again, since the first one was on 40 hours of playing... SO, after a year I get to know 5 things about this game. 1. It's awesome the TONS of nice people, almost every friend I have is from TF2, I can make some mentions, like the best player in my list, is a nice guy with true heart, and soemone that helped me when I was about to kill myself due to a break up with... anyway, other guys, like a teacher from a rocket jump server, that now is one of my best friends, an asian guy... that... well is asian, and a german guy with a profile pic of a girl... xD, you can get to know, I've been playing in almost every kind of server, from a normal valve Control Points server, to a Death Run server hosted by nice admins. Also, you can get to some weird servers, that are full of bots, or idle people, but well, that's something that happens sometimes. 2. Hats... 3. The community is half good, and half bad, I mean you get to know nice players, and some funny servers to just have fun, and other servers to completely destroy the enemy team, but since mannconomy update, now there is another market for all the things you can have and get, BUT you need items to do it, like keys and , and they have prices, and a lot of more things that I don't want to get into it... I mean, yeah I used the market, tf2outpost, and trade.tf, but I don't care about prices or those things, If I want a thing, I GET THE THING, no matters what is the price for it... So I just skip this part, but if you wanna get into it, you will need to use backpack.tf 4. Last thing, this game saved my life, with the friends I got from it, I must say thank you for it, if you have a history, just ing add me and hang me with me for a while, maybe I can even be your new friend (?) 5. Hats.
Iago {Team Captain};-;After playing this game for nearly 3 years, I still love going on it every single day. This is by far the best game out their, and, since it's free to play, you're out of excuses to not try it!
Asasill;-;One of the best free to play game, with good graphics and... All in it is fantastic.
Andy Misandry;-;When Team Fortress 2 was released in 2007, it was the result of nine years of development. It's now seven years later, and development hasn't actually stopped. A wealth of gamemodes, weapons, and gameplay adjustments later, Team Fortress 2 is less intricately well-balanced, but is still as exciting and funny as it ever was. Going free-to-play was also a smart decision, I feel, as the expanded player-base means you'll never go without a match. Absolutely recommended.
General (fag) Deer;-;i have stopped playing this game half year ago but i still respect this game alot overall rating 9/10 good things -amazing community -maps are ballanced -classes are ballanced -music :D -so many different weapon choices -#gibus bad things -trading yep! -economy -updates hats hats hats and hats
fk mmr;-;10/10 There are hats in this game.
Neebs;-;A great game. But the only defection is that it tends to lag, and, sometimes, a lot.
Rage_Inducer;-;Team Fortress 2... What can one say about this game that hasn't been said already? It's a rather unique game in many ways: How many games have had an entire economy based on hats appear in them thanks to their community? How many games can have an extremely skilled player fragged by another, less skilled yet adecuately equiped player? How many games have a metric -ton of hats that vary from plain and boring to silly and pure awesome? Lets not forget that this is a class-based FPS in which every single class has its weaknesses and strengths twards other classes. As the game gets updated more weapons are added, all of which swap around the classes you're good and bad against. With only a few, minor exceptions, there are no weapons ingame that are a straight upgrade to the default weapons, all are sidegrades. The best weapon in the game is the one that fits your style best, the one you feel most comfortable using. There are many ways to play Team Fortress 2: You can play on official servers, which are all good. Play an objective against other players or play a 6 player coop mode against vast waves of AI controlled characters. OR You could play on community servers, where just about anything can happen. There are servers dedicated to trading, to snipers, to all versus one battles, achievement servers, and a large amount of modded gameplay servers. Play how you like, it's free and it's good.
Cel | sH4ME;-;Hey guys this game is too fancy Pro: ----The gameplay is smooth ----Fancy details ----Steam workshop -but i hate that lagspikes For me tf2 is 10/10 :)))) Brofist
SickPuppyThrower;-;Dis is sum good free
Unseen | Trading;-;One of the BEST Fps game ive ever played... i mean you get hats, hats, more hats, and let me see HATSSSSS!
star;-;team fortress 2 is one of the few games that require you to work together with teamates and really get along with them to really get the win.
Techno Wolf (RIP - Satoru Iwata);-;R.I.P Wallet, and absolutely NOBODY cares about skill unless you have hats. 100/10
Deceiver;-;Nice hat simulator had plenty of fun playing it.
ckowkay(going to mexico);-;i like the smooth gameplay and different classes and modes
L rivr;-;Played a bit... I liked it
Dr.Edomae;-;Behold the greatest hat / dress up simulator in the world!
DeathCheeb;-;Amazing game! They're always adding in new items.
=(yIFF)= Unsavory furry;-;I wanted to wear hats, earn hats, collect hats, probably do something else to the hats.. 600 hours in I regret wasting this much time in my life to play some bullet shooting hat wearing gibus giving game I went in too deep. Please help me out.
Clumsy Coyote;-;Best Online game i've ever played! You wont be desapointed mates!
Iniet;-;Play this game ;3 :D
Racego;-;Great game if you want to kill some time, or just wear some hats.
The Glowworm [];-;Loved this game, very good potential. I also like the comedy and humor in this FPS.
StagMan;-;Awesome game. Very fun and addicting.
BombShell;-;You can explode people pretty good.
Menin Gate;-;great game, picked it up for free as well 10/10
ToastaDa;-;Probably the best game ever, I have met so many people here and said so many weird stuff on this game that I can't even imagine my self before playing tf2 O-O
Pugs;-;I have wasted to much of my life on this game
Dedly;-;AWESOME THIS GAME IS SUPAH
st.mp4|noodles;-;This is one of the best hat simulators out there, recommend you pick it up so you can waste more money than you thought possible
Luk;-;Very good! and for free
Sebastianey;-;The, in my opinion, best first-person shooter, with 9 completely different classes and it's very own economy. Go ahead and give it a try, it's free-to-play!
Duck;-;Has a greatly immersive campaign 10/10
Aya Shameimaru;-;The only game where team stacking is seen as a valid strategy, if not the most valid strategy in video games since 1911. Despite the incessant team stacking that would almost convince you to support EA if not for those Steam sales, TF2 still somehow remains fun to enjoy to this very day!
Huey Freeman;-;Dis game is filled with gamer s, But i love it soo.. yeee
Th3Fluffy1L;-;This game is really good all the graphics I love and its really big on multiplayer.When I'm kinda annoyed I play this game or just play it like no one cares if im here
Hostilian;-;Team Fortress 2 is a free to play FPS. It will make you laught and cry. TF2 has many Character that have there own persanality and game play, there realy is something to do for everyone. (PS The crits will make you cry theres no way of getting around that. so pls valve remove ramdom crits. they ruin the game. its fine to have them on the sniper/spy/ medic kritskireg but a ramdom crit while fighting someone is not a fun thing)
That sentry is a spy!;-;Reasons why you should get tf2. Conga Hats Throw  on people Pancake recipe Most realistc game ever Hats Decapitation Hit people with a fish Cosmetics Hit yourself with a baseball bat Hats Fight robots Steal integence Conga Strange weapons Festive items Awesome halloween event Crates Hats Stab your friends in the back Flamethrower that shoots rainbows Jump six times Slap people with a grenade killing them but not you Conga Bonk Be a sp00ky spy Sanvich Rocket jump Delfect rocks and grenades Hats Put out fires with flamethrower Deadringer Be a black scottish cyclops Because I told you to. Seriously do it. Stop reading this review and do it. 10/10 Would stab my friends in the back again.
=ACG= Ditley;-;This game is fun. The End.
D20;-;four words: gentlemen get this game.
lag;-;Great game
Titan;-;I need a life
Pigagorus;-;10/10, wasted hundreds of dollars and lost hordes of proffit, i am now a bankruped hobo on the street, but at least i look good...right?
AngelicDemon;-;Team Fortress 2 is a fast-paced game.From characters as fast as scout to characters as slow as heavy.Although some people might argue,I personally feel that scout is not the fastest. As a soldier,rocket jumping proves to be a good mean of reaching to the front line.A great item to have as a soldier when rocket jumping is the 'Gunboats'.The gunboats is a pair of AMAZING item.It provides lots of mobility.Next we're going to look at the classes. 1. Scout=Fast,good mean of damage with the scattergun,flying guillotine+sandman can take down a heavy fast 2.Soldier=Slow at moving,fast at rocket jumping,highest mean of damage with stock rocket launcher,gunboats for mobility and market gardener/escape plan 3.Pyro=Normal speed,reflecting rockets is the way to play pyro properly i feel and using the flare and axtinguisher gives you lots of damage output. 4.Demoman=Slower by normal speed by a bit,Pipes and stickybomb launcher is a really good mean of taking down sentry nests.You can have lots of fun by being a troll demoman by having the boots,tide turner or sticky jumper(depending of map) and the ullapool caber.The fun factor is high. 5.Heavy=Slowest class,Good mean of damage and very effective at attacking sentries. 6.Engineer=Normal speed,widowmaker teaches you how to aim your shotgun as missing takes out your ammo,pistol for secondary as its your seond long range weapon.Gunslinger as its annoying and fun to use. 7. Medic=Faster than normal by a bit,blutsauger,kritzkrieg for the healing taunt and uber saw to build uber for team. 8.Sniper=Normal speed,challenging but fun,sniper is an effective class to deal with heavies. 9.Spy=Normal speed.Last but not least,we have the SPY.An effective class against sentry nests,heavies and medics,the spy is a very sly class,able to take out sentry nests with the sapper,taking out heavy and medic combos is a huge up side. Overall tf2 is a fun game to play .
Rainbow Dash;-;Ive played this game for quite some time and had much fun in this game, it is quite original and a unique gem in the line of video games out there. For instance, I was walking around in Dustbowl and encountered an enemy pyro. Then astonishingly, he croutched down, pulled out an axe, and called me a "spy" in friendliness. I did the same except with a shovel. Being a new Tf2 player and never seeing this behavior before, I scrounged the voice command list for "spy". Upon completing my feat of seeking the correct word, we walked toward eachother slowly, legs crouched, and stared at eachother, spamming "spy". We did this for a few moments until one of my team mates (soldier) came waddling himself down towards me and the pyro. He stared at us both in confusion, the little ghost dangling off his gibus in the fresh dusty air, and shot a rocket at the pyro, sending his body flying many yards away. Upon seeing my first Tf2 ragdoll, I burst into tears crying with laughter as the pyro's body fell through the air and made the "squish" splat noise. Such a sight is unheard of in any other game and is quite common in this game. I am not a Tf2 fanboy, as I have grown up playing games like the Halo series my whole life since before I was 5, and playing CoD for a few years. I can easily say Halo is a very fun game, but that is another story. You will never find another experience like the ones you find in Tf2 nearly all the time every day, there is much laughter to have and enjoy in this game. 10/10 Is gud stuff. -Heavy
The Real Guy, The Best Guy;-;Great, fun exciting game, where you have a variety of classes you can try from! Geat game overall and with friends!
Hades;-;It is fun and if it gets boring u have more ways to play so this game is really cool for filling your time.
Rocky;-;Its really fun game, one of the best multiplayer game. specially when playing with your friends. If you like FPS or team games, you should give it a shot for sure.
Zwockl;-;Review a Game to earn: "Pillar of Community" 10/10 would r8 again.
[DGN] Lucario :D Buying Skins :D;-;its the best game ever made
Ibuki;-;7.8/10 too much hats - ign
xTcR | Keettu [TF-M];-;Fun, cartoony, and stylish. This game will leave you comming back for more!
TheJollyCabbage;-;This game stole my life. I can't go a day without playing for less than 5 hours. Great pvp, great maps, great hats! 10/10
JonGarfield;-;This is a game that you'll keep coming back to.
Kazix;-;AWESOME game i really like the cartoony effect to this game. SO cool
{DG} General Dezmond;-;This Is The Best Trade Game Ever I Saw
PedoBear;-;I you don't play this game and you have a steam something is wrong with you and you need to go and get some metal help :D
B;-;This is my best game..You Must Get It!
Stephano The Doge;-;ITS JUST FUN!
[CRO]Blade;-;One of the very few Free to Play games worth installing! 11/10
What's Your Vector, Victor?;-;Brotha Strika was on! Folks was friekin, tite me? Translation: this game is really nice
SlyMonkeyKing;-;Team fortress 2 has quickly grown to one of my faverite games faster than any other game, besides Red Dead Redemption XD. I simply love and sometimes hate this game. This Multiplayer/Co-oprative game is extremly fun with the friends and many more to be made! My friends and I are simply in love with this game as it can be very interesting/Extremly fun to play. TF2's comunity is very dedicated and has been here for 7 to 8 years. The comunity always is alive and is no matter what gonna be here. Untill Valve learns to count to 3 I mean (TF2, Portal 2, Half life 2, Left for dead 2...) ! So I Really Recommend This game to everyone and anyone in general!
Monkey D. Luffy;-;Like skyrim with hats!
Alexdhabi;-;Hats... Nothing more to say...
Chub;-;W + M1 = Quality entertainment
Gideowl;-;This game has some kind of magical power to convert all my money into hats and miscs 11/10 -- Would get poor again
Frank Sinatra;-;Greatest Game Lots Of action and thrillif u dont play this game go get urself a life and come back.
Don't Call Me Bertlu;-;i hust did this for the badge
$uokukko 8);-;This game is great. After getting a premium account.
BloodySpy [];-;Really Fun If U Played other Fps Game u will have experience
GGrowled (  );-;too many hats
Boozam;-;It's alright I guess
Sir Me0w;-;I got my mom's credit card and spent 80 dollars to buy cosmetics. It takes 2 days for her to make 80 dollars. Got grounded, she called Steam and they took away all my cosmetics. Best game ever, 11/10. Would spend mommy's credit card again. i soon quit the game
Retro_;-;if you want to play games, play this game. it is best game
Pttersson;-;Hats, Hats and even more HATS! a very good and enjoyable free to play game
Raiden;-;This game used to have toast. I like this.
aufheben.astra;-;Ok, so I'm an old guy. We used to have to play this stuff for real in the playground of our local school. Man, you don't know problems 'til you've got a bunch of little kids screaming and running from your makeshift flamethrowers and grenade launchers. Anyway, years later, we played Unreal Tournament, which was hella fun and didn't get the police or FBI involved. It looks primitive now like a Ford Pinto looks primitive (or would, if you ever saw one, which you don't). After all this time, I found myself really missing the bloody gibfest of psychopathic entertainment. So I picked up TF2. KILL ME WITH SUPERIOR FIREPOWER. That's all I can say. I get slap-happy and stoopid with adrenaline playing this fragfest of a killing game. I am giddy among the rain of giblets. Screaming bloody hoo-ha as I <crit> shot someone's head. It's almost obscene, the amount of fun I have. And you can have the same kind of fun! Just download the game now and join in! You'll be fragging jokers all day! You'll forget food. You'll forget showers. You'll forget to use the toilet. You will become a single-focus zombie mad murdering death machine, and you'll like it. Rrrraaaawwwwrrrr!!!!1! Then, when it's all over, you will appreciate wee little kittens and otters and whatnot, docile as a flower. Until next time.
Don't Anger the Duck;-;Best PC game ever!!!!!!!! TF2 is probably the best multiplayer game of the century. Valve games are the best!!!
Flamernus;-;This game is Addictive This game made me a Premium and Non-Limited Acc On Steam by Trading Started from Gifted Crates to Keys
Quad 4s and Smarts;-;I started playing this game in the Spring of... what, 2007? That's the year after it came out, right? The grand old days. I remember when spies couldn't take teleporters because the glow would persist even when you were cloaked or disguised, and the only way to refill the invisibility watch was to stand in a corner and hope desperately that nobody was going to turn around. I remember when Pyros had no airblast and Engies couldn't move their buildings or upgrade anything but sentries to level 3. Ahh, yes, that was a simpler time. A time before demoknights and mini-sentries. A time before crates and item drops. A time, by gum, before hats. A time when spies had their mouths crammed full of cigarettes, when wielding the Ubersaw was a mark of excellence, when Spytech provided equipment instead of Mann Co and nobody had heard of Australium. Those were the good old days, the golden years of TF2... You know what? The game's improved a lot since then. Go play it. I still do.
Oran$amp118_-;-;i Like This Game, i'm 5 Years playing this game
That Pink Engie;-;This its the funiest game i ever played.
Vaskez;-;F2. This is nearly the ultimate Free-To-Play game on Steam. Second only to Dota 2 in the number of users playing daily. Why is it so popular? Let's take a look, shall we? First off, the obvious: It's free. 100% free. This means its accessible to everyone on Steam. This is just the icing on the cake though. What really shines about TF2 is the game itself. Team Fortress 2 usually consists of two teams (Red and Blue) going head to head against each other. Sometimes fulfilling certain objectives or just downright killing each other. There are many, many maps and modes, such as Payload, Capture Points, and Mann VS Machine. But the general idea no matter the map or mode is to KILL EVERYTHING THAT MOVES! And my god, is it fun to do so. The game has 9 playable mercenaries, each actually being a certain "class". Each class is divided into 3 different roles: Offense, Defense, and Support. Let's go over each role and class. Offensive roles specialize in dealing damage to the opposing team. These are your main attack force. Scouts are the speedy hit and run class, with the ability to double or even triple jump depending on equipped items. Soldiers pack a bit more firepower with their rocket launchers, which gives them not only power, but mobility due to the ability known as "rocket jumping". The Pyro is great at setting the opposition on fire, as well as extinguishing burning teammates using an airblast. Defensive roles serve to inhibit enemy access and to hold enemies back from vital points on the map. Overall, the defensive group has the most firepower of all the groups. Demomen can safeguard areas with stickybombs that they can detonate when enemies come by. Heavies are great for mowing down incoming troops and pushing back forces. Heavies can also keep enemies in an area while whittling their health for teammates to finish off. Engineers can build Sentry Guns for effective area defense, as well as build Teleporters and Dispensers for logistical support of the team. Support classes cannot hold the fight on their own, but their specialized abilities can tip the balance in their team's favor. They offer the offensive and defensive classes an extra edge in battle and can help turn the tide of the game. Whether crippling the enemy advance from behind or keeping teammates healed, the support classes are always handy to have around. Medics are the team healers, capable of providing numerous buffs depending on their equipments. Spies are great for sneak attacks or eiliminating key threats. Snipers excel at long range, also eliminating key threats, as well as extinguishing burning teammates with jarate and providing a damage boost to teammates. Next, let's look at the presentation. TF2 has a very unqiue art style. It's somewhat cartoonish, but very appealing. It's simple, and un-complex. But it doesn't need to be complex. It's simplicity is it's strength. Everything is detailed enough to where you can easily tell whats going on, what a specific model or item is, and they all stand out. The soundtrack is also very appealing and catchy, especially the main theme. I personally have it as a ringtone/alarm tone on my smartphone! :) One of the best aspects of TF2 is the Steam Workshop. Users can submit designs for items and weapons, and possibly have them added to the game! A very lucrative sub-market has also emerged from this game in the form of the Crate Keys. That's a whole different ballgame in and of itself, so we won't get into it here. During normal gameplay on most servers, you can obtain random items, weapons, and sometimes crates, and taunts....through the item drops system. You can only receive so many drops per week, and you will get them randomly as you play. You can use these items and weapons to customise your mercenary's loadout, or you can use them to craft other items, hats, and weapons. You can take multiples of items and craft them into Scrap, then Reclaimed Metal, then Refined Metal. You can then use these metals to craft specific class weapons/items, among other things. The crafting system is simple yet robust, with lots of possiblities. Some of it is very luck based. You can take some very common items and end up crafting a super rare hat or gun worth a lot of moolah on the Steam Market! All-in-all, Team Fortress 2 is just a very fun game. Endless entertainment awaits when you start up this game, especially if you play with friends on your favorite server. Probably the best free-to-play game on Steam.
*c!nDy`;-;Highly addicting game that doesn't get boring with the different characters and items up for grabs. The various classes have such charming personalities. Mixing and matching the classes to form a team is always fun. You can be unique with your classes by changing up their gear, something that compels me to continue playing.
The 9GAG Subreddit of 4chan;-;This game. It has indeed taken 350+ hours of my life away. The community (Not counting unusual traders) is great! But please. PLEASE take the addiction away.
bitchhamsterfuckingwarlord;-;If you have a computer there is no reason why you shouldn't have played this game. (Unless it doesn't appeal to you.) So I guess there is a reason.
xXflamingskullsofdeathXx;-;real life:because you know i'm all about that bass tf2:because you know i'm all about that hat
[HG] Midget CSGO-RAFFLE.COM;-;Well there is only a couple of words for this game. These words would be Amazing, Good, and Fun. Tf2 is a very good well balanced free to play game. It's very good and worth the play time. I would recommend getting this game because its a very good game and is also free. Just get the game if you don't have it yet.
Revy the Pirate;-;If this game was a sandwich, it would be a very good sandwich.
Zeppeli~n;-;"You can never have enough hats, and they can never be orange enough" --Most Trada-est Trada in TF2
White Knight;-;10/10 would bang... legit just so SEX-AY
XDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDDD;-;There's no reason not to play this unless you have a computer running on a i3 potato [EDIT] unless you play counter strike:global offensive
Jimbo;-;best hat simulator ever 11/10
OpTIcORANGE;-;This game is an amazing game, I have never ever added funds to my steam account but due to this game, I was encouraged to, the game maps are amazing, and the graphics are acceptable and the gameplay, Oh yeah, it's amazing! This game is the best thing that happened to my life! If you are planning on getting the game, don't hesitate! Smash that PLAY BUTTON! VALVE FOR THE WIIIN!
The Mutchinator;-;The first FPS game that doesn't make you rage. All the loadouts are really fun and all the guns are balanced in their own ways. Great game! For being free there's no reason not to play this.
Emsraven;-;fun to play when your not a anoyed -wink wink- also fun to play with friends and gets your skills on other games up as well
Indominus Rex;-;Its one of the best games in steam!
Doc Lolz;-;great game
JOKER;-;If you don't have this your stupid
The Bread Master;-;Awesome shooter love the cartoon graphics and all the variety thta comes with this game! free to play as well i strongly recomend it
The Boss Stage;-;A great game. Don't belive me? Look at how many hours i have spent playing it.
ICraaZZyM4N;-;This is best game evar. I love this game<3
Wango Mango;-;Ruined my life with hats... 13/10 would ruin again.
in america now, pls wait;-;Hey, ma, look I'm Link! *Hookshots away*
48 Ginji;-;great fun. would recommend to anyone who loves fps games
Spoderman;-;this game is fun and awesome , play this game!! its free!
Kasper | Stooge;-;love this game!
ThemMajiks;-;OH MY GOD WHERE DO I START??? Well, let's just leave it at.... beats any call of duty or battlefield game. Its really really fun and I can bet you money that every single BarnBlitz game you play, you will not ee the same sandwich eating Heavy eapons Russian with a fedora or Scottish black guy holding up a beer! If you haven't already, you should pick up TeamFortress2! Thanks for reading and if ou found this review helpful, please let me know!
DerpsterDerps;-;The best FPS ive ever played
isaac;-;if you like being boss if you like running round and slaughtering everyone if you like finding your own stuff an customizing you? DO YOU LIKES HATS! THEN THIS IS TEH GAME FOR U MUN
Gray;-;Love this game
Wickersham leader;-;Team Fortress 2. Arguably the most popular FPS on the PC. This game is insanely fun, even after so many years of playing. Every class is still working as they should. (well, except the Demoman, but let's face it, Valve made every single one of his unlocks make you play him differently) The addition of the steam workshop compatibility makes all new possibilities come up. So, even 5 years after its initial release, Team Fortress 2 is a MUST HAVE FUN GAME, and since it's free now, there's no excuse.
LancerG2;-;You will play this religiously, and at time will make friends, my guideline? Don't be generous,  everyone around you and strive to the top, and most importantly, no matter how many people you have to backstab, your unusual is worth it.
FexxStream;-;this is the BEST free to play first person shooter, I HIGHLY reccomend this game
parmeen [CZ];-;I love it very much :-)
Roh;-;If you like a FPS that you can explode, burn, chop off heads or just fill some random body with bullets in a comical universe, Team Fortress II is a must play. If bored, you just sit, open this game and stay minutes or even hours and hours playing this.
Catholic Time Terrorist;-;No differance between high and low graphics settings and there are no new weapons because the devs suck. Dont waste your download space. UPDATE: My hate grows for Valve and their really  games UPDATE 2: Game is getting worse the really bad cartoony graphics dont change and the mechanics have gotten worse The Tide Turner is the most OP thing I have seen so far in my life and the beta maps look like they are alpha or before this game blows my
{ JSA };-;There are good moments and bad moments in this game. Killing someone and making them rage is a good moment. Getting killed by someone and raging is a bad moment. Also watch your wallet, Gaben is hungry
vIp(R2U);-;This game is so much fun and is really addicting! Try it out! Its probably the most fun you can have on Steam
Chimp;-;I'd give the keys to my house for some keys to a box
Fatbuddy;-;Fun in doses, but not for everyone. It can suck your finances a bit dry if you get too into it, so beware.
Greek Duncemaster;-;Your saying hats don't make you better. Words of a wise mann.
WHDG;-;Its fun I Like collecting Guns And i like the commuuntiy its polite and not dirty
DinkusMcSlush;-;This game is really fun i dont have lots of stuff and the trade is broke but other than that i can quickly join into my friends game without trouble! Just a great game all together
Dr Fondles.;-;My hours. help. I wrote something for real! These hours are legit, I played this game a lot in the past to avoid some tragic stuff in real life. I was young and didn't really have my gaming consoles anymore because of my brothers and I had a really bad pc, which i still own. TF2 was one of the games i could play pretty well on this pc but with horrid graphics, but it was one of the more fun games I installed. I met some real cool and nice people on this game as well as people who i plan to keep by my side. The community back then was more humble compared to nowadays. You have competitive gamers who spam their bind keys with unfunny/gross jokes and very obnoxious people who are either yelling at you or telling you to do specific things to win the game. When really, it doesn't even matter if you win or lose. However, you also have those people who are really awesome and you may meet some nice friends along the way! Although you never know what kinda person you're going to meet on this game. In my honest opinion, if you want to have a game to just waste time on (and money) or just mess around with people you know (which is what I do now), this is perfect. Esspecially the mann vs. machine co-op. I mainly play that now. Although to me, the game lost its touch, update wise, and I moved onto other games. I believe it's worth a shot to try it out but other than that, I'd keep it as a casual game. I don't think the competitive scene is worth getting into anymore because it's being flooded by crude people. Atleast from my experiance after over about 2+ years of playing it just got worse and worse. You will eventually be tied into drama even if you try to avoid it. You'll be more stressed than actually having fun, I'll tell you that! Although in all seriousness, this game is losing its touch and probably isn't worth making it your main game MAINLY because the updates they've been releasing are becoming very dull and not as great as they used to be. BUT, it's a great game to just play to pass the time and have fun! All you'll really notice nowdays is...people really love to trade more than actually play. Living off as a free to play would be very tough and you'd need to be patient with items you would want, unless you got that MONEY! Hope this helps. One last thing, I am not saying this game is bad in any way. I am saying that it's worth trying and playing with friends, or even meeting people! Although there are some downsides that you won't like, such as some stuff I pointed out above. Strictly towards the community. I personally think you should have this game as a side game rather than your come home to play sorta thing. Have it as a once in a while game, because it's nothing to be big about, unless you really do not like most of the millions of other games out there. Just give it a shot and see what you think! Have fun
Hunter - Drum Bangin Mum Banger;-;Without a doubt, The best online game avalible right now for many different reasons. 1. It is Updated all the time and The updates are usually big ones 2. The Amount of Weapons/ Hats/ etc..... That are avalible in the system 3. The Size of the Community 4. The game never gets repetitive 5. The Gameplay is Great for all Skill Levels 6. It's Free!!! So why not? Those are just some of the reasons that This is the best multiplayer game out right now, And i Bet you that you would find a whole lot more yourself. So Download this Free Game that will bring hundreds of hours of Fun!
TANEdos;-;It will always be fun to play this with friends! Wonderful game.
Munki #nopainnogain;-;Team Fortress 2 is the best game I EVER played. There are 3 points why you must download this epic piece of game: Free to play IT's a Free to Play game, so you don't have to pay to get it! Tf2 Competitive Tf2 Competitive is where some players come together to play against each other. The are different types of it (6v6, 9v9, 4v4, 2v2, 1v1) Extras Rocket jumping, Sticky jumping, Sentry jumping and airblasting are so much fun to do. For example there are maps which are extra made for jumping and dodgeball (a pyro gamemode). I don't want to tell you everything about it, just try it out by yourself! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- All in all i would rate this game 11/10 because I have 1000+ and i still love to play this game! (Yeah, it ruined my life >.<)
[War3]XHiubattoX;-;Install it, Play it, Love it ! This game is different than any other FPS which i'v seen. This game will never get boring.
Pann;-;Team Fortress 2? I believe you meant Hat Simulator.
stez;-;it's ok
Gremm;-;Best game i have ever played! If you havent played this game before go ahead but still DO NOT take it that seriosly! I mean you can try to get kills but seriosly the game is not meant to be taken seriosly... You know what i mean when you try it out by yourself! 1# Game ever!
Kurdt;-;Very interesting game, especially with friends. It never gets old and is updated frequently. +10
LUDYA;-;A very fun way to kill boredom and a fun way to kill your enemies. :D
BackStab;-;An awesome game with an awesome economy. A bit too adictive :D
TotalTurtleTime;-;It's a really really REALLY fun and adictive game, highly recommend it. 10/10 -_-
FaultyGaia;-;Tried it once, it was ok. 10/10
Ocean;-;Very Good, Very Cool, I like it
efroneon;-;Great RTS Game, fun for all levels of expertise, decent graphics and medium learning curve. Online play can be unforgiving if you dont know what your doing. 8.5/10
KW0131;-;10/10, best Hat Simulator.
Corax;-;Best hat simulator ever hats/10
TCT - The Fireball Disaster;-;this game is a lot of fun, it may be hard at first but once you get the hang of it you'll have the time of your life
Osiris Champion;-;This game is really fun & addicting
TheRealTiberiumWars;-;Played for 2,029 hours 3 weeks ago it stopped working stil not fixed 9.5/10 crashes would not fix again
Farouck;-;Probbaly Best Game :D
Garret Bobby Ferguson;-;Best game to play while listening to Skrillix. 11/10
The Lawyer;-;A really fun FPS game that kills time! It is a free to play game but you can also buy items in game, which will make you a premium player. Premium players get access to trading and a larger backpack that can hold more items. I really recommend checking it out, it is free :) !
Stock;-;Great game 8/8 would play again Tons of gud classes plz play
Aurora Cardinal;-;this is probs going to be a short review but i thing this game is worth playing if you put the time and efort into finding a server that you rather enjoy and are willing to put countlis hours on this game and just have fun with it im sure you'll like itand this is my point of view on the matter you may have your opinion but if you value mine but hate the game just give it time im sure it'll grow on you who knows?
Ike;-;If you have not already tried this game your crazy go get it now!
TG | BAN5HEE117;-;This game is amazing! It is so fun and will provide hours of enjoyment! It is a FPS that is not serious. You can play offline with bots, online with other people, or a campaign like story called Mann vs. Machine. While playing, you can unlock new pieces of equipment. There is so many items that it is overwhelming! You can choose between 9 classes. Scout, soilder, pyro, demo man, heavy, engineer, medic, sniper, and spy. You can play on different types of gamemodes and maps. There are also always new updates coming out. If you have steam and you don't have this game the GET IT!
General Chaos;-;One of the funnest team based FPS ever, and it's free. Why aren't you playing RIGHT NOW?!
iLikePie;-;Awsome Game
Jangkrik;-;Need good teamworks for this game
M.o.M.;-;One of the best games ever made !!!
Kakiri;-;Best fun you can get for free. Well, almost. ;)
Epic Cactus Llama;-;This is very good, i have over 500 hours of gameplay on this on alot of different accounts! If you dont like blowing people up with a rocket launcher or shooting exploding enemies with a grenade launcher, then you can try to run around like crazy and shoot enemies heads off with a scatter gun. If you are just like you wanna camp you can try headshotting enemies with the sniper or just be the engineer, who can build machines like a sentry that aims automatticly or shoot them, build dispensers so you you can heal your teammates, or build teleporters to get your teammates up to the line quickly!
Sterling Archer;-;This is the best FTP game i have ever played! There is so much to do, no need to buy anything with real money if you dont want to. Everything can be crafted! All 9 classes are awesome. I never feel that one of them is too OP because you can always counter them. Once you mastered one class there is always more! If you master Scout, you can then start to master some else class or just dont master anything and still have a good time wiht this game. PvP mode works like it should, nothing special, just 7 differend game modes and some beta gamemodes, lots of maps and everyone is fun to play. there is also an PvE mode called MvM. Its supper fun with firends and some of them are hard. To top it off, i like this game :)
LT.LongWang;-;This might be hard to believe, but this man is the leader of a group of lizards from the hyper elite. I know this first hand. I took care of this being as the mentor, as I am a hyper elite of the syntax-sector of the Illuminati. I have experimented with teleportation, Obama, and lizards shape-shifting into Secret-service agents. When the syntax-sector of the hyper elite barracks in the north pole, most experiments broke loose. This prototype, however, was smarter than most. With little to no signs of lizard-like structures when shape-shifted, he was the perfect man for our job. I once used my transformation powers, but was quickly spotted, and the extra-molecular shape-shifting superdinosaur came and saved me, with the hyperbeam harvested from Dialga in the Pokemon dimension. Yes, that show is real, made by the Ancient Gods from Sector-B//AnimationDimension//X-3, we transported the creatures into the "intelligent" planet called Earth, in my opinion, the weakest sector of the whole Illuminati. If you want more information about these creatures first hand, contact me via Google+ or teleportating to the hyperdimension in Class-A.
sadist lord;-;i ubercharged a soldier then he switched to equalizer 10/10
Rain Cloud;-;really fun and addictive game, you need teamwork skill and shooting skill. i would reccomend this game to anyone!
Mullokad;-;Why did i spent $100 bucks on virtual keys.
Tiger killer;-;The best F2P game play
Square Mom;-;its okay I guess
x1xjack;-;I would say a really good game would recommend :D
Darki;-;This game is pretty awesome if you like action games / fun games. Get weapons, craft and many other things! Just awesome!
Nor-Thug;-;This is awsome. All i have to say.
Lenroid;-;Very fun game, can lose a lot of time and money though. Well at least I have my Gibus.
Private Ryan;-;A greate game to play with friends that never gets old.(the game, not your friends) With endless updates and patches, you'll never run out of wepons and hats to play with!
ChrisTNT;-;this game is so much fun you will love it will make you smile get it :)
Spanky;-;Hours and hours of fun, the best thing is... WE"RE DO I START. 9 classes each with their different abillaties, and stunning maps and scenery. Great to play with friend's or with random online players. Possibly one of the greatest games yet! 10/10!
Sir.Hom :3;-;Best game evah, It changed my life XD
Zedonius;-;Team-Fortress 2...How am I supposed to say it?Oh I know.IT'S THE BEST FPS EVER!Well,tf2 is a really nice and popular game which will blow your mind.You have 9 different choices of weird characters,from the fast scout to the giant heavy weapons guy.My personal favorite game....and since it's free,you can have one of the best fps you can play for free!TF2 is also a game that will let you make your own server in which you will be capable to do anything you want.I highly recommend tf2 to those who:Want to play a game which will make them laugh and will have enjoyable combat at the same time.Also if you are good a programming and you want a game which will allow your ideas to leave your mind and join the internet,here it is!
KennardGamer 02;-;This is a pretty good game, its free. If it lags, dont blame the game, blame ur laptop doesnt have enough memory
[iN] wb98;-;A great team based F2P FPS with a breathing economy based off of virtual hats.
Ben Ulrand;-;This is a great hat simulator. With billions of hats to choose from u will never run out of possibility's. Having nine dress up dolls and so many combinations this will make u feel like ur actually wearing these hats. Theres also a shooting mini game but its very small and has barley any effort in it.
Sir.FuZZyngtsson[];-;The best Multiplayer out there since 2007 and now thats its FREE,Well you can't miss it buddy... 9/10 solid for me
FG4_Monster;-;this game is an amazing fps with taunts and really cool maps
Memento;-;Though TF2 has fame beyond many shooters, I still would give it a little praise here in this little review. Now you have to know that I am not a first person shooter type of gamer. Outside of TF2 my only other experiences are Wolfenstein 3D and Unreal Tournament, which I never even played multiplayer. However, TF2 has become my most played game ever, eating over 3000 hrs. of my life. It may be a bit on the downhill for me now, but it was a solid pick during my PhD. The game's cartoonesque style and class based system make it so that even non-veterans can jump in and have enjoyment. I even managed to climb up the ranks a bit in competitive. What if you don't like to fight other people and just want to have some fun with friends? Jump into the game mode Man vs. Machine to have a unique 'tower defense' - like game. In short it has many different skill level and playstyle type of game modes to entertain a wide variety of players. Besides, it is free to play and if you do not pay you get nearly the full game. What you get extra if you pay - even just a nickel is enough to get upgraded to 'premium' status - are nice extra's like trading. This is not necessary to play, however, and rarely are the first weapons you receive (or 'stock' weapons) downright outclassed by others - others weapons tend to have their own niches. Furthermore the community in general is friendly, so why don't you give it a try?
Laggy;-;10/10 would play
Nibbles;-;Most addicting game I have ever played
"Animating" moonman221998;-;grass grows, birds fly, sun shines, and brother i will dominate you and i ain't even wearing a hat. tf2 is an awesome game why? hat's weapons and misc items that make a call of duty fps look stale. the gameplay is different then call of duty and will take time to get used to but man i have never seen a black scottishs cyclops flying through the air like a bird or a sentry that can not be destroyed. a man who is your worst nightmare who can't be detected by your team and a sniper who will one hit kill you if your not lucky. i like it atleast i ain't being kicked off a server for being new to a game i bought with my money. who the hell cares if it's cartoony or has a stupid concept. it's pure stupid genius it's origns story is funny as can be and who can't resist blasting them robots away with and uber charge? 9/10 because it's training program is too short for new players who deserve to know how to play all classes not four and there are scamers out there so remember it's steamcommunity not staemcommuity or anything like that so i wish you good luck and keep an eye out for spys, engies, scouts, snipers, medics, heavys, pyros, soldiers, demos, and spys, haaaaavvve fun!
Clement Attlee;-;Used to play this a lot back in the day. Recently played it again. It's good to see that all the new aesthetics haven't ruined the orginal art style in any considerable way. It's actually very tasteful in a Quorn kind of way. Churchill asked me to play this again, and I was all like " no, that ing game is ing insulting to the  senses. ing community content? I'd ing rather pay actual ing concept artists so that  would look good." That was of course when I used to drink, but I've cut back now. Poor Bevan. He will never be not Welsh again.
AlmondSlushie;-;A free to play game that isn't pay to win. Team Fortress 2 gives you 9 classes: Scout: Runs very fast, double jumps, mainly uses shotguns Solider: Slower, uses rocket launchers to fight and to get around Pyro: Class with barely any range but deadly up close using flame throwers and such Demoman: Uses explosive launchers and can be made into a demoknight Heavy: Very slow but quite strong Engineer: Weak alone but can build helpful things like sentries and teleporters Medic: Challenging to use in combat at first but also heals teammates Sniper: This one is pretty obvious... Spy: Disguise as enemies, go invisible, stab people in the back and sneak away All are diverse and helpful to have a combination of on a team. Each class starts with default weapons and items, but over time you may find things throughout your endevors, or maybe if you have the time and items, craft things. You could also go off and buy items (none of which make you stronger) or even trade with other people. The gameplay is fun and takes some skill that you will develop quickly with some time put into the game. The community is very active in trade and marketing. This is one of the least money grubbing f2ps because of the fact that: Weapons you buy are balanced and not op, meaning a f2p and premium player both can be slaughtered by eachother just as easy. The other items are things like cosmetics (hats, accessories) and keys to open random crates you may find that provide you with random weapons and cosmetics. All updates are free and you can get every bit out of this game without spending money. Not to mention, valve puts alot of time into sending out updates for new items, maps, etc, all these updates free. So what more can I say? Great game, good company, active community, NOT PAY TO WIN! It's free so go ahead and try it.
Granberia;-;Like Skyrim with hats
Severus;-;WOW. This game impressed as soon as I "hit play". It has timeless cartoon-ish graphics that fall right in the boundary line between too animated and too realistic. It has a wide variety of characters, and a lot of items to find, so there will always be a reason to keep playing! Most of the characters are easy to play, but hard to master, so it wont be too difficult to switch characters and play as that one. I reccomend this game to anyone 10 and up. You can turn of the blood, and as long as a kid understands that it's not ok to do any of this in real life, and to keep a positive attitude, he/she should be find. See you in Pyroland!
MARK BOSS :D;-;hdfbgiuaysgfiaysfhgusaiirgby ok thats good
DayDreamN;-;very fun game, i enjoy this game and it is pretty cool yeah.
Saito Hiraga;-;It's definitely a fun game that's worth playing for longer than a day. It's free-to-play, so there's no real downside to trying it out. I'm surprised at how well it plays on my PC, and my PC is pretty crappy. It runs Google slower than TF2, which is pretty sad, actually. Just shoot anything that moves, and you should be fine. Also, don't eat the bread.
ProffeeTroll;-;It's a game.
ACE;-;This is my favorite game ever made! I will play this without stopping 24/7! I think everone should play this game.
Scheie #Love Wins;-;reallly fun game to just sit around and have fun or to even play seriously. one of my favorites!
MrCake713;-;love it. good for all ages
Midnite;-;A really good First person shooter game and has 9 classes for you to choose from! There is a: Scout, Soldier, Pyro, Demoman, Heavy, Enginear, Medic, Sniper, and Spy! Best of all I think... ITS FREE!!!
Hank Hill the Mpuse;-;Best point and click adventure game i have seen.
Kaze #HOLIDAY;-;free game with expensive hat (   )
TheBushTickler;-;For all you people who love hats... this is the game for you.
Chappy :3;-;(   ) m8 play this game
FALCON LORD xxXxXxx;-;best game ever 10\10 360 no scop
Zalent;-;Hats, accesories, robots, killing things and much much more! What else could you want? Wait more hats? you got it!
CrazyGamerDK;-;It's the BEST Game and it will be forever Please Dont Ever Change any of the weapon's Thanks Love The: End of The Line update, and the EPIC Costomic's :) This Game is VERY VERY Fun !!!
ine0dre;-;One of my favorite games
Samski | TF2Pickup.net;-;Brilliant game and cannot get enough of it if only they implemented competitive within the game this game would explode onto the comp community alongside CS:GO
Thundermastadon;-;All that I can say is, this is the only game I play now, it keeps me wanting to come back and play it everyday. Plus for some strange reason I am now addicted to hats.
KillingTheButterfly;-;This first person shooter is unique to all others, it has a cartoony look and feel which is the core to how this game works. The weapon designs are all unique and humorous and the maps are excellent to play in.
BattleClam;-;Just doing this for badge Its good
Soldier No. 3847;-;This game is amazing. It is the best FPS that I have played in all my gaming years 5 Stars: ***** This game is for those FPS players who just want some hilarious gameplay. This game has many easter eggs and has may in game rewards. You should all go out and play this funny and wierd game, full of crap from another universe
Rovert;-;A unique FPS game that I actually enjoy playing. The classes are very different, the game is balanced, getting updated often, and has a great art style and humor.
Toroi;-;My hours. help. I wrote something for real! These hours are legit, I played this game a lot in the past to avoid some tragic stuff in real life. I was young and didn't really have my gaming consoles anymore because of my brothers and I had a really bad pc, which i still own. TF2 was one of the games i could play pretty well on this pc but with horrid graphics, but it was one of the more fun games I installed. I met some real cool and nice people on this game as well as people who i plan to keep by my side. The community back then was more humble compared to nowadays. You have competitive gamers who spam their bind keys with unfunny/gross jokes and very obnoxious people who are either yelling at you or telling you to do specific things to win the game. When really, it doesn't even matter if you win or lose. However, you also have those people who are really awesome and you may meet some nice friends along the way! Although you never know what kinda person you're going to meet on this game. In my honest opinion, if you want to have a game to just waste time on (and money) or just mess around with people you know (which is what I do now), this is perfect. Esspecially the mann vs. machine co-op. I mainly play that now. Although to me, the game lost its touch, update wise, and I moved onto other games. I believe it's worth a shot to try it out but other than that, I'd keep it as a casual game. I don't think the competitive scene is worth getting into anymore because it's being flooded by crude people. Atleast from my experiance after over about 4+ years of playing it just got worse and worse. You will eventually be tied into drama even if you try to avoid it. You'll be more stressed than actually having fun, I'll tell you that! Although in all seriousness, this game is losing its touch and probably isn't worth making it your main game MAINLY because the updates they've been releasing are becoming very dull and not as great as they used to be. BUT, it's a great game to just play to pass the time and have fun! All you'll really notice nowdays is...people really love to trade more than actually play. Living off as a free to play would be very tough and you'd need to be patient with items you would want, unless you got that MONEY! Hope this helps. One last thing, I am not saying this game is bad in any way. I am saying that it's worth trying and playing with friends, or even meeting people! Although there are some downsides that you won't like, such as some stuff I pointed out above. Strictly towards the community. I personally think you should have this game as a side game rather than your come home to play sorta thing. Have it as a once in a while game, because it's nothing to be big about, unless you really do not like most of the millions of other games out there. Just give it a shot and see what you think! Have fun <3
Vale;-;Can you name any other unmodded First Person Shooter that lets you play as a cocky and fast Bostonian that can slap the hell out of urine throwing Australian campers with a fresh atlantic fish wrapped in fine christmas lights, eat a bucket of fried proccessed poultry over their corpses, and then get hit with an exploding cannonball launched from an African-Celtic one eyed alcoholic who can leap yards into the air from his own explosives while weilding a mystic ancient talking ghost claymore? I thought so.
A bLuE cOw;-;If you bind forward to a button on your mouse, you can play pyro and eat at the same time
UnfunnyName;-;The vicious cycle of Team fortress 2 First when you'll arrive in the game, you'll want Weapons, tons of them. Then you'll see that everyone has hats, and you'll want these, a tons of them. Then you'll realize that hats doesn't matter, only skill count, so you'll want a lot of skills, tons of them. Then new weapons will be added, and you'll want them, all of them. Then a new hat will be added and you'll want it, cause it'll be fancy on your main class. Then you'll realize again, that you don't give a damn about hats, all is about is skill. Then when you have waited for 3 years, new weapons will be added, and you'll want them. And then you realize that you spent like 2000 hours of your life for this, met great friends, and you'll have a server where's you feeling like home, and you discovered so much things via the community, it learnt you so much. Then the rude reality of life, bring you on earth, and this game is here, Waiting for you to play 1,2,3... hours, and you'll be happy to see that all your good friend are still here.
[CotC] King Conga Gandhi;-;Oh, and if you're wondering, the new update, Gun Mettle, did NOT ruin TF2 for me. I actually find it a LOT more fun now! I think Jerma summed up this game pretty nicely... "Maybe you got like two Pyros that just installed the game ten minutes ago. They don't have any hats, they're spraying  and they're having a blast. They might even be at the wrong point. They might be going backwards to the point that's already been capped. On the same team, there's a Scout with a Hale's Own Scattergun. He's got 18 kills with a 17 killstreak, he just got 18. He's going 'I just got 18, sick!' He runs up the stairs, he's trying his  off. He's get *beeping noises* dodging the 'Oh, the sentry almost got me!' He looks up to his left when he gets up the stairs on Gorge and there's two sandwich Heavies having a ing picnic. So he stops for a second and goes, 'Two... nnnggh!' so he walks forward and gets blown up by a soldier's rocket next door... ...The two sandwich Heavies then decide to move their picnic. There's ants. 'There's ants here, honey. I wanna get out of here.' So they get up, they pack their sandwiches, pack up their lunches, and their breakfast, and whatever the  they're eating. They get up and walk toward the door to go to RED because they think, 'That spot near the A point for RED is pretty good.' They walk out the door, and they see four Level 3 Sentry Guns pointing at them. They get shot a million times and blow up, and there's like nine Engineers swinging their wrenches in random directions. The BLU Scout, at this point, respawns, and walks by the at least 3-4 statues because we all know there's four people AFK when you play this game, you go by the museum of people standing still. He walks out the door and readies his weapon, he's ready, 'I'm going to get another 20 killstreak, just you watch Gaben, I'm going to praise Gaben!' And he goes forward and starts shooting, and he gets backstabbed by a Spy that has been sitting with the Cloak and Dagger in the corner for at least the last 68 seconds." Normally when I do reviews, I turn into a critic and start to examine that game, pointing out every little flaw and pro and determining a final score. However, Team Fortress 2 (or TF2 for short) helped me make so many memories that if I actually tried to make a fair review on it, it would still be way too biased to consider a valid review. Team Fortress 2, is, obviously, an amazing game. The teamplay is necessary and going out and attacking solo may be difficult. You need teammates in order to survive and win. The graphics are unique to a shooter game and really makes it a special game. I'm not here to explain the gameplay or graphics or whatnot. I love this game because of its charm. The game has such a unique and diverse cast of characters, you can't help to love all of them at some point. Scout is cocky and overconfident. Spy, another one of the characters in the game, is technically Scout's father. Soldier is a crazed WWII American patriot. He never actually joined the Army, but instead, he had his own personal Nazi killing spree. His roommate was a magician named Merasmus, who grew to hate Soldier. Pyro is mysterious, but portrays the world as one big happy paradise, known as Pyroland. Demoman is a Scottish alcoholic who, due to Merasmus, lost his eye that is now haunted. Heavy, although he appears to be dim-witted, is actually very intelligent and looks over three sisters. Engineer is very intelligent as well, and his grandfather was a major contributor to keeping the war with RED and BLU continue. Medic isn't fond of normal forms of medicine, but is still an important member nonetheless. Sniper is from New Zealand, but was raised in Australia. He prefers working from a distance and his backstory is very similar to Superman's. Spy is the master of disguise, and is technically Scout's father, as said before. Of all the characters, he appears to be the most "mature" and appears to be the ringleader at many times. Not only that, but the game has an interesting story. I would not like to get too detailed with it. However, it makes little to no sense but is still funny, engaging, and gives TF2 much more depth. There is also a storyline that takes place a few years later where Mann Co. is being attacked, so the mercenaries have to defend it, called Mann vs. Machine. This game mode ties in with the TF comics, which explain many characters' backstories and is currently still in the works as of this review. The other comics (all of which can be found on TF2's official website) are all funny and charming in their own way as well. The community has been quite debatable on how nice it is at many times, but in the end, it's still an overall great community. I've seen people give out stuff, others mentor some of the newbs (something I do as well) along with much, much more. Yes. the game is considered a "pay-to-win game" but it isn't necessarily a pay-to-win game. With lots of patience, you will get what you want from the game, whether it be hats, weapons, or whatever it is you want. The game has a learning curve that isn't too steep, but become dedicated and you'll fall in love with it. No matter how many times you rage to a W+M1 pyro that destroyed your 16 killstreak, or cheer when you unbox an Unusual, or maybe discover a few friends or learn a few things, Team Fortress 2 has been a huge part of my PC gaming life and without it, I would be as bored as hell. I cannot recommend this game enough, and I hope that many more memories are made on here. Valve may be cash cows, but you can't help but admit they are amazing when it comes to making games. Portal, Half-Life 2, Counter-Strike, but this game stands out from the rest to me. Do I recommend this game? Yes, yes, yes, YES.
Nerd House;-;Team Fortress 2. Being ranked as the third most-played game [steamcharts.com] on Steam, Team Fortress 2 is probably one of the best free-to-play games we've got. Why is it so popular? Let's take a look, shall we? First off, the obvious: It's free. 100% free. This means its accessible to everyone on Steam. This is just the icing on the cake though. What really shines about TF2 is the game itself. Team Fortress 2 usually consists of two teams (Red and Blue) going head to head against each other. Sometimes fulfilling certain objectives or just downright killing each other. There are many, many maps and modes, such as Payload, Capture Points, and Mann VS Machine. But the general idea no matter the map or mode is to KILL EVERYTHING THAT MOVES! And my god, is it fun to do so. The game has 9 playable mercenaries, each actually being a certain "class". Each class is divided into 3 different roles: Offense, Defense, and Support. Let's go over each role and class. Offensive roles specialize in dealing damage to the opposing team. These are your main attack force. Scouts are the speedy hit and run class, with the ability to double or even triple jump depending on equipped items. Soldiers pack a bit more firepower with their rocket launchers, which gives them not only power, but mobility due to the ability known as "rocket jumping". The Pyro is great at setting the opposition on fire, as well as extinguishing burning teammates using an airblast. Defensive roles serve to inhibit enemy access and to hold enemies back from vital points on the map. Overall, the defensive group has the most firepower of all the groups. Demomen can safeguard areas with stickybombs that they can detonate when enemies come by. Heavies are great for mowing down incoming troops and pushing back forces. Heavies can also keep enemies in an area while whittling their health for teammates to finish off. Engineers can build Sentry Guns for effective area defense, as well as build Teleporters and Dispensers for logistical support of the team. Support classes cannot hold the fight on their own, but their specialized abilities can tip the balance in their team's favor. They offer the offensive and defensive classes an extra edge in battle and can help turn the tide of the game. Whether crippling the enemy advance from behind or keeping teammates healed, the support classes are always handy to have around. Medics are the team healers, capable of providing numerous buffs depending on their equipments. Spies are great for sneak attacks or eiliminating key threats. Snipers excel at long range, also eliminating key threats, as well as extinguishing burning teammates with jarate and providing a damage boost to teammates. Next, let's look at the presentation. TF2 has a very unqiue art style. It's somewhat cartoonish, but very appealing. It's simple, and un-complex. But it doesn't need to be complex. It's simplicity is it's strength. Everything is detailed enough to where you can easily tell whats going on, what a specific model or item is, and they all stand out. The soundtrack is also very appealing and catchy, especially the main theme. I personally have it as a ringtone/alarm tone on my smartphone! :) One of the best aspects of TF2 is the Steam Workshop. Users can submit designs for items and weapons, and possibly have them added to the game! A very lucrative sub-market has also emerged from this game in the form of the Crate Keys. That's a whole different ballgame in and of itself, so we won't get into it here. During normal gameplay on most servers, you can obtain random items, weapons, and sometimes crates, and taunts....through the item drops system. You can only receive so many drops per week, and you will get them randomly as you play. You can use these items and weapons to customise your mercenary's loadout, or you can use them to craft other items, hats, and weapons. You can take multiples of items and craft them into Scrap, then Reclaimed Metal, then Refined Metal. You can then use these metals to craft specific class weapons/items, among other things. The crafting system is simple yet robust, with lots of possiblities. Some of it is very luck based. You can take some very common items and end up crafting a super rare hat or gun worth a lot of moolah on the Steam Market! All-in-all, Team Fortress 2 is just a very fun game. Endless entertainment awaits when you start up this game, especially if you play with friends on your favorite server. Probably the best free-to-play game on Steam. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=383235670 Highly Recommended Be sure to check out Nerd House Gaming for more reviews!
Mr Squiggles;-;How to play Team Fortress 2: Be polite, Be efficient, Have a pan to kill everyone you meet.
pacsomepuppes;-;> I was only 10 years old. > I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. > I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. > Then I got my first hat, The gibus. > Suddenly everything changed. > I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' > I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. > I had so many hats, I loved them all. > But then someone traded me, I accepted. > They offered an Unusual for all my hats. > It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. > But no Unusual, He scammed me. > I lost it all. > I was so sad I cried for hours. > Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. > I went to bed after praying. > I felt warm. > I looked behind me, It was Gaben! > He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning Team Captain. > Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning Team Captain and I was naked. > I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. > Hats are love. Hats are life. TF2: 11/10 Best hat simulator 1981 Overall, I'd give this game 9 out of 10 Gabe Narwalls Shoutout to ObsidianObelisk17 for making a youtube vid of this Showout to TheDisableBore for making a comic of this I cringe re reading this :smug:
Flexi;-;Ruined my life and cost me over 500. 10/10 would recommend to friends and family
Special;-;Team Fortress 2 is the most realistic hat simulator created to date. There is absolutely no other simulator quite like this one. The first time you start the simulator, you join a server where you can play a minigame where you show off your hats and items. If you kill a person three times in a row in the minigame, you get your very first hat: the Gibus. This is where it really starts; To play the simulator correctly, you have to spend money in the market place, made by Valve. After that, while you play the minigame, you can find hats which you can trade for, or collect! There is many other people who wants to collect and trade hats, just like you! After you collect enough items and/or hats, try joining a trade server! There, the REAL fun begins! Good luck, and beware of ending up poor!
Jony-;-;PRO: + Well-balanced classes and maps + Team dynamic can yield immensely satisfying moments + Appealing visual aesthetic + Extremely facilitated gameplay and HUD system + Newbie friendly + Funny and humourous elements are added in the game + Very stable and only presents a few minor glitches + High detailed world and models + Reward system is present to evaluate the progress + Looks and plays great + 500 Achievements + Valve Anti-Cheat + Free to play + Items Trade CONTRA: - Heavy reliance on other players can make or break the experience - Strategic depth can be daunting - Price pushes boundaries of reasonability - Respawn times of twenty seconds or more can feel like an eternity CONCLUSION: This game makes me laugh even when Im losing... an impressive...
KEN KENEKI;-;Awesome and addicting game. Also very funny and free!
-=TsC=- Steve37867;-;Team Fortress 2 is a very good and balanced game (for me, I don't know what other people think). You can play it alone or with friends (like building a group of players). There are many different modes to play: Capture the Flag, Paylord, Paylordrace, Capture Points, Man vs Machine and other Costume modes..... There are also 9 Classes you can Choose: 1# Scout :Fast and you can't Aim them?(but he has 125 Hp) This are Scouts.... 2# Soldier :Tanky and got a Rocket launcher, but he is pretty slow 3# Pyro :Flamethrower+Shotgun+Axe= PURE DEATH (He makes a high Damage) 4# Demoman :Bombs? Yes, Bombs, many Bombs, WAIT TO MUCH BOMBS! (for people who love Explosions :D) 5# Heavy :VERY TANKY (300hp) and he got a MINIGUN (more i wont say....) 6# Engineer :My favourite class! He can build Buildings like: Sentrys , Dispensers , Teleporters (for Tactical people) 7# Medic :MEDIC! I AM DIEING! A sec. later a Med appears and saves your live! (medics are wonderful) 8# Sniper :See your teammates dieing? Dont know why they are dieing? Sniping is a good job my friend..... 9# Spy :Whats this strange sound? *hears a scream* WHY IS HE DEAD??? (#Got backstabbed) Sneaky Spys.... (excactly what i'm thinking of this classes... xD) Don't hate im not English, im just Austrian.
Monstercat;-;Now, to start off, this game is a dress up simulator and what not, But its still a great game dont get me wrong, it keeps you playing by rewarding you with new weapons and hats ( which we all love) which we use to craft scrap, reclaimed, refined, etc. God, I can go on forever talking about this game, but i'll let you go play yourself because its FREE!
Saborio;-;havent played it that much, but from what i've tried it seems ok.
Sirpenguin11;-;whole team did the conga until an enemy pyro burnt us all 10/10 would conga again
Snoopaloo;-;Hats. Enough said.
prysm;-;The most fun I've ever had in an FPS. When a game's only downside is that it can be addictive, you know you're working with a gem.
I'll be ur oni-chan;-;LOST MY HEARING TO SCREAMING CHILDREN SCREAMING OVER BEING SCAMMED 10/10 would defiently play again and recommend to all - Westbro Baptist Church
Master_G;-;Fun game,has two aspects,playing the game normally and trading,both are fun to try,recommended
Garrus;-;This game is a must! And its free, why would you even wiat to play it?
Knugen;-;It's a great f2p shooter if not even one of the best one out there. There's a great weapon balance and isn't a pay to win game at all like most of the f2p games. You could call this game Hat fortress 2. 10/10 Like CoD but with hats - IGN
josp;-;I got beat to death by an american with a fish while playing as a fat russia holding a sandwich. 10/10
The Molesting Panda_;-;How much did you say you were gonna pay me? lodsemone/10
[] Ardemicr;-;Probably your best first experience in a shooter, but after playing a lot, you can see it is lacking a lot, and the major things you can notice is : non serious players, bad teammates and then some "good" teammates who can get the kills but are only fragging. I give you an advice : after you reach 1000 hours, quit the game.
Zero;-;Game summed up in one statement: "Fisher Price's My First Stock Exchange"
Moskau;-;I punched a little boy with my mittens and he started to laugh I just left him and my team killed him 9/11 A game I'd never forget
BackStab;-;An awesome game with an awesome economy. A bit too adictive :D
TotalTurtleTime;-;It's a really really REALLY fun and adictive game, highly recommend it. 10/10 -_-
FaultyGaia;-;Tried it once, it was ok. 10/10
efroneon;-;Great RTS Game, fun for all levels of expertise, decent graphics and medium learning curve. Online play can be unforgiving if you dont know what your doing. 8.5/10
DeltaSlugPunch;-;I recommend people to play this game if you are a meatball
TinyTiger;-;Its an awesome game that you can just mess around in. Its just fun not very realistic but fun to mess around and have fun with your firends!
cookierino;-;Wasted 1200+ hours of my life! Free money!
Teh British Bandit [M.A.T.E];-;love the game, played 374 hours still not bored of it. I admit it is a bit of a pay to win but the general gameplay and encounters is fun and the characters are comical and witty. The taunts are a good idea and the ridiculus weapons are so much fun like the huntsman and rocket jumper. I can list alot more. Generally a great free to play game. Well done Valve
Boabashir;-;Amazing and fun game!
AngelicDemon;-;Team Fortress 2 is a fast-paced game.From characters as fast as scout to characters as slow as heavy.Although some people might argue,I personally feel that scout is not the fastest. As a soldier,rocket jumping proves to be a good mean of reaching to the front line.A great item to have as a soldier when rocket jumping is the 'Gunboats'.The gunboats is a pair of AMAZING item.It provides lots of mobility.Next we're going to look at the classes. 1. Scout=Fast,good mean of damage with the scattergun,flying guillotine+sandman can take down a heavy fast 2.Soldier=Slow at moving,fast at rocket jumping,highest mean of damage with stock rocket launcher,gunboats for mobility and market gardener/escape plan 3.Pyro=Normal speed,reflecting rockets is the way to play pyro properly i feel and using the flare and axtinguisher gives you lots of damage output. 4.Demoman=Slower by normal speed by a bit,Pipes and stickybomb launcher is a really good mean of taking down sentry nests.You can have lots of fun by being a troll demoman by having the boots,tide turner or sticky jumper(depending of map) and the ullapool caber.The fun factor is high. 5.Heavy=Slowest class,Good mean of damage and very effective at attacking sentries. 6.Engineer=Normal speed,widowmaker teaches you how to aim your shotgun as missing takes out your ammo,pistol for secondary as its your seond long range weapon.Gunslinger as its annoying and fun to use. 7. Medic=Faster than normal by a bit,blutsauger,kritzkrieg for the healing taunt and uber saw to build uber for team. 8.Sniper=Normal speed,challenging but fun,sniper is an effective class to deal with heavies. 9.Spy=Normal speed.Last but not least,we have the SPY.An effective class against sentry nests,heavies and medics,the spy is a very sly class,able to take out sentry nests with the sapper,taking out heavy and medic combos is a huge up side. Overall tf2 is a fun game to play .
Rainbow Dash;-;Ive played this game for quite some time and had much fun in this game, it is quite original and a unique gem in the line of video games out there. For instance, I was walking around in Dustbowl and encountered an enemy pyro. Then astonishingly, he croutched down, pulled out an axe, and called me a "spy" in friendliness. I did the same except with a shovel. Being a new Tf2 player and never seeing this behavior before, I scrounged the voice command list for "spy". Upon completing my feat of seeking the correct word, we walked toward eachother slowly, legs crouched, and stared at eachother, spamming "spy". We did this for a few moments until one of my team mates (soldier) came waddling himself down towards me and the pyro. He stared at us both in confusion, the little ghost dangling off his gibus in the fresh dusty air, and shot a rocket at the pyro, sending his body flying many yards away. Upon seeing my first Tf2 ragdoll, I burst into tears crying with laughter as the pyro's body fell through the air and made the "squish" splat noise. Such a sight is unheard of in any other game and is quite common in this game. I am not a Tf2 fanboy, as I have grown up playing games like the Halo series my whole life since before I was 5, and playing CoD for a few years. I can easily say Halo is a very fun game, but that is another story. You will never find another experience like the ones you find in Tf2 nearly all the time every day, there is much laughter to have and enjoy in this game. 10/10 Is gud stuff. -Heavy
The Real Guy, The Best Guy;-;Great, fun exciting game, where you have a variety of classes you can try from! Geat game overall and with friends!
Hades;-;It is fun and if it gets boring u have more ways to play so this game is really cool for filling your time.
Rocky;-;Its really fun game, one of the best multiplayer game. specially when playing with your friends. If you like FPS or team games, you should give it a shot for sure.
Zwockl;-;Review a Game to earn: "Pillar of Community" 10/10 would r8 again.
[DGN] Lucario :D Buying Skins :D;-;its the best game ever made
Ibuki;-;7.8/10 too much hats - ign
xTcR | Keettu [TF-M];-;Fun, cartoony, and stylish. This game will leave you comming back for more!
TheJollyCabbage;-;This game stole my life. I can't go a day without playing for less than 5 hours. Great pvp, great maps, great hats! 10/10
batmole;-;10/10. It's ok- IGN
The Torpian;-;best hat simulator on steam
Spencer_The_Whale;-;A very good game. You should get it.
:c;-;Many contents in this fun, slow/medium/face action paced. Very well made. Time to make one of this game but call it Conga Candy.
hype-train;-;downloaded steam got TF2 for free first kill agains a gibus player i got a gibus soon a party hat i became premium got the mann co hat soon got my first genuine hat soon it goes down it will all go down because in the end gaben is watching out the window in your monitor in you soul gaben wont count to three so he will make you count 1000000000/10 because I DUNNO HATS OR SOMTHING
P3WT;-;I like this game because the community is awesome, they always bring funny things into the game, whether it is workshop or just better gameplay experiance.
CaughtNappin;-;There's not a better Multiplayer game out there. This game is freakin' amazing. There isn't a person in the world that I would not recommend it too. The game gets frequent updates and is just filled to the brim with content. The gameplay is fun and fair (for the most part) Every class has a distinctive personality they makes them all unique to each other, which adds another layer to the game. If you're looking for endless hours of multiplayer AND FOR FREE, this truly is the game for you.
Hiro;-;It's free and amazing
stop kicking me you infamy dicks;-;Best Hat simulator 2014. Nuff said.
THE POOTS;-;Pros: + Lots of hats + Maybe the best online FPS that exists for PC Cons - Could be more hats - Total sausage fest
[CRO]Blade;-;One of the very few Free to Play games worth installing! 11/10
What's Your Vector, Victor?;-;Brotha Strika was on! Folks was friekin, tite me? Translation: this game is really nice
SlyMonkeyKing;-;Team fortress 2 has quickly grown to one of my faverite games faster than any other game, besides Red Dead Redemption XD. I simply love and sometimes hate this game. This Multiplayer/Co-oprative game is extremly fun with the friends and many more to be made! My friends and I are simply in love with this game as it can be very interesting/Extremly fun to play. TF2's comunity is very dedicated and has been here for 7 to 8 years. The comunity always is alive and is no matter what gonna be here. Untill Valve learns to count to 3 I mean (TF2, Portal 2, Half life 2, Left for dead 2...) ! So I Really Recommend This game to everyone and anyone in general!
Monkey D. Luffy;-;Like skyrim with hats!
Alexdhabi;-;Hats... Nothing more to say...
Chub;-;W + M1 = Quality entertainment
Gideowl;-;This game has some kind of magical power to convert all my money into hats and miscs 11/10 -- Would get poor again
Frank Sinatra;-;Greatest Game Lots Of action and thrillif u dont play this game go get urself a life and come back.
Don't Call Me Bertlu;-;i hust did this for the badge
$uokukko;-;This game is great. After getting a premium account.
BloodySpy [];-;Really Fun If U Played other Fps Game u will have experience
Gepsu;-;Great game!
{RP9} Pootis boot;-;Good game to play but there will be annoying people on there
MaskedMann;-;team fortress 2 is a very good game but some times can get a bet laggy.all the class are wellbalenced and all the different weapons adds vaiarity to the game.its free (for the most part)so theres no reason not to own this
Lloyd The trader;-;Its An Verry Awesome Game I Recome it for everbody :D
CharlieTheUniquorn;-;Action packed, crazy cartoon fun! I would reccomend this game to anyone looking for comedy, guns and gore! The community is great. The weapons are great. The hats are halarious! 7/10
Pttersson;-;Hats, Hats and even more HATS! a very good and enjoyable free to play game
sharkk;-;i love this game always making me happy when i am bored and helps me level up on steam with the amount of trading cards
Squid MBM;-;This game is a massive online multiplayer experience i will never forget. this war basded, hat simulater is what made me a pc gamer. its free to play, people get the game!!!!
Dr. Dane;-;Super fun game with good fun gameplay and friendly players. kinda like a comic style first person shooter game...and just a little bit insane XD
IInventedPotatoSalad;-;This sux I just need this 4 badge elelell
Vacumator5000 |CG|;-;This is a great game, I like it a lot.
Warez;-;Funsies, also known a virtual cocaine, I love it
Azerth;-;Its Very Funny Game
DeathWing;-;This is an Awesome game! Heres why- -First it's Free -It is the only place to legally make kids cry(unless you count Black ops 2) -Hats -More Hats -Classes -And MOAR Hats!!!!!!
Zectorn;-;a good f2p game. i wish i had bought the game
mean mom;-;id say its pretty ok, and pretty easy to accidentally leave on personally i like the demoman and i think hes a pretty alright dude
Mr 3D;-;this is the best hat simulator on steam and the FPS mini game is fun 2 10/10
AwkwardSquid;-;Ah TF2, what can I really say? It's un-calm atmosphere, variety of characters, and it's crazy references.I really like the spy class and I get better at it every day. One of the only things I truly dislike about this game, is the Mann Co. Prices. Its like 7$ for a hat. A HAT! But overall the gameplay, music, weapons, is great. 9/10 game.
[FaZe] iiMeow;-;Even though it has glitches.. It's still a very fun game with different gamemodes too. Like Prop Hunt Saxton Hale, and a lot more. You can even have custom maps or make a private server so you and your friends can only play on it. TF2 will never die..
PradaaJax;-;pretty good no bears tho
Sunnyside193;-;Definitely would recommend this game. I mean it is free and you can beat it being free. I've never been a person really into first person shooters but this game is the exception. Something about it is so fun and addicting. 10/10 would recommend.
White Knight;-;10/10 would bang... legit just so SEX-AY
i play roblox;-;There's no reason not to play this unless you have a computer running on a i3 potato [EDIT] unless you play counter strike:global offensive
Jimbo;-;best hat simulator ever 11/10
OpTIcORANGE;-;This game is an amazing game, I have never ever added funds to my steam account but due to this game, I was encouraged to, the game maps are amazing, and the graphics are acceptable and the gameplay, Oh yeah, it's amazing! This game is the best thing that happened to my life! If you are planning on getting the game, don't hesitate! Smash that PLAY BUTTON! VALVE FOR THE WIIIN!
The Mutchinator;-;The first FPS game that doesn't make you rage. All the loadouts are really fun and all the guns are balanced in their own ways. Great game! For being free there's no reason not to play this.
Emsraven;-;fun to play when your not a anoyed -wink wink- also fun to play with friends and gets your skills on other games up as well
Joker;-;This is very very good game! For me is this game one of my the best games, that I played. Thos is, I think, the first multiplayer shooter with classes. You can craft your weapons, you can trade with other players, you can customize your character. These are things, that isn't any multiplayer shooter, that I know. Also when you're wanna some multiplayer shooter to gaming, I am recommending for you THIS! Team Fortress 2
Landon;-;Great graphics,  players. Usually uptight and suck some major . Other than that, fun maps, fun , and fun killing. 10/10 would play it again
eadExpensive;-;Funny... and great game to play with friends :D
Lern2Spud;-;The different classes that this game has is definitely awesome. PROS: Different classes for different playstyles. Trading Fun Co-Op which is Mann vs Machine Public as well as private servers CONS: Must have premium for better crap.
Renaissance;-;Dont think about playing the game,Just play it and you will have the greatest experience of your life
notpro.DoggyG;-;The storyline is ok
wnzie;-;I like Team Fortress 2 here is why: + Nice community +Awesome classes + Awesome updates and items - Hatless (aka Gibus) are a bit annoying Nice game, deffinetly download it. IT'S FREE!!! but if you decided to download it based on this review DON'T WEAR THE GOSTLY GIBUS OR THE PYRO GOGGLES (you'll be a newb as some of the P2P call it)
Marioman2020;-;Really love this game try it out sometime!
Tommy Is A Tomato;-;Good game 10/10 IGN Hat Fortress 2 Get It Now :3
Taco #NEWCOMPUTER ^_^;-;Very fun game and excellent trading side!
Puffy Panda;-;This game's awesome. It's basically a male dress-up game. I've been playing this game for like forever. What century is it now?
Megan;-;<3 it's good
[EG-Lackey] Kyou;-;Play so much I play it in my sleep...10/10 FUN!!!!
Chrome Chameleon;-;This is an awesome popular smooth running 1st person shooter.
Miles ''Tails'' Prower;-;i really like this game and medic is so awesome healing!
[ArcticA]Buli;-;cool
thebreadore;-;I recommend this game,is very good ...
Daddyflabburger;-;unoriginaljokehatsemptywallet simulator/10 would drink bleach again
Skotten #Timet;-;Hats. Chaos. Infinite fun. nuff said
Link-a-chu-sama;-;A Great shooter game that I think is better than counter strike
chewbaklava;-;It's real purty
Reznika;-;Team Fortress 2 It killed my Wallet, my Social life, And my dog.
dN` | unskilled;-;88/88 i swear m8 it's truly gr8
TG | BAN5HEE117;-;This game is amazing! It is so fun and will provide hours of enjoyment! It is a FPS that is not serious. You can play offline with bots, online with other people, or a campaign like story called Mann vs. Machine. While playing, you can unlock new pieces of equipment. There is so many items that it is overwhelming! You can choose between 9 classes. Scout, soilder, pyro, demo man, heavy, engineer, medic, sniper, and spy. You can play on different types of gamemodes and maps. There are also always new updates coming out. If you have steam and you don't have this game the GET IT!
General Chaos;-;One of the funnest team based FPS ever, and it's free. Why aren't you playing RIGHT NOW?!
iLikePie;-;Awsome Game
Jangkrik;-;Need good teamworks for this game
M.o.M.;-;One of the best games ever made !!!
Kakiri;-;Best fun you can get for free. Well, almost. ;)
Epic Cactus Llama;-;This is very good, i have over 500 hours of gameplay on this on alot of different accounts! If you dont like blowing people up with a rocket launcher or shooting exploding enemies with a grenade launcher, then you can try to run around like crazy and shoot enemies heads off with a scatter gun. If you are just like you wanna camp you can try headshotting enemies with the sniper or just be the engineer, who can build machines like a sentry that aims automatticly or shoot them, build dispensers so you you can heal your teammates, or build teleporters to get your teammates up to the line quickly!
Sterling Archer;-;This is the best FTP game i have ever played! There is so much to do, no need to buy anything with real money if you dont want to. Everything can be crafted! All 9 classes are awesome. I never feel that one of them is too OP because you can always counter them. Once you mastered one class there is always more! If you master Scout, you can then start to master some else class or just dont master anything and still have a good time wiht this game. PvP mode works like it should, nothing special, just 7 differend game modes and some beta gamemodes, lots of maps and everyone is fun to play. there is also an PvE mode called MvM. Its supper fun with firends and some of them are hard. To top it off, i like this game :)
LT.LongWang;-;This might be hard to believe, but this man is the leader of a group of lizards from the hyper elite. I know this first hand. I took care of this being as the mentor, as I am a hyper elite of the syntax-sector of the Illuminati. I have experimented with teleportation, Obama, and lizards shape-shifting into Secret-service agents. When the syntax-sector of the hyper elite barracks in the north pole, most experiments broke loose. This prototype, however, was smarter than most. With little to no signs of lizard-like structures when shape-shifted, he was the perfect man for our job. I once used my transformation powers, but was quickly spotted, and the extra-molecular shape-shifting superdinosaur came and saved me, with the hyperbeam harvested from Dialga in the Pokemon dimension. Yes, that show is real, made by the Ancient Gods from Sector-B//AnimationDimension//X-3, we transported the creatures into the "intelligent" planet called Earth, in my opinion, the weakest sector of the whole Illuminati. If you want more information about these creatures first hand, contact me via Google+ or teleportating to the hyperdimension in Class-A.
sadist lord;-;i ubercharged a soldier then he switched to equalizer 10/10
Rain Cloud;-;really fun and addictive game, you need teamwork skill and shooting skill. i would reccomend this game to anyone!
stalefish;-;i hate this game
Robo Dude;-;Team Fortress 2 is in my opinion the best FPS game I've ever played. Here's why. It has 9 classes to choose from (Heavy, Medic, Sniper, ect.), lots of gamemodes (Capture the Flag, Control Points, ect.), humorous voicelines for each of the classes, lots of weapons that you can find at random, and of course, hats to customize your characters. Oh, and did I mention it's free? I highly recommend this to anyone who likes FPS games.
MolotovRocket;-;Awesome fps game with unique classes and gamemodes. Perfect for new comers of fps games and experienced players.
^\WtC/^ Kaifyre;-;Its a great game and I appreciate the 9 years worth of work put into this, but like every game; there are flaws. It's mainly glitches and exploits like the sandvich exploit to get endless points without cheating but this game sets the standards for what a first person shooter should be and if you had a mind you would think the same. Thank you ~Kaifyre
Sneak;-;It's ok
Parsa2;-;this game is absolutly awesome... every class has its unique skills and every single one of them is great graphics are not bad and never get boring this game may look hard at the first time but when you reach 20 hours of playing then you can't stop playing and you want to play more and more... but the best part is gameplay...controls are very smooth after 2 hours of playing you can find the class that is made for you... I played a lot multiplayer games but from my opinion this game is the best multiplayer game ever made 10/10 thank you valve
Chad;-;sure get it why not its free and who cxares about grmaemr yeha im diselquiztic whatevre dnot wrory auobt it amn~
Dopity;-;Just play the game and you'll get used to it.
MaxChar850;-;i like this game because is has cool weapons and classses. it makes me happy when i play with my brother
Orlacktherof;-;TF2 won't ever replace Battlefield: Heroes for me, but its a good game in the same genre nonethless. Its good.
stez;-;it's ok
Gremm;-;Best game i have ever played! If you havent played this game before go ahead but still DO NOT take it that seriosly! I mean you can try to get kills but seriosly the game is not meant to be taken seriosly... You know what i mean when you try it out by yourself! 1# Game ever!
Kurdt;-;Very interesting game, especially with friends. It never gets old and is updated frequently. +10
LUDYA;-;A very fun way to kill boredom and a fun way to kill your enemies. :D
scruffypuppy0420;-;'Team Fortress 2' is a great shooting game.With the spy,you can go behind enimies and backstab them for an instant kill;with the sniper, you can fully charge (or not) and aim for their head for an headshot that mostly instant kills the opponent.Really good game and i also recomend this game for people who play shooting games. :D
Trash Ketchum;-;This game is actually a hat simulator. The true objective of the game is to trade for hats and miscs. All those other gamemodes in this game are actually minigames meant to distract you from the prime objective of aquiring hats. 10/10 would hat.
The Wonder Spud;-;Team Fortress 2 is a gem in my Steam library. Although I do not play it daily like other players, the game is surely addicting and I always turn up when there are updates or special events. The game is a free-to-play, which is great! Although you can buy stuff in game, it doesn't make the game a pay-to-play game. There are no OP weapons as far as I'm aware and the gameplay is fantastic. You can pick from a range of classes, which are all free and come with different weapons, which, of course, are free. Flamethrowers, machine guns, knives, bombs, you name it. Highly reccomended. Thanks for reading!
RetailCrownza;-;Definently recommending this old gem. This game has never let me down, it's always been just as fun as always. Don't miss out on playing this! 10/10.
Universion;-;There are no Sanic hats. 0/10
.iG RainBowDash;-;I really like dis game TRY IT I RECIMEND IT
princeruff;-;This is a very good game.
Trippy;-;I love this game so much! Well worth the download time and spending a little money too!
MinerZMB;-;I think I've spent my life quite well, considering I haven't used 10 000 on hats yet (The day will come, I assure you) Would recommend to anyone who is ready to waste their life and money on a video game. Hats is love, Hats is life I write this review in the honour of our great lord and savior Gabe Newell.
Lusty *(*)*;-;We all know how reviews turn out to be in Team Fortress 2. Well, if I have to be honest from my experience, It was a great game back in the days... Do not get me wrong, it is still a great game though. But after how things have changed throughout the years, Team Fortress 2 is all about hats and economy. Any public servers are not always fun to play on your own when you have to carry your team all the time. Plus, do not expect to see any Medics on your team either as there will be more Snipers, Spies and Scouts. (May the luck be with you~) And then there is random crits... Ugh... This is just what I dislike but if you only care about having fun playing the game then do not let this bother you. But still, I will recommend to play Team Fortress 2 with your friends as it will make your gaming experience much more enjoyable.
DropDead;-;Absolutley awesome. Ever since I started this I had a feeling it would be one of those FPS games. I recommend it 9/10.
FarZinTL;-;Fun game. especially when playing with friends. this game allow friends to work together and create better bonds - really a teamwork game.
Mr. Admiral Sexy;-;Team Fortress 2 is one of the best games I have ever had the luck to come across a must have for anyone intersted in well balanced, stlyeized and fast paced FPS.....and hats Honestly there really is nothing I can say that hasn't already been said, it is just really great.
Icy~;-;It's Team Fortress 2. You can't go wrong.
SquareMom;-;this game is a-w-e-s-o-m-e!
Trevanion;-;Hats. Guns.  in a jar. This Game has it all.
Blas Boys Club;-;Pretty good and fun
Zipulies;-;The most fun you can have online
AC_;-;Best f2p FPS game I have played.
Unstoppable;-;This game came out of my dream
[Lazy] UnskilledHoss;-;Best game I ever played.It's just so fun.
Moose;-;In this game you get to be a guy who kills other guys who yell funny things and wear hats.
Breeze;-;Play this game if you like hats, Fire, Rockets, Russians, Texans, BONK. 10/10 Would Bonk again. PS: Pootis
Ikuze Kurama;-;It's not about who wins. It's about whoever has the coolest hats that wins.
lemon shooter;-;great game
flyingbuddy AuzCtrL;-;10/10 my favourite game ever, characters are really awesome as well.
MovingNonstop;-;My first game so many feelings :D TF2 is the reason why I joined Steam
Wireframe;-;The best game ever made.
maxu~;-;i sure do love fighting and yelling at player about how mutch hats are worth C: FUN :DDDDD!!!!! 10000000000000 out of 10
RPBuk;-;Such a great game, addictive and really great to play with friends!!
Melonking;-;This Game Is Freaking Amazing One of the best free to plays....ever
I'm not a plane.;-;Okay, so, if you ever want a First-Person Shooter Game, this is for you. Because... it has HATS. Yes, HATS. The most desired thing you ever want. And crates. Who doesn't love crates? I have no idea. You should play this game. It's fun. Go download it. It's free. Do it. Do it now. DO IT NOW
SP SpecTre;-;Best free-to-play game out there
Original Ham;-;You want me to give you a review? You'll GET ONE. Hats! More Hats! Even More! A hat with a side of hat with a hat drink and hat fries and with a hat on the go! 11/10 -IGN
Papas con Mayonessa;-;Awesome game! Skills! Get good, get Skills! Forget about the hat! Play, and enjoy! Keep Snipin'!
Defcon;-;>Playing TF2 >Arena mode >whole team rushed out and died >all that was left was me and a heavy, I was playing medic at that time >I ran back to base and saw the heavy AFK >after a while he came back >'OH TEAM I AM MOST SORRY' in a voice that sounded he had food in his mouth >from what I can tell he was probably autistic or something since he spoke heavy lines >always referred to me as 'DOCTOR' >BLU team approached >'DOCTOR CHARGE ME WHEN BABY TEAM IS NEAR. NOW DOCTOR, HIT IT DOCTOR' >Popped the uber and he killed the whole team >he adds me >every game we play I always go medic and he goes heavy >he always yells the battle cry of the heavy or laughs like him most of the time >always thanks me ' YOU ARE GREAT DOCTOR' >I think he was poor since he never played other games besides TF2 >when asked all he responded was 'DOCTOR, money is needed. Must collect money, but money is hard now' >he sounds sad and I asked him if he ever saw meet the medic to brighten up the mood >when he said no, I gave him the link to the video >he was very estatic and eagerly asking me about the part when the medic put the uber part on the heart >I said heart transplants are possible, but without uber >he got sad again >'Maybe in the future' >He gave me a heavy laugh and said 'THEN DOCTOR, HEAVY WILL WAIT FOR FUTURE' FEW WEEKS LATER >he messaged me saying 'DOCTOR, Heavy will not be fighting until later in the night' >it wasn't until tomorrow he got on For the record, he referenced himself as the 'Heavy' since it's the only class he ever played and it was his steam name >got the message saying ' DOCTOR, Heavy doesn't feel well. I go to other doctors, but they were nowhere near as good as you doctor' >he sent this message when I was already asleep, I have no idea where he lives >last message said 'DOCTOR, Heavy will go now. But do not fear baby men on other team. You are good doctor. With you victory is always good. Heavy will join in future.' >by the time I read his messages he was already offline >never came back online for a year >yesterday he came online >greeted him and asked why he hasn't been online for so long >it was his mom >'David (Heavy) died of heart failure. I'm sorry. Are you the doctor he was always talking about? You're the only friend in his list. He was always going on about how him and Doctor were best friends and always leading the team to victory. I don't know what he was talking about, but I was happy that he was happy. Whenever he was on the computer he always had this smile on his face, and I've never seen him happier. He always stayed strong because he wanted to be with the Doctor >Thank you for making him happy >I'm selling this computer because we were never wealthy to begin with. If we were, he'd be here right now. I just wanted to see what was on his computer Thank you again' >My face when I never replied >my face when I was just staring at that screen for hours 11/10 IGN Ruined my life, lost purpose in life and killed myself.
Sticky greNate;-;Incredibly fun and addicting game!
-[ZG]- dazdan79263;-;Over all tf2 is a great game and everyone should atleast have a go at it keep up the good work valve!!!!
FlubberMemes;-;Taunt killed a kid admin on a "friendly" server. Got banned. 10/10
Polturpupgamer;-;So what I like about team fortress 2 its complety different from other first person shoters I have played. Another thing i like about it is how much you can custimize your classes.Another thing i love is the gameplay is just so adictive. Honestly i don't hate anything about tf2.
Holo;-;Dress-up for autistic manchildren
FSN.Ubercharged Batman;-;I only played a little, but it seems fun
Ryukei;-;I love this game , its fun too play , i wish there was more games like this <3
Happy Feet? Wombo Combo!? OHHHHH;-;Ahhh, Team Fortess Duex; the famous game where you run around shooting at people and they shoot back. But the question is, who will survive?
Peacekeeper;-;I'm not addicted....I'm not addicted...I can stop playing at any point...Just need one more hat...One more domination.....One more Ubercharge...
The Thane of Whiterun;-;I think Tf2 is the most addictive multiplayer fps out there. It has almost flawless gameplay, great characters and is hands down one of my top 5 favourite games ever. I'd recommend this game to everyone of my friends who hasn't played it. It's a blast! Score: 8/10 +Extremley addictive +Funny and loveable chracters =Updates too few and far between =Other flaws are there but I can't list them down
Furphy;-;It is a fun game to play with friends. Plenty of servers and gamemodes to play on.
Halo1m;-;I mean. It's okay. ...I'm sure the company will be able to break even.
King Nigga;-;this is like the best free to play steam game ever 10/10
iLoveWolves;-;I love this game so much because It's so cool for my liking! I would recommend that lower than 7 or 6 years old should not play this as It has blood and all that. I would recommend people over 6 or 7 should really play this.
koombaa;-;doing this for the badge. But good game anyway
B;-;This game is Awesome.
Deneris;-;Great game, and easy to get into... great sense of humor.
Draken #ExamsWeek;-;The best hats simulator of world Oh, also a shooter mini game
kostios-_-power;-;team fortress2 is my favourite game the most but it is not just one we do like there are thousand games to try and maybe one of them is really your favourite i just choose this game beacuse most of my friends play this and sometimes this game is fun and funny
Grieve-tan;-;I can be an obese texan with a shotgun 10/10
Move Like Jaeger;-;People don't play Team fortress 2 to show their skills , but to show how rich they are. 10/10 Would do the same.
Th_Lorax;-;The Perfect game 10/10, would ruin my life again.
laatdonovan;-;You want a game where comedy and combat clash together? BAM TF2
LiamTheSourceGamer;-;I love it it goes out of it's way To add hilarity each major update, and Adds varity to each wep giving player more exitement with every drop.
AEOBeastRay;-;I Personaly Love This Game,But Valve Should Add More Weapons And Stop Putting So Many Hats...(P.S. More Maps?)
[T.B.S] CEMCMD | trade.tf;-;Team Fortress 2 is one of the "Free to plays" that does it right.
NIGNOG;-;It's gr8 m8 I would r8 8/8. (   )
katia.m2004;-;Ate a whole bucket of gamer food while playin this game, silly me~ ;) pros: pottis is in this game cons: he is not main focus of this game
Bois;-;Its pretty euphoric if i do say so myself
CLF ArmyCow101;-;If you are looking for a AWESOME game that may just become your favorite game, you are looking in the right place. TF2 has an amazing community with endless fun! TF2 has countless modes and maps to play with a ton of weapons to choose from to fit your play style. Also, with 9 different classes to choose from, each with different rolls, the possibilities are endless. So what are you waiting for, get it now!
$ir;-;It's nice
[IF] Stylin' Sloth;-;Brilliant free game!
General Dani;-;This game, is awesome, very flippin awesome, there are tons of weapon choices, each with their own effects. The classes have a ton of personality which really makes them shine. I highly recommend this to anyone who likes shooters.
EpicSoda;-;This is an epic game if you like shooting games and games with classes, try it out. The game has nice weapons, we can show off our hats. This game offers steam trading and trading cards which is epic. The weapons are really cool. Heres my story.. > I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. > I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. > Then I got my first hat, The gibus. > Suddenly everything changed. > I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' > I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. > I had so many hats, I loved them all. > But then someone traded me, I accepted. > They offered an Unusual for all my hats. > It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. > But no Unusual, He scammed me. > I lost it all. > I was so sad I cried for hours. > Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. > I went to bed after praying. > I felt warm. > I looked behind me, It was Gaben! > He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning Team Captain. > Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning Team Captain and I was naked. > I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. > Hats are love. Hats are life. TF2: 11/10 Best hat simulator 1981 Overall, I'd give this game 9 out of 10 Gabe Narwalls I would play the game the whole day
CEAON;-;I was only 15 years old I loved TF2 so much I prayed to TF2 every night, thanking it for the love I've been given. "Hats are love." I say. "Hats are life." My dad walks in on me as I max out the credit card to buy all the hats and he calls me a theifing , I know he's just jealous that I'm going to raise my steam level, I called him a . He smacks me and takes my computer away, sending me to sleep. I'm crying now, I lay in bed, and my face hurts. It's cold, and I feel a warmth moving towards me. Something touches me. It's Gaben! I'm so happy, he whispers in my ear, "HALF LIFE 3 CONFIRMED." He grabs me with his powerful programming hands, I'm ready. I spread my asscheeks for Gaben, he puts a hat on my butt. It looks so stupid but I do it for Gaben. My dad walks in to check on me and apologize, and shouts, "WHAT THE ?!" Gaben looks him straight in the eyes and says, "PORTAL 3 CONFIRMED." He flies through the window. Hats are love. Hats are life.
GeneralWolfie;-;Team Fortress 2 is one of my favorite games it's easy ad quick to learn how to play. Fun to play with friends and enjoy the games
Stealth Ninja Assassin;-;Wanna kill people with a candy cane? This game is for you. Wanna eat a sandwitch in the middle of a battle field? This game is for you. Wanna throw  at someone? First off, you are very disturbed and should see a theropist. Second, this game is for you. Oh yeah, also: Pootispootispootispootispootispootispootispootispootispootispootispootispootispootispootispootispootis
alsgames12;-;THIS GAME IS THE MOST AWESOME GAME I HAVE EVER PLAYED COD PLAYERS CAN  OFF IF THEY SAY THIS GAME SUCKS GET THIS GAME NOW AND ALSO LOOK ITS FREE TO PLAY!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Dekkler;-;This game is best game ever.
Mr. Snowman;-;It's a fun first person shooter. the hats are nice, original, and fun to get. be warned though, it will drain your wallet, and your time! Overal its a fun game with a nice community. its a miracle that it still updates after 7 years! The thing that its free makes it complete. It's not a pay to win, but you do get hat drops if you pay for the game, you can buy it for less than 30 cents! Overal, i recommend you trying this game!
PewDieGuy;-;Cool game.Worth installing it.
Edward Nygma;-;Played a little bit. Pretty good game.
Juggernut Road2Unusual!;-;Team Fortress 2 will give anyone a fun time. No matter what you do, your going to have fun doing it. There are many things you can do aswell, collect hats, kill players, collect hats, complete objectives, collect hats, earn achievments, collect hats, troll nubs, collect hats, taunt your foes, collect hats, get kicked because you are new, collect hats, get scammed off your items, collect hats, and have fun doing it! Oh, did I mention you collect hats?
[FOC]=PHOENIX=;-;Team Fortress 2 the best game for having fun with friends on GammersUN Servers
Zash_the_Cat |Meow4Luck|;-;Having played this game for a while now, I felt that I should reveiw it. now this game I loved when I started playing and still play it more. Not only just killing each other in an animated world of comedy and mindless killing, You can find hats and paints to somewhat change your apperance in game and craft other things that can be "rare" or just have fun in a conga line. This game almost always has surprised me, the only problem I have seen are the "tryhards" who just want to ruin your fun and enjoyment.
The Geezz [MicS];-;My experience is fairly limited, I don't play many games, but I do think TF2 is fun, and with the right group of people, its hilarious!
Omi-Box;-;A money waster A GREAT money waster!
Plugger;-;Good FPS game, probably best Free game I have ever seen.
On Vacation 14 days;-;I had something called "Life" but then I found this game.
TacoIsNotAWizard;-;I love playing Team Fortress 2. The amount of items you can get, customize your characters, find strategies to defeat the enemy team, and acton-packed fun! It's like Call of Duty, but way better! Also it has a great cartoony texture!
Grumpy Cat;-;Best free to play ever made its a must have! their is a ton of guns and hats with downside and benefits i love the pyro is my favorite character! 10/10 would recommend to friends and family
AGCPrivate|Cheeze;-;Tf2 is a game that would make my top 20 best games of all times list it only has minor flaws but mostly amazing in terms of gameplay and its growing community and tons of weapons and especially "HATS".
Skipples;-;Very fun game, nice system, "okay graphics" but it feels like 75% of the community are deaf, blind or muted
Ryan Higa;-;Great
Renegade Zero;-;I like taking photos of almost everything on TF2. When I cleaned up my disk, I freed up 2 GB. What am I doing with my life.
Ballisticannon;-;Dude. It's TF2. How do you not have it already?
CableKing;-;Would recommend to alot of people.
[tG] _KennObii;-;it never occurred to me that i never did recommend this. but then again did i really have to in the first place? one of the best Free to play games out there, it never was pay to win. it was pay to look Rad.
Du3lRab 1310;-;When you want to look nice, wear a hat. If you want to push in dustbowl, use the side tunnel. If you wanna blow up robots and save Mann Co., play some Mann Vs. Machine with friends. And if you wanna be in space, play some Asteroid.
Smz Free Cases Pls;-;all you need for this game is skill and a heart to kill
Def;-;One of the best free fps's. A strong strategic Team based game that builds skill in each player playing definatley a great game to look at
A Friendly Satanist;-;if you DONT have this game yet then you have wasted your life
West;-;You can get awesome hats and can get killed by machina bodyshotters 9001/10
Ahri~chan;-;Very good game and it is a good game that is easy to get used to when you first start and then the more you play the more the game changes.
Welp;-;It's alright I guess.
Pigeon;-;Be sure not Buy alot of things from store although it is the BEST VALVE FPS EVER
Derpy Link (Dashie);-;TF2. One of my reason of why I'm even on Steam. Its fun. Its Multiplayer. Its TF2. From Scout (Annoying, But Fast Character) To Heavy (Slow, Overweight , But has a Minigun) To finally, The Spy (Backstabbin Son Of a..) and many more classes. This is one hell of a game. And its free!
Frosch;-;Awesome game that i will play for a very long time. Would recommend it's a must have.
NikolasZeMedic B-day 1 day;-;It is such a fun game. Recommended to all!
Fluffy Fluzz;-;Good game fun silly and best of all free. Game gets better if you invest into it. If you can't thats ok there are a lot of kick butt free to players.
ur> :o3;-;This is game is better than a regular FPS game! I really recommend this game!
TerryyyD;-;Awesome First Person Shooter!
Min|YouTube|;-;In my opinion TF2 is one of the greatest games of all time with many different styles to play and loads of game modes (and Hats) So i would deffinatley reccomend tf2 to anyone and whats stopping you? ITS FREE!!!!
Hard Boomer;-;I just realized that I have played this game for more than 1K hours and haven't made a recommendation for it so here I am. When I tried this game (first time), the voice of the "announcer" was so strange I said "I won't be able to tolerate this voice" so I stopped playing basically right after I started. After like, a year maybe I picketed it up again, thanks to "GameDay Iroda". I thought "why not try it again" and boy, after few hours of struggling with... well any class I fell in love. I wasted few hundred bucks on virtual items since then but you know, I don't mind it. This game gave me so many awesome hours and I still like it, I don't know when it will wear off but one thing is for sure: if you haven't played it already just give it a shot (You can't lose anything since it's F2P).
TheCheeseKing;-;Best f2p out there
Polturpupgamer;-;So what I like about team fortress 2 its complety different from other first person shoters I have played. Another thing i like about it is how much you can custimize your classes.Another thing i love is the gameplay is just so adictive. Honestly i don't hate anything about tf2.
Holo;-;Dress-up for autistic manchildren
Osama (Bush did it);-;Where do i start? Okay so this game is one of the most well put together game on the market because great gameplay and new updates that make it all the more better
Oiram Is so Geay;-;Avg said it was a virus 'Anal, i can't believe its not butthurt."
() cl GMF;-;Best Muilti player game ever.
Refractal;-;As you can tell by my play time I quite enjoy this game. I find it extremely fun. This game is filled with the craziest things. You can grab your minigun, or your sheild and sword. It has nine classes to chose from, all with distinct roles and weapon sets. What is really cool is that it is fun even to the free players. You can get most weapons without having to pay. If you decide to buy anything from the in-game store you are automatically upgraded to a premium account. All you gain from this is more frequent item drops, the ability to trade and other minor things. All in all I think the game is extremely entertaining.
WubbaDucky;-;This game has a great community and economy on top of it being free to play. The gameplay is fantastic and the graphics are good too. I highly recommend installing and playing Team Fortress 2.
Casual Jack;-;This game is great for if you are looking for a team based game. From Medics that can heal your team, to spies that can cloak and disguise as a member of the oppisite team, to the wacky and wide variety of weapons you have at your disposal, this game never gets old. On top of that, there is a large community behind this. An, although broken, economy, and much more. Also, hats. If you are worried about if your computer can't handle this, my 1 year old windows laptop can handle this game on the highest graphics with more then playable frames per second. This game is also not very serious, which, depending on your taste, is a great way of bringing humor to this game. This game gets constant updates with new weapons, features, cosmetics, and sometimes maps. On top of this, you can play this game free of charge! However, the downsides are that this game requires you to buy something off of the in game store in order to expand your storage, you also can't trade until you buy something off the store. This may be a problem for some people that are having a hard time with their money at the moment. This game isn't the most balanced, either. This is mostly due to the wide variety of weapons that are avaliable. Overall, this game is the best FPS i have played in a while, and the only game i have been playing for some time. I highly reccomend this to anyone that is a fan of FPS games.
dajano56;-;This game is absolutely amazing. For those of you turned off by needed to buy something from the store to get premium, you can get it for less then 50 cents. The kits are well balanced, the achievements are fun, and the weapons are awesome. Hope to see you online!
**Artic Snow **;-;Tf2 is a good game u can play with friends or play co-op also play ofline gaming. If your new stick with training or offline til you get good. Byes! ~Lighting fire
DaGreenTaco;-;Best hat simulator 2099
Supa Hot Pow!eR;-;I love this game it is my all time favourite game and i have nothing more to say other than PLAY IT! My rating 10/10 GET IT IT'S FREE
Murasame;-;If you can't afford games like Call of Duty: Advanced Warfare, Or Counter Strike: Global Offesive, then this game is for you! Why you ask? Well its a great game overall, because its a cartoony shooter what more can ask? it's not like those games with fancy graphics like Tomb Raider, COD: Advanced warfare, Bioshock2, Portal2, Etc. So I suggest you add this game to your library and give it a try :)
VR6X;-;Medic is my trade, and I will make sure that you suffer no hurt or damage.
Leyawynn;-;hat i got hat i got hat hat i got hat i got hat hat i got hat i got hat hat i got hat i got hat hat i got hat i got hat hat i got hat i got hat hat i got hat i got hat hat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hathat i got hat i got hat. 3/10 Needs more hats: IGN
tylerkade;-;Extremely addictive, its all about the Hats.
Dean Ambrose;-;Its awesome
Silver The Hedgehog;-;THIS GAME I S EPIC E P I C
[LFT Raja] aWoland;-;dis gaem is very g00d i trikstabed a skrub with my stock nife and i unboxed a strange purple  i already hav 69 kils wit it i r8 8/8 m8 gr8 gaem
Blackthunder522;-;I played it for a little bit. Pretty good.
KelevraQuackenstienVance;-;Teamfortress 2 is a mix of off the wall humor, giblets and an insane amount of fun. So lock and load and bring your friends, and remember above all else have fun =)
GERTY;-;I killed a guy with a shield and then headbutted a guy who had a giant eyeball for a head and then I got  thrown on me. 10/10
DjPon3;-;I recommend this game if you have friends , or want make new ones , or just buy items for money and doing yourself rich. i have over 3000+ hrs in this game , this is my new acc. I dont recommend this game until new weapons update because tf2 is now only about hats. Happy tf2 playing.
[FP] Bagels <3;-;11/10 -Best Hat Simulator of all time -Learned Fluent Russian in a week -Economy can pay America's Debt -12yr olds give sex advice -Best bind spamming game ever -Can get banned for killing a friendly
SpokenBanana;-;"Never bring a bat to a battlefield, war is not a game." - Soldier. a charater in a game.
AceSound | #BSFE;-;Great game and very addictive! 9/10
4Brandan4;-;Team Fortress 2 is a fun and competitive game. It has a lot of different things to other games such as Taunts and Hats, there are heaps of hats you can try out. There are nine classes, Scout, Soldier, Pyro, Demoman, Heavy, Engineer, Medic, Sniper and Spy. Hope you go and try out this game after you read this.
idiot.mp4;-;Great Game. Many hours on it with endless fun. I reccomed it if you're looking for comedy, guns, and fun. Another great thing is that they focused into every character's personality. There traits, characteristics, and weapons. As you play more you build skill, earn acheivements, and express your personality by putting on cosmetics/clothes! Another thing you should note is the community. They are usually nice and respect and try to help you. In summary, I reccomend this silly game to new players and expeirenced for entertainment.
Poisonous Pyro #SHR3KT;-;HATS N' HATS seriouslly now: so many posibilities of gameplay and so much fun with friends HAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAATS f2p and at least 0.01 to make premium so 1000000000/10
Nammar333;-;TL:DR: at the end It was 2011, I had been wandering around best buy when i saw a box case for team fortress 2 for 10 dollars. I wondered why they would be selling the same minimalist game i played on the orange box on my xbox, so i wandered over to the computer section of the store and looked up why someone would buy it on PC. I found that the PC version had more than the 10 maps on the xbox version, it had differnt weapons to pick from and hats too, i thought oh what the hell, and got the game. I came home to set it up on my old cruddy toshiba laptop and as a result caused me to create a steam account, but it couldn't hande it, so i used my brother's laptop whenever he wasn't using it. I fell in love instantly. The multitudes of gamemodes, the custom maps and many achievements to get (and i was an achievement addict back then thanks to my xbox) kept me entertained. My brother got a virus on his computer and blames the custom maps i downloaded because of it (to this day, im not sure if it was the cause). So he didn't let me use it anymore almost a year later it was early 2012, somehow i convinced my brother to play on his computer again when i found out that a few months earlier the game became free to play. A ton of my friends began playing it which made it appealing again. When i came back though everything was about trading, not many went to achievement servers anymore, there were spreadsheets, and things that used to be worth very little (buds were 2 keys and bills were 1) were now jacked up in price. I got used to it though, and adapted to become a good trader, i even met a guy who i called my "partner" and we worked together to trade our way up, and it worked. We got a fireproof diary (which i still dont know what it does) out of pyromania. Despite me finding the deal, he wanted to hold on to it. And around that time i felt him becoming more hostile, I was kind of afraid to ask him to much out of fear that he would run off with the whole thing. And despite my pleads in saying that it would probably triple in value soon (it only doubled, but i was still kind of right) he decided to sell it anyway. And because of my conversations with him being too cautious, he only gave me 25% ( 5 keys out of 20) and i couldn't really do much about it. I was angry. So i created a scheme in which i created a fake account and pretended i had some crazy amount to offer him in a spycrab (look it up if you dont know what it is) and knowing him, he said he had an equal amount (which he didn't). I got lucky and i won it and just like i thought, he changed his name and did a bunch of other things to hide himself. I then used a new fake account (which i pretended was a steam admin of something like that) and told him when he was reported for the spycrab, i investigated and found that the bud he used to have was duped (look that up too). He practically bribed me to keep quiet and i got back a good share of what was mine. He still doesn't know i did this to this day. I lost my tf2 privalages again until late 2013, this year, when i got my own computer. And this was the best time of all for me. From all my previous trading i had a ton of items which raised in value while i was away, i decided (as i didn't need most of it) to do giveaways in different servers. One server in particular (sodahappy) i met a kind admin (still good friends with) who helped me do some giveaways using his admin powers, this influenced me to join the community and become a moderator (so i could do giveways). For a while it was fun. People didn't do the giveaways for only free stuff, but for the fun minigames it had. Such as one where everyone was locked in a small room and had to try and run away while i used a /zap function which killed them if i pressed a button while aiming at them. But then problems started to occur, my giveaways started to become out of hand as everyone was doing them. People no longer cared for the game than the prize. And i got in trouble with the higher up admins because of the amount of zaps ( i had 2800 zaps in the 4 months i was a mod, other mods had no more than 100 in their entire careers). After explaing that issue and a few others i was restricted in giveaways. And over time i got less enthusiastic with it. I left Sodahappy, but i left with a ton of new and good friends on my side who i met through the server. In the recent months i focused on getting my dream unusual (which i wanted long since before free to play was a thing). A texas ten gallon painted gold that was vivid plasma and level 3 or 33 (favorite hat, favorite paint, favorite effect and if you look at my name you can see why the level) After borrowing an entire bud from that admin mentioned above from sodahappy (the first one i met) i purchased the hat for 3.5 buds (with some extra sweets) while it was only worth 2.5. This was because the owner was super reluctant to give it up, but i needed it for its level 33. After paying off the 1 bud debt i felt complete I had a ton of tf2 stuff including my dream hat and i felt it was time to move on. So i gave a lot of my stuff away and stopped playing tf2, revisiting occasionally. Summary/TL:DR: Tf2 is my most played game of all time and i kind of grew up with it. And if i could go back and change anything i wouldn't (maybe except for that  scamming me). As much as it makes me sound like a nerd, Tf2 represents a chapter of my life and i wont soon forget it.
SIXTRON;-;This the most fun game you can ever play all of you COD players who think this game is a  game then get the hell out.Anyway this game is not like COD that you have too really win you can play just for fun and have lot's of fun and it's my most fav game ever so go and DOWNLOAD IT NOW !!!!!!
Sorcerer Of Soup;-;A great hat game with a nice shooting mini-game!
Pepper;-;Get this game. It is free now, and it is very addicting.
mario433434 -KnightS-;-;yea um there some kind of glitch cause wen i try to play it it just doesnt go it just stays there all time im even waiting now fix it please
Will-San's Own Japanese Slut;-;I AM NOT RECOMMENDING THIS GAME FOR ATTENTION!!!!11ONEONEONE
DudeDesigns;-;join public games only to be called a hacker when you anally savage little kids that don't read the official wiki and do their research or join autistic servers where killing is apparently dis-allowed in a team based shooting game.
Gest;-;Terrible game. I wish I would stop seeing it on my Library, even though I uninstalled it.
md;-;no its not worth you pay for it later like, REALLY pay for it later save your money
starbuckmw;-;This is... god... you know what i hate this. Pick the right server: get killed a million times but have fun once you get the hang of it and possibly get a friend. Pick the wrong server: get Spawn killed, Killed by hackers, Killed by tf2 vets, booted for high ping, kicked for no reason, kicked because you are doing too good, kicked because you arent good, kicked because no one likes you, kicked because everyone is flaming you and oh yeah CALLED A F*G BY DUMB  P***KS!!! Pick wisely or get screwed out of a good time! P.S. I didnt catch hat addiction, cheers!
Oberkommandant Sierra;-;The spy needs to be ing nerfed. All these new weapons are completely ing unbalancing the game and YOU SHOULDN'T BE ABLE TO BACKSTAB FROM THE SIDE.
qrhgb'qRGV B;-;Well then im not going to list off the things i like and hate about this game End of The Line update, but im just going to say that Team Fortress 2 ed up......
Teeny Tiny Tofu;-;When I got this game, I swore I would never spend a single penny to buy anything and just be content with the loot drops. But then I thought "maybe I'll get something worth a couple cents just so I could get a premium account and have more backpack space" and later on, "Damn I have a lot of crates and I need to purchase a key to open one. Maybe just one. Or two." And now I'm an active trader and have bought a bunch of keys for metals and taunts and weapons and most importantly hats.
TeEs;-;Great game , its my 2nd day playing it and its just awesome , I love it ! I really recomend this game to any videogame players , boys or girls. For the first time I saw it before like 1 year , I tough its totaly crap , just kind of cartoon style fps with bad controls , but actually , its better than COD modern warfare 2 Plus it got voice chat ,so you can chat with your friends , and it too got normal chat. I love trading items from this game with friends ! Love this game.
Aelynthi;-;It's a fun game to play every now and then if you've got nothing else to do. Personally I couldn't play this all day everyday.
YELLING BIRD;-;Easily one of my favourite games ever. Most of the weapons are well balanced, and the combat is absolutely insanely fun. What's more, it's free! (Strictly speaking, you should buy at least one thing from the Mann Co store to get the full fun out of it, but that's like a $0.50 outlay, which heck, you can get with trading cards).
VoDKa Win DodKa;-;this game is a FPS (first person shooter) game which is played by gamers worls wide. i really love this game by its graphic design, trading in-game.
Team Banta [];-;THE best game that I have ever played. TF2 Is a class based FPS. The classes are all easily countered and fun. No 1 class is too OP and the range of items that you can find is astounding. Some items help counter the class that counters you which I think is great. This is definitely a game that you want to play.
Lightning;-;After playing this almost 2000 hours I have to say it is my favorite game. There is so much to do. Find friends. Spam Binds. Trade. Play on Community Servers with ADS. Play on Valve Servers with F2Ps. Go on trade servers and Snipe. Customize your classes with weapons and hats. Trade Up or Buy Hats with coolio shiny . Show off your hat with coolio shiny . Cry cause no one wants to buy your hat. Keep the hat for days. Go crazy over the hat. I still have the hat. Ok enough about hats here are the classes. Heavy:Super Slow,Probably going to be healed,Buffed,Damage Dealer. Spy:Average Speed,Probably going to be spy checked,Stealthy,Backstabber. Scout:Fast,Probably will die of sentrys,Smart ,Meat Shoter. Sniper:Average Speed,Probably will be out sniped,Aussie,Aim Botter. Demoman:Slightly Slower than Average,May get healed,Drunk,Damage Dealer Pyro:Huddah Huddah,Mmmph,MMMPH,Mmph Mmph mpmh mph mph mph. Engineer:Average Speed,9/10 chance to be harrased by spys,Also Drunk,Camping more than snipers Medic:Average Speed,Will most likley pocket heavy,Oktoberfest,Spy Bait Soilder,Slow on Foot Fast in air,Murica,Murica,Murica Well thats about it mates. I'm drunk ~Demoman
Miner;-;This. Game. Is. Great. I started playing after some very tragic issues in life, as I slowly became even more of a gamer and an antisocial. To be honest, I only expected a few hours of fun and then I'd be moving on, but, that was not the case. I joined a server, one night, and got sucked in. The class diversity, the community (other than that of the MvM community), taunts, weapons, and most importantly.... Hats. So, while most people think the community is toxic, they must've been in the wrong damned place, because everywhere I have been everyone has been very polite and nice. With one exception, the MvM Tour of Duty community. People there are so damned strict with what they want, as they push through one of the most challenging tasks of getting an Australium weapon. Many of them have ego's larger than the  on a black male, but, some aren't as religiously following this gamemode, and they will mess around if they realize being serious isn't beating the wave. So, other than that, our community is running fine. Team Fortress has fought changing times, and has succeeded. It's the game that you hate to love, but the game you can't put away. 10/10 would play another 1,000 hours and probably will.
Scootis McPootis;-;best game ive ever played. and to make it even better, its f2p. the game has a nearly unlimited skill cap and it is the most unique and hilarious game you'll ever play. dont let not being good get you down, just keep practicing and eventually, u will get good and come to love this magnificent masterpiece. people say hats ruined the game. thats dumb. u dont have to wear hats and i wear a gibus with pyrovision goggles for the irony. dont worry about all the weps and hats, its still a fun game. no1 is making u trade all the time or wear hats. just play the game and have a blast with it!
Barrack O-Ind E Gurley;-;This is "The Game". TF2 is a FPS unlike all others. Including cartoonish characters with special qualities, Every second you play you want to play more. NOTE: This Game is NOTHING like CoD. IT IS BETTER !!! so "GET ON THE POINT WANKARS"
Tontto;-;This is one of my favorite games. If you didn't played this yet, I recommend to try this great game. I've been playing this a really long time to my favorite class which is Engineer.
OmegaRocker11;-;THIS GAME IS AWESOME!
AnaKk1N;-;First day you play TF2-This is such a great game, all those classes , too complex, I will never understand them and handle them. After a few days: Now I know everything about every class. Such a cool game! The Day you get the GIBUS!: Hmm is this a hat? Let`s try it on! After you realise that Tf2 is a conga and a hat simulator you want more HATS. Because, well , why not? After 1 month: You love this game so much, you have a single hat and you want more but you realise that you don`t have inventory. You buy a great hat from mann co store and then SURPISE! You get other hat gifted my mann co store because you bought something!! A few moments after you realise that you got those hats: Hmm...I have one hat(Gibus) and these 2 hats. Illuminati triangle has 3 sides. 1+2=3 --Illuminati Confirmed!! Anyway gr8 game m8. 7.357/10-IGN-Best HAT simulator ever made. As an additional information you realise that your money disappeared. Would play that again
Reality is Boring;-;The most awesomest game I ever played I recommend that you should play this game Its got awesome graphics AWESOME!!!! :D :))))))
NolongerQuinnandoutburger;-;I shot someone once 420/69
ine0dre;-;One of my favorite games
Samski | TF2Pickup.net;-;Brilliant game and cannot get enough of it if only they implemented competitive within the game this game would explode onto the comp community alongside CS:GO
Thundermastadon;-;All that I can say is, this is the only game I play now, it keeps me wanting to come back and play it everyday. Plus for some strange reason I am now addicted to hats.
KillingTheButterfly;-;This first person shooter is unique to all others, it has a cartoony look and feel which is the core to how this game works. The weapon designs are all unique and humorous and the maps are excellent to play in.
BattleClam;-;Just doing this for badge Its good
Soldier No. 3847;-;This game is amazing. It is the best FPS that I have played in all my gaming years 5 Stars: ***** This game is for those FPS players who just want some hilarious gameplay. This game has many easter eggs and has may in game rewards. You should all go out and play this funny and wierd game, full of crap from another universe
Rovert;-;A unique FPS game that I actually enjoy playing. The classes are very different, the game is balanced, getting updated often, and has a great art style and humor.
The Flying Walrus|AFK 1 WEEK|;-;What is there to say about Tf2 that has not already been said? Not much really so I am going to try and keep this short. This game has some of the best class based mechanics that can be found in any FPS. Each class is different and provides a different style of play to have fun with, and that is just the stock characters. Customization is one of this games strong points, in what other game can I jump across a map with a pink beard and hat and then proceed to smash a shovel into a friends face causing them to endlessly rage? There is a reason that people still play this after 7 years. TF2 has taken many hours of my life, and I'm fine with that as longs as it continues to stay awesome I will spend many more hours in the future. "Arf"- Walruse
Krunchy Anarchy [AoG];-;I've been Playing Team Fortress since the beginning of this summer 2013, to be honest I haven't played a game that can matche up to Team Fortress, and no matter how boring you are the Fun Never ends, it keeps going, going and going.
Doctor Pockets;-;Introduction Team Fortress 2 has really surprised me. While It has no story or co-op modes, this has to be one of my favorites. Game play Simple multiplayer or bot matches, that's it. Campaign? Nah. There are some fun gamemode that include: arena, capture the flag, control point, king of the hill, mann vs. machine, payload, special delivery, territorial control, and even a dueling mini-game. What else can you ask for? Hats? Yes, Valve has added hundreds of hats for you which can cost hundreds of $$$. But why waste you hard-earned cash on a digital hat? You don't need to! Trading can get you 1 ordinary wepon to unusual hats, but with a cost. Not a money cost but lots lots lots of time. Away from that you can customize your loadouts and play 9 different classes. Scout Soldier Pyro Demoman Heavy Engineer Medic Sniper Spy Each has there own advantages and disadvantages that make the gameplay different for each class. Sniper litterally snipes you from the corner of the map and medic heals you. Playing each can get you to your favorite. In-game items that you get by random drops can complete change your style of play. Each wepon can either reload faster but shoot slower or completely opposite. There are custom maps and plugins that can change the game from shoot stuff and kill things to slender and even role playing. Sprays can be a problem if someone is watching you (people can relate) and players can rage on mic. Most people are friendly and some never stop playing this game. Graphics/other Cartoon-like characters and lots of gore. Lower-end PCs can also handle the game, but on lower settings. Good graphics, but you don't need better because its not realistic. Controls are normal, WASD to move, R to reload, MOUSE1 to shoot. Challenge level Easy bots can be a little difficult if it your first FPS or new to TF2. As you play more, expert goes from insta-killing you to easy. Real multiplayer can have noobs or MLG players. How fun it is Really fun. From walking into the super death trap of sentries or sticky jumping across them map, this game has been worth ever hour I played. Playing death run is great fun but Mario Kart can be better. There are many good laughs that I had while playing. Conclusion Play it.
RubyGamer;-;Team Fortress 2 is an online multplayer shooter. But over all I will say that Team Fortress is a great game and I recommend giving it a try its free to play so you should have no excuse not to have played it once.
Sjuuk&Rino;-;Probaly the best free game you can get!!
Bloodstained Dress;-;very addicting and yet one of the best games i ever played.
.iG [ZombiePanic]Br-xD-;-;Man this game is AWESOME play it if you are man or girl i don't know lol
Pig;-;Respawn times are great breaks to jerk my sissy little , love this game!
The Scout Here;-;An excellent game, one of my favorite online games of all time. It's entirely free, except for hats and weapons, BUT! You can get all those weapons by just PLAYING THE GAME! That's what I did, and even now that I have all the weapons, I can still have fun playing. Also, there's updates every few months that fix balance issues, and add a lot of items (mainly hats). Plus, you can make items in the Steam Workshop that can possibly be ADDED TO THE GAME! Incredible, right? Lastly, trading in this game is an immense economy full of rises and drops. Once you get into this trading community, you can make serious profit, and eventually, you can MAKE. MONEY. That's right, you can BUY other Steam games by PLAYING A FREE ONE! Is that not AMAZING? If you aren't downloading this game right this second, I pity what you're missing out on. Over 2000 hours and still going strong.
Your mom naked on a cold day;-;TF2 is an awesome way to spend a short amount of time relaxing. Jump in / Jump out and have fun
SK1RM1SHERrawr;-;teleport bread today 10/10 would bread again
N1chlas;-;This game is so awesome ! :)
qwrvee;-;A 6 year old kid told me that he ed my dead grandparents on a trade server.
Mr. Illusion;-;It's a really nice game and I really like it . :D
ShadowGreninja 9001 {BR};-;Team Fortress 2 is an amazing, creative, hilarious, and incredibly fun multiplayer first person shooter. This game is one of a kind, and it is incredibly popular for many good reasons like: it perfectly balances the 9 classes to make the game a lot more fun (Because who wants to constantly die against someone with virtualy no weakness?). The balancing in this game makes sure that no one class is too overpowered, and encourages a lot of team work and stradegy. The game probably wouldn't be as fun if it wasnt balanced to perfection. Valve also listens to their fans, something that many game companies don't do. We have the Steam Workshop to show fan - made items that have at least a chance of becoming in game items! They also listen to feedback about for example: balancing issues, or a glitch. The constant updates are great especialy since like the game, they are all free! These important updates could include new weapons, taunts, costumes, maps, or even modes! (Like Mann vs. Machine) The 9 classes are so full of stereotypical humor, bright personalities, and amusing lines. The Scout is a stereotypical teenager from Boston with a baseball bat and an awesome accent, the Soldier is a stereotypical American drill sargent with a bazooka who sounds exactly like what I would think a stereotypical drill sargent sounds like, the Demoman is a drunken black scottish guy with an accent, a grenade launcher, a stickybomb launcher, and an eyepatch, many peoples favorite class: the Heavy is a giant Russian man with a minigun named "Sasha", and a Russian accent who punches people with his bare (or bear!) hands and created an internet meme because of the almighty Sandvich, the Engineer is a Texan who can build Sentry guns, Dispensers, and Teleporters to help the team, has a Texan accent, and palys the guitar, the Sniper is an seemingly everyday Australian man with a Rifle that can do an instant kill (Headshot), an Australian accent, a hat and sunglasses, and is an assasin for hire, not just a mercinary. the Medic is a German doctor that has a German accent, stole a dove from a German prime ministers wedding and named it "Archimedes", and lost his medical liscence who can breifly turn people invincible, the Spy (my favorite) is a mysterious French gentleman who can do an instant kill (Back stab), has a French accent, can turn invisible, can use his Electro sapper to destroy an Engineer's Buildings in time, is an assasin for hire like the Sniper, and is CRUEL to everybody, and my second favorite class: the Pyro is a complete mystery since he has a fire protective suit that covers his entire body, a gas mask that covers his face (if he even HAS one), and only says "Mmph", and has a huge variety of Flame-throwers, secondary weapons, (Like Flare guns) and Meele weapons (Like axes) who is arguably the best class in the game!!!!!! (Even with the Pyro's balances like mostly close-ranged combat) I could go on and on about the entire game, but I dont want to bore any one reading this review by making it even longer that it already is. Team Fortress 2 is one of the funniest, most creative, one of a kind, and best games I have ever played, and the best PC game EVER period. I would recomend this more than anything else, and if it wasn't free when I got it, it would be higher than #1 on my wishlist. Infact, the one reason I made a Steam accout is to get Team Fortress 2! It is truly a godly game. GET. THIS. GAME. NOW!!!!!
Ge$undheit!;-;This game is more addicting than cigarettes!
Captain Craterpie;-;Honestly, i love the game, and it has a good community once you become a p2p, i was a f2p for about 150 - 200 in game hours, and people were just major douches to me.
[P.T]Awesomelokesh #TF:GO;-;Really Fun And Addictive Game....I Really Recoommend It To Everyone
Isuckatgaming;-;One of the best online FPS to date. Characters are awesome, voice acting is awesome, weapons are awesome. Class based, with a giant arsenal of different weapons to equip. Smooth and optimized performance, awesome fan made and oficial maps. Has in game store, were all weapons and cosmetics are. (Execpt for a few promo items.) But here is the twist: Almost all of the stock weapons which you recieve from the start, are the best. Weapons drop rather freqeuntly, aswell as having achivements which gives weapons. (Hint: There is a LOT of achivements.) So in short: Play this game. If you dont enjoy, no harm. Its free. Just uninstall and be on your way... 12/10 would play again.
Exudias;-;Very fun game, in my opinion one of the best games that has ever existed. During my long playtime I learned a lot about the community. With the probably addition of competitive matchmaking valve will "revive" this game since a lot of players say it is dying. All I hope is that Valve will add this new feature and this game will have even more players like CS:GO and DOTA 2. Cosmetics are also a part of the game that keep the community alive! People say traders are stupid and don't even play the game and traders say that people who play the game only for gameplay are stupid and poor. That's not true at all. The F2P players aren't always noobs... There are some F2Ps with expensive backpacks and there are some F2Ps with crazy skills. It's not the gibus or the team captain, it's the skills, no matter what type of skills - trading or playing. It is a fair and balanced game and people can easily get started playing it. There aren't any complex mechanics or anything, just hop on and have fun. Lots of weapons to choose from, lots of gamemodes, lots of fun. The perfect trio. I started playing this game and the first 1000 hours I only played without trading. I got premium at 500 hours and started trading after 1000. I started playing the game without trading just months ago. My backpack is worth a bit and I do not need more than this. As a conclusion, I am both a trader and a player and I suggest you play this game for both of those things! The only bad thing I can say is that the trading community is going to hell.
Booty;-;I need to review a game to get a badge so consider this a review.
Emem;-;There is only one er in this game. 1/10 for only one er.
Unreal;-;Scroll down the comments and you will find around 300.000 reasons why I like it.May be more, may be less. I am tired now, I go to bed.
Callie;-;This game is fun for competitive players, people who just want to mess around, and people who enjoy trading items. Best hat simulator I've ever played.(That last line was a joke)
The Lone Soldier;-;Just get the damn game...
Ellie;-;New taunts Cool weapons Cool gamemodes Unusuals stranges new maps workshop and FREE GAME!
Nightwolf0729;-;I Say This To You If you Are Reading This Gabe: THANK YOU FOR MAKING THIS GAME! The Best FPS I Played In 2014 - 2015 But I Do Think The Dead Ringer IS Kinda Cheap And I Hate It When I Get Killed By A Spy Who i Though I Killed. All In All A Master Piece
bug;-;release me from this hell
Sir Laughs-a-lot;-;"I didn't need a life anyway" - Everyone
Derpy;-;This is all about the new hats and .
MySperm;-;I've probably played over 2000hrs (on my brothers account + mine) since it came out, can confirm hats gonna hat.
prysmx;-;The most fun I've ever had in an FPS. When a game's only downside is that it can be addictive, you know you're working with a gem.
I'll be ur oni-chan;-;LOST MY HEARING TO SCREAMING CHILDREN SCREAMING OVER BEING SCAMMED 10/10 would defiently play again and recommend to all - Westbro Baptist Church
Master_G;-;Fun game,has two aspects,playing the game normally and trading,both are fun to try,recommended
HyperDoc (Have an eagle);-;THE GAME IS ING AWESOME!
--;-;Pretty nice game keep up the good work valve :D
The Wizard;-;Do you like hats? Do you like buying hats? Do you like buying virtual hats? Than this is the game for you!
Procrastinator Konata;-;Presentation - 8.5/10 User interface shows you all you need to know, solid feature set all around, and great little touches of polish. Graphics - 9.5/10 The art style is such a forceful presence in this game, adding to the enjoyment you get out of it and the allure to keep playing. A strikingly coherent artistic vision. Sound - 9/10 Many of Valve's staple sound effects are mixed in with excellent weapon and voice effects to yield excellent results. Gameplay - 9/10 It's difficult to describe, but this game just feels right. From the way the weapons handle to the way your character scampers around the environments. An absolute blast to play. Lasting Appeal - 8.5/10 Very Lasting... very lasting indeed OVERALL - 8.9/10
[WOC] George;-;Really good game m8. I'm gonna start to play more steam games often
Unecht;-;this is definitey a game
Force (EMF);-;Crafted two wooden bats and got metal 10/10
Wolf;-;Great banter, it realy is!
necai (urban beat);-;THE BEST GAME i have ever played.
Moow58;-;This game is awesome it is so fun and has endless posibilities. You can customize your classes and master them. 10/10.
JulianThomas;-;Pabu is very adorable Pabu likes this game Pabu thinks that you should play this game.
Outlaw;-;This is not really a game, it is more of a simulation of Left Twix factor and Right Twix factory dueling each other to see who has the better twix.
Kchypark;-;I love this game with all the weapons and stuff keep up the good work valve!
Skotten #Timet;-;Hats. Chaos. Infinite fun. nuff said
Link-a-chu-sama;-;A Great shooter game that I think is better than counter strike
chewbaklava;-;It's real purty
KommandantKIWI;-;Absolutly life ruining. 9.5/10 would rage at afterburn damage again.
Lazy;-;play this
takeisover;-;This game is awesome You must play!
CookieMonsta ( );-;Its a really Fun Game the Drops are amazing :D
Supahpikmin [ADM] SSR;-;I totally recommend this game to anyone interested. TF2 is a first person shooter... kinda. This game can involve wacky shenanagins, like bumper cars, giant strongman games, silly cosmetics, and watching really bad players. What i really like is that you can get almost a full experiance with the free to play option, with only some crafting, trading, and inventory space being limited. The only downsides to this game are the cost of some items, like keys and paints, and the glitches. Oh the glitches. Although sometimes funny, they can be a real hassle. There are times when you can't join games, have trading errors, are unable to turn or quite, and can only swing your current weapon, glitches caused by using the chat, and anything along those lines. Overall though, this game can be a lot of fun for people of many ages.
WAWP;-;If you don't have TF2, then......*sigh*..... I DON'T KNOW WHAT YOUR WAITING FOR!!!!! Get TF2, it true, the hype. This is a must have for any PC gamer!
DERP POTATO;-;Spy = Secret Porno Yard wait wut ?!
SK1RM1SHERrawr - NEW VIDEO XD;-;teleport bread today 10/10 would bread again
N1chlas;-;This game is so awesome ! :)
qwrvee;-;A 6 year old kid told me that he ed my dead grandparents on a trade server.
Mr. Illusion;-;It's a really nice game and I really like it . :D
ShadowGreninja 9001 {BR};-;Team Fortress 2 is an amazing, creative, hilarious, and incredibly fun multiplayer first person shooter. This game is one of a kind, and it is incredibly popular for many good reasons like: it perfectly balances the 9 classes to make the game a lot more fun (Because who wants to constantly die against someone with virtualy no weakness?). The balancing in this game makes sure that no one class is too overpowered, and encourages a lot of team work and stradegy. The game probably wouldn't be as fun if it wasnt balanced to perfection. Valve also listens to their fans, something that many game companies don't do. We have the Steam Workshop to show fan - made items that have at least a chance of becoming in game items! They also listen to feedback about for example: balancing issues, or a glitch. The constant updates are great especialy since like the game, they are all free! These important updates could include new weapons, taunts, costumes, maps, or even modes! (Like Mann vs. Machine) The 9 classes are so full of stereotypical humor, bright personalities, and amusing lines. The Scout is a stereotypical teenager from Boston with a baseball bat and an awesome accent, the Soldier is a stereotypical American drill sargent with a bazooka who sounds exactly like what I would think a stereotypical drill sargent sounds like, the Demoman is a drunken black scottish guy with an accent, a grenade launcher, a stickybomb launcher, and an eyepatch, many peoples favorite class: the Heavy is a giant Russian man with a minigun named "Sasha", and a Russian accent who punches people with his bare (or bear!) hands and created an internet meme because of the almighty Sandvich, the Engineer is a Texan who can build Sentry guns, Dispensers, and Teleporters to help the team, has a Texan accent, and palys the guitar, the Sniper is an seemingly everyday Australian man with a Rifle that can do an instant kill (Headshot), an Australian accent, a hat and sunglasses, and is an assasin for hire, not just a mercinary. the Medic is a German doctor that has a German accent, stole a dove from a German prime ministers wedding and named it "Archimedes", and lost his medical liscence who can breifly turn people invincible, the Spy (my favorite) is a mysterious French gentleman who can do an instant kill (Back stab), has a French accent, can turn invisible, can use his Electro sapper to destroy an Engineer's Buildings in time, is an assasin for hire like the Sniper, and is CRUEL to everybody, and my second favorite class: the Pyro is a complete mystery since he has a fire protective suit that covers his entire body, a gas mask that covers his face (if he even HAS one), and only says "Mmph", and has a huge variety of Flame-throwers, secondary weapons, (Like Flare guns) and Meele weapons (Like axes) who is arguably the best class in the game!!!!!! (Even with the Pyro's balances like mostly close-ranged combat) I could go on and on about the entire game, but I dont want to bore any one reading this review by making it even longer that it already is. Team Fortress 2 is one of the funniest, most creative, one of a kind, and best games I have ever played, and the best PC game EVER period. I would recomend this more than anything else, and if it wasn't free when I got it, it would be higher than #1 on my wishlist. Infact, the one reason I made a Steam accout is to get Team Fortress 2! It is truly a godly game. GET. THIS. GAME. NOW!!!!!
Garrus;-;This game is a must! And its free, why would you even wiat to play it?
Knugen;-;It's a great f2p shooter if not even one of the best one out there. There's a great weapon balance and isn't a pay to win game at all like most of the f2p games. You could call this game Hat fortress 2. 10/10 Like CoD but with hats - IGN
Spag Heddy;-;This is the best game ever :D
Eeriem;-;Awesome game, best First Person Shooter ever! Really recommended to all those newbies out there!
Deadpool Doge;-;Really fun game for casual playing! 10/10 Would play again!
lowmo;-;might consume life
CrazyPanda061;-;This is an amazing game, I hope they make new game modes such as team deathmatch's and stuff.
Dwuuh;-;Team Fortress 2 has changed a lot recently, and you know what? In my opinion, it's not getting better. Not any more. Unless Gaben or the community does something about this Free-to-play game, it might just die one day. The servers will be empty, the only ones that will be filled is trading servers and "competitive" servers, which is kind of  in itself. "TF2 was not meant to be a competitive game." Anyway, TF2 has still changed me, sorta. Or should I say, the people I've met has changed me and how I look at the game today. As an autistic little f*ck I am, I loved the competitive community, until a lot of  happened in the UGC leauge, around the seasons 12 and 13. Maybe there's still some  left, who knows. But for a F2P, this game is a great experience, if you want to find out what unbalanced teams and  weapons are, you're more than welcome to join TF2! 6/10, I'm still playing it. Yeah, I swear a lot. So?~ <3
Energy;-;The best free to play game. :)
FrameDrops;-;The game is so great i didnt even feel that its bad to the players more and more will come in the future add this game and try it!
Kaga;-;A really good game. My favourite game
Kiyoko-Gone Indefinitely-;-;I love this game so much! :)
9L;-;Hours of fun, One of the best communitie's I have ever seen and its really awsome to be a part of. Team fortress 2 is one of the games that you never get tired of. Been playing over 1000 hours and still really enjoy it!!
InDustTrees;-;I played this game all the time. I had good weapons. I had lots of fun. I had lots of friends. I got lots of noscopes. 10/10 It ruins your outside life, It makes your gaming life more cooler. : ) Also Gaben takes all your money for cool hats, keys and stamps (But who actually buys stamps.)
FRhino;-;Funny, beautiful and good game! TF2 is nice timekiller!
Shia Iwata of Rivia;-;It's k
Kokosnootje;-;Best game I have ever played...And the fact that it is a F2P game makes it even better. 10/10! Want to hear the best thing about this game? Hats. I mean everyone likes hats right?
Alcatraz Smith;-;this game its addicting
AarChA;-;One of the best games possibly anyone can play!
totally_whales;-;its a coool and its fabulous
R.I.P Ren;-;Conga Fortress 2 10/10
Wessie;-;Probably my favorite game of all time, bunch of endless hours of shooting and fun :) it has an awesome trading and competitive community also :) Best F2P Ever
Titus;-;One of the best games I've ever played and . a must have game and best of all IT'S FREE!!!!!!! though you need $5.00 to be premium though
Stealth Ninja Assassin;-;Wanna kill people with a candy cane? This game is for you. Wanna eat a sandwitch in the middle of a battle field? This game is for you. Wanna throw  at someone? First off, you are very disturbed and should see a theropist. Second, this game is for you. Oh yeah, also: Pootispootispootispootispootispootispootispootispootispootispootispootispootispootispootispootispootis
WarriorDan;-;5 Star! One of the best games I've ever played! The gameplay is fun and kenetic, the music and SFX are cool and funny at the same time, and TF2 is one of those rare awesome MMOs that continue to set the bar higher and higher for itself, well surpassing what it once was. Especially loving the MVM mode!
BUCKER BOY;-;Very fun. All I want is weapons and I've been playing a lot for weapons since that's the only way to get weapons. Weapons are want I want and need. Flamethrowers, snipers, I don't care. As long a I can kill people with it. Also I like the food. This game provides food you can use as combat weapons. Example: The Holy Mackerel (a fish). Again you can kill people with it. One thing I get mixed up with in the game is that if you kill someone along the rails or a fence, it looks like they are standing up, so I waste my ammo trying to kill a dead guy. That's it and remember to get weapons. I recommend this game for people who likes weapons. How many times did I say weapons (not including the time I say weapon in this sentence)?
E AQUELA DO PAPAGAIO?;-;Well, it's hard for me to describe TF2. How can someone talk using his reason about something that he loves? Damn, i don't know how. For me there isn't no words to describe this incredible piece of . That's not just a game. It's clearly much more than that. The only thing i can say is that this thing is really ing amazing. No further comments about. Ps. i REALLY REALLY LOVE THAT CRAP. :D
DPerpes(selling key for 15.77);-;this game is a god of games so much stuff conga's to hats im happy with all my hats
Pantong;-;400 hour free two play game!
potterman28wxcv;-;When a FPS meets team play, fun, and strategy :) Team Fortress 2 is a game that looks simple at first glance. Just pick a class, shoot, kill everybody, have fun. But in the end, you realize that it's not that simple. Every class has strengths and weaknesses ; the more balanced is a team, the more chance the team has to win. And once you really understand all the classes and know them all, the game is just bomb. So in this game, being a pro at CS or Quake 3 Arena doesn't mean you'll oneshot everybody here ; you've got to think carefully about what you do, and help the best possible your team. That's precisely what I love in this game : each class is useful, and no class is overpowered. I do not count the number of games that have been won because I was a Medic or an Engineer (which are support classes), and because there were enough big guys in my team to do the rest. And at last but not least, you have in this game a lot of fun contents (cf the pyro glasses ; or when blood becomes balloons, and fire becomes rainbow), which is the icing on the cake. The only backdrop : there is a lot of noobs in public games that don't know how to play, and most of the time, it's the team who has the highest number of non-noobish player who wins. But that shouldn't be a problem for you if you're looking just for fun :)
STEWPiD;-;This game is a EXTREMELY addictive team based shooter where having everyone working togetheir is essential. Even if you don't like the base game VALVe (Volvo Pls) has had good support for custom game modes like Jailbreak PropHunt VS Saxton Hale. The game has a very deep trading system basically created by the community. If you have the space and and bandwith this game is a must get. Atleast try it
Endy;-;good game. fun game. hats. a lot of hats. pixels. a lot of pixels. 0/10
Frosts;-;Im Loving This Game So Far ! ( as you can see by my hours spent on here.) Ive Played this game a few years ago but never was able to trade and I was missing out on the best part Now that I Am able to trade im experiencing the Full Game !
Kingofvoglers;-;Amazingly addictive game. For a free game its amazing and is one of the best free steam games out there.
Stab;-;10/10 420 BLAZE IT ~ILLUMINATI
Tacotroll232;-;Wow nice videos
Commander Erwin Smith;-;IS EPIC but i hate medic he freaks me out T.T
Mr And Mrs Zero ();-;THIS GAME HAS SO MUCH SHPEES I <3 IT
15 dr peppers;-;It's like Skyrim with guns! - IGN 10/10
rxg| WiryJacbo;-;Horrible game, after 10 minutes playing I decided to never play again. 1/10 ~IGN
Swegirman;-;I was 9 years old... I loved TF2 so much. I had all of Gabens merchandise. I decided to play on a public server on tf2. I couldnt believe it. When I pressed tab, I saw "Gabe Newell". Was Gaben(the lord and savior) really playing on a server with a skrub like me? Gaben sent me a trade request. I quickly took a screenshot to make all my friends jelly. I then accepted the request. "Hey kid, wanna give me all your items 4 this rare item?" he added a Ghostly Gibus. But no, it wasnt any regular skrubby ghostly gibus. It was a new hat. The name read "Gabens Special Hat, for a Special Boy". I knew that this deal was a once in a lifetime oppurtunity. I quickly added all of my 146 items into the trade. "Very good" Gaben said. He hit confirm trade, as did I. Once I got the item, I nearly peed my pants in joy. I asked my friend how much this new item was worth (not that I would sell it, but I just wanted to know). He broke the news to me. It turns out, it wasnt a new hat. It was just a ghostly gibus that had been renamed. I cried myself to sleep that night. When I awoke the next morning, I was surprised to see Gaben standing by my bed, watching me. He pulled out a box out of his pants. He handed it to me with love and care. "Wha-Whats this for?" I asked, almost too afraid to question The Almighty Gaben. "It's a surprise" he told me. When I opened the box, there was a decapitated head in it. "This is the man who scammed you" Gaben said. I smiled in delight. "Thank you Gaben!" I ran up to him and gabe him a warm and tight hug. "Oh, but my boy, the present isnt over" he said. I heard a sound coming from my computer. On the tf2 main screen, I had pending alerts. I clicked on the alert box, and I couldnt believe it. I got all my items back. But something seemed a little strange. I had more items in my inventory than before. I scrolled through my inventory and was amazed to see a whole page filled with unusuals. I went to go put my items in my profile display case, but something seemed to be downloading. I checked what was, and I almost died in shock. It was Hl3. "Thank you Gaben, my lord and savior!" I said. "Anything for a son, my boy". And with that, he flew out the window. Gaben is not life. Gaben, is a WAY of life.
Epic Derp;-;You bring a fish into a gunfight and win 10/10
WaffleSaurus;-;Is good. Very fun.
LeJames Bron;-;First of all, I want to start out by saying that I am not the most experienced player, but TF2 isn't a game where experience really matters. I have around 1500 hours, but I am a decent trader and have come pretty far into trading. What I mainly want to review is the stuff I know about: Competitive and Trading. Perhaps the most well-known aspects of the game, yet the most fluctuated (in terms of rating or liking). Trading Trading- unless you are extremely experienced- revolves around two things: Luck, and Patience. Although you do need some other skills (Price checking, negotiation etc.), you hardly ever get good deals unless you are trading with some 10 year-old whose mother spent well-earned money on a virtual game. Sometimes I do get good deals (good in TF2 trading terms means profit) on some decently experienced players, but it is rare.( For Me!) Competitive From the TF2 servers I've played on competitive can be good, bad, or of course just normal. Why? Because in one game you might be absolutely  the asses off the other team, but then "You have been switched to the other team due to auto-balance". Another example: One team might have a player wearing a Burning TC, yet the others are fresh out of installation, roaming cluelessly around with their gibuses on. Well, that's my review, this was just all my opinion, and I respect every one elses Bye!
Madness Beam;-;So... This isn't my first review, BUT, I guess I need to do it again, since the first one was on 40 hours of playing... SO, after a year I get to know 5 things about this game. 1. It's awesome the TONS of nice people, almost every friend I have is from TF2, I can make some mentions, like the best player in my list, is a nice guy with true heart, and soemone that helped me when I was about to kill myself due to a break up with... anyway, other guys, like a teacher from a rocket jump server, that now is one of my best friends, an asian guy... that... well is asian, and a german guy with a profile pic of a girl... xD, you can get to know, I've been playing in almost every kind of server, from a normal valve Control Points server, to a Death Run server hosted by nice admins. Also, you can get to some weird servers, that are full of bots, or idle people, but well, that's something that happens sometimes. 2. Hats... 3. The community is half good, and half bad, I mean you get to know nice players, and some funny servers to just have fun, and other servers to completely destroy the enemy team, but since mannconomy update, now there is another market for all the things you can have and get, BUT you need items to do it, like keys and , and they have prices, and a lot of more things that I don't want to get into it... I mean, yeah I used the market, tf2outpost, and trade.tf, but I don't care about prices or those things, If I want a thing, I GET THE THING, no matters what is the price for it... So I just skip this part, but if you wanna get into it, you will need to use backpack.tf 4. Last thing, this game saved my life, with the friends I got from it, I must say thank you for it, if you have a history, just ing add me and hang me with me for a while, maybe I can even be your new friend (?) 5. Hats.
Iago {Team Captain};-;After playing this game for nearly 3 years, I still love going on it every single day. This is by far the best game out their, and, since it's free to play, you're out of excuses to not try it!
Asasill;-;One of the best free to play game, with good graphics and... All in it is fantastic.
Andy Misandry;-;When Team Fortress 2 was released in 2007, it was the result of nine years of development. It's now seven years later, and development hasn't actually stopped. A wealth of gamemodes, weapons, and gameplay adjustments later, Team Fortress 2 is less intricately well-balanced, but is still as exciting and funny as it ever was. Going free-to-play was also a smart decision, I feel, as the expanded player-base means you'll never go without a match. Absolutely recommended.
jesux11;-;Best Team based hat simulator there is
Inquisitor Wub-Wub;-;YATATATATATATATA YATATATATATA KAABOOM KAABOOM all of u r ded 10/10 Would Heavy again.
Hispanic Jew;-;Words don't even begin to describe how incredible this game is! I have more hours on my main account ;D But! It's alot of fun :) <3
Jak2Beast;-;Team Fortress 2 does an amazing job of creating very specialized classes for every type of player. Whether you're the type who likes to attack from afar, charge into battle, or even go undercover, TF2 has you covered. Since every character has exaggerated features based on their play style, I immediately understood each character from their look. For example, the Spy's slender and mysterious physique told me he wasn't the strongest, but he was probably stealthy. Since the name of the game is TEAM Fortress 2, the TEAM is a major part of it. To be successful, you need every class on the field. Sure there will be a few of a certain class, but a team full of snipers won't do any good if you don't have someone looking outside of a scope once in a while. One of the main problems a lot of people have with the game is Auto-Balance; spreading people around to fill empty spots on the other team. It annoys me a lot of the time, but it makes it fair. Sure you might've just scored 2 caps and someone else is about to make the third when you switch, but it is for the good. It's just a game, right? TF2 constantly makes me laugh, whether it's the Heavy's quote, "POOTIS-PENSER HERE," or the Medic's quote, "OOPS, zat was not medicine!" If there is some sort of campaign, I haven't heard about it (at least for single player), but it makes up for it. Best of all, it's free, and you can conga while wearing a hat. Pros: Fun for all player-styles Hilarious dialogue and art style Straightforward and easy to pick up Conga Cons: Team Auto-balance sometimes No real storyline or single player campaign
Gato-hy.;-;Basic free to play game, will keep you entertained for many days and years to come. Great game to play with friends or to make new friends. Also if you don't play this you won't get any of the inside jokes society makes. So start playing to catch up with those people who have 10,000 Plus hours.
ApocalypticRainbow #6days2home;-;I request this game to be renamed Conga of Duty: Advanced Breadfare. 11/10
Munster Frisbee;-;Great F2P game
Wolfie;-;Fun game, constant updates, many jokes, great community makes this the best game ever!
DancingBLUESQUEED;-;Very fun and addictive FPS, also its free!
The Ice Cube;-;This game is one of the best games ever made and is a very popular one. Not like Team Fortress Classic, this game has taunts, more items, cosmetics, hats and even Steam Trading (Which I don't really use these days, but whatever). Almost all of my friends have this game (Which is like 40) and I sometimes even play with some of them (Not always). I rate it 9/10. The only problem is the maps. I have to go to special servers like trading servers to see some new maps or download maps from Game Banana, because otherwise I will see the same maps all the time. But the rest of the stuff is good :)
Der Sirion;-;Best online multiplayer game ever is the best online multiplayer game ever.
XDALL (FTW);-;this game is fun all of the time and really has a lot of houmer in it.
[Symmetry];-;I didn't remember clearly, what were my first thoughts when I started to play this game. But now-2 years and nearly 1000 hours later- this is the best game I have ever played. Why? Because it's fun. Everybody can find his/her main character from the nine and play with the others as a TEAM. Oh, and you can earn money with it.
sebastian.ohrt;-;its a awesome game with many great weponds and maps.
Captain Potato;-;Great game. Enjoy playing it with friends and some servers are very interesting.
Shot3x;-;one of the greatest game ever
AssassinSG;-;Team Fortress 2 is awesome. You can play lot of gamemodes and have fun with friends and if you are lucky, you can get cool items. There are characters with their unique abilities.
Sauerkrautbaum;-;The world's most popular hat simulator. ...and an awesome game as well.
liz the good luck cricket;-;i like this game a lot it is really cool also: bunny hats
*JC*JohnConner;-;It's A Great Game
Untracker Gaming;-;This game kicks  in more ways then 7. What more can I say, after all, 7 different kinds of  kicking is enough to buy the game- BUT WAIT, IT'S FREE!! Team Fortress 2 is one of the most played games on Steam and it's not a surprise. It's a FPS with a cartoon-like twist! The more and more you play it the more and more you unlock new things. After a while you just get so caught up into it and BOOM. No life :3. But in all seriousness, I highly reccomend this game for it's extreme balance between players. It doesn't matter if you're a F2P or a P2P, the weapons are always equal. The cosmetics however... different story. All in all, 10/10 stop reading this and go get Team Fortress 2! See you online :L
konggary;-;Definitely a game.
Mr. Hell;-;so much cringe, have to voice_enable 0
twootle_;-;This game is the game of my life. It is amazing and I love it because it's ALL multiplayer and its really fun. It gets hard when you just start, but its F2P which is good and I'll hope you like it! THUMBS UP
Sir Derp;-;A very addictive and fun Fps shooter where you fight against cod s and "1v1  at m8 bro ill rekt u" and cod kids trying to 360 noscope and shoot through glass In other words every once in a while (maybe even often) you'll encounter a aimbotter,speedhacker and much more on the non secure servers, but tf2 is still a great game and next thing you know you'll be in a randomizer gamemode holding a bazzar bargin as a heavy that can build dispensers
Desperox;-;I bought this back when it was $20. Now it's free. I am OK with this because hats. 10/10 Would play even if Valve could count to 3.
Kah hong;-;Absolutely and undisputedly the best free fps game out there for pc . Excellent replay value and you will never get tired of it . Constant updates and new weapons and engaged in a never-ending thirst for blood battle:D keeps u hooked onto this game
{SIR} John Snow Dies;-;this game is so much fun
GreenDragon;-;Best Game ive ever Played :)
Slips;-;You can say alot about TF2. But you can't say that it isn't fun. This game is most certainly a perpetual case of fan-service, but in doing this, it's kept itself alive and has only grown in relevance.
kickrider999;-;This is probably the best free to play game! If it costed money it would cost 100$ for the fun, graphics, characters and classes!
Lui got banned;-;The First and the best game a ever played on steam(P/S:after watch dogs) BEST GAME EVER ES!!!!!
Hipster Trash;-;Ruined my life, and my bank account. 11/10 would pootis again
DRUNK;-;Idk what to say, but I like this game, It makes me happy while playing it.
Gunner Reptile;-;This should be in every steam users game libary
TheRedDragon;-;this game is awesome
Racxaz;-;Pootis. Nope.
Space Bee[Armadillo];-;This game has changed my life and I'm never going back to the none game playing nerd I was before
Goose;-;I only played for a little, but it was good.
The Dude;-;It's ok.
MesS T1 K0;-;Nice game
Cloud;-;Im just gonna say that this game is awesome you can trade,you can collect items and you can have fun.1 advice if youre under 10 dont play this game people are gonna laugh at you if they hear youre voice and theyre gonna kill you lots of times untill you quit playing.Have fun :)
Poor Pootis;-;If you ask me whats my status about me when im playing this game with my total play time Q: wow you have a lot of play time O_O how about your school A: Ded Q:how about your dream? A: Ded Q:how about your study? A: Ded Q:how about your money you've wasted on visual items? A: Ded Q: how about your lunch money A: Ded used it for buying keys Q: why is your bp value only 1.88 buds? A: 1. i got scammed alot of time 2. 30% people i trade use some trading Exploit 3. lots of Newbie asking free item nonstop
Demoham;-;Awesome game :) short and simple. But ples do better on the updates valve >.>
Lobsters are People too;-;Best Hat Simulator 2014 Heavy/10
Sir Penguin, Master of Evil;-;I love this game. I really do. That's why I have over 1,000 hours on it. Every single thing about it is great. But, the one, SINGLE, thing that makes me hate it is the freaking people who play it. There is a select amount of people who are good, but about, I say, 80% of the people who play it are either: screaming 5 year olds, trollers who wont shut up, hackers who ruin the entire game for everyone, people who think they are better than everyone, and last just your classical . I'm sorry if I'm sounding harsh, but this is how I see it. I just needed to say this and this is the only place I could think of. Thank you for reading and good day.
Bear;-;It be a fine game lassie
money face;-;Fantastic game with focus on gameplay over cosmetics
Gyro;-;Players of TF2 are open to the following: --covering -Being hit in the face with a wrench -Drunken demolitions experts -Radioactive energy drinks -Conga lines -Square dances -Pyromaniacs -Hats. Many hats. Oh, so many hats. -Being slapped by a fish -Loss of sleep -Questionable experience with questionable weaponry -Having your bones sawed in half -Visiting a little girl's wonderland -Making bread -Getting hit in the face with bread -Wearing stylish outfits -Wearing glowing hats -Becoming a knight If you have experienced any of these things while playing TF2, you played it right.
guguloi;-;This is one of the few shooters where teamwork > individual skill.Also there are 9 very fun cartoonish characters out there,each one with their own advantages and disadvantages + lots of weapons => many different playstyles. If you're tired of mindless shooters where USA is the hero and bam bam...give a try to team fortress 2.
The Blazing rapeist;-;great game any body would like
ConnorAKAthor377;-;Amazing game, a class for everybody's style of gameplay, really nicely done. Probablly one of the very few good multiplayer games out there
Cyb3r_M@lev0lenc3;-;I recommend this game.
Moonbeam - Gone Until August 4;-;The best war-based hat simulator of the 21st century.
Three Dog;-;Don't play this game unless you have a lot of money to burn.
CyborgParrot;-;This is like a Disney/Dreamworks Movie directed by Quentin Tarantino (if there ever was one). 10/10 Hats
Totes MaGoats ();-;Really good it is practically a time killer. when you are bored you can play it
Santo98;-;Like a WB cartoon. Except you get to shoot them in the head.
marcusMLG;-;Hats or suck
Warden keeper of dragon souls;-;realy fun awsome game
Ritz;-;I got stabbed by a Frying Pan that was Gold. 10/10
"Thor";-;After so many years it is still addictive and fun to play
Cokane;-;+10/10 Best game every good for trading just sitting there or just wanting to murder people this would be the game for you. :)
Madman;-;hats
RencKy;-;BEST GAME EVAH an must play 101% positivly sure :D
RKBooby;-;It's a nice game.The characters are good and the gameplay.AAnd you also can customize your characters with weapons and hats.I like this game
SolarLeaf;-;Great game. It has me hooked.
xXB3RR13ZXx;-;I swear to god I have no idea what happened..I..I just heard about it from a friend.. "It is a good game" he said.. "it is free" he said. But it wasn't free. Oh god it wasn't free. The cost was my soul and my social life. I don't know...I.. It was just so fast..I clicked ran and then..the hats.. THE HATS OH GOD THE HATS! Do not play this game..DO NOT. PLAY. THIS. GAME.
Cute Doggo;-;I like to be the medic.
zest #new comp;-;Awesome game, so many different game modes and different ways to play the game!
[V!P] halofreak61;-;10/10 would conga again "10 out of 10, now when do i get paid again?"-IGN
Sir Bungleston III;-;Just getting started but very (x73) good game! Already starting to ruin my life.
Odss [Srgus];-;Keep calm & trade hats! When i've start playing this game - it was a funny cooperative-fps. Today it's just a free2play wardrobe simulator
Arbiter;-;pootis 10/5 MLG 360 NOSCOPE SWAG AN HATS
[Aimnot.exe] |  Crow767;-;This game is just amazing ,i spent a lot of time in my life in this game ,10/10 ,best Valve's game mates . Various game mod made by community could be find in Team Fortress ,all of them are wonderful . I recommend this game because it's playable with a lot of your friends , there is a lot of community contributions . i can't say anythings else ,this game is just perferct !
lumpty rex;-;A scrub is a guy who thinks he's fly And is also known as a buster Always talkin' about what he wants And just sits on his broke  So (no) I don't want your number (no) I don't want to give you mine and (no) I don't want to meet you nowhere (no) I don't want none of your time and (no) [Chorus:] I don't want no scrub A scrub is a guy that can't get no love from me Hanging out the passenger side Of his best friend's ride Trying to holler at me I don't want no scrub A scrub is a guy that can't get no love from me Hanging out the passenger side Of his best friend's ride Trying to holler at me But a scrub is checkin' me But his game is kinda weak And I know that he cannot approach me Cuz I'm lookin' like class and he's lookin' like trash Can't get wit' no deadbeat  So (no) I don't want your number (no) I don't want to give you mine and (no) I don't want to meet you nowhere (no) I don't want none of your time (no) [Chorus] If you don't have a car and you're walking Oh yes son I'm talking to you If you live at home wit' your momma Oh yes son I'm talking to you (baby) If you have a shorty but you don't show love Oh yes son I'm talking to you Wanna get with me with no money Oh no I don't want no (oh) No scrub No scrub (no no) No scrub (no no no no no) No scrub (no no)
KebabScout;-;Great and fun game to play, BUT I GOT TO BUY THESE CRATES - Dj ster.
Derp-A-Chu;-;Before u got this game u had a life, money, and a wife. After u got it, your wife left u, u spent hundreds of dollars on imaginary loot, and your life is ruined. YAH!
Xiao;-;u click on people with hats
The_0ccurrence;-;Probably the best game ever made. It takes up way more of my life than I wish it did, but whatever.
AltrA;-;This is the most fun you can have in your life and i highly recommend it to anybody.
Imposibear;-;I AM BRUCE LEE
oli1546;-;I love this game, and strongly recomend it to everyone. I rate it 5 out of 5.
SpinninMonkey;-;Welcome to Hat Simulator 2 The best Free 2 Play game ever created. This game is so well done and keeps getting updates from ValvE which is awesome, almost every week a new update with new content. If you haven't tried it yet, well then you are pretty late because this game is 7 years old by now.. but you are never too old to download this game because it's the best free 2 play game ever created and it will be for ever All hail lord gaben to release Hat Simulator 3
Shadow_Wolf917;-;I love this game.
D A W N;-;im doing this for the achievement
Bills consolidated.;-;A bit of banter
Vexelon;-;A game where what is on top of your head decides your skill. Oh and if you dont buy anything you suck apparently. 10/10
josp;-;I got beat to death by an american with a fish while playing as a fat russia holding a sandwich. 10/10
The Molesting Panda_;-;How much did you say you were gonna pay me? lodsemone/10
[] Ardemicr;-;Probably your best first experience in a shooter, but after playing a lot, you can see it is lacking a lot, and the major things you can notice is : non serious players, bad teammates and then some "good" teammates who can get the kills but are only fragging. I give you an advice : after you reach 1000 hours, quit the game.
Zero;-;Game summed up in one statement: "Fisher Price's My First Stock Exchange"
Moskau;-;I punched a little boy with my mittens and he started to laugh I just left him and my team killed him 9/11 A game I'd never forget
Vacumator5000 |CG|;-;This is a great game, I like it a lot.
Starguy"Boop";-;As far as i know this is the most wonderfull game . its fun . keep up the good work :D
Fluffle Puff;-;Great game!
xXxX_LordOfDoge_XxXx;-;Its awesome
Boost 4Skins until silver 2;-;Poop is good for your teeth
Dongerman;-;Team Fortress Hats Half Life 3 Left 4 Dead Valve Conga Simulator Gaben 2019
Rada | The Great Khan of Khans;-;I'm not quiet sure what to put here...so ill just put up this pumpkin bread recipe. Ingredients 1 1/4-cups sugar 1/2-cup butter or margarine, softened 2-eggs 1 1/2-cups mashed very ripe bananas (3 to 4 medium) 1/2-cup buttermilk 1-teaspoon vanilla 2 1/2-cups Gold Medal all-purpose flour 1-teaspoon baking soda 1-teaspoon salt 1-cup chopped nuts, if desired Directions: 1 Move oven rack to low position so that tops of pans will be in center of oven. Heat oven to 350F. Grease bottoms only of 2 loaf pans, 8 1/2x4 1/2x2 1/2 inches, or 1 loaf pan, 9x5x3 inches. 2 Mix sugar and butter in large bowl. Stir in eggs until well blended. Add bananas, buttermilk and vanilla. Beat until smooth. Stir in flour, baking soda and salt just until moistened. Stir in nuts. Pour into pans. 3 Bake 8-inch loaves about 1 hour, 9-inch loaf about 1 1/4 hours, or until toothpick inserted in center comes out clean. Cool 10 minutes. Loosen sides of loaves from pans; remove from pans and place top side up on wire rack. Cool completely, about 2 hours, before slicing. Wrap tightly and store at room temperature up to 4 days, or refrigerate up to 10 days
TC Georgebaii;-;Can eat sandviches to gain health. 10/10
Fcis;-;Too much fun... :D
PSI Wind;-;Is there really any reason you aren't playing this? You're on Steam, this game is basically a requirement to own. Just make sure to buy an item in the shop to become a premium member.
TheGameScoot;-;Awesome Game Download it It may take all day but itll pay off
schneblume;-;I only just got this game and I really like it. Super enjoyable and always fun, even if you get killed over and over. It's not a game that makes me rage when I die, because it's just fun no matter what. Team Fortress 2 is definitely one of my favorite games on Steam.
matt9moons;-;it is so much fun becuase it never end
Scratto;-;pro: - hats con: - not enough hats
xotic Lime [];-;Looking for a awsome game to play? Of course you are so come play tf2! Why play a stupid looking game you say to your computer monitor. Well have you just played a game or on a server that had only friendly and repuable people? Well tf2 is just that exept the repuable part xD. This game offers great game play and solid mechanics. If you just think that you're just not that type of pub person who wants to tryhard all the time (Im talking to all of you spam soldiers -_-) valve offers the great system of trading in tf2 where you can explore items and see their true value to others. The game also offers a variety of classes to play as, 9 to be exact. From run and gun to stand still and snipe this truely gives everyone a well - deserved spot to play in. Overall 10/10 IGN Would play again 100% Recomended no reason to not give this game a try since it's free.
? Rottytops;-;i recommend this game but, don't play it if you're 5 for the love of god T_T messes with my sleep BUT IDC I HAT SLEEP WOOHOO!!
CNL!;-;I play this game and it's highly addicting. New updates and weapons are a plus! Runs super well on my computer! A game that you must play!
FreeLynx;-;An amazing FPS that's really addictive! It's a very well built shooter with a trading aspect that's free to play. I'd say it's better than the Call of Duty Franchise.
Frosty Charizard;-;i love this game
TheBlazing01;-;Team Fortress is such a fun and enjoyable game. Its weapons, gameplay, balance and reliance on teamwork all work together in perfect harmony. With 7 Gamemodes, 9 classes, tonnes of weapons and maps, TF2 is such a great game, both from its great sense of balance and comical gameplay. Step aside Battlefield and COD, TF2 is the game to play! TF2 isn't your usual FPS, its 9 classes all have unique weapons, tactics, advantages and disadvantages. These classes include the quick, fast Scout, the rocket firing Soldier, the flamethrowing Pyro, the grenade lobbing Demo, the bullet tanking Heavy, the sentry building Engineer, the ally healing Medic, the headshoting Sniper and the backstabbing Spy. Each Class counters and is countered by another class. TF2 is a masterpiece of a game and is still being updated. What are you waiting for? GO PLAY TF2 NOW! ITS FREE!
ArmedDarkly;-;love this game so much, this is such a well balanced game, there is no OP weapons cause there is always a anti weapon, and anti class for each character in this game,this game takes alot more skill then a run and gun game anyday,plus the game gives back to you when you play so its a win win :D
TURDY DUMP;-;When I was growing up in the white trash apartment complex in the 90s, I often spent my days playing outside. I would catch toads, fish, and bugs and often keep them as pets. One day my mother burned my face with a cigar. A few years ago my brother and I were fishing. We caught a catfish and as we were cleaning and gutting it, we noticed a pair of human infant feet in the catfish's stomach contents. More importantly, this taught me a valuable lesson about not running on floors covered in ice or human excrement.
]][[;-;Playing this game you should remember few thing 1.Hat 2.Hat with AWESOME effect on it 3.Golden weapons (aussies) 4.Don't wear the GIBUS D: ^ ^
Mr. Dr. Scientist;-;Nice free-to-play online game from Valve, that based on a team work. You can play for one of 9 classes: scout, soldier, demoman, pyro, heavy, engineer, medic, sniper, spy. Every class has its special limitations, capabilities and features. Universe of a game is crazy, comic, kind of funny, bloody, violent, enthralling. By the way, this game also famous for it's variety of hats.
MrR48;-;fun game and lots of people to playwith
<Windows7Superiority>;-;This game is turning out to be one of the best Free-To-Play games I have ever played. The updates are amazing and so are the festive add-ons you get for Free! I would recommend this game to all who love FPS'
Skinny, the Skinny Pirate;-;free to play or premium this game is fun no matter what.
The Professor of Dank Memes;-;I got a hat.
Ns;-;Best hat simulator I've ever played 10/10
George Pearce;-;This is by far the best f2p game on the market.
Recon;-;Fun First Person Shooter LOTS of hats,there's guns there are diffrent classes ALL kind of maps there are events for holiday's and such, i highly recommend this game if you are looking for a free quick to download game thats fairly fun.
FreeManMeta;-;The best shooter since counter strike, and we all know how fun and interesting that game is.
Xentius;-;you all needs hats to live
Cactus;-;In short, this game gives hours of fun. It's free to play, but is strongly recommended that you upgrade to premium (you can use your steam wallet to pay for the cheapest thing in the store, if you wish to upgrade). 9 Unique classes and multiple weapons per class, you'll enjoy this game for a long time. There are also lots of different mods, gamemodes and maps.
sneak;-;Endless hours of fun. Protected against cheating, impressive trading economy, great community and well developed system overall. I play this game whenever I get the chance.
Daz-Shepard;-;this game is gud
Judas;-;amazing i love it this game is amazing for a f2p game the gameplay is good all game modes are fun too play and all weapons (and hats) are very interesting and fun to use but f2p's can be anoying sometimes and ruin conga party's! 9.5/10
adequately chilled pepsi;-;An incredibly fun FPS game! If you have Steam and don't have this game, you should kill yourself. But not before you play it.
Captain Shyv;-;What A Really Good F2P Game That Alot Of People Will Enjoy.. I Spend More Than $15 On This Game Just For Being Premium And Buying Keys I Would Rate This 11/10 Unusuals
Syzygy;-;One worthy thing to mention, one thing this game is full of, is hats. If you don't have hats, you are an outcast until you either find one or steal your parents credit card to buy some. This game in my opinion has a lot of key features that make it great. First off, there is no campaign, so its all multiplayer based. The community is very friendly towards anyone. A mostly silly game, but if you want to play competitive, they have servers for that. This game is also a good way to make money, you can sell keys on the market, or do what i did and play MvM and pray that you get an australium. Valve seems to listen to what the community wants added in to the game and will add them (for the most part). Each weapon is unique and balance. They will have something good about them but then they will have something to counter that (Ex: A weapon might have +25% damage but then will also have -25% movement speed). Overall this game is great and despite being free, is one of the best games I have ever played in my life. Im sure there are others who will agree with me. (P.S: DON'T buy anything from the Mann.Co store, no matter how desperate you are).
hellraptor;-;The best F2P game ever! :)
[SVGS]Savage assassin;-;team fortress 2 is one of the best online expirence's ive had on a pc, the gameplay can be mixed and matched and the players are very nice..... most of them anyway.
The Swaget;-;10/10 IGN-its ok. time for my tf2 story one day i was at my friends house and he played tf2 and found a strange wep.i wanted it so bad. i went home and played it. i did not care till i got my first scout hat i loved it i was tolded it was worth 1scrap so i accepted it. i lost 6ref. i went and cryed in bed then a light flickered on my game it said. 'buy a hat on the store gabe gets a candy bar' so i accepted i use my mums card and spend 100$ then gaben took it from me and give me a genuine gibus i cryed threw my pc and jumped out a window like dis if u cri evry tim
TFFEL;-;i was very sceptic about pc-games once not anymore
Torchiest;-;The best multiplayer FPS of all time.
Stefike;-;1.It's free 2.It's Fun 3.HAAAAAAAAAAAAAAATS!!!!!!!!!
FO.;-;Can shoot while looking sexy in fabulous hats.
Dark$oul;-;This game is awesome! Thank you Valve for creating this game! alsothank you for the Valve CEO Gaeb Newell. I hope you would create better games. By the way thank you because i get items, so many items. I thought this game is not awesome, but when I play it, it was awesome!
Billehbawb;-;This game reminds me of my bathtub in my opra house.
The Duke of Sternutation;-;Valve's Team Fortress 2 is quite different from most multiplayer games that come out these days. First of all, the balance of this game is excellent. Seriously. Out of all the classes, the only one which comes even close to being overpowered and unbalanced is the Pyro, which is terrible at long range, so probably that evens out. Secondly, the humour and the classes are enough to keep anybody entertained. There are 9 classes in the game, and each one has their own unique personality and traits. I definitely recommend this game. If you haven't played it yet, do so right now. It's free to play, but I had bought it when Orange Box came out.
Kawaii Desu_Lion;-;An easy way to get rich on steam! It's fun as well as competetive.
zonocind;-;this silly and unpredictable game keeps you entertained forever. with a huge amount of weapons and accesories, there's always something new to be found.
~|CoS|~ Tuckismad;-;This game is the very reason I don't own a car, have any social skills or an education, but at least I can say I have HATS. 10/10.
ayCiee (');-;Circle of TF2: Think you're good --> see people with hats better than yours /|\ | | \|/ | Spend $money$ on better hats <-- Think you're bad
Toroi;-;My hours. help. I wrote something for real! These hours are legit, I played this game a lot in the past to avoid some tragic stuff in real life. I was young and didn't really have my gaming consoles anymore because of my brothers and I had a really bad pc, which i still own. TF2 was one of the games i could play pretty well on this pc but with horrid graphics, but it was one of the more fun games I installed. I met some real cool and nice people on this game as well as people who i plan to keep by my side. The community back then was more humble compared to nowadays. You have competitive gamers who spam their bind keys with unfunny/gross jokes and very obnoxious people who are either yelling at you or telling you to do specific things to win the game. When really, it doesn't even matter if you win or lose. However, you also have those people who are really awesome and you may meet some nice friends along the way! Although you never know what kinda person you're going to meet on this game. In my honest opinion, if you want to have a game to just waste time on (and money) or just mess around with people you know (which is what I do now), this is perfect. Esspecially the mann vs. machine co-op. I mainly play that now. Although to me, the game lost its touch, update wise, and I moved onto other games. I believe it's worth a shot to try it out but other than that, I'd keep it as a casual game. I don't think the competitive scene is worth getting into anymore because it's being flooded by crude people. Atleast from my experiance after over about 4+ years of playing it just got worse and worse. You will eventually be tied into drama even if you try to avoid it. You'll be more stressed than actually having fun, I'll tell you that! Although in all seriousness, this game is losing its touch and probably isn't worth making it your main game MAINLY because the updates they've been releasing are becoming very dull and not as great as they used to be. BUT, it's a great game to just play to pass the time and have fun! All you'll really notice nowdays is...people really love to trade more than actually play. Living off as a free to play would be very tough and you'd need to be patient with items you would want, unless you got that MONEY! Hope this helps. One last thing, I am not saying this game is bad in any way. I am saying that it's worth trying and playing with friends, or even meeting people! Although there are some downsides that you won't like, such as some stuff I pointed out above. Strictly towards the community. I personally think you should have this game as a side game rather than your come home to play sorta thing. Have it as a once in a while game, because it's nothing to be big about, unless you really do not like most of the millions of other games out there. Just give it a shot and see what you think! Have fun <3
Vale;-;Can you name any other unmodded First Person Shooter that lets you play as a cocky and fast Bostonian that can slap the hell out of urine throwing Australian campers with a fresh atlantic fish wrapped in fine christmas lights, eat a bucket of fried proccessed poultry over their corpses, and then get hit with an exploding cannonball launched from an African-Celtic one eyed alcoholic who can leap yards into the air from his own explosives while weilding a mystic ancient talking ghost claymore? I thought so.
A bLuE cOw;-;If you bind forward to a button on your mouse, you can play pyro and eat at the same time
UnfunnyName;-;The vicious cycle of Team fortress 2 First when you'll arrive in the game, you'll want Weapons, tons of them. Then you'll see that everyone has hats, and you'll want these, a tons of them. Then you'll realize that hats doesn't matter, only skill count, so you'll want a lot of skills, tons of them. Then new weapons will be added, and you'll want them, all of them. Then a new hat will be added and you'll want it, cause it'll be fancy on your main class. Then you'll realize again, that you don't give a damn about hats, all is about is skill. Then when you have waited for 3 years, new weapons will be added, and you'll want them. And then you realize that you spent like 2000 hours of your life for this, met great friends, and you'll have a server where's you feeling like home, and you discovered so much things via the community, it learnt you so much. Then the rude reality of life, bring you on earth, and this game is here, Waiting for you to play 1,2,3... hours, and you'll be happy to see that all your good friend are still here.
[CotC] King Conga Gandhi;-;Oh, and if you're wondering, the new update, Gun Mettle, did NOT ruin TF2 for me. I actually find it a LOT more fun now! I think Jerma summed up this game pretty nicely... "Maybe you got like two Pyros that just installed the game ten minutes ago. They don't have any hats, they're spraying  and they're having a blast. They might even be at the wrong point. They might be going backwards to the point that's already been capped. On the same team, there's a Scout with a Hale's Own Scattergun. He's got 18 kills with a 17 killstreak, he just got 18. He's going 'I just got 18, sick!' He runs up the stairs, he's trying his  off. He's get *beeping noises* dodging the 'Oh, the sentry almost got me!' He looks up to his left when he gets up the stairs on Gorge and there's two sandwich Heavies having a ing picnic. So he stops for a second and goes, 'Two... nnnggh!' so he walks forward and gets blown up by a soldier's rocket next door... ...The two sandwich Heavies then decide to move their picnic. There's ants. 'There's ants here, honey. I wanna get out of here.' So they get up, they pack their sandwiches, pack up their lunches, and their breakfast, and whatever the  they're eating. They get up and walk toward the door to go to RED because they think, 'That spot near the A point for RED is pretty good.' They walk out the door, and they see four Level 3 Sentry Guns pointing at them. They get shot a million times and blow up, and there's like nine Engineers swinging their wrenches in random directions. The BLU Scout, at this point, respawns, and walks by the at least 3-4 statues because we all know there's four people AFK when you play this game, you go by the museum of people standing still. He walks out the door and readies his weapon, he's ready, 'I'm going to get another 20 killstreak, just you watch Gaben, I'm going to praise Gaben!' And he goes forward and starts shooting, and he gets backstabbed by a Spy that has been sitting with the Cloak and Dagger in the corner for at least the last 68 seconds." Normally when I do reviews, I turn into a critic and start to examine that game, pointing out every little flaw and pro and determining a final score. However, Team Fortress 2 (or TF2 for short) helped me make so many memories that if I actually tried to make a fair review on it, it would still be way too biased to consider a valid review. Team Fortress 2, is, obviously, an amazing game. The teamplay is necessary and going out and attacking solo may be difficult. You need teammates in order to survive and win. The graphics are unique to a shooter game and really makes it a special game. I'm not here to explain the gameplay or graphics or whatnot. I love this game because of its charm. The game has such a unique and diverse cast of characters, you can't help to love all of them at some point. Scout is cocky and overconfident. Spy, another one of the characters in the game, is technically Scout's father. Soldier is a crazed WWII American patriot. He never actually joined the Army, but instead, he had his own personal Nazi killing spree. His roommate was a magician named Merasmus, who grew to hate Soldier. Pyro is mysterious, but portrays the world as one big happy paradise, known as Pyroland. Demoman is a Scottish alcoholic who, due to Merasmus, lost his eye that is now haunted. Heavy, although he appears to be dim-witted, is actually very intelligent and looks over three sisters. Engineer is very intelligent as well, and his grandfather was a major contributor to keeping the war with RED and BLU continue. Medic isn't fond of normal forms of medicine, but is still an important member nonetheless. Sniper is from New Zealand, but was raised in Australia. He prefers working from a distance and his backstory is very similar to Superman's. Spy is the master of disguise, and is technically Scout's father, as said before. Of all the characters, he appears to be the most "mature" and appears to be the ringleader at many times. Not only that, but the game has an interesting story. I would not like to get too detailed with it. However, it makes little to no sense but is still funny, engaging, and gives TF2 much more depth. There is also a storyline that takes place a few years later where Mann Co. is being attacked, so the mercenaries have to defend it, called Mann vs. Machine. This game mode ties in with the TF comics, which explain many characters' backstories and is currently still in the works as of this review. The other comics (all of which can be found on TF2's official website) are all funny and charming in their own way as well. The community has been quite debatable on how nice it is at many times, but in the end, it's still an overall great community. I've seen people give out stuff, others mentor some of the newbs (something I do as well) along with much, much more. Yes. the game is considered a "pay-to-win game" but it isn't necessarily a pay-to-win game. With lots of patience, you will get what you want from the game, whether it be hats, weapons, or whatever it is you want. The game has a learning curve that isn't too steep, but become dedicated and you'll fall in love with it. No matter how many times you rage to a W+M1 pyro that destroyed your 16 killstreak, or cheer when you unbox an Unusual, or maybe discover a few friends or learn a few things, Team Fortress 2 has been a huge part of my PC gaming life and without it, I would be as bored as hell. I cannot recommend this game enough, and I hope that many more memories are made on here. Valve may be cash cows, but you can't help but admit they are amazing when it comes to making games. Portal, Half-Life 2, Counter-Strike, but this game stands out from the rest to me. Do I recommend this game? Yes, yes, yes, YES.
Nerd House;-;Team Fortress 2. Being ranked as the third most-played game [steamcharts.com] on Steam, Team Fortress 2 is probably one of the best free-to-play games we've got. Why is it so popular? Let's take a look, shall we? First off, the obvious: It's free. 100% free. This means its accessible to everyone on Steam. This is just the icing on the cake though. What really shines about TF2 is the game itself. Team Fortress 2 usually consists of two teams (Red and Blue) going head to head against each other. Sometimes fulfilling certain objectives or just downright killing each other. There are many, many maps and modes, such as Payload, Capture Points, and Mann VS Machine. But the general idea no matter the map or mode is to KILL EVERYTHING THAT MOVES! And my god, is it fun to do so. The game has 9 playable mercenaries, each actually being a certain "class". Each class is divided into 3 different roles: Offense, Defense, and Support. Let's go over each role and class. Offensive roles specialize in dealing damage to the opposing team. These are your main attack force. Scouts are the speedy hit and run class, with the ability to double or even triple jump depending on equipped items. Soldiers pack a bit more firepower with their rocket launchers, which gives them not only power, but mobility due to the ability known as "rocket jumping". The Pyro is great at setting the opposition on fire, as well as extinguishing burning teammates using an airblast. Defensive roles serve to inhibit enemy access and to hold enemies back from vital points on the map. Overall, the defensive group has the most firepower of all the groups. Demomen can safeguard areas with stickybombs that they can detonate when enemies come by. Heavies are great for mowing down incoming troops and pushing back forces. Heavies can also keep enemies in an area while whittling their health for teammates to finish off. Engineers can build Sentry Guns for effective area defense, as well as build Teleporters and Dispensers for logistical support of the team. Support classes cannot hold the fight on their own, but their specialized abilities can tip the balance in their team's favor. They offer the offensive and defensive classes an extra edge in battle and can help turn the tide of the game. Whether crippling the enemy advance from behind or keeping teammates healed, the support classes are always handy to have around. Medics are the team healers, capable of providing numerous buffs depending on their equipments. Spies are great for sneak attacks or eiliminating key threats. Snipers excel at long range, also eliminating key threats, as well as extinguishing burning teammates with jarate and providing a damage boost to teammates. Next, let's look at the presentation. TF2 has a very unqiue art style. It's somewhat cartoonish, but very appealing. It's simple, and un-complex. But it doesn't need to be complex. It's simplicity is it's strength. Everything is detailed enough to where you can easily tell whats going on, what a specific model or item is, and they all stand out. The soundtrack is also very appealing and catchy, especially the main theme. I personally have it as a ringtone/alarm tone on my smartphone! :) One of the best aspects of TF2 is the Steam Workshop. Users can submit designs for items and weapons, and possibly have them added to the game! A very lucrative sub-market has also emerged from this game in the form of the Crate Keys. That's a whole different ballgame in and of itself, so we won't get into it here. During normal gameplay on most servers, you can obtain random items, weapons, and sometimes crates, and taunts....through the item drops system. You can only receive so many drops per week, and you will get them randomly as you play. You can use these items and weapons to customise your mercenary's loadout, or you can use them to craft other items, hats, and weapons. You can take multiples of items and craft them into Scrap, then Reclaimed Metal, then Refined Metal. You can then use these metals to craft specific class weapons/items, among other things. The crafting system is simple yet robust, with lots of possiblities. Some of it is very luck based. You can take some very common items and end up crafting a super rare hat or gun worth a lot of moolah on the Steam Market! All-in-all, Team Fortress 2 is just a very fun game. Endless entertainment awaits when you start up this game, especially if you play with friends on your favorite server. Probably the best free-to-play game on Steam. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=383235670 Highly Recommended Be sure to check out Nerd House Gaming for more reviews!
Mr Squiggles;-;How to play Team Fortress 2: Be polite, Be efficient, Have a pan to kill everyone you meet.
pacsomepuppes;-;> I was only 10 years old. > I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. > I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. > Then I got my first hat, The gibus. > Suddenly everything changed. > I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' > I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. > I had so many hats, I loved them all. > But then someone traded me, I accepted. > They offered an Unusual for all my hats. > It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. > But no Unusual, He scammed me. > I lost it all. > I was so sad I cried for hours. > Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. > I went to bed after praying. > I felt warm. > I looked behind me, It was Gaben! > He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning Team Captain. > Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning Team Captain and I was naked. > I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. > Hats are love. Hats are life. TF2: 11/10 Best hat simulator 1981 Overall, I'd give this game 9 out of 10 Gabe Narwalls Shoutout to ObsidianObelisk17 for making a youtube vid of this Showout to TheDisableBore for making a comic of this I cringe re reading this :smug:
Flexi;-;Ruined my life and cost me over 500. 10/10 would recommend to friends and family
Special;-;Team Fortress 2 is the most realistic hat simulator created to date. There is absolutely no other simulator quite like this one. The first time you start the simulator, you join a server where you can play a minigame where you show off your hats and items. If you kill a person three times in a row in the minigame, you get your very first hat: the Gibus. This is where it really starts; To play the simulator correctly, you have to spend money in the market place, made by Valve. After that, while you play the minigame, you can find hats which you can trade for, or collect! There is many other people who wants to collect and trade hats, just like you! After you collect enough items and/or hats, try joining a trade server! There, the REAL fun begins! Good luck, and beware of ending up poor!
The Geezz [MicS];-;My experience is fairly limited, I don't play many games, but I do think TF2 is fun, and with the right group of people, its hilarious!
Omi-Box;-;A money waster A GREAT money waster!
Plugger;-;Good FPS game, probably best Free game I have ever seen.
On Vacation 14 days;-;I had something called "Life" but then I found this game.
Headsquasher;-;I'd say something like "hats off to this game", but some people might be offended by that.
Krieg The Psycho;-;100/100 Perfect For Any One Who Likes Shooting,getting new items,FPS/TPS In My Words I Love This Game
xXWillTheDragonXx;-;i saw a spy stab a spy who just stabbed a spy who was going to stab a spy. 10/10
reut;-;All my life I wanted to be a pro...a warrior and I just couldn't succeed.But then,I found it.The fate of the world was now in my hands,a weapon designed by the gods of pootis,a true amazing weapon that would aid me in every battle that I would ever be in it was...........the phlog.This weapon was made for me,but only those with true power could use this righteous glory of pure holiness that is this weapon.The beauty of this weapon gives me a hardcore erection that can not and will not be tamed.People yell and hate on me because I wield the power of the almighty.Not only is the weapon a very balanced item,but it represents life..time...and humanity.The mechanical look of the phlog represents us...as humans it shows that we are gears turning endlessly cought up in many things..but we are like this for a reason.You see...the gears turn and work together to produce the flame of the heavenly guards that once protected this weapon.Anyway what im saying is the gears help each other to charge and activate...the mmph meter.The pure skill and patience it takes to activate this will literally give you the power of everything,demons,angels,and even God himself.Once this meter has run out you go back to your slightly better than normal self.After having this weapon for over 10 milliniums,I finally unlocked the helment of grace and glory...this hat is.....the GIBUS.I CAN'T SAY ANYMORE OR ELSE THE GODS WILL PUNISH ME FOR THE SIN I HAVE COMMITED TELLING EVERYONE AND ANYONE ABOUT THIS IS JUST DEATH FOR ME.SO GO MY FRIENDS AND PHLOG ON. :D :D :D
B-STAR;-;You get what you paid for. I paid nothing.
jle;-;A violent game, but cartoony at the same time TF2 is one of the best games I have ever played. It is simple, but can get complex as you play more and more. This is easy on your computer so almost any computer can run it. (Even mine) Easy to jump into, but still able to dedicate time and money to. Has cheesy aspects but the core can get as serious as you want without being COD.
Omnoman;-;Hat Simulator 2012 is a great game suitable for all ages 10 and up.
0l1v3rG;-;Brilliant fun no pay to win just great
quickonthesticks;-;Great game
typical black;-;-plays game -has fun -thinks is good -realises is bad -depression -"oh, look! A hat!"
Tree_Rainbows;-;Second best game on my library. Five stars.
Fearless Assassin The Old Man;-;TF2 is a very fun game.if you like to kill and wear cool hats while doing it, you should play this. IT'S A FUN GAME.
NIGNOG;-;It's gr8 m8 I would r8 8/8. (   )
katia.m2004;-;Ate a whole bucket of gamer food while playin this game, silly me~ ;) pros: pottis is in this game cons: he is not main focus of this game
Bois;-;Its pretty euphoric if i do say so myself
[ToJ.cc]Eltolad;-;This is the classic, TFC gameplay, updated with hats. And then other misc. items. And now even the classic weapons have been redone to look like bread with teeth. You heard me. As ridiculous as this game seems, the gameplay is still one of the best. Its a balanced shooter with multiple gameplay modes and 9 different unique classes. If the gameplay doesn't capture you, the trading will. Be careful. I recall a time when I spent more time trading than I did actually playing.... Graphics: 9/10 Sound: 10/10 Gameplay: 10/10 Overall: 9.5/10
Emily Chubby Bunnies;-;I love it! Enuf said <3
Catyclept;-;Fortress of Teams Twice is a game that makes me more concerned about virtual hats then real life events. I think this makes it worthy enough to be in anybody's Steam Library.
Axemasterjared;-;Team fortress is one of the best game i have ever played. It has good graphics, items look amazing ang just over all just really fun
Andy Reid;-;Super Great
[]--SLEDGEHAMMER--[];-;awsome game so much fun
FaZe Depressed Teen;-;A game about collecting hats and showing off? I thought this was a class based game with several game modes and weapons
vntage;-;*gets fairly good at the game* *comes back after about a month* *gets rekt* i cried evrytime 9.7/10 it's decent
Grandma Slow;-;Bread, Hats, Weapons, What more could you want? It has food, decoration and explosions, just like a party (with murder and death)
Cap;-;A simple Cartoonish-themed game can turn out to be rage-enducing, hilarious, and fun at the same time. Team Fortress 2 is an example of creativity with maps, cosmetics, and gameplay. Even a simple game has a nice storyline (Unlike the Call of Duty Franchise), and having it F2P doesn't mean the game will change. Team Fortress 2 has, and always will be, one of the best First Person Shooters out there.
Mr. Gaddy;-;This is the only game that makes me rage more than Battlefield 3 / Bad Company 2.
Luxac;-;The best hat simulator.
TheRobbebas #2Rob4U;-;Team Fortress 2, where to start with this? Well, this game is beautifull for its time, the cartoonish style looks great and so do the hats (most of them) The gameplay is astonishing, theres are multiple great gamemodes to play, so theres something for everyone (oh yea there are hats) And the weapons, original as hell!!! (just like the hats) Oh yea, did i mention this game has hats? If i didn't well now you know (hats)
Syndrome The Umbreon;-;this is about three words i could use tot discribe this game, "HILLARIOUS, FAMILY, TOY SHOOTER" three of my favorite words valve has out done themselves, and the mann vs machine was EPIC, who give flying hotdog about zombies or dinosaurs. WE GOT ROBITS! (that misspell was intentional!) RECOMENDED!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! AND ITS FREE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Cakeflip;-;Such a fun and accilerating game, so many random fun and goofy crap happens while playing TF2 I have done so many hours on this game and none of them are wasted. If you wanna play a fun awesome and goofy game I recommend you play TF2.
ThatRandomAnimeLover;-;Lost my girlfriend. havent left my house in 3 years. spent over 1000 dollars on hats. ruined my life. 10/10 l came
The Chickenpocalypse;-;It's fun to get a group of Heavies together and eat sandviches together. Definitely a fun game to play.
Lieutenant- MoonJoker ll;-;It's a wonderful game that I have played for some weeks and months. It has grown on to me for some weeks thinking if this is good or not. For some days and weeks has past I finally thought it was a good game. It's a fantastic game with great animation for a shooting game. If you don't believe try yourself and see how great it is. -MoonJoker891 P.S Don't take this game to serious for it won't be fun for you.
1.3 Froakinator;-;Team Fortress 2 (TF2) is a shooting based game no dur! It's basiclly a COD game but classicified. There's weapons, hats, and cosmetic stuff. who will win Blutarch or Redmond? There both dead anyways becasue Zepheniah Mann killed them! So enjoy the game!!! And remember there's scammers everywhere!
Someone;-;Great game for people who are not 6 year olds
gameing king 52;-;bloody and super fun
Coco;-;this game gucci boi
tannebri;-;is very good its cinda futer based but not to futer based is collect items to be op so is very good over all
TDS_Dashie;-;Amazing Game. Highly suggest.
Cory Baxter;-;One of the Top 10 best online-only games you can afford to play. With it, time goes by like the wind, your friends can go on a full zerg rush against you and you can get scammed. Non the less, THE best online game you can have on your PC.
(=K9=) .... Tuskuyami;-;This is game is awesome. Theres a lot of classes with a bunch of weapons. You can also costmize your charter, there very awesome.
oaklati;-;The Worlds Best Hat Simulator! (Now with war minigame)
Bimbus;-;10/10 would wear hats
{EPTC} Mr_Jackiley;-;GREAT GAME! If tf2 was not like it was today i dought that peoiple would play it. Its a fun but serious game at the same time
Tuskanator;-;yo man i used to play this game everyday before my laptop crashed but now i've got a brand new windows 8 and im ready to continue pwning in this fine sport
[] ASMDC | Trade.tf;-;One of the best games I've ever had. Got my steam account just so I could play it, ever since I saw my friend having so much fun with it.
Trickyy-Scrap To Unusual-;-;Love this game
RandomTBush;-;Everybody should know what Hat Fortress 2 is. THE HATS DON'T DO ANYTHING. STOP OBSESSING OVER THEM. There, that's out of my system now.
Seunghyun5 (SouthStar);-;It's AMAZING So addicting :3
();-;Its very good and fun. All new players to steam should have this game :)
[BA] Baron von Haxor;-;This is a really good take on your typical multiplayer FPS. People that play CoD usually dont like this because there is no way to replicate the weapons in the game since TF2 actually requires some thinking and strategy (if you're playing one of the more strategic classes). The balance in the game is perfect since all of the classes have their strengths and weaknesses. I would reccomend that people buy this game as you can jump in from pretty much any point as the stock (default) weapons are just as powerful as any so it's incredibly easy to just download it and join in with your friends (unless you wear the Ghastly Gibus, then prepare to be called a noob).
Grunkfuss The Clown;-;NYAAHAHAAHHAAHAHA is all i really gotta say.
Pedo Mongoose;-;This is honestly one of the best games ever.
Nuclear Toxin--;-;I can not recommend team fortress enough it is the best game i have ever played!!!
Is This A Stupid Name?;-;A wonderfull game. Beautiful graphics, a variety of choices of maps, and a perfict economy for regular players.
Reddylanh;-;To sum it up... this game is fun. It's fun when you win, and it's fun when you lose. It's mostly because these characters all bring a huge smile to face. No matter who I'm playing as (though it's usally scout) I always have fun. And thats good, most games you have to win to feel like you're having fun but not here. That added with the fact that it's always being updated, so there's always somehing new. Makes this game a 10/10. Hats off to Valve and the creators of Team Fortress Classic, you've come a long way.
PAH POW;-;This game isnt worth full price, buy on sale.
Vyral \></;-;Well the game has it's flaws, but it's is by far better then most other multiplayer shooters on the market right now and in the not so distant past. Best trading-hat-game out there :D
GiveMeDatCookie;-;This Is a Good Game
Roren;-;One of the best free games out there
Ryan;-;I love this game! Totally fun as you can earn weps and customize your character to your liking! Very, very good game!
gun shoot game is fun;-;thanks gaben for this balanced game, which was totally worth the wait
Its Flamious | Sad;-;installed the game : -played like a noob at first -got my first hat, a gibus -and pyrovisions -saw people playing with better hats -saw the community market -bought some hats -so  happy -some1 want to trade with me for some unusual -accepted -acc got hacked -cried like a  -gaben came and sells unusuals for extreme low price -2bad pc broke -cried like a  agan 10/10 would still play again
Balu89 HuN [];-;Oh my GoD this awesome game!! ;)
Cory Baxter;-;One of the Top 10 best online-only games you can afford to play. With it, time goes by like the wind, your friends can go on a full zerg rush against you and you can get scammed. Non the less, THE best online game you can have on your PC.
BATTLE BIRD(Ortvinwin);-;This game is really easy to get into, but if your a regular cod player this isnt a game for you, in adition the ''free to play'' element is broken when you have to buy a key to open a box that has a 1% chance of giving you a hat that has either our planets orbiting it OR its on fire. 10/10 in adition my wallet feals violated.
Subject-JS;-;Ok i'm not gonna lie. this game is just amazing. I know this may sound abit sad but i have got through about 800 hours on this game throughout the past, 3 years? So much fun spent with friends on different game modes and i really do recomend people to get this game. come on, its free :)
tannebri;-;is very good its cinda futer based but not to futer based is collect items to be op so is very good over all
TDS_Dashie;-;Amazing Game. Highly suggest.
Lieutenant- MoonJoker ll;-;It's a wonderful game that I have played for some weeks and months. It has grown on to me for some weeks thinking if this is good or not. For some days and weeks has past I finally thought it was a good game. It's a fantastic game with great animation for a shooting game. If you don't believe try yourself and see how great it is. -MoonJoker891 P.S Don't take this game to serious for it won't be fun for you.
The Chickenpocalypse;-;It's fun to get a group of Heavies together and eat sandviches together. Definitely a fun game to play.
1.3 Froakinator;-;Team Fortress 2 (TF2) is a shooting based game no dur! It's basiclly a COD game but classicified. There's weapons, hats, and cosmetic stuff. who will win Blutarch or Redmond? There both dead anyways becasue Zepheniah Mann killed them! So enjoy the game!!! And remember there's scammers everywhere!
Someone;-;Great game for people who are not 6 year olds
gameing king 52;-;bloody and super fun
Coco;-;this game gucci boi
Camellide;-;Imagine this game as the Eldorado , Valve and the F2P introduction as a nuclear bomb and TF2 nowaday as the aftermath of that bomb . That's how I see TF2 . It used to be great . On the way before the ruin , Valve added stuff . At first it was good . Then it started becoming suspicious . The hat phenomenon was at first a lol thing , that we first accepted ; that in-game market , that however , was no good . And then there was the nuke . The Meet the Medic update , introducing the free to play . What was the reward to old players for buying the game ? A hat . It looks like a WW2 british hat , but for me , it evokes more like Valve's middle finger, pointed to my face . The community ... TF2 used to have one of the greatest and most friendly community I had ever seen in any FPS . Such perfection was anihilated in one day . Now , the autistic F2Ps who wouldn't even hit an AFK are everywhere . Is there a sentry blocking your way on your attack ? You'll have to destroy it yourself , because your allies will keep running on it and dying like the  turds they are . Managing to bring down some of the ennemies ? Too bad , five others will come on you alone . Some ennemy made it through your defense ? Then you're ed . If you defend , you'll be there forever , as your team will never know how to capture an objective . If you attack , it's like an instant defeat , because your team doesn't defend . Nor attack . The fact I'm referencing here is the team system . In every ing server , it will be like this : one teams contains all the good players , one other contains the  . If the team happen to be balanced , the goods will gather will the goods because it's TF2 and people won't like challenge . If you happen to be in the good team , the game will say  you and "team balance" : putting you alone in the team full of  , leaving you 1v10 . Let's not forget the cancer of Demoknight , which make  unable to destroy sentries anymore , and the minisentry , the invention of satan himself . That's only a few cons of the modern TF2 . The rest is up to yourself to see or to read by the other games review , as I assumed you've read a lot , but the most annoying thing is listed there . It's not a game anymore . It's valve's personal milkstation , filled with the second most toxic community of videogames .  you valve , for you ed us way too hard .
SOFGhostBoy;-;The game is fun. For such a massive multiplayer, decently good graphics. Minor lag problems; probably due to other gamer's internet capabilities. Overall, very well made game.
Cakeflip;-;Such a fun and accilerating game, so many random fun and goofy crap happens while playing TF2 I have done so many hours on this game and none of them are wasted. If you wanna play a fun awesome and goofy game I recommend you play TF2.
Star Butterfly;-;First Match I Join We're Getting Spawn Camped By A Hacker Who Has Speed Hacks, Aimbot, And All Crits. Then I Proceed To Play The Game On A Different Server, To Which I Am Greeted In Spawn By A Furry Spray. I Leave And Try One More Time. "HEY GET THE  OFF OF TF2 YOU ING CALL OF DUTY  FACE" Okay, One More Time Wouldn't Hurt, Right? Of Course Not! "Hey Does Anybody Want To Meet Up And Have Sex?" Alright. I Now Dedicate All Of My Life Savings To This Video Game. 69/10 Would Meet Up And Have Sex Again.
Nai;-;Amzing F2P game, Must try, Recommended 9/10
TheNamesBallsZack;-;One of the best games ive ever played !!!
Mobile Task Force Leader Gunner;-;what is team fortress 2 team fortress is a fps game made by valve i recommend this game beacuse its fun to play its also free and first when i started i got my first hat the gibus then ive been playing the game i found out the big updates that are coming are free but however the hats came in and made me just spend money over them but now its fun to play the hats everything is just great you can screw around in random server or you can play on real maps and use teamwork to win or you can be trading in trade servers and also try funny and awesome stop like airshots and double kills and more thats what i have to say about this game its free 2 play so go check it out :D
You gotta love his tenacity;-;Ah, Team Fortress 2... such a great game. If you don't listen to those people who complain about this game being to "cartoonish" then you will LOVE this game. I was invited by my friend, who said that this was a great game. At first, I thought it was alright, but I quit. However, since it's Free to play, you could imagine that I tried it once more, and i was officially hooked. So, whats so great about this game? It has a lot of fun and sometimes outright hilarious maps. Then, you have the classes. Being the guy who likes to get stuff done and over with fast, and the fact that I love fast characters in games, I LOVE the scout. Or maybe you like explosions. I would recommend the Soldier or Demoman. Want to be helpful to your team? Medic is the way to go! So many great options, and since there are only 9 classes, you would think that after figuring out how each class works, the game would get boring. Heheheheh... NOPE. There are a LOT of weapons other than the stock (starter, if you call it that.) weapons. There's the Black Box for soldier that gives you 15 health every hit... The Loch - N - Load (sorry if you don't like the spaces, it's just common for me to use them a lot.) in which you have to directly hit your enemy, but it does so much damage, and SO MUCH MORE WEAPONS. With a total of 27 "starter" weapons in the game, and even more weapons than just those that you can find, which are extremely fun to mess around with. Despite these things, a game sometimes messes up on a few things, which therefore makes the cons. One of the usual cons I see in multiplayer FPS games is that the community is bad, and I say so on this game. I'm not saying the community made maps or weapons are bad, which there pretty good, but some people who play this game just happen to be very rude. Don't get me wrong, I like most people who play this game, but everyone is going to run across either a troll spamming Rick Astley in the mic, or someone who is just rude. Usually, these people are probably in bad moods that day, but mostly not, they just want to either grab attention or be absolute trolls. Another con is that if your playing the game for the first time, your going to die. A LOT. This is usually the reason why some people quit TF2 so early. This isn't really a con, as it doesn't bother me that much, but one of my friends doesn't like this game because he isn't good at it. However, this game can get HILARIOUS. Such as: Backstabbing people and seeing them get sent over a building. Instant killing someone with a shovel while airborne. Watching people on spectator on the map sawmill run into the saws and killing themselves. it's what makes this a great game. If your alright with "cartoon - like graphics" and you like casual First Person Shooters, then please get this game right now. Speaking of now, excuse me as I go kill people with my scout...
_CoOKiE_MoNsTeR_;-;very good game lots of fun even more with the maps people made
TheGameBomber;-;AWESOME PURE ADRENELINE Heart beating awesomeness
CookedCookie;-;Fun Game. EVERYONE SHOULD GET IT AND PLAY IT AND BECOME A MEXICAN LIKE ME!
UnderDog I [NnR] Clyde;-;This Game. They Couldnt Make It Better If They Tried. This Is The Greatest Gaming Experience Ive Ever Gone Through
Pancakes The Hobo;-;After so long, I decided to make a review. Half a decade almost, barely started playing when the game wasn't F2P, and a lot has changed since then. Cosmetics are the biggest change, pretty much creating a whole market for them. But all in all, TF2 is still the same, it's still fun to play, challenging at times, and the game play keeps you on edge even after all these years.
Chewy :3 | LFT;-;Free fun! Who don't want?!?! :D
BlitzBringer;-;ME MONEY IS GONE R.I.P ME WALLET 10/10
Joey the Kangaroo;-;A fun game, and lots of hats. If ur new, there might be trouble starting out, but in the end, youll be happy.
Alcad;-;its an awsome game! recommended to many people
Nameless;-;Team Fortress 2 is a First - Person Shooter that millions of people have played. You can customize yourself with hats, shirts, weapons and so on. Although you have to pay real world money for hats or trade. If you are Free - to - Play, don't bother the insults Premiums throw at you. You're here just to have fun, right? Well, who am I kidding. Why recommend this game when you should have already gotten it? Score: 10/10 stars. Although once you had your fill of fun, you have to play other games otherwise TF2 will soon get boring.
Fwostyburn;-;This is one of the best games I've ever played. Its got multiplayer, co-op, and bots if you feeling bored. Its full of funny stuff and shanagans. Even though you start out with nothing, you still got the best weaps.
FaZe Weaver;-;the best game i ever played
| AF | Knilax;-;Summary: 9/10 A superb online Free-To-Play experience you and your friends will spend countless hours playing. Details: It has the standard Free-To-Play microtransactions, sure, but it is and shall remain my favorite shooter of all time. Why? The unique classes. The classes differenciate in lots of ways; some being more drastic then others. Including the Engineer who can build sentry guns, dispencers, and teleporters. Or the Spy, who can disguise as an enemy teammate and backstab them. Literally.
Jakeasaurusrex;-;This is amazing!!!
DasWesen;-;Probably the best free 2 play game on Steam!!!
Nazi Cat;-;This is a very good game, I like it so much! (Because its free)
DaveyD;-;This is a well made, stylized, team based first person shooter. Teamwork is needed to win at higher levels of play, though lone wolfing is fine on lower skill levels such as on most public servers. There are 9 classes to choose from. Each class has unique weapons and abilities that allow each to fill a unique roll as part of a larger team. This provides for a challenging and rewarding experience when faced against opponents of similar or better skill levels. There are two official modes of play: player versus player and 'Mann Versus Machine'. Player versus player is a mode where one team of players battles against another team of players. Within this mode, there are different types of maps. Each type of map has it's own objectives for both teams to achieve. 'Mann Verses Machine' is a mode where a team of up to 6 players battles against waves of bots. Players collect money from destroyed bots. The money is divided equally among players in the team and can be used to purchase upgrades and abilities for the next wave of bots. The pay to play sub-mode, "Mann Up", gives rewards upon completing a "tour". In addition to game play, players will randomly receive free items from the game. Some of the free items given out are weapons, hats and crates. Hats can be worn by a class to change the appearance of that class. Crates can be opened with a key. Keys can be purchased from the Mann Co Store or from the Steam Community Market or traded for from another player. Most crates will list which items can be found within them. I really like the game :)
Spitfire;-;hat
Pedo Mongoose;-;This is honestly one of the best games ever.
Is This A Stupid Name?;-;A wonderfull game. Beautiful graphics, a variety of choices of maps, and a perfict economy for regular players.
Vyral \></;-;Well the game has it's flaws, but it's is by far better then most other multiplayer shooters on the market right now and in the not so distant past. Best trading-hat-game out there :D
GiveMeDatCookie;-;This Is a Good Game
Reddylanh;-;To sum it up... this game is fun. It's fun when you win, and it's fun when you lose. It's mostly because these characters all bring a huge smile to face. No matter who I'm playing as (though it's usally scout) I always have fun. And thats good, most games you have to win to feel like you're having fun but not here. That added with the fact that it's always being updated, so there's always somehing new. Makes this game a 10/10. Hats off to Valve and the creators of Team Fortress Classic, you've come a long way.
Unkle billy;-;if you like killing and working as a team this fps game is the perfect game for you
[LC] BlackDeath;-;How to make an awesome game? Just make a game where you can eat a sandwich!
Dragonsmith breadguy;-;One of the best games on steam. ever.
Azol(Awayfor7days);-;this game is just incredible!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! very damn nice graphics
Ryan;-;I love this game! Totally fun as you can earn weps and customize your character to your liking! Very, very good game!
Pointy Mom;-;This is a Hat Simulator not a Hate simulator
Roren;-;One of the best free games out there
gun shoot game is fun;-;thanks gaben for this balanced game, which was totally worth the wait
PAH POW;-;This game isnt worth full price, buy on sale.
Its Flamious | Sad;-;installed the game : -played like a noob at first -got my first hat, a gibus -and pyrovisions -saw people playing with better hats -saw the community market -bought some hats -so  happy -some1 want to trade with me for some unusual -accepted -acc got hacked -cried like a  -gaben came and sells unusuals for extreme low price -2bad pc broke -cried like a  agan 10/10 would still play again
Balu89 HuN [];-;Oh my GoD this awesome game!! ;)
"YOU'RE FIRED!!!!!!";-;Ahhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh, where to start with this game. This game is one of the best F2P FPS games out there and, frankly, one of the best games of all time. Pros: Can get every weapon withought having to pay. Awesome core gameplay. EXTREMELY ADDICTING. Awesome pace. Cons: If you are new, well.... get ready to get rekt.
TheGamingJedi (away 4 a week);-;TF2 is THE MOST popular free to play games in the history of free to play games. With over 220,000 reconsiderations it easily beats any other free to play games. I recommend playing this game as it offers a wide range of game play and keeps you entertained the whole game. Other than PvP game play there is a co-op mode which can be played for free or you can buy Tour Of Duty tickets and when you use those you can unlock rare and valuable items. There and 9 classes : 3 Support, 3 Defence and 3 Offence. First we have the Sniper, this is one of the classes you can relate to if you come from COD. It is a support class and once you find a good spot you become a living hell for the other team. Next we have the Spy, this class is known for its sneaky a attribute. This classes load out is ; A revolver, a butterfly knife, a sapper (to sap building from the engineer), a invis watch and a disguise kit so he can portray he's on the other team. His knife can back-stab and instantly kill any class from behind. Once you have got the hang of this class the other team would need to be cautious. Next we move on to the Pyro this is the Spys Nemesis, because if a pyro his a spy (disguised or invis) or any other class with its flame-thrower it will immediately catch fire, therefore showing the rest of the team that there is a spy. This fire causes after burn on any class this means that even after the pyro is dead the fire is dealing damage. Now we move on to the scout, the scout is the fastest class in the game and is made to deal damage and get out due to its low health. A scouts primary weapon is a scatter gun and when up close to enemy deals a large amount of damage. It 2nd weapon is a automatic pistol this weapon can be also seen as the engineers secondary. Its 3rd weapon is a metal bat this is used when you are up close to the enemy. Now we move onto the Engineer this calls is a defensive class and can build sentry guns, dispensers and teleporters. The buildings of the engineer either help team-mates out in a tough situation or help hold off a enemy attack. The buildings are vulnerable to spy Sappers, the sapper stops a building from working and also destroys the building after a period of time. Now we have the solider, this class consists of a rocket launcher, a shotgun and a shovel. This class is moderately effective in offence as it can kill most classes in 2 shots of his rocket launcher. Next we move on to the demo man, this class can be helpful in multiple situations its sticky-bomb launcher can be used to set traps for enemy pushes and its grenade launcher deals a very large amount of damage. This can be used as a very defensive class or offensive class. Now we move onto the medic, this class pretty much is self explanatory it heals other team mates... BUT we're talking about TF2 so nothing is that simple. After a majority of time of healing other players the medic will gain a power called UberCharge. The UberCharge can be used once to make 1 person on your team INVULNERABLE or about 7 seconds! When used with the heavy this is a VERY effective way of pushing the enemy backwards. Last but not least we have the Heavy, the face of valve the heavy's primary weapon is a mini gun! The mini gun deals a very large amount of damage output (the amount of damage gave off by a weapon). Combined with a medic a heavy become a VERY offensive class. When a medic has a UberCharge it would most likely charge the heavy as the heavy becomes a indestructible tank. This game has very balanced team game play and urges you to be a team player. I highly recommend this game.
Cyprus;-;One of the best games ive ever played. (4.6 stars)
{W.K.} .Silver the Wolfie.;-;After playing about 300 hours on TF2 for the past few months, I can say that this is a very fun game(And I'm not even a gamer)! TF2 isn't your average FPS, and that's what makes it unique! It's quite balanced, with tons of different and unique weapons, not to mention LOADS of hats/cosmtics and taunts(Which is a thing I've never seen in any other game and are pretty awesome). What attracted me to the game were the trailers made by Valve and how they brought so much character into each class and after that they grew on me. I really enjoy the crafting and trading, but what I really enjoy is how much more the game is besides playing the main game modes(Control Point, Payload, MvM, and King of the Hill)and that the community has managed to make it's own(Prop Hunt, Slender, Death Run, Randomizer, Versus Saxton Hale, ect.)! There isn't much I dislike about the game besides the frequant confrontation with immature and roudy people under the age of 15. If you're looking forward to getting into trading, be sure to check sites like Backpack.Tf or Trade.tf for the pricing list, it's very helpful. :) Love it, love this game!!
SFg.l Kitt;-;You can be a fat Texas Man while drinking beer. 10/10
D4Delta;-;This game finished off my already very weak social life. 100/100
zachattack;-;one of the best games i have ever played
Isometric Pixel;-;Awesome class based F2P FPS with great gamplay, wacky and cartoon-ish graphics, hilarious voice sound track, and best of all, it's not a pay to win!
Sarah Conner;-;Grate Game Mate, Rate 8/8, No hate
the powers that be;-;A realistic first person hat simulator.
MattiGGtx (Wolf)___@_@-@^-^;-;Cool Geams
Sanic Scoot | trade.tf;-;I really liked this game, go play it and you will see.
Hanser;-;It good :)
Shadow15243 {ScrapBanking};-;Ive Played This Game For So Many Hours... I Dont Think A Review Is Needed.
Siri;-;Great and fun game with very funny characters but those expensive hats though ugh
Crazy Pete;-;Best game evar, it taught me the true value of a hat.
SpokenBanana;-;"Never bring a bat to a battlefield, war is not a game." - Soldier. a charater in a game.
AceSound | #BSFE;-;Great game and very addictive! 9/10
4Brandan4;-;Team Fortress 2 is a fun and competitive game. It has a lot of different things to other games such as Taunts and Hats, there are heaps of hats you can try out. There are nine classes, Scout, Soldier, Pyro, Demoman, Heavy, Engineer, Medic, Sniper and Spy. Hope you go and try out this game after you read this.
idiot.mp4;-;Great Game. Many hours on it with endless fun. I reccomed it if you're looking for comedy, guns, and fun. Another great thing is that they focused into every character's personality. There traits, characteristics, and weapons. As you play more you build skill, earn acheivements, and express your personality by putting on cosmetics/clothes! Another thing you should note is the community. They are usually nice and respect and try to help you. In summary, I reccomend this silly game to new players and expeirenced for entertainment.
Poisonous Pyro #SHR3KT;-;HATS N' HATS seriouslly now: so many posibilities of gameplay and so much fun with friends HAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAATS f2p and at least 0.01 to make premium so 1000000000/10
Nammar333;-;TL:DR: at the end It was 2011, I had been wandering around best buy when i saw a box case for team fortress 2 for 10 dollars. I wondered why they would be selling the same minimalist game i played on the orange box on my xbox, so i wandered over to the computer section of the store and looked up why someone would buy it on PC. I found that the PC version had more than the 10 maps on the xbox version, it had differnt weapons to pick from and hats too, i thought oh what the hell, and got the game. I came home to set it up on my old cruddy toshiba laptop and as a result caused me to create a steam account, but it couldn't hande it, so i used my brother's laptop whenever he wasn't using it. I fell in love instantly. The multitudes of gamemodes, the custom maps and many achievements to get (and i was an achievement addict back then thanks to my xbox) kept me entertained. My brother got a virus on his computer and blames the custom maps i downloaded because of it (to this day, im not sure if it was the cause). So he didn't let me use it anymore almost a year later it was early 2012, somehow i convinced my brother to play on his computer again when i found out that a few months earlier the game became free to play. A ton of my friends began playing it which made it appealing again. When i came back though everything was about trading, not many went to achievement servers anymore, there were spreadsheets, and things that used to be worth very little (buds were 2 keys and bills were 1) were now jacked up in price. I got used to it though, and adapted to become a good trader, i even met a guy who i called my "partner" and we worked together to trade our way up, and it worked. We got a fireproof diary (which i still dont know what it does) out of pyromania. Despite me finding the deal, he wanted to hold on to it. And around that time i felt him becoming more hostile, I was kind of afraid to ask him to much out of fear that he would run off with the whole thing. And despite my pleads in saying that it would probably triple in value soon (it only doubled, but i was still kind of right) he decided to sell it anyway. And because of my conversations with him being too cautious, he only gave me 25% ( 5 keys out of 20) and i couldn't really do much about it. I was angry. So i created a scheme in which i created a fake account and pretended i had some crazy amount to offer him in a spycrab (look it up if you dont know what it is) and knowing him, he said he had an equal amount (which he didn't). I got lucky and i won it and just like i thought, he changed his name and did a bunch of other things to hide himself. I then used a new fake account (which i pretended was a steam admin of something like that) and told him when he was reported for the spycrab, i investigated and found that the bud he used to have was duped (look that up too). He practically bribed me to keep quiet and i got back a good share of what was mine. He still doesn't know i did this to this day. I lost my tf2 privalages again until late 2013, this year, when i got my own computer. And this was the best time of all for me. From all my previous trading i had a ton of items which raised in value while i was away, i decided (as i didn't need most of it) to do giveaways in different servers. One server in particular (sodahappy) i met a kind admin (still good friends with) who helped me do some giveaways using his admin powers, this influenced me to join the community and become a moderator (so i could do giveways). For a while it was fun. People didn't do the giveaways for only free stuff, but for the fun minigames it had. Such as one where everyone was locked in a small room and had to try and run away while i used a /zap function which killed them if i pressed a button while aiming at them. But then problems started to occur, my giveaways started to become out of hand as everyone was doing them. People no longer cared for the game than the prize. And i got in trouble with the higher up admins because of the amount of zaps ( i had 2800 zaps in the 4 months i was a mod, other mods had no more than 100 in their entire careers). After explaing that issue and a few others i was restricted in giveaways. And over time i got less enthusiastic with it. I left Sodahappy, but i left with a ton of new and good friends on my side who i met through the server. In the recent months i focused on getting my dream unusual (which i wanted long since before free to play was a thing). A texas ten gallon painted gold that was vivid plasma and level 3 or 33 (favorite hat, favorite paint, favorite effect and if you look at my name you can see why the level) After borrowing an entire bud from that admin mentioned above from sodahappy (the first one i met) i purchased the hat for 3.5 buds (with some extra sweets) while it was only worth 2.5. This was because the owner was super reluctant to give it up, but i needed it for its level 33. After paying off the 1 bud debt i felt complete I had a ton of tf2 stuff including my dream hat and i felt it was time to move on. So i gave a lot of my stuff away and stopped playing tf2, revisiting occasionally. Summary/TL:DR: Tf2 is my most played game of all time and i kind of grew up with it. And if i could go back and change anything i wouldn't (maybe except for that  scamming me). As much as it makes me sound like a nerd, Tf2 represents a chapter of my life and i wont soon forget it.
SIXTRON;-;This the most fun game you can ever play all of you COD players who think this game is a  game then get the hell out.Anyway this game is not like COD that you have too really win you can play just for fun and have lot's of fun and it's my most fav game ever so go and DOWNLOAD IT NOW !!!!!!
Sorcerer Of Soup;-;A great hat game with a nice shooting mini-game!
Pepper;-;Get this game. It is free now, and it is very addicting.
Tycho;-;fun with friends, fun alone, great for anyone
Zoomoo;-;Probably in the Top 10 for my favorite games of all time easily. So many modes, some fun mods... Well structured classes with their own deep backstories. Humorous. Not to mention that the balance and diversity of weapons is great. No overpowered weapons. Trading in this game adds a whole new dimension for some people. I don't trade for profit anymore. Why not give it a shot? It's free. If you take a liking to it I would highly reccommend going premium. I didn't go premium until I hit 200 hours though. It was definetly worth the 49 cent investment. DEFINETLY. I later went on to play competitive tf2, which I found increasingly fun compared to the pubs in which I was dominating the rest of the server. I think valve should add a match making/ rank system in tf2. It would really help the game garner more attention as an e-sport. I think the problem is that with out these built in features, few people know about competitive at all. PLZ VALVE PLZ Due to the rumors of TF2 matchmaking, my rating of TF2 has been boosted to a mango out of a melon.
Camellide;-;Imagine this game as the Eldorado , Valve and the F2P introduction as a nuclear bomb and TF2 nowaday as the aftermath of that bomb . That's how I see TF2 . It used to be great . On the way before the ruin , Valve added stuff . At first it was good . Then it started becoming suspicious . The hat phenomenon was at first a lol thing , that we first accepted ; that in-game market , that however , was no good . And then there was the nuke . The Meet the Medic update , introducing the free to play . What was the reward to old players for buying the game ? A hat . It looks like a WW2 british hat , but for me , it evokes more like Valve's middle finger, pointed to my face . The community ... TF2 used to have one of the greatest and most friendly community I had ever seen in any FPS . Such perfection was anihilated in one day . Now , the autistic F2Ps who wouldn't even hit an AFK are everywhere . Is there a sentry blocking your way on your attack ? You'll have to destroy it yourself , because your allies will keep running on it and dying like the  turds they are . Managing to bring down some of the ennemies ? Too bad , five others will come on you alone . Some ennemy made it through your defense ? Then you're ed . If you defend , you'll be there forever , as your team will never know how to capture an objective . If you attack , it's like an instant defeat , because your team doesn't defend . Nor attack . The fact I'm referencing here is the team system . In every ing server , it will be like this : one teams contains all the good players , one other contains the  . If the team happen to be balanced , the goods will gather will the goods because it's TF2 and people won't like challenge . If you happen to be in the good team , the game will say  you and "team balance" : putting you alone in the team full of  , leaving you 1v10 . Let's not forget the cancer of Demoknight , which make  unable to destroy sentries anymore , and the minisentry , the invention of satan himself . That's only a few cons of the modern TF2 . The rest is up to yourself to see or to read by the other games review , as I assumed you've read a lot , but the most annoying thing is listed there . It's not a game anymore . It's valve's personal milkstation , filled with the second most toxic community of videogames .  you valve , for you ed us way too hard .
SOFGhostBoy;-;The game is fun. For such a massive multiplayer, decently good graphics. Minor lag problems; probably due to other gamer's internet capabilities. Overall, very well made game.
AsianPotato(TheDoctor617);-;i r8 8/8 m8 ign would rekt this game again Really though, the main reason, it has hatz.
-FTG- $Beefturkeylol$;-;yes i do recommend this game but there one problem comes into your inventory, it is the boxs. But it is fun and there different thing to do.
katzndogs;-;Very Addictice
Geniance.;-;On of valves best games! I suggest you get this game it has HOURS of fun gameplay
*Name Here*;-;I'm really bad yet I find it really fun
ITIMIX;-;Good game, I spent some time on it :)
El Furno;-;Has many names : Hat Simulator Conga Simulator Duck Simulator Random Crit Simulator Autobalance Simulator Unboxing Simulator TF2 Removed due to be too confusing for new players. 11/10
DOG;-;This game is awesome! has lot's of gamemode to play like Payload and Control Point! I rate this game 10 out of 10!
DJ.Charlie#Dadead;-;Fun game. That is all you need to know
TheAppleJhon - YouTube;-;This is great game that really focuses on giving people as many different playstyles as possible. It's fun, addicting and challenging. my only problem is that buying things from the store will make you bankrupt. i recommend buying items elsewhere.... RECMMONDED
halfwaysleet;-;My favorite game from steam, I almost have 1000 hours. I bought many paid games but this is by far my favorite and it is FREE!
Sadman1213;-;Very fun game! A must download for everyone!
funny robot make blinky sounds!;-;My wallet has been severely injured by this game. 10/10
Yo Mama;-;Great Game
Gengar;-;THE BEST GAME OF ALL TIME! AND MY FAVORITE FPS IN THE HISTORY OF THE WORLD! AND YOU KNOW ITS TRUE BUY SEEING MY CAPS LOCK SPAM!
TRUE TORBIN;-;Sup bros, TF2 is one of my favorites since my 13th birthday. Lets get started. So first off you have to go to training mode. Once you know all the tricks and moves, you are ready to play. Its a really awesome game filled with hats, weapons, and maps. WARNING: DO NOT PUT ON THE GHOSTLY GIBUS, UNLESS YOUR A F2P!
InZayneGamer;-;Great
NT2000;-;This game sucks. I can't stop playing it.
Jackie Chan;-;Pew pew pew All i do is kill people with the heavy pistol hand taunt
Vosilon;-;one of the best games online .
[EON] MuffledMasquerade!;-;Thanks Valve for making this great game! The frequent updates don't take hours and they are big! A whole selection of weapons and 9 classes make each one useful for any situation AND I just love the hats! What I really would love is that when a Free to Play first comes ( I'm not saying I'm free to play check my backpack ) they should get a reward hat. But anyways thanks for this game and I hope it gets better!
Fafa Ivan;-;Hello, All i say that this game is good game cool keep up the good work. Thank you,
Dirt;-;People always say that you waste your life away on this game but the time you spend on it is the most fun. The game can get boring from time to time if you aren't playing with friends, but you can still manage to enjoy the game by yourself.
Hashy;-;You can throw  at people. And wear hats. 10/10. Would buy a new hat.
Dj. Moist;-;Free, loads of fun, hats, play now.
FreakCat;-;played for 100 hours and fully llearned to talk pyro and 8 year old kid 10/10 i think i will continiue
Ninja;-;Very awesome FREE game! Great for people who love FPS. Also, HATS!!!
Sujikan;-;TF2 on october 17 2000121212
Pure Chocolate Thunder;-;it is a really good game i recommend this game to my friends and they like it too.i will give this game 9/10 great game.it has alot of intersting game modes.if you are fps gamer u should try it
69;-;tis game is good
BigChiefSlapaho;-;Team Fartress 2 is a gud game. I liek it.
[FD99C] Mohammed The Scrublord;-;DUDE, DUDE, DUDE, LIKE. TEEMMMM FUCHRESS TER, DUDE, ITSLIKEREALLT PRETT GOOD. FUN GAME. PLAY THIS. DO IT. YA LIKE BISCUITS. YA, I KNOW U DO. HERES SOME BISCUITS, http://fusionchurch.net/wp-content/uploads/2014/07/buttermilk-biscuits-61.jpg HERES A RECIPE FOR DA BISCUITS: YA, I LIKE TF2 BY THE WAY. WORTH THE INVESTMENT. FREE GAME, I'VE SPENT LIKE 75 BUX ON IT NOW. WORTH TOTES. HOW BOUT THEM BISCUITS: HERE YA GO: Directions In a large bowl combine flour, sugar, baking powder and salt together. Cut butter into mixture until it begins to look like cornmeal. Make a well with flour mixture and slowly add milk into the middle. Knead dough with your fingers and add milk when necessary. Roll out dough onto a lightly floured surface and roll out to desired thickness. Cut with small biscuit cutter. Butter bottom of skillet and place biscuits in pan. Cover and place on top of hot coals in the fireplace. Carefully place some hot coals on top of the skillet cover. Bake for 12 minutes or until golden brown. HAVE A GOOD DAY, MAKE SOME BISCUITS. PECAE OUT. TF2 IS KOOL BEENZ, YA. SUCK IT. SPELLING. WHACHU GOT. YOYOYOYOYOYOYO!!!!!!!!!!!111
DL_Drill.NB;-;Team Fortress 2 is a follower of the Team Fortress Classic game. The game itself is very unique, both in artstyle and it's miscellaneous functionalities. I wouldn't say this game is original though, we've seen fighting games where you can fight between 2 teams and pick characters, etc. However, the extras included in this game are awesome, the items, the trading, the character design, etc. I wouldn't doubt that this game would be of interest to you, because the game is very accepted and very popular, which there's no doubt about, but overall, this is just Team Fortress 2 , there's not really any other way to explain the game properly! I'd advice you to buy this game if you like coming home from work or school, and just leaving it on the shelf while you play this game, because you'll completely forget about it - which can be both good and bad at the same time. Story 6/10 Soundtrack 6/10 Atmosphere 4/10 Scenery 6/10 Characters 8/10 Graphics 7/10 Overall 6.5/10 Unique, but also not unique
Software2;-;So much fun. When you start you may not like it, but when you start to go into trading and such you will be attached to this game like feces on the side of a toilet. (As in, it will stick to you until you figure out how to stop)
Gift me rocket league im poor;-;ing ruined my life- 11/10. Also mlg 3dank5you hat simulator (   )
Toast;-;Nice game... Good waste of life and money
Androidbot;-;Simplistic, ridiculous, yet so overly fun to play :D
TheRobbebas #2Rob4U;-;Team Fortress 2, where to start with this? Well, this game is beautifull for its time, the cartoonish style looks great and so do the hats (most of them) The gameplay is astonishing, theres are multiple great gamemodes to play, so theres something for everyone (oh yea there are hats) And the weapons, original as hell!!! (just like the hats) Oh yea, did i mention this game has hats? If i didn't well now you know (hats)
Contaminate;-;I LOVE THIS GAME!! i always play it since that is the only game i have
Bot Pie;-;It keeps crashing but i love the game -_-
N iceviet;-;good game i play it alot
Luxac;-;The best hat simulator.
the friendly mineturtle Rabin;-;Realy good game and u can make some money 2
Sukauto;-;Just the thing Medic ordered for when you've had a bad day.
JEO;-;Fun game with lot's of fun things to do.
The Enchanting Female Latios;-;I have had so much fin in this game i recomend anyone to try it
Sir Von GentleDerp;-;Team Fortress 2 is one of best multilayer games out there. Best part about this game is that there are more hats in this game than guns. Yes, more hats than guns, thats an actual thing. Creative and funny dialogue, easy to know classes and weapons, many fun maps and user created content is allowed, only if valve likes it. All in all if you and your friends want to have some fun then get this game, blow each other up, dominate them, and trade to your hearts content.
Fighting_Irish_805;-;i love this game so much
barfofavolon;-;Amazing game, One of the greatest, If not, The greatest animated game ever!!!!
JDAH22megirl;-;Before I got into the Fandom, I've been seeing my friends playing this game and talking about the game for a year! so I was curious and now that I've tried it, it is indeed fun! X'DDDD What Team Fortress 2 is all about: -Pootis -Spam "E" -Conga -Hats -Cosmetics -Item Drops -Backcapping spies -Friendlies -Tryhards -Crates -Keys -Buds -Trade -Aimbots -Hackers -Pros -N00bs -Gibus hat -Pyrovision -Achievement Servers -Kids -Players who has no idea what they're doing -Other fandom's fans -Sprays -Spawn Camp -Idle -Rich people -F2P -P2P -Taunts -Humor -Glitch abusers -Voice spammers -Voice Chat spammers -Spycheck -Friendly Fire -Shippers -LAG .. and many more. TF2 never fails to enlighten and entertain me XDDD Best FPS game!
T5A|DazZi;-;This is a very good game with cartoony graphics, and tons and tons of hours of fun, it is one of the best fps games i have ever played in my life, the big thing in tf2 is HATS, it mays sound weird but everyone wants as much as possible, so if you're new, get premium immiediatly and get going with hats!! :)
Drako, the Scaly Beasty;-;I enjoy almost every minute of it. Unfortunately, the economy is falling and needs a fix. also, to many aggressive people are joining the game and ruining the fun. Otherwise, gameplay is great.
Vygan;-;It's free, you get free hats, weapons, more hats, taunts, another update with even more hats, NEW WEAPONS?!, wait for a new update, more hats, a map, more miscs and that is TF2 updates in a nutshell. 10/10 would play it for 800 hours again.
();-;A good game, and more hats
Scandinavian Orange;-;For a free game this is incredibly brilliant! There's much to do even if it does get repetitive overtime, all the drop items and achievements make it good to go back to in times of boredom. A minor issue I shall complain about is the lack of inventory space for non premium accounts, I did experience this issue myself but I have upgraded by now, with no regrets, a brilliant game which I would highly recommend to anybody who asked, keep with the good stuff Valve!
Raspberry;-;This game is seriously one of the best games I have ever played...Period. The unique artstyle helps set it away from generic shooters like COD or battlefield and makes it addicting with the collectible hats and guns. Plus the 9 classes are extremely different and diverseness makes for a fun time. With the AMAZING content patches, Events and great weapon ideas in the steam workshop this game is insane so what are you doing reading my review? PLAY THE GAME GOD DAMNIT!!!
Mew;-;This Game is so Cool
Dismal;-;Very fun game, I enjoy the fact that Valve is constantly changing the game and fixing the bugs.
NotPhase;-;Only played a few hours, but it's great fun - never been irritated by the game at all! As long as you can run it smoothly, this game is a breeze. The different classes are so much fun to play and easy to learn if you're willing to put your mind to them. Trading is still a thing but as always be careful with the waves of scammers buzzing around your high value items, if you have any of the sort! Have fun with this game! P.S: It's f2p! - Robbie
Shoop Da Scoops!;-;Good game mate.
Zero;-;THIS IS JUST WOW!!
Ddawg;-;this is one of my all time favorite games. Classic shooter, solid mechanics, balanced classes (which are each extremely customizable), different game modes, a lot of humor, and just plain fun gameplay. Trading makes it a lot more awesome, too. Get this game. It's free :D
Surny;-;help me please.
[E$$E] Reece;-;Totally Amazing Game - Do play & become pay too play !
Cube;-;It's fun and competetive. For a free game it's pretty good, though if you want to trade items at all (half the fun), you will need a premium account.
[CongaClan] Garry Gloege;-;Best hat themed conga simulator of all time.
Eddard Stark;-;suck  i got it when it was free
Swedish Raccoon;-;I love this GAME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Mediburd;-;Best Conga simulator I have ever played.
Sgt. Stitch;-;insanely fun,but i hope valve sees this: i think they should add some sort of like check to play this game,to many young kids and squeakers and trollers on this game today,kinda ruins my fun i used to have. over all one of my most favriote games ever.
The Undertaker;-;Killing Noobs Everyday
[MLG]HatTrick Patrick;-;this is THE BEST GAME IN THE HOLE ENTIRE WWWWWWWWWWWWOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOORRRRRRRRRRRRRRLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLLDDDDDDDDDDDDDD :D
Happycat;-;One of the most funniest game I ever played. Really recommend it.
The Dreamer;-;i play this more than i sleep
HarrySoul;-;THE HEAVY IS FAT
Dexter908;-;nice game competitive and cool I recommend the game Trust Me
xXWillTheDragonXx;-;i saw a spy stab a spy who just stabbed a spy who was going to stab a spy. 10/10
reut;-;All my life I wanted to be a pro...a warrior and I just couldn't succeed.But then,I found it.The fate of the world was now in my hands,a weapon designed by the gods of pootis,a true amazing weapon that would aid me in every battle that I would ever be in it was...........the phlog.This weapon was made for me,but only those with true power could use this righteous glory of pure holiness that is this weapon.The beauty of this weapon gives me a hardcore erection that can not and will not be tamed.People yell and hate on me because I wield the power of the almighty.Not only is the weapon a very balanced item,but it represents life..time...and humanity.The mechanical look of the phlog represents us...as humans it shows that we are gears turning endlessly cought up in many things..but we are like this for a reason.You see...the gears turn and work together to produce the flame of the heavenly guards that once protected this weapon.Anyway what im saying is the gears help each other to charge and activate...the mmph meter.The pure skill and patience it takes to activate this will literally give you the power of everything,demons,angels,and even God himself.Once this meter has run out you go back to your slightly better than normal self.After having this weapon for over 10 milliniums,I finally unlocked the helment of grace and glory...this hat is.....the GIBUS.I CAN'T SAY ANYMORE OR ELSE THE GODS WILL PUNISH ME FOR THE SIN I HAVE COMMITED TELLING EVERYONE AND ANYONE ABOUT THIS IS JUST DEATH FOR ME.SO GO MY FRIENDS AND PHLOG ON. :D :D :D
AttackSpring173;-;This game is great!there can be tons of players playing at the same time and its a great friend making game with robot fighting co-op.If u dont have this game,get it ASAP!
Ripped gorilla (really Ripped);-;I think its the coolest free to play online game
Why do I even try?;-;Use a primitive bow and arrow whilst getting molecularly deconstructed by a laser. Smack people with shovels and fish. Stop and have lunch whilst everyone around you dies. Group up in herds of seven or more snipers for maximum efficiency. 10/10 Would Hat Again
folkrockerZ;-;Good Game!!! thx
Holmis;-;the best pc game have ever played
Lebwon Jams;-;This game is so fun.I been playing for 1 year now and I have many items.Look at my inventory.
TheTallguyDT;-;it is one of the best games
Sweaterboobs New Mouse;-;It's ok - IGN
Sweaterboobs New Mouse;-;It's ok - IGN
b3ta ( =^w^= );-;This game is an awesome FPS game, one of my favourites. It is probably the best free-to-play multiplayer game, and I really like it because there is a lot of skill involved, so there's always something new to learn or get better at.
Serena;-;A giant multiplayer game with tons of things to do and dicover. This is not like your ordinaery shooter, no, this is TEAM fortress 2. Work together closely with other classes and find a balance in your team to what is possible and what isn't. Pyro's best tactic isn't walking forward while firing, rather airblast the enemy and use your shotgun. Gets them every time. Soldiers rocket can do splash damage so they hit more while hitting the ground. The community is also rather fun to play with, since there are plenty of nice people. Recommended for anyone age 12+
Petrake100314;-;You need to play it belive it
Popiscle Vendor;-;need.....more....hats....
Headsquasher;-;I'd say something like "hats off to this game", but some people might be offended by that.
Krieg The Psycho;-;100/100 Perfect For Any One Who Likes Shooting,getting new items,FPS/TPS In My Words I Love This Game
Unecht;-;this is definitey a game
Force (EMF);-;Crafted two wooden bats and got metal 10/10
Sir. Serpent;-;Amazing game. Whoever doesn't play this should.
Darth Zino;-;My oppinion of a first person shooter done right. This game has so much going for it. The levels are well designed, and fun to play on. All 9 of the classes are unique and balance well (each class has it's own niche and weakness). Controls are smooth and easy to pick up, even for a person new to the FPS genre. The comunity has an empesis on creativity with a workshop, mod maps, character custimization (both cosmetics and weapon loadouts), trading, and much more. Finaly, this game has something that no FPS has had in a long time, as sense of humor and presonality mostly stemming from the characters unique personas and how they interact with eachother.
TV | Eman;-;blew a 8 year old up then killed his m8 11/10 it sucks -IGN
Marx;-;Team fortress 2... Well this game. Is awesome. Its balanced, its casual it can also be Competitive. Not to Mention the character customization... Well what can I say, its friggin great!
TYPER Mentsi;-;This is as good as it gets! Free to play multiplayer/co-op game with cool characters, community maps and tradeable items. The yearly special events are awesome!
SuperMonkey0890;-;I am gonna be honest........... This is the best game I ever played. I got ths game for like 10 months and i played more than 650 hours.. Valve you have done you selfs. Just dont give up on Team fortress 2. Try your best to get new items in the game. My favourite weopen is the tide turner , that is why i would like to see a new shields , maybe something like .... it does fire damage on impact or ... when charge you fly up in the air and smashes down on people.you must also make something for the engineer ..... it is a drone that the engineer can take control of... and dont stop making selley hats .. i like it. you guys can also try to make team fortress 3.. thanks for reading valve.. bye
TryHardPotato;-;If this was a potato, it would be a good potato
Sargeant Turtle Mayhem;-;This is really fun and unique, so much options and hats. This game is like why steam is still up!
Original Ham;-;You want me to give you a review? You'll GET ONE. Hats! More Hats! Even More! A hat with a side of hat with a hat drink and hat fries and with a hat on the go! 11/10 -IGN
Papas con Mayonessa;-;Awesome game! Skills! Get good, get Skills! Forget about the hat! Play, and enjoy! Keep Snipin'!
Defcon;-;>Playing TF2 >Arena mode >whole team rushed out and died >all that was left was me and a heavy, I was playing medic at that time >I ran back to base and saw the heavy AFK >after a while he came back >'OH TEAM I AM MOST SORRY' in a voice that sounded he had food in his mouth >from what I can tell he was probably autistic or something since he spoke heavy lines >always referred to me as 'DOCTOR' >BLU team approached >'DOCTOR CHARGE ME WHEN BABY TEAM IS NEAR. NOW DOCTOR, HIT IT DOCTOR' >Popped the uber and he killed the whole team >he adds me >every game we play I always go medic and he goes heavy >he always yells the battle cry of the heavy or laughs like him most of the time >always thanks me ' YOU ARE GREAT DOCTOR' >I think he was poor since he never played other games besides TF2 >when asked all he responded was 'DOCTOR, money is needed. Must collect money, but money is hard now' >he sounds sad and I asked him if he ever saw meet the medic to brighten up the mood >when he said no, I gave him the link to the video >he was very estatic and eagerly asking me about the part when the medic put the uber part on the heart >I said heart transplants are possible, but without uber >he got sad again >'Maybe in the future' >He gave me a heavy laugh and said 'THEN DOCTOR, HEAVY WILL WAIT FOR FUTURE' FEW WEEKS LATER >he messaged me saying 'DOCTOR, Heavy will not be fighting until later in the night' >it wasn't until tomorrow he got on For the record, he referenced himself as the 'Heavy' since it's the only class he ever played and it was his steam name >got the message saying ' DOCTOR, Heavy doesn't feel well. I go to other doctors, but they were nowhere near as good as you doctor' >he sent this message when I was already asleep, I have no idea where he lives >last message said 'DOCTOR, Heavy will go now. But do not fear baby men on other team. You are good doctor. With you victory is always good. Heavy will join in future.' >by the time I read his messages he was already offline >never came back online for a year >yesterday he came online >greeted him and asked why he hasn't been online for so long >it was his mom >'David (Heavy) died of heart failure. I'm sorry. Are you the doctor he was always talking about? You're the only friend in his list. He was always going on about how him and Doctor were best friends and always leading the team to victory. I don't know what he was talking about, but I was happy that he was happy. Whenever he was on the computer he always had this smile on his face, and I've never seen him happier. He always stayed strong because he wanted to be with the Doctor >Thank you for making him happy >I'm selling this computer because we were never wealthy to begin with. If we were, he'd be here right now. I just wanted to see what was on his computer Thank you again' >My face when I never replied >my face when I was just staring at that screen for hours 11/10 IGN Ruined my life, lost purpose in life and killed myself.
Sticky greNate;-;Incredibly fun and addicting game!
-[ZG]- dazdan79263;-;Over all tf2 is a great game and everyone should atleast have a go at it keep up the good work valve!!!!
FlubberMemes;-;Taunt killed a kid admin on a "friendly" server. Got banned. 10/10
Do Not Die;-;Very cool game but it was be cooler so much if i know how to trade
Feraliyann;-;Too Much Money Was spent...
Heavy Gamer;-;Team Fortress 2 is the Best Fps I have ever played thanks Valve for making this awesome game and for it being free to play so all of the steam users can play .
Embrace the Dong;-;This game has hats, hats, more hats, guns, hats, hats, robotic hands that are strangly OP, more hats, glowing hats, hats on fire, hats that do nothing, hats that make you look like a duck-cyborg-rabbit-zombie abomination, hats, robots, hats, hats, bread, nazi doctors, hatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshatshats, and also you can beat (probably) swedish 10-year-old PewDiePie fanboys to death with a baseball bat while dressed as a superhero, make him cry his eyes out, keep killing him, and steal his hat and/or googles, all while in a magic horse girl land while your main goal is to steal a briefcase that is most likely filled with porn. 20/10 Best CoD sequal ever would reccomend to friends and family.
[ON]ThaDerpyDragon;-;This game is amazing. The weapons are unique, the game modes are fun and exciting, and overall it's a very fun game. I especially appreciate the fact that while there is an in-game store, the game is not pay-to-win, like most games nowadays. By this I mean the "weapon drop" system. For those of you who don't know what I mean, there is a function in the game that at random times while playing, you can find a random weapon or item. This means that certain weapons aren't restricted to paying players. It allows free-to-play players enjoy all the awesome weapons paying players get. There's also a lot of really cool functions and taunts to the game, and an underlying sense of humor that makes the game overall extremely fun to play. And sure, it has its glitches and problems (aghermghermGabeNewallaghermgherm) but if you look past it, TF2 is an amazing game, and I think that almost anyone can find enjoyment in it. The only problem I have with it, Mini-Sentries. Nerf them. Now. Valve. DROP WHAT YOU'RE DOING AND NERF MINI-SENTRIES RIGHT NOW. #GibusPride #PyroFoLife
[BOOTY] Yag;-;most favorite game of all time.
spooks 4 days;-;spent my life savings on virtual hats
smog;-;this game sux
Reznika;-;Team Fortress 2 It killed my Wallet, my Social life, And my dog.
dN` | unskilled;-;88/88 i swear m8 it's truly gr8
FaZe-Kirito [Epic-Snipers] Gone;-;good game, but how do you use voice chat?
Spooky;-;So I played it for a while and yea its Not Bad
Justice;-;Why are you looking at the reviews? You already know the reviews are going to be filled with "BECAUSE HATS" reviews.
Plank Hill;-;I LOVE THIS GAME BUT SOMETIMES IT IS KIND OF A PAIN IN THE BUTT WHEN YOU DONT HAVE OP STUFF
FO.;-;Can shoot while looking sexy in fabulous hats.
Dark$oul;-;This game is awesome! Thank you Valve for creating this game! alsothank you for the Valve CEO Gaeb Newell. I hope you would create better games. By the way thank you because i get items, so many items. I thought this game is not awesome, but when I play it, it was awesome!
Billehbawb;-;This game reminds me of my bathtub in my opra house.
The Duke of Sternutation;-;Valve's Team Fortress 2 is quite different from most multiplayer games that come out these days. First of all, the balance of this game is excellent. Seriously. Out of all the classes, the only one which comes even close to being overpowered and unbalanced is the Pyro, which is terrible at long range, so probably that evens out. Secondly, the humour and the classes are enough to keep anybody entertained. There are 9 classes in the game, and each one has their own unique personality and traits. I definitely recommend this game. If you haven't played it yet, do so right now. It's free to play, but I had bought it when Orange Box came out.
Kawaii Desu_Lion;-;An easy way to get rich on steam! It's fun as well as competetive.
XX CrazyHorse XX;-;it's a good game
Spyro1264;-;A great and simply amazing game, if u dont have it u need to get it.
Chickakid;-;its a great game and you should get it
The Dank Messiah;-;Easily one of the best first person shooters. Both F2P wise and in general. Very balanced, and very fun.
Gepsu;-;Great game!
{RP9} Pootis boot;-;Good game to play but there will be annoying people on there
MaskedMann;-;team fortress 2 is a very good game but some times can get a bet laggy.all the class are wellbalenced and all the different weapons adds vaiarity to the game.its free (for the most part)so theres no reason not to own this
Bubbles;-;Its An Verry Awesome Game I Recome it for everbody :D
CharlieTheUniquorn;-;Action packed, crazy cartoon fun! I would reccomend this game to anyone looking for comedy, guns and gore! The community is great. The weapons are great. The hats are halarious! 7/10
[SlyG] N101stars;-;Very good game 10/10. I recommend this game it is very fun when playing with friends, you can still have fun by yourself though.
Bronze;-;It's a awesome and addicting First person shooter game, it can take some time to learn, but it's really worth a try :)
MATTMAD;-;This game is really good because you can play in many varying ways. As a spy you could be sneaky. If you like to be a support you could always play as a medic and heal injured teammates. If you wanna be a bit tanky, though you will probably need a medic to be in the frontlines of a fight, you could play as a heavy and kill everybody with your minigun. If you like being fast and capture points and the intelligence fast you will be playing as the scout. There's other classes such as sniper, pyro, soldier demoman, and engineer. Another great thing is that you can find new weapons to play differently. Definitely recommend, Hell I would give the game 10/10!
Sir. Saltington;-;Best. Game. Ever. It might seem at first hard, because you only have the basic gear and all that, and it might seem to be a Pay2Win kinda game, but trust me, it ain't Pay2Win.
[SSC] Jason;-;Great shooter, original art style, and great gameplay. Also free. There is no reason why you should not have this game.
|LP| victim .. chained #5Months;-;1 way to explain this game? You can smack a person with a Golden Frying Pan. Not many games have that benefit. It's also a "Hat-Themed-Conga-Simulator". Play it now!
Wise;-;What is this game called Tf2 u say? This game is great. If you like first person shooter and funny stuff, join TF2! Where Valve always cares about us!
Caps-Lock;-;you can be a viking black man from scotland 10/10 im not rasict
Doorbell;-;durrbill thinks tem furtress too is gud gaem. wud recemend 2 any m80's
JoJo's Wild Circus;-;I have wasted a lot of time, money, and energy on not being good at this game, making weird outfits for fully grown, fictional men, and making sandwiches and chocolate bars into metal so I could be rich according to a made-up currancy. 10/10 would recommend to everyone. Soak this game into every corner of your life.
Sinister Sandvich;-;Not in many situations can you throw a jar of urine at a fellow friend and be thanked for it.
DJ.Charlie#Dadead;-;Fun game. That is all you need to know
TheAppleJhon - YouTube;-;This is great game that really focuses on giving people as many different playstyles as possible. It's fun, addicting and challenging. my only problem is that buying things from the store will make you bankrupt. i recommend buying items elsewhere.... RECMMONDED
halfwaysleet;-;My favorite game from steam, I almost have 1000 hours. I bought many paid games but this is by far my favorite and it is FREE!
robo;-;This game is probably one of the best free to play games on Steam and one of the best first person shooters.
Just A Regular Gamer;-;Completely addictive! I cant stop playing this game because its so fun! All the classes, weapons, and hats make this game a great first-person shooter game
Kitten potpie;-;I love this game :) DBS and DB Voogru servers are amazingly awesome :D
Sloth Slaughter;-;Pros : -Hats -Hats -Did I mention hats ? Cons : -Still thinking..... -------------------- Play this game and you will never see sunlight again. 11/10 - "Would spend money on virtual hats again"
Haruhi Suzumiya"h4ruhi";-;What is TF2? -Earbuds broke the economy -You'll never get a Saxxy -10 GB of custom Maps -Best Slender sequel ever made -Best Warioware sequel evermade -Pyros are like ex-wives All in all, its a good game.
CoolDee1111/ Offline for a month;-;This is one of the best and fun gams i ever played graphics characters everything is awesome.valve keep creating these awesome games :)
Fighting_Irish_805;-;i love this game so much
Sir Von GentleDerp;-;Team Fortress 2 is one of best multilayer games out there. Best part about this game is that there are more hats in this game than guns. Yes, more hats than guns, thats an actual thing. Creative and funny dialogue, easy to know classes and weapons, many fun maps and user created content is allowed, only if valve likes it. All in all if you and your friends want to have some fun then get this game, blow each other up, dominate them, and trade to your hearts content.
Pure Chocolate Thunder;-;it is a really good game i recommend this game to my friends and they like it too.i will give this game 9/10 great game.it has alot of intersting game modes.if you are fps gamer u should try it
Januszeq;-;I've put in this game so much money, help.
Scoutthomson;-;hats
Jono;-;It's very good game.
[.:RG:.];-;Had A Social Life *Had* Have Hats *Have* I Tried To Save Myself But It Was Too Late
Gabe Nol;-;There are only two reasons to why you could possibly hate this game. 1: You are a steryotipical 10 year old Call Of Duty , who hates every FPS other than COD 2: You only have 2 working brain cells All in all 11/10 Would play again.
[DD.S]dman3499[sMiLe ArMy][ICK];-;hard but very very fun the gameplay is very good and the community is epic
Matrix_;-;Amazing free game. It's what got me on steam, and it's lots of fun! I enjoy it!
=HouseMech=;-;TF2 has been around for quite some time now, and it is still as fun as ever, gameplay is fun, graphics are apreciable and loot drops pretty often. There are a lot of items and I still haven't unlocked them all. One awesome game 10/10
phaise;-;>when you meet your absolute best friend on the weirdest game mode possible
Walter;-;The best game to make steam profit. epic gameplay but it stays p2p for a bit GG 10/10
b D3M1G0D;-;Literally my favorite shooter of all time. The game never gets old, the community is astounding, the characters are well-written, and the gameplay is always fun. There are those that think TF2 is dead or all the people online are just sitting around trading, if you are one of those people, please direct your attention to: http://store.steampowered.com/stats/ http://tf2center.com/ http://www.tf2pug.me/ http://www.ugcleague.com/ https://www.reddit.com/r/tf2 https://www.reddit.com/r/truetf2 And multiple other sites. I have heard people call TF2 "pay 2 win", and that is simply not true. Actually, a good chunk of the time the stock weapons are better than weapons you get from drops/crates/etc. The weapons you can buy from the store can also come as drops, be purchased cheaply through trading through sites like scrap.tf (we are talking 2 weapons for 1 scrap, which is worth no more than 3 cents), or traded from friends or players in game. Those strange/killstreak/unusual items you get from crates? Those properties are purely cosmetic and give you absolutely no benefit in game. Yes, TF2 can be competitive as well. Just because it's a silly game does not mean it can't be competitive. TF2 is possibly the most balanced game I have ever played, with a few exceptions (*cough loch'n'load cough*). These exceptions are usually banned in competitive via whitelists to make the gameplay fair for everybody. Every class/weapon has a counter. While its true TF2 trading is dying out because of players moving to CS:GO trading, the game itself is not even close to dead. TF2 has not been abandoned by valve. As a matter of fact, an Alien Invasion update will be upon us shortly, and no thats not conspiracy. This is the same way valve lead up to the MVM update which you can learn about Here . Thats not including the upcoming Spy vs Engineer update. I can wholeheartedly reccomend this game to anyone who has not tried it, as it is a fantastic game and a great mulitplayer experience.
Lord Universe Star-Blaze;-;AMAZIN 10/10 once you play you CAN NOT EVER STAHP
kluker_;-;Team Fortress 2 is an awesome game in which you do many things such as control points or capture the flag. The game is amazing and the plot is good. This is one of the best games out there!
[RBS] JimmyN;-;Tf2 is a fun fps, which I really enjoy playing. It's not only for one person, it fits everybody's style. Say your a fast paced player, then play as a scout. If you rack up tons of kills, you get rewarded, and you constantly get new items. This makes Tf2 one of the best steam games, of all time.
Jezzze;-;I like this game 5/5
Cloud;-;when drunk 10/10 when sober 1/10 do not reccomend make of that waht you will like a good dogner rubbing
Zeda;-;After playing this game, I came... to a conclusion that this is the fawken best game out there.
lno579 CSGOReactor.com;-;Ok, that is AWESOME. The different classes fell different. The graphics are cartoonish, but they are beautiful! The gameplay is just what Valve does in every single game of the studio. (great) And, it is FREE. Download it NOW, GUY. OR I WILL HATE YOU.
[TRG]Tygger-Senpaii;-;So uh.. got my LOOTCRATE today. and guess what I WAS HAPPY AS I DONT KNOW WHAT! ive been with you guys awhile for xbox and then moved to pc but.. you know you guys are fantastic just utterly awesome. i love my sandvich button <3 keep on making crate stuff ;)
Not A Suspicious Character;-;9 different classes with their own distinct lines, personality, and specialization. 230+ weapons with their own upgrades and downgrades. Over 350 different items to customize with. Frequent updates, an active community, a company that listens, and extremely enjoyable for anyone.
Foxxy Marblelicious Mable;-;This Is truly a good game my rating : 10/10 (why not 11/10 you say? ) Because....... Advantage: -Good Multiplayer -Nice Community -Liking The Graphics Not Too Lag -Nice Gameplay -Ongoing Update Disadvantage: -Hats Hats Hats (not really hating but why it's all about hats?) -n00b f2ps (well i'm a f2p but i know how to play) -Pay2wins server
Happy_Mc_Hap_Hap;-;If your tired of CoD or battlefield, or just want a change of pace, try this. it's really fun when you play with your friends (if u have any =P) and best of all, its not a single bit realistic!
gnite;-;Scrubby Game. Fit for Scrubs. And who plays it? Scrubs. -Scrubby Johansson
Iridocyclitis;-;I am really good at the game and fun to have around DIZ GAYME IS AWUSUM!
Exodus/trade.tf;-;dis game is addicting
Sloth Party;-;Good game, I really enjoy this. Compared to some people i have a very small amount of time spent but i every minute of that time was well spent, Other then the loading screens :)
MicPixel The Wizard;-;Do you like Call of Duty? Do you like realistic, generic shooters? Well  YOU because this is Team Fortress 2 This game is a BLAST and throws everything you thought you knew about an FPS out the window and s you so hard that you will never be rid of it So overall  it, it's pretty good Should you get it? Of course
Jelleton (No Volume);-;Why haven't I written a review for this yet? Onwards to the only game in history where your friends might be your enemies, people yell at a failed doctor German man to help them though they never help him, a large russian man throws sandwiches and lunch meats at you to heal your wounds, a sneaky croissant screws his watch up to turn him invisible and forgets he has a son in the process, a boston boy breaks his own legs jumping too many times and hunts down said sneaky baguette for loving his mother, a confused American finds a Rocket Launcher and goes mad, fire thing, a Texan with a PhD builds machines to heal and hurt everything, an angry australian man urinates into bottles and throws them at his enemies before opening fire, and an intoxicated African-American-Scottish cyclops manages to get a hold of a grenade launcher. And hats. 100/100
vAultz;-;This game is amazing even though the hat prices in the mann,co store might bust ur wallet there is always the community market and backpack.tf. Gameplay is amazing the classes depend on each other making you feel like a team and doing your part well cause its team fortress 2 not hero fortess 2 pub servers are good but if you want to have a greater challenge play in lobby servers or highlander servers. But there are some downfalls in this amazing game the derped players mostly  medics are the bane of your good time cause they will only heal ONE GUY and ignore you while your burning and dying. Anyway this game is amazing for what it is. each class is unique and fresh. IF YOU NEVER PLAYED THIS GAME YOUR MISSING OUT!
Shanky_;-;If you want to have a great time, buy this , Gibuses and endless fun, Ladies and gents. TF2 is GREAT!
Vault Boy;-;10/10 cured my cancer
Flapjacks;-;I love this game beyond words like every other person who has played it. As addictive as crack-Rolling Stone
Jesus Hooves;-;This Game Is Awesome :D
Timythedarkside;-;BEST FPS IN THE WORLD
HollowPointSmile;-;this game is about the most frikin addicting game in the world, reccomend it to FPS fans, well i have no more to say, so, SEE YA
pizzatoppingz;-;Best free game out there
El Tony;-;I want my medal :v
RATHER TASTY!;-;love this game. makes me laff evrytiem
DataCluster;-;Had it sitting in my library for at least a year having originally barely played it (two hours not really knowing what I was doing) until recently where I was looking for a casual and fun game to help get someone into gaming. Decided to try and see if this game would work and long story short, they love it and I'm shocked at how much they've been playing it. I'm even quite addicted at this point too. Needless to say, the game is great and I wish I had given it some attention sooner.
XIX #roadtosomething;-;TF2, an amazing shooter for its age and the first shooter that I have competitively played, sadly the competitive communtity is not really big and it is all community based and not greatly supported by the publishers. It offers a really interesting gameplay with the 9 classes that are available, a great fun for the casual gamer aswell as the player searching for competitive experience. Despite the fact that it is older than 7 years valve still puts some time into making updates for this game although most of them just feature items and no game changing content. It was a good time! Bye bye TF2!
Sel <> (  );-;Wonderful game with 9 great classes. The class that dies as fast as it runs - the Scout The class that everyone can learn in 5 minutes - the Soldier The class that doesn't need to aim to get kills - the Pyro The class that blows everything up, including itself - the Demoman The class that doesn't need to play to get kills - the Engi The class that noone likes to play and noone loves - the Heavy The class that noone likes to play but everyone loves - the Medic The class that everyone plays and noone loves - the Sniper The other class that everyone plays and noone loves - The Spy The rest is hats. Buy them.
Happeleh @ yu do dis;-;Good game i recommend it 9/10 Download now if you didn't try this
Narwhal Piss;-;This... is the absolute best game. Download it now.
TheLazyGamer22;-;This is the best game ever i would recommend this game to any one who like's fps's. If you get this game add me as a friend just send a requset and leave a comment on my proflie and good luck with tf2
[P.A.A] HajsenDK;-;Thanks for crits Gabe
FloomRide;-;This game is so american; it's all like "Look at all of my wealth! I shall shove it in your face! I have wealth! You don't! I have wealth! Fun!"
Rainbow Dash;-;I just came here for the hats who cares about the game Its all about the HATS HATS HATS HATS
Generic FNAF Profile #TF:GO;-;This game is an amusing Free-To-Play Game that is very easy to play, with minimal effort. It is very unique in the sense that there are certain roles that every class has, not just "SHEWT DA BAD GUYZ" I recommend this game to EVERYONE who plays class based First Person Shooters, or likes Valve games. If you like any of Valve's other games, You'll love this!
Feature Length;-;"Pretty darn gay" 9/11 Would Not Forget IGN
Tomoyakun;-;I recommand this game because i have 2000+ over this game and im not bored of it
QuantumCloud;-;This is one of the best games of all time. I spend alot of time on here and not a second is wasted. there is lots of tradeing and fps stuff>
Sir David [Married];-;I recomend tf2 for new players to get started for othere games its the top of game you would play for fun and play Co-op and much more just play it its awesome Mvm too is good but Mvm is much harder than a normal tf2 game Thank you for reading this and goodbye!
SheX145 (Bday Today);-;boobs= awesome. tf2 = awesome. tf2 = boobs
LukeyPoo;-;Game: Team Fortress 2  Genre: FPS, Action, Hat-Wearing Simulator  Rating:      5/5  Favorable Aspects: Back in 2007, when it was released, not a lot of people had knowledge about this nowadays masterpiece, prefering to play games such as CS and it's mods. But what did TF2 have that none other game at the time could achieve? Well, we can point out many reasons, but I'll only detach two: game experience and simple gameplay. Combine a "cartoon" graphics FPS game with lots of classes, funny characters and objectives, then you'll get a different gamestyle everytime you join a match. I won't extend it because pratically every decent FPS gamer should've already played it or at least took a look, just ask around.  Negative Aspects: As every work has it's weak spots, it couldn't be different with TF2. To summarize: the addition of hats along with all the cosmetic items brought good and bad effects. The good (specially for Valve): you can customize your character outfit the way you like it, for a price of course. The bad is the unequal proportion between cosmetic and weapon updates, since they introduce a lot more cosmetic items than weapons. Besides, it was spent enough time to produce a new Team Fortress title.  How much is it worth to pay: [] Full Price* [ ] 75% [ ] 50% or Less * Fortunately, it's a Free to Play game since a 2011 update.
gauku;-;this is a highly addictive game with t physics and is tons of fun, it also is a game of skill and new players are recommended not to play pyro or snipar for new pyros dont know how to airblast and if u main snipar its all ogre nao
AtomicVendetta;-;Can't get enough of Hat simulator!
Griffin Productions;-;Amazing game, great variety in-game store and items, all around epic action. The only problem is getting everyone to work as a team to win. Too many CoD players and people who don't care come on here and play like they are the best of all time. And F2P (Free-to-play) "racism" is super thick on alot of servers. If you can manage that though, this is worth every penny.
graves;-;its ok. seriously. ive become cynical after all these hours wasted. this game isnt really worth it anymore. the competitve scene is dying and the community is just... ew. wait for the next big thing, or wait until competitive matchmaking is a thing, but then its gonna be overrun by hackers and pub scrubs.
Xire;-;You honestly cannot beat TF2, good olf fashioned FPS fun!
RheaCrossyButt;-;TF2 is a balanced, fun game that has given me allot of joy over the past year, its class based game-play and fun, fast-paced combat never ceases to entertain me, and with the seemingly never-ending stream of content Valve is continuing to produce, along with the already phenomenally designed maps, it doesn't show any sign of getting stale any time soon.
Swagboi Walter Kush;-;Team Fortress 2 is a great free to play game that I enjoy, espeacially when my friends play it with me
[G.T.N] Norga [Ger];-;Awsome Game!
Pigs Can't Fly;-;Great game.
Apoyo;-;I really like this game. There are a lot of cosmetics and classes to choose from, and I like the graphics. There's a lot of maps, and gamemodes. It's really fun.
MystiviouS;-;just the best game i have ever play
Joe5687;-;This game is just so much fun if your looking for just a wacky crazy game that gets you away from all those realistic shooters
Deadhoundz;-;A great game for fun, serious or some other kind of players. The style of the game is unique, ITS AWESOME!
Truth;-;This is an outwright great game. If you're looking for something to sink your teeth into, this is the game for you. It features multiple class gameplay, as well as infinte ways to change the way your classes appear in-game. I would highly recommend this game to anyone who like to have a good deal of fun playing video games. WARNING: This piece of software is extremely adictive, play responsibly!
-=NooBShots=-;-;the best game that i have been played before
SmYtHy;-;YES I LIKE THIS NEW GAME
KG CometGames;-;Great game
Jack;-;MANN VS MACHINE FOR EVER! Shift+Tab is my nightmare,game becomes so annoying (blackscreen) when you press these two and you have to restart the game again :).
(GG)'SIR' Oprion (In Holiday);-;it is very good with its design, classes and objective but sometimes it will lag and slowly download
Dongar Bill (   );-;best game i have ever played this game is one of the first games ive ever played i love this game so much valve pls make a 3rd one
fireballFTW1123;-;Bes gam 10/10. Plai dis if u liek other valv an staim . super spoopy with the halloweeeeeeeeeen updots. Serious time add me to your friends list if you play this game please i have no friends ;_;.
Humanista Secular Ateu.;-;Around 2008, I had this free weekend that completely changed my life. First, I had seen this game in a LAN where a colleague was playing and that was magical, he exploded a couple of guys with a single stick and then just posed in a comic fashion as their bodyparts landed on the ground. I knew I had to play that game, and so I did. Played at first in a free weekend, then bought the retail game and had loads of fun since then, at first there were no items, only the comic characters and as the time passed by, valve included 3 basic items for most classes, and what really changed my life: HATS[/b][/i]
gentStewie;-;Good game so awsome best multiplayer good hats good updates and good weapons so everyone on steam should play this game Super awsome
TheThirdStreet;-;Conga'ed past a Sentry and died. 10/10 would conga again.
QuackTheDuckKing;-;If you like First Person Shooters, hats and fun in general this is for sure the best game you can get.
Captain Rain;-;This is a must play for any who truly think they are a good 1st person shooter.
Visit to Grandma's House;-;Fine game. Not the game I'd spend, like, 2500 hours on
SoProPenguin57;-;A game that has everything most other games haven't. Like holy macarels and 9 half - crazed characters who have developed their own ways of killing eachother. But really, its a great game. And the comics are almost better! 10/10 Would get killed by a jar of pi'ss and a cow mangler again.
Emp_;-;I haven't play it that much, but its alright.
Spyro the Gentlemann;-;Please download this game! You won't find any other Hat Simulator 2 here.
[VON*]ZyphriC;-;A well balanced, not P2W, enticing, awesome, fabulous, extraordinary and the most unique FPS experience one can have
White;-;It's fun Play it
|dam sam| Tenju;-;TF2 is the only first person shooter that I can play. It has a few balance quirks as of right now, but aside from that, an incredibly fun game, from the perspective of someone who's always hated first person shooters with a fury.
Syndicate birthday in 4 days;-;great game but need more weapon
Yams;-;I highly recommend this game who are new to steam and its fun to play! Only problems that I have with this game is the amount of squeakers who ruin the fun by screaming and whining. Another is that people rage easily when killed or dominated. It can be fun at times but can get annoying later. Other than that. The game is good.
Illius[Accepting Case Donations];-;Silly Review? I tried quitting this game after hundreds of hours, turns out I just took a break. Serious review? It's an amazing FPS game with heavy emphasis on mobility and teamwork. There are various game modes, and 9 classes with strengths and weaknesses, meaning you HAVE to work together. You could do almost a chart that shows who trumps who (naturally speaking, any class can take any class if there is enough skill), such as Spy trumps Sniper trumps Pyro trumps Spy. Going back to mobility, if you pick this game up now I suggest heavily you learn mechanics of the game such as rocket jumping. Even as the slowest classes (Ex. Heavy) you never want to stop moving, meaning there is more skill than just "Shoot thing with gun". Along side this is the abundance of weapons and gamemodes, meaning that if you ever get a feeling the game is growing stale, just mix it up a bit and it's almost a whole new game. If all else fails, there are various user-made gamemodes (such as Vs Saxton Hale) to keep you entertained. And despite it's age, this game looks really good and each character has amazing personality, giving a great sense in charm (Something that lacks in the majority of FPS games...). Consider the age of this game and that it's still a heavily played game, you can see that it's worth playing. In terms of issues though there are some problems, such as some slightly unbalanced weapons (though this makes up a minority of them). This game is also at this point largely player-made as well; the majority of servers aren't even owned by Valve, and most added content are supplied by players. Overall: Great game, worth playing (And getting addicted to), but do NOT expect your everday shooter.
Kyung-san;-;Yes is very fun and lots of fun players around. But i have this one problem that really fustrated and you better see this Valve. The one most major problem are accuracy. There are some classes that when you shoot is doesn't even register same with some melee too. Like the sniper i totally headshot a person sometimes is bodyshot fine with that but again when i do it, it doesn't even register when i totally aim right in the head. Now there the melee the market gardener sometimes is work fine but sometimes when i slap a person it doesn't register and i can tell i hit that person because it made the sound when the market gardener hit. Same with the pan it made that annoying sound but funny sound when i hit someone but is doesn't register the damage. Valve please fix this
Bluey[TF:GO];-;You should play it! It's fun! Very fun. I just want this badge.
DJ Point;-;nice very nice MVM is best fighting robots because you being hero on last wave
oBaderxX;-;i Love This Game!
Wormy;-;This game is the best ever!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Surke;-;It's ok.
Armorshield;-;The most awesomeness game ever made since its Team Fortress Classic debut. Go play it.
Carbo;-;I liked the amount of friendly players who would conga whenever you did :P
Zyth #Tradebanned;-;You can buy hats. And you can put them on your head. 10/10
TheWhale, Doubtful at Best;-;Team Fortress 2 is the best class-based combat game out there. The game requires you to take responsibility for playing a class when they are badly needed (example: A defending team is made up of mostly Snipers and Spies, and the attacking team is advancing quickly. What you as a player should do is take up the role of a good defense class like Engineer to fill the gap created by team members.). In other words, an effective player should be able to adapt to any situation based on how their team is performing. I am not alone in saying that this is a feature that makes the game great, along with some other unique features like hilarious characters, gameplay, different acquirable items that can drastically change the way you play, unique gamemodes, and of course, hats. For god's sake, it's free! Nothing should be stopping you from getting this game!
0s Kat.;-;Team Fortress 2, more like Hat Fortress 2. It is a firstperson shooter game with 9 classes for you to choose, and a ton of weapons for you to try out. The game is also about making profit (like selling hats, weapons, miscs, and more). What I think about this game: It is very adicting, you just can't stop playing the game. All it's funny memes, it's fun gameplay, like MvM, Ctf, Cp, etc. I wish I could make a game similar to this.
Spotty the Gay Doggy-Dragon :3;-;is rly gud
The English Gamer Badger TF:GO;-;Really great game 9/10 Some of the best updates -Scream Fortress IV -Scream Fortress V -MvM -Smismass - Love and War This game is really amazing even though Valve slacked with updates in 2014 I would advise you get this game Edit: Played deathrun lord gaben ate me 11/10
burnedrobot;-;Worst community ever .
Fastly;-;It ok
Teen Angst;-;Incredible game! Very balanced and insanely addicting. Great community as well. Mods, community gamemods, custom maps, and trading keep this game alive even when you're finished with the vanilla experience.
The Pyro Main;-;This game ruined my life. I play nothing but TF2 and have gone bankrupt due to buying too many hats. 10/10 -ign
The Feral Hydra;-;10/10 - IGN Mentioned the pootis.
robo;-;This game is probably one of the best free to play games on Steam and one of the best first person shooters.
ufohornet;-;this game is funney and has its laughs but i get it for the textures so i can use them in gmod i give 8/10
Sandokan;-;A really cool multiplayer game to play with friends I would recommend it to anyone really.
3000;-;,  300+ ?! =)      Steam.
Sloth Slaughter;-;Pros : -Hats -Hats -Did I mention hats ? Cons : -Still thinking..... -------------------- Play this game and you will never see sunlight again. 11/10 - "Would spend money on virtual hats again"
CoolDee1111/ Offline for a month;-;This is one of the best and fun gams i ever played graphics characters everything is awesome.valve keep creating these awesome games :)
Gestalt;-;This game ruined my life It drove away my friends I've lost all my real skills My family is ashamed of me I've spent all my money on hats Now I'm a miserable man living in a box on the side of the street Nobody knows me, loves me, cares about me, every person that still understood me has left my side Now I don't know what to do, I may commit suicide, and then maybe people will see me, on the headlines, one last time I am lost. 10/10
[Cakes] Rainbow :3;-;I had real friends... but... it's okay... I have some hats now 12/10 -Cakes
Shalom;-;*has one of the best soundtracks in gaming history* *only uses it during main menu* 10/10
Toroi;-;My hours. help. I wrote something for real! These hours are legit, I played this game a lot in the past to avoid some tragic stuff in real life. I was young and didn't really have my gaming consoles anymore because of my brothers and I had a really bad pc, which i still own. TF2 was one of the games i could play pretty well on this pc but with horrid graphics, but it was one of the more fun games I installed. I met some real cool and nice people on this game as well as people who i plan to keep by my side. The community back then was more humble compared to nowadays. You have competitive gamers who spam their bind keys with unfunny/gross jokes and very obnoxious people who are either yelling at you or telling you to do specific things to win the game. When really, it doesn't even matter if you win or lose. However, you also have those people who are really awesome and you may meet some nice friends along the way! Although you never know what kinda person you're going to meet on this game. In my honest opinion, if you want to have a game to just waste time on (and money) or just mess around with people you know (which is what I do now), this is perfect. Esspecially the mann vs. machine co-op. I mainly play that now. Although to me, the game lost its touch, update wise, and I moved onto other games. I believe it's worth a shot to try it out but other than that, I'd keep it as a casual game. I don't think the competitive scene is worth getting into anymore because it's being flooded by crude people. Atleast from my experiance after over about 4+ years of playing it just got worse and worse. You will eventually be tied into drama even if you try to avoid it. You'll be more stressed than actually having fun, I'll tell you that! Although in all seriousness, this game is losing its touch and probably isn't worth making it your main game MAINLY because the updates they've been releasing are becoming very dull and not as great as they used to be. BUT, it's a great game to just play to pass the time and have fun! All you'll really notice nowdays is...people really love to trade more than actually play. Living off as a free to play would be very tough and you'd need to be patient with items you would want, unless you got that MONEY! Hope this helps. One last thing, I am not saying this game is bad in any way. I am saying that it's worth trying and playing with friends, or even meeting people! Although there are some downsides that you won't like, such as some stuff I pointed out above. Strictly towards the community. I personally think you should have this game as a side game rather than your come home to play sorta thing. Have it as a once in a while game, because it's nothing to be big about, unless you really do not like most of the millions of other games out there. Just give it a shot and see what you think! Have fun <3
Vale;-;Can you name any other unmodded First Person Shooter that lets you play as a cocky and fast Bostonian that can slap the hell out of urine throwing Australian campers with a fresh atlantic fish wrapped in fine christmas lights, eat a bucket of fried proccessed poultry over their corpses, and then get hit with an exploding cannonball launched from an African-Celtic one eyed alcoholic who can leap yards into the air from his own explosives while weilding a mystic ancient talking ghost claymore? I thought so.
A bLuE cOw;-;If you bind forward to a button on your mouse, you can play pyro and eat at the same time
UnfunnyName;-;The vicious cycle of Team fortress 2 First when you'll arrive in the game, you'll want Weapons, tons of them. Then you'll see that everyone has hats, and you'll want these, a tons of them. Then you'll realize that hats doesn't matter, only skill count, so you'll want a lot of skills, tons of them. Then new weapons will be added, and you'll want them, all of them. Then a new hat will be added and you'll want it, cause it'll be fancy on your main class. Then you'll realize again, that you don't give a damn about hats, all is about is skill. Then when you have waited for 3 years, new weapons will be added, and you'll want them. And then you realize that you spent like 2000 hours of your life for this, met great friends, and you'll have a server where's you feeling like home, and you discovered so much things via the community, it learnt you so much. Then the rude reality of life, bring you on earth, and this game is here, Waiting for you to play 1,2,3... hours, and you'll be happy to see that all your good friend are still here.
[CotC] King Conga Gandhi;-;Oh, and if you're wondering, the new update, Gun Mettle, did NOT ruin TF2 for me. I actually find it a LOT more fun now! I think Jerma summed up this game pretty nicely... "Maybe you got like two Pyros that just installed the game ten minutes ago. They don't have any hats, they're spraying  and they're having a blast. They might even be at the wrong point. They might be going backwards to the point that's already been capped. On the same team, there's a Scout with a Hale's Own Scattergun. He's got 18 kills with a 17 killstreak, he just got 18. He's going 'I just got 18, sick!' He runs up the stairs, he's trying his  off. He's get *beeping noises* dodging the 'Oh, the sentry almost got me!' He looks up to his left when he gets up the stairs on Gorge and there's two sandwich Heavies having a ing picnic. So he stops for a second and goes, 'Two... nnnggh!' so he walks forward and gets blown up by a soldier's rocket next door... ...The two sandwich Heavies then decide to move their picnic. There's ants. 'There's ants here, honey. I wanna get out of here.' So they get up, they pack their sandwiches, pack up their lunches, and their breakfast, and whatever the  they're eating. They get up and walk toward the door to go to RED because they think, 'That spot near the A point for RED is pretty good.' They walk out the door, and they see four Level 3 Sentry Guns pointing at them. They get shot a million times and blow up, and there's like nine Engineers swinging their wrenches in random directions. The BLU Scout, at this point, respawns, and walks by the at least 3-4 statues because we all know there's four people AFK when you play this game, you go by the museum of people standing still. He walks out the door and readies his weapon, he's ready, 'I'm going to get another 20 killstreak, just you watch Gaben, I'm going to praise Gaben!' And he goes forward and starts shooting, and he gets backstabbed by a Spy that has been sitting with the Cloak and Dagger in the corner for at least the last 68 seconds." Normally when I do reviews, I turn into a critic and start to examine that game, pointing out every little flaw and pro and determining a final score. However, Team Fortress 2 (or TF2 for short) helped me make so many memories that if I actually tried to make a fair review on it, it would still be way too biased to consider a valid review. Team Fortress 2, is, obviously, an amazing game. The teamplay is necessary and going out and attacking solo may be difficult. You need teammates in order to survive and win. The graphics are unique to a shooter game and really makes it a special game. I'm not here to explain the gameplay or graphics or whatnot. I love this game because of its charm. The game has such a unique and diverse cast of characters, you can't help to love all of them at some point. Scout is cocky and overconfident. Spy, another one of the characters in the game, is technically Scout's father. Soldier is a crazed WWII American patriot. He never actually joined the Army, but instead, he had his own personal Nazi killing spree. His roommate was a magician named Merasmus, who grew to hate Soldier. Pyro is mysterious, but portrays the world as one big happy paradise, known as Pyroland. Demoman is a Scottish alcoholic who, due to Merasmus, lost his eye that is now haunted. Heavy, although he appears to be dim-witted, is actually very intelligent and looks over three sisters. Engineer is very intelligent as well, and his grandfather was a major contributor to keeping the war with RED and BLU continue. Medic isn't fond of normal forms of medicine, but is still an important member nonetheless. Sniper is from New Zealand, but was raised in Australia. He prefers working from a distance and his backstory is very similar to Superman's. Spy is the master of disguise, and is technically Scout's father, as said before. Of all the characters, he appears to be the most "mature" and appears to be the ringleader at many times. Not only that, but the game has an interesting story. I would not like to get too detailed with it. However, it makes little to no sense but is still funny, engaging, and gives TF2 much more depth. There is also a storyline that takes place a few years later where Mann Co. is being attacked, so the mercenaries have to defend it, called Mann vs. Machine. This game mode ties in with the TF comics, which explain many characters' backstories and is currently still in the works as of this review. The other comics (all of which can be found on TF2's official website) are all funny and charming in their own way as well. The community has been quite debatable on how nice it is at many times, but in the end, it's still an overall great community. I've seen people give out stuff, others mentor some of the newbs (something I do as well) along with much, much more. Yes. the game is considered a "pay-to-win game" but it isn't necessarily a pay-to-win game. With lots of patience, you will get what you want from the game, whether it be hats, weapons, or whatever it is you want. The game has a learning curve that isn't too steep, but become dedicated and you'll fall in love with it. No matter how many times you rage to a W+M1 pyro that destroyed your 16 killstreak, or cheer when you unbox an Unusual, or maybe discover a few friends or learn a few things, Team Fortress 2 has been a huge part of my PC gaming life and without it, I would be as bored as hell. I cannot recommend this game enough, and I hope that many more memories are made on here. Valve may be cash cows, but you can't help but admit they are amazing when it comes to making games. Portal, Half-Life 2, Counter-Strike, but this game stands out from the rest to me. Do I recommend this game? Yes, yes, yes, YES.
Nerd House;-;Team Fortress 2. Being ranked as the third most-played game [steamcharts.com] on Steam, Team Fortress 2 is probably one of the best free-to-play games we've got. Why is it so popular? Let's take a look, shall we? First off, the obvious: It's free. 100% free. This means its accessible to everyone on Steam. This is just the icing on the cake though. What really shines about TF2 is the game itself. Team Fortress 2 usually consists of two teams (Red and Blue) going head to head against each other. Sometimes fulfilling certain objectives or just downright killing each other. There are many, many maps and modes, such as Payload, Capture Points, and Mann VS Machine. But the general idea no matter the map or mode is to KILL EVERYTHING THAT MOVES! And my god, is it fun to do so. The game has 9 playable mercenaries, each actually being a certain "class". Each class is divided into 3 different roles: Offense, Defense, and Support. Let's go over each role and class. Offensive roles specialize in dealing damage to the opposing team. These are your main attack force. Scouts are the speedy hit and run class, with the ability to double or even triple jump depending on equipped items. Soldiers pack a bit more firepower with their rocket launchers, which gives them not only power, but mobility due to the ability known as "rocket jumping". The Pyro is great at setting the opposition on fire, as well as extinguishing burning teammates using an airblast. Defensive roles serve to inhibit enemy access and to hold enemies back from vital points on the map. Overall, the defensive group has the most firepower of all the groups. Demomen can safeguard areas with stickybombs that they can detonate when enemies come by. Heavies are great for mowing down incoming troops and pushing back forces. Heavies can also keep enemies in an area while whittling their health for teammates to finish off. Engineers can build Sentry Guns for effective area defense, as well as build Teleporters and Dispensers for logistical support of the team. Support classes cannot hold the fight on their own, but their specialized abilities can tip the balance in their team's favor. They offer the offensive and defensive classes an extra edge in battle and can help turn the tide of the game. Whether crippling the enemy advance from behind or keeping teammates healed, the support classes are always handy to have around. Medics are the team healers, capable of providing numerous buffs depending on their equipments. Spies are great for sneak attacks or eiliminating key threats. Snipers excel at long range, also eliminating key threats, as well as extinguishing burning teammates with jarate and providing a damage boost to teammates. Next, let's look at the presentation. TF2 has a very unqiue art style. It's somewhat cartoonish, but very appealing. It's simple, and un-complex. But it doesn't need to be complex. It's simplicity is it's strength. Everything is detailed enough to where you can easily tell whats going on, what a specific model or item is, and they all stand out. The soundtrack is also very appealing and catchy, especially the main theme. I personally have it as a ringtone/alarm tone on my smartphone! :) One of the best aspects of TF2 is the Steam Workshop. Users can submit designs for items and weapons, and possibly have them added to the game! A very lucrative sub-market has also emerged from this game in the form of the Crate Keys. That's a whole different ballgame in and of itself, so we won't get into it here. During normal gameplay on most servers, you can obtain random items, weapons, and sometimes crates, and taunts....through the item drops system. You can only receive so many drops per week, and you will get them randomly as you play. You can use these items and weapons to customise your mercenary's loadout, or you can use them to craft other items, hats, and weapons. You can take multiples of items and craft them into Scrap, then Reclaimed Metal, then Refined Metal. You can then use these metals to craft specific class weapons/items, among other things. The crafting system is simple yet robust, with lots of possiblities. Some of it is very luck based. You can take some very common items and end up crafting a super rare hat or gun worth a lot of moolah on the Steam Market! All-in-all, Team Fortress 2 is just a very fun game. Endless entertainment awaits when you start up this game, especially if you play with friends on your favorite server. Probably the best free-to-play game on Steam. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=383235670 Highly Recommended Be sure to check out Nerd House Gaming for more reviews!
Mr Squiggles;-;How to play Team Fortress 2: Be polite, Be efficient, Have a pan to kill everyone you meet.
pacsomepuppes;-;> I was only 10 years old. > I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. > I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. > Then I got my first hat, The gibus. > Suddenly everything changed. > I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' > I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. > I had so many hats, I loved them all. > But then someone traded me, I accepted. > They offered an Unusual for all my hats. > It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. > But no Unusual, He scammed me. > I lost it all. > I was so sad I cried for hours. > Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. > I went to bed after praying. > I felt warm. > I looked behind me, It was Gaben! > He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning Team Captain. > Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning Team Captain and I was naked. > I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. > Hats are love. Hats are life. TF2: 11/10 Best hat simulator 1981 Overall, I'd give this game 9 out of 10 Gabe Narwalls Shoutout to ObsidianObelisk17 for making a youtube vid of this Showout to TheDisableBore for making a comic of this I cringe re reading this :smug:
Flexi;-;Ruined my life and cost me over 500. 10/10 would recommend to friends and family
Special;-;Team Fortress 2 is the most realistic hat simulator created to date. There is absolutely no other simulator quite like this one. The first time you start the simulator, you join a server where you can play a minigame where you show off your hats and items. If you kill a person three times in a row in the minigame, you get your very first hat: the Gibus. This is where it really starts; To play the simulator correctly, you have to spend money in the market place, made by Valve. After that, while you play the minigame, you can find hats which you can trade for, or collect! There is many other people who wants to collect and trade hats, just like you! After you collect enough items and/or hats, try joining a trade server! There, the REAL fun begins! Good luck, and beware of ending up poor!
Sloth Party;-;Good game, I really enjoy this. Compared to some people i have a very small amount of time spent but i every minute of that time was well spent, Other then the loading screens :)
-=NooBShots=-;-;the best game that i have been played before
Deadhoundz;-;A great game for fun, serious or some other kind of players. The style of the game is unique, ITS AWESOME!
Swedish Raccoon;-;I love this GAME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
HarrySoul;-;THE HEAVY IS FAT
Happycat;-;One of the most funniest game I ever played. Really recommend it.
Syndicate birthday in 4 days;-;great game but need more weapon
Emp_;-;I haven't play it that much, but its alright.
Yams;-;I highly recommend this game who are new to steam and its fun to play! Only problems that I have with this game is the amount of squeakers who ruin the fun by screaming and whining. Another is that people rage easily when killed or dominated. It can be fun at times but can get annoying later. Other than that. The game is good.
Toroi;-;My hours. help. I wrote something for real! These hours are legit, I played this game a lot in the past to avoid some tragic stuff in real life. I was young and didn't really have my gaming consoles anymore because of my brothers and I had a really bad pc, which i still own. TF2 was one of the games i could play pretty well on this pc but with horrid graphics, but it was one of the more fun games I installed. I met some real cool and nice people on this game as well as people who i plan to keep by my side. The community back then was more humble compared to nowadays. You have competitive gamers who spam their bind keys with unfunny/gross jokes and very obnoxious people who are either yelling at you or telling you to do specific things to win the game. When really, it doesn't even matter if you win or lose. However, you also have those people who are really awesome and you may meet some nice friends along the way! Although you never know what kinda person you're going to meet on this game. In my honest opinion, if you want to have a game to just waste time on (and money) or just mess around with people you know (which is what I do now), this is perfect. Esspecially the mann vs. machine co-op. I mainly play that now. Although to me, the game lost its touch, update wise, and I moved onto other games. I believe it's worth a shot to try it out but other than that, I'd keep it as a casual game. I don't think the competitive scene is worth getting into anymore because it's being flooded by crude people. Atleast from my experiance after over about 4+ years of playing it just got worse and worse. You will eventually be tied into drama even if you try to avoid it. You'll be more stressed than actually having fun, I'll tell you that! Although in all seriousness, this game is losing its touch and probably isn't worth making it your main game MAINLY because the updates they've been releasing are becoming very dull and not as great as they used to be. BUT, it's a great game to just play to pass the time and have fun! All you'll really notice nowdays is...people really love to trade more than actually play. Living off as a free to play would be very tough and you'd need to be patient with items you would want, unless you got that MONEY! Hope this helps. One last thing, I am not saying this game is bad in any way. I am saying that it's worth trying and playing with friends, or even meeting people! Although there are some downsides that you won't like, such as some stuff I pointed out above. Strictly towards the community. I personally think you should have this game as a side game rather than your come home to play sorta thing. Have it as a once in a while game, because it's nothing to be big about, unless you really do not like most of the millions of other games out there. Just give it a shot and see what you think! Have fun <3
Vale;-;Can you name any other unmodded First Person Shooter that lets you play as a cocky and fast Bostonian that can slap the hell out of urine throwing Australian campers with a fresh atlantic fish wrapped in fine christmas lights, eat a bucket of fried proccessed poultry over their corpses, and then get hit with an exploding cannonball launched from an African-Celtic one eyed alcoholic who can leap yards into the air from his own explosives while weilding a mystic ancient talking ghost claymore? I thought so.
A bLuE cOw;-;If you bind forward to a button on your mouse, you can play pyro and eat at the same time
UnfunnyName;-;The vicious cycle of Team fortress 2 First when you'll arrive in the game, you'll want Weapons, tons of them. Then you'll see that everyone has hats, and you'll want these, a tons of them. Then you'll realize that hats doesn't matter, only skill count, so you'll want a lot of skills, tons of them. Then new weapons will be added, and you'll want them, all of them. Then a new hat will be added and you'll want it, cause it'll be fancy on your main class. Then you'll realize again, that you don't give a damn about hats, all is about is skill. Then when you have waited for 3 years, new weapons will be added, and you'll want them. And then you realize that you spent like 2000 hours of your life for this, met great friends, and you'll have a server where's you feeling like home, and you discovered so much things via the community, it learnt you so much. Then the rude reality of life, bring you on earth, and this game is here, Waiting for you to play 1,2,3... hours, and you'll be happy to see that all your good friend are still here.
[CotC] King Conga Gandhi;-;Oh, and if you're wondering, the new update, Gun Mettle, did NOT ruin TF2 for me. I actually find it a LOT more fun now! I think Jerma summed up this game pretty nicely... "Maybe you got like two Pyros that just installed the game ten minutes ago. They don't have any hats, they're spraying  and they're having a blast. They might even be at the wrong point. They might be going backwards to the point that's already been capped. On the same team, there's a Scout with a Hale's Own Scattergun. He's got 18 kills with a 17 killstreak, he just got 18. He's going 'I just got 18, sick!' He runs up the stairs, he's trying his  off. He's get *beeping noises* dodging the 'Oh, the sentry almost got me!' He looks up to his left when he gets up the stairs on Gorge and there's two sandwich Heavies having a ing picnic. So he stops for a second and goes, 'Two... nnnggh!' so he walks forward and gets blown up by a soldier's rocket next door... ...The two sandwich Heavies then decide to move their picnic. There's ants. 'There's ants here, honey. I wanna get out of here.' So they get up, they pack their sandwiches, pack up their lunches, and their breakfast, and whatever the  they're eating. They get up and walk toward the door to go to RED because they think, 'That spot near the A point for RED is pretty good.' They walk out the door, and they see four Level 3 Sentry Guns pointing at them. They get shot a million times and blow up, and there's like nine Engineers swinging their wrenches in random directions. The BLU Scout, at this point, respawns, and walks by the at least 3-4 statues because we all know there's four people AFK when you play this game, you go by the museum of people standing still. He walks out the door and readies his weapon, he's ready, 'I'm going to get another 20 killstreak, just you watch Gaben, I'm going to praise Gaben!' And he goes forward and starts shooting, and he gets backstabbed by a Spy that has been sitting with the Cloak and Dagger in the corner for at least the last 68 seconds." Normally when I do reviews, I turn into a critic and start to examine that game, pointing out every little flaw and pro and determining a final score. However, Team Fortress 2 (or TF2 for short) helped me make so many memories that if I actually tried to make a fair review on it, it would still be way too biased to consider a valid review. Team Fortress 2, is, obviously, an amazing game. The teamplay is necessary and going out and attacking solo may be difficult. You need teammates in order to survive and win. The graphics are unique to a shooter game and really makes it a special game. I'm not here to explain the gameplay or graphics or whatnot. I love this game because of its charm. The game has such a unique and diverse cast of characters, you can't help to love all of them at some point. Scout is cocky and overconfident. Spy, another one of the characters in the game, is technically Scout's father. Soldier is a crazed WWII American patriot. He never actually joined the Army, but instead, he had his own personal Nazi killing spree. His roommate was a magician named Merasmus, who grew to hate Soldier. Pyro is mysterious, but portrays the world as one big happy paradise, known as Pyroland. Demoman is a Scottish alcoholic who, due to Merasmus, lost his eye that is now haunted. Heavy, although he appears to be dim-witted, is actually very intelligent and looks over three sisters. Engineer is very intelligent as well, and his grandfather was a major contributor to keeping the war with RED and BLU continue. Medic isn't fond of normal forms of medicine, but is still an important member nonetheless. Sniper is from New Zealand, but was raised in Australia. He prefers working from a distance and his backstory is very similar to Superman's. Spy is the master of disguise, and is technically Scout's father, as said before. Of all the characters, he appears to be the most "mature" and appears to be the ringleader at many times. Not only that, but the game has an interesting story. I would not like to get too detailed with it. However, it makes little to no sense but is still funny, engaging, and gives TF2 much more depth. There is also a storyline that takes place a few years later where Mann Co. is being attacked, so the mercenaries have to defend it, called Mann vs. Machine. This game mode ties in with the TF comics, which explain many characters' backstories and is currently still in the works as of this review. The other comics (all of which can be found on TF2's official website) are all funny and charming in their own way as well. The community has been quite debatable on how nice it is at many times, but in the end, it's still an overall great community. I've seen people give out stuff, others mentor some of the newbs (something I do as well) along with much, much more. Yes. the game is considered a "pay-to-win game" but it isn't necessarily a pay-to-win game. With lots of patience, you will get what you want from the game, whether it be hats, weapons, or whatever it is you want. The game has a learning curve that isn't too steep, but become dedicated and you'll fall in love with it. No matter how many times you rage to a W+M1 pyro that destroyed your 16 killstreak, or cheer when you unbox an Unusual, or maybe discover a few friends or learn a few things, Team Fortress 2 has been a huge part of my PC gaming life and without it, I would be as bored as hell. I cannot recommend this game enough, and I hope that many more memories are made on here. Valve may be cash cows, but you can't help but admit they are amazing when it comes to making games. Portal, Half-Life 2, Counter-Strike, but this game stands out from the rest to me. Do I recommend this game? Yes, yes, yes, YES.
Nerd House;-;Team Fortress 2. Being ranked as the third most-played game [steamcharts.com] on Steam, Team Fortress 2 is probably one of the best free-to-play games we've got. Why is it so popular? Let's take a look, shall we? First off, the obvious: It's free. 100% free. This means its accessible to everyone on Steam. This is just the icing on the cake though. What really shines about TF2 is the game itself. Team Fortress 2 usually consists of two teams (Red and Blue) going head to head against each other. Sometimes fulfilling certain objectives or just downright killing each other. There are many, many maps and modes, such as Payload, Capture Points, and Mann VS Machine. But the general idea no matter the map or mode is to KILL EVERYTHING THAT MOVES! And my god, is it fun to do so. The game has 9 playable mercenaries, each actually being a certain "class". Each class is divided into 3 different roles: Offense, Defense, and Support. Let's go over each role and class. Offensive roles specialize in dealing damage to the opposing team. These are your main attack force. Scouts are the speedy hit and run class, with the ability to double or even triple jump depending on equipped items. Soldiers pack a bit more firepower with their rocket launchers, which gives them not only power, but mobility due to the ability known as "rocket jumping". The Pyro is great at setting the opposition on fire, as well as extinguishing burning teammates using an airblast. Defensive roles serve to inhibit enemy access and to hold enemies back from vital points on the map. Overall, the defensive group has the most firepower of all the groups. Demomen can safeguard areas with stickybombs that they can detonate when enemies come by. Heavies are great for mowing down incoming troops and pushing back forces. Heavies can also keep enemies in an area while whittling their health for teammates to finish off. Engineers can build Sentry Guns for effective area defense, as well as build Teleporters and Dispensers for logistical support of the team. Support classes cannot hold the fight on their own, but their specialized abilities can tip the balance in their team's favor. They offer the offensive and defensive classes an extra edge in battle and can help turn the tide of the game. Whether crippling the enemy advance from behind or keeping teammates healed, the support classes are always handy to have around. Medics are the team healers, capable of providing numerous buffs depending on their equipments. Spies are great for sneak attacks or eiliminating key threats. Snipers excel at long range, also eliminating key threats, as well as extinguishing burning teammates with jarate and providing a damage boost to teammates. Next, let's look at the presentation. TF2 has a very unqiue art style. It's somewhat cartoonish, but very appealing. It's simple, and un-complex. But it doesn't need to be complex. It's simplicity is it's strength. Everything is detailed enough to where you can easily tell whats going on, what a specific model or item is, and they all stand out. The soundtrack is also very appealing and catchy, especially the main theme. I personally have it as a ringtone/alarm tone on my smartphone! :) One of the best aspects of TF2 is the Steam Workshop. Users can submit designs for items and weapons, and possibly have them added to the game! A very lucrative sub-market has also emerged from this game in the form of the Crate Keys. That's a whole different ballgame in and of itself, so we won't get into it here. During normal gameplay on most servers, you can obtain random items, weapons, and sometimes crates, and taunts....through the item drops system. You can only receive so many drops per week, and you will get them randomly as you play. You can use these items and weapons to customise your mercenary's loadout, or you can use them to craft other items, hats, and weapons. You can take multiples of items and craft them into Scrap, then Reclaimed Metal, then Refined Metal. You can then use these metals to craft specific class weapons/items, among other things. The crafting system is simple yet robust, with lots of possiblities. Some of it is very luck based. You can take some very common items and end up crafting a super rare hat or gun worth a lot of moolah on the Steam Market! All-in-all, Team Fortress 2 is just a very fun game. Endless entertainment awaits when you start up this game, especially if you play with friends on your favorite server. Probably the best free-to-play game on Steam. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=383235670 Highly Recommended Be sure to check out Nerd House Gaming for more reviews!
Mr Squiggles;-;How to play Team Fortress 2: Be polite, Be efficient, Have a pan to kill everyone you meet.
pacsomepuppes;-;> I was only 10 years old. > I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. > I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. > Then I got my first hat, The gibus. > Suddenly everything changed. > I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' > I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. > I had so many hats, I loved them all. > But then someone traded me, I accepted. > They offered an Unusual for all my hats. > It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. > But no Unusual, He scammed me. > I lost it all. > I was so sad I cried for hours. > Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. > I went to bed after praying. > I felt warm. > I looked behind me, It was Gaben! > He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning Team Captain. > Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning Team Captain and I was naked. > I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. > Hats are love. Hats are life. TF2: 11/10 Best hat simulator 1981 Overall, I'd give this game 9 out of 10 Gabe Narwalls Shoutout to ObsidianObelisk17 for making a youtube vid of this Showout to TheDisableBore for making a comic of this I cringe re reading this :smug:
Flexi;-;Ruined my life and cost me over 500. 10/10 would recommend to friends and family
Special;-;Team Fortress 2 is the most realistic hat simulator created to date. There is absolutely no other simulator quite like this one. The first time you start the simulator, you join a server where you can play a minigame where you show off your hats and items. If you kill a person three times in a row in the minigame, you get your very first hat: the Gibus. This is where it really starts; To play the simulator correctly, you have to spend money in the market place, made by Valve. After that, while you play the minigame, you can find hats which you can trade for, or collect! There is many other people who wants to collect and trade hats, just like you! After you collect enough items and/or hats, try joining a trade server! There, the REAL fun begins! Good luck, and beware of ending up poor!
Bluey[TF:GO];-;You should play it! It's fun! Very fun. I just want this badge.
[VON*]ZyphriC;-;A well balanced, not P2W, enticing, awesome, fabulous, extraordinary and the most unique FPS experience one can have
|dam sam| Tenju;-;TF2 is the only first person shooter that I can play. It has a few balance quirks as of right now, but aside from that, an incredibly fun game, from the perspective of someone who's always hated first person shooters with a fury.
White;-;It's fun Play it
Kyung-san;-;Yes is very fun and lots of fun players around. But i have this one problem that really fustrated and you better see this Valve. The one most major problem are accuracy. There are some classes that when you shoot is doesn't even register same with some melee too. Like the sniper i totally headshot a person sometimes is bodyshot fine with that but again when i do it, it doesn't even register when i totally aim right in the head. Now there the melee the market gardener sometimes is work fine but sometimes when i slap a person it doesn't register and i can tell i hit that person because it made the sound when the market gardener hit. Same with the pan it made that annoying sound but funny sound when i hit someone but is doesn't register the damage. Valve please fix this
69;-;tis game is good
Software2;-;So much fun. When you start you may not like it, but when you start to go into trading and such you will be attached to this game like feces on the side of a toilet. (As in, it will stick to you until you figure out how to stop)
Gift me rocket league im poor;-;ing ruined my life- 11/10. Also mlg 3dank5you hat simulator (   )
Scandinavian Orange;-;For a free game this is incredibly brilliant! There's much to do even if it does get repetitive overtime, all the drop items and achievements make it good to go back to in times of boredom. A minor issue I shall complain about is the lack of inventory space for non premium accounts, I did experience this issue myself but I have upgraded by now, with no regrets, a brilliant game which I would highly recommend to anybody who asked, keep with the good stuff Valve!
Mr.YOLOBanana;-;A very very very very very good game.
LynxMcPaws;-;One of the best first person shooters I've ever seen and theres tons of things to do. Theres different tactics, you can customize your loadout and what he looks like and what weapons he uses, buy items from the market located in the community tab (also be careful not to get addicted to buying things I learned that the hard way.), buy items from the tf2 store located in tf2 (But be warned you get much better deals from the market.), You can have bragging rights from murdering your friends and taunting at the freezecam, play mvm (mann vs machine) and kill lots and lots of robots. and all of this? I mean once you play this. You'll be wondering, why is this free?
g;-;Great game, nuff said.
Docco;-;Now anyone who recommends Team Fortress is going to focus on one thing: Hats. I'm going to be different and try not to. Team Fortress 2 is an excellent pick up and rock out with your  out shooter, whether it's some meaty Payload or a brief trip down Point Capture lane you're going to be having the time of your life. I play Heavy a lot, and my favourite thing about playing Heavy is screaming gutterally at people over my mic as I mow them down with my bromedic in tow. The number of things you can do in Team Fortress 2 is limitless, from shooting people to... HATS OKAY, YOU CAN COLLECT HATS. IT'S A HAT SIMULATOR. I HAVE LOTS OF HATS AND I DYE THEM ALL ORANGE BECAUSE I'M A GINGER. HATS. WANT TO WEAR SOME DEVIL HORNS AND SHOW ALL THE BOYS WHAT A NAUGHTY LITTLE PYRO YOU ARE? GO AHEAD, BUY THE HAT. WANT TO UNLEASH YOUR INNER KILLER AND DON A RAMBO HAT AND RAM YOUR FIST UP THE BUMHOLES OF UNSUSPECTING SCOUTS? GO AHEAD, BUY THE HAT. HATS HATS HATS HATS. HAT SIMULATOR 2, BUY IT.
Moonlight Shadow;-;Team Fortress 2 is the best game I've ever played. Over the last one and a half years I've clocked up 800 hours on Badwater and Upward. This game isn`t like Cs:Go. It have it`s features. A lot a people say that the main TF2 problem is a hats, i thinks so too, but i personally think that the main TF2 problem is a hackers. Imagine a kid, which has just installed TF2. He can`t kill anyone, he`s dying a lot - this infuriates him. The only way he sees is a getting a hack to get better. While playing this game i understand what is a teamwork. So, i`ll forever remember the time that i spend on this outstanding, addictive and fun game.
ReTired;-;This game WAS the greatest multiplayer FPS ever. But now Valve has turned it into their money printing machine, squeezing an insane amount of bucks out of people for useless or game disturbing items. DO NOT buy this game, you will end up spending nights on tradeservers and writing recommendations to get virtual items :oP.
Hoou-dini;-;Nice easy and fun! That's all! [And it's free]
Jack :3;-;What is this game? call of duty? counter strike? NO it iS TF2 (teamfortrEss 2) dude :O THIS GAME IS A HELL A LOT OF FUN, HOPE YOU INJOY IT LIKE ME :D THANK STEAM, VALVE FOR MAKE THIS AWESOME GAME
[ST?] duckshark06;-;America's greatest hat simulatior 2015. I recomend selling your soul to gaben for hats.
[H!] granitegamer;-;This. game. is. friggin'. awesome.
El Tony;-;I want my medal :v
RATHER TASTY!;-;love this game. makes me laff evrytiem
DuskLight;-;This is the game that got me off of MineCraft. Nuff said.
France;-;Best War-Themed Hat Simulator out there.
pizzatoppingz;-;Best free game out there
Blue Cola;-;10 / 10 Weapons? Meh... Stranges? pretty cool... Strange Prof Killstreak? cool! Strange Australium Prof Killstreak? HOLY CRAP!!
Skull;-;This game is too bloody 4 kids.
ozzydude2003;-;this game has effected me a lot and I think its more than worth getting
Reborn_;-;umm , where should i start :D ok , so this game is a really cool free to play fps shooter , with lots of gamemode and even more fun stuff . you can get weapons ,hats ,creates from drops and from them you can trade up to unusual such as a hat on fire ,electric beniee and more... the game itself is running on source engine , wich is was created at 2004 , so you can run the game even on a potato. there is a mannco. store in the game , wich you can purchase hats , weapons , keys . and if you purchase something you will become a Premium member . being premium , you can trade you're stuff to others , have more backpack slots , after purchasing anything at mann co. store you will be awarded with mann. co Hat wich is pretty cool i guess. For all i can say , this game is very addictive , dont play it , jk lol :D . i give this game 10/10 becouse of the vareide things you can do.
R0ckst@r l3unnag123+;-;This a game is good for me
DataCluster;-;Had it sitting in my library for at least a year having originally barely played it (two hours not really knowing what I was doing) until recently where I was looking for a casual and fun game to help get someone into gaming. Decided to try and see if this game would work and long story short, they love it and I'm shocked at how much they've been playing it. I'm even quite addicted at this point too. Needless to say, the game is great and I wish I had given it some attention sooner.
XIX #roadtosomething;-;TF2, an amazing shooter for its age and the first shooter that I have competitively played, sadly the competitive communtity is not really big and it is all community based and not greatly supported by the publishers. It offers a really interesting gameplay with the 9 classes that are available, a great fun for the casual gamer aswell as the player searching for competitive experience. Despite the fact that it is older than 7 years valve still puts some time into making updates for this game although most of them just feature items and no game changing content. It was a good time! Bye bye TF2!
TryHard;-;A bit confusing for new players, but a really fun game, lots of werid weapons to play around with. But its basically i hat/conga/trade simulator but still a good game, comp is fun as well.
CliffyG;-;pretty good game blokes. best quickscope simulator i've played in years.
NyanSenpai;-;Things I like about tf2 - First off, the gameplay is amazing as there are 9 different classes with really different play styles, in tf2, its not like COD where most people just go yolo rambo around. tf2 is a game that requires teamwork, (thats why they put in a medic class) Things i dislike about tf2 - First off, just because the guy who keeps headshoting you wears a gibus DOES NOT MEAN HE IS HACKING. I have come to a point where i really dislike f2p accused of "hacks" just because they are f2p. Sure some of them do but dont always accuse unless you have proof. And so what if you have alot of good items and cosmetics? THAT DOES NOT MAKE YOU A GOOD PLAYER.
Sel <> (  );-;Wonderful game with 9 great classes. The class that dies as fast as it runs - the Scout The class that everyone can learn in 5 minutes - the Soldier The class that doesn't need to aim to get kills - the Pyro The class that blows everything up, including itself - the Demoman The class that doesn't need to play to get kills - the Engi The class that noone likes to play and noone loves - the Heavy The class that noone likes to play but everyone loves - the Medic The class that everyone plays and noone loves - the Sniper The other class that everyone plays and noone loves - The Spy The rest is hats. Buy them.
KingJubalungi.fm;-;No.2 In my top 5 games of all time with great (almost) balanced classes fun gameplay infinitely high skill ceiling and SO MANY GOD DAMN HATS!!! its hard not to enjoy tf2 And its free so why wouldnt you? Besides you cant deny that a game is doing something right when it still has it hooks in you even after 600+ hours of game time Well done valve
Garry;-;AWESOME GAME MUST PLAY IT!
Emmie Oak;-;its okay
Dr. Nooooo!!;-;This is the best game! When you start play, you cant stop! It isn't P2W game, but it is nice to buy a keys with money and trade them for hats, misc, outfits, weapons and unusuals. the trade in tf2 is really fun! you can play f2p, you dont must buy stuff, you can get it in drops. Have in this game a drop weapons and you dont must to buy them, you can craft them but you can trade them for a scrap or other weapons. PLAY THIS GAME!!! Classic, funny and good game!
dan;-;Very fun to play in pubs, with friends, trade servers, or just trading hats :D
GreenWill;-;9 classes 3 each for support,defense, and offense with free dropable weapons and more hats than you can ask for! You can count me in!
Ster Ster;-;This Game is totally completely and utterly EPIC! P.S Sandvich.
Wryme -TM;-;Something something hats.
The Duke of Spook;-;2 Rad 4 Me
[PRG] deathsmash121;-;It is a verry good game.
Hasukin;-;FPS Shooter games have been spread out around the world becoming popular, but when it comes to TF2 it's like no other. It's simply made and easy to play just like the way it's made, it's different every day with new thing's to do with new updates, including taunts, cosmetics, and loads more, building up the game. What makes TF2 a unique game apart from COD and BF is that it's not as big as those games, well ofcourse it has loads of stuff, but not as sophisticated as the other FPS shooters. It does not have singleplayer, not that (extreme) graphics and including other more features that other games have and not TF2. But not having features like COD or BF makes it better and unique not worse and more repetitive, therefore when COD or BF players try TF2 for the first time they don't really understand the concept of the game, which explains the game is unique. Overall TF2 is an addictive and unique Game with lots to discover, hoping the game get's better. 10/10
DeadlyMaggot;-;like This Game !!!!!
TheGamingDrake;-;This Is A Really Great Game Because This Game Is Relativly Old This F2P Is Getting Constantly Updated For New Things To Come. The Game Has 9 Classes That Make The Game More Interesting Since All Have Thier Own Play Style And All Can Be Mastered. Thier Are Many Weapons To Keep The Gameplay Interesting. This Game Has Been Able To Hold Up With Hackers, Trolls, And Even Cheaters Witch Not Many Games Cant. The Game Has Been Able To Hold Up For 7 Years (I Think) So Yes In My Opinion This Is One Of The Classics And I Will Never Forget My Experience In TF2 :D
Jessica;-;Great Game! Heaps of fun and very addictive :3
SPECTATULAR MLG GODLIKE JESUS;-;You probably know what this game is. Lets be honest, everyone has probably heard of Team Fortress 2 the moment they got on steam. Team Fortress 2 is a free-to-play shooter with a cartoony art style, and an unusual way of playing that sets it apart from other shooters. In Team Fortress 2, there are 9 classes, each with its weaknesses and advantages. Along with the basic shooting, classes have their own unique abilities that help on the battlefield. However, this game is not only famous for the click & shoot, it has one of the most interesting (and complicated) economy that I enjoy to participate in. You can work your way up to be able trade in-game items for actual steam games. This game also doesn't tax your machine and even on low settings is lovable with it's computer-friendly artstyle. Even though it's been released a long time ago, Team Fortress 2 still maintains it's freshness and uniqueness.
| |1| Iverson (_);-;This Game Have Too Much TeamWork And This Is Why I Like This TEAMWORK GAME ARE THE BEST My Rate For This Game 99999999/10
anti-dane | tipofthehats.org :);-;its ok
[Bday] LazyEngie;-;It's free. Forever. Go online and play and get new items.
{GRM8} VivaLaVida;-;Great Game 5 Star
The only girl on TF2;-;It's Team Fortress 2.... there's not really much that can be said other than that's it's awesome and won't get old anytime soon. :D
[PONY] K_Fuffles -TPF-;-;best.game.imo
Elite101;-;A really good game. One of my favorites. Has many players around the world and the trading system will get you hooked. Free and fun, Team Fortress 2 is one of the best games ever created and you should get this game.
I SMELL LIKE BEEF;-;Comprised of my two favorite things : free and five year olds.
Canadagamer9;-;I used to be unsure weather or not I'd like TF2, but once I tried it I couldn't stop, I was addicted. Although the game may seem limited on the outside, with only 9 classes and a few gamemodes, but on the inside TF2 is one of Valve's best games. Right now it's one of my favorites!
-=lJFHl=- Juli;-;10/10 Raging children
Lulz. Cookei Monstr;-;Amazing game if you like to trade and try to build up an amazing backpack. Or you can just play the amazing gamemodes this game provides.
Put it in my Asiimov;-;great game! been playing it for years and it has never made me bored once.
ISean | trade.tf;-;Awesome game! especially for a free one ;) Really Good Fun
duck_;-;Killed guys doing conga. Get banned. 420/xxx
Jaaj;-;its ok
Craig Boone -TPF-;-;Addictive as hell and after almost 3 years of playing, it's still entertaining!
Salad Waster Jordan;-;Died with a hat on. 10/10
Ninja Tuna;-;This is a good game because of the skills it requires to play in this FPS. Teamwork is also needed which is also what I find in FPS games.
.png.jpg.gif.pdf.jar.exe;-;If u like fps play this game :3
GoldPanda;-;Its free its fun and is addictive, what more do you need for installing and then playing it so go to the steam store istall the game and i promise you great times lots of friends and something to do when you are bored when you had enough of xbox or playstation. I give yhis game a 9 out of 10 it has innovating modes new and strange-interesting weapons and, (of course) HATS!!! a lot of godamn hats it is a FPS so it makes it funny because its not COD or HALO so you can variate. I really REALLY recomend it to you EXCELSIOR!!!!!
[{PooT}]Pocket Hoovy;-;AMAZIN! 9V9 Classic well know classes go into battle with hallarious weapons and trolly techniques, The Classes Are: Scoot (Commonly Known As The Scout) Rocket Jumper (Commonly Known As The Soldier) Flame Man (Commonly Known As The Pyro) Demopan (Commonly Known As The Demoman) DovahHeavy (Commonly Known As The Heavy) Engi (Commonly Known As: The Engineer) MEDI (Commonly Known As the Medic) SHHHNNIIPPPERRR (Commonly Known As the sniper) SHPHII (Commonly Known As the spy) Both Teams (RED + BLU) Fight eachother on many different stages varing gameplay, most times players like one more than the other. ALSO THIS GAME IS FREE TO PLAY, but i advise you to buy 1 thing from the in game store so you have more backpack but apart from that FREEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE EEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE GREAT GAME 100000000000/100000000000
Skongkhai;-;this is not your typical fps game,since it mostly relies on teamwork and co-ordination for a good team,whereas in other fps's you're a lone wolf,i would definitely recommend this [i'm only doing this for the task badge :3
Husky Hayley;-;A fun game that can be played by any age. Very funny and enjoyable. I would recommend it to all my friends because of the good graphics and the awesome weapons. :D
DontKnowCallouts;-;This is by far one of my most favorite games!
Casino;-;Hello fellow steam players out there if you don't have this game you should get it if you like free steam games and first person shooters combine it togehter and get TF2!
MyNameIsTom;-;A great free to play first person shooter. My thoughts 7 and a half out of 10
Tfool;-;I really like this game because of fun gameplay.
YuGameFreakGuyNL [2015#cookies];-;this game is cool
Toroi;-;My hours. help. I wrote something for real! These hours are legit, I played this game a lot in the past to avoid some tragic stuff in real life. I was young and didn't really have my gaming consoles anymore because of my brothers and I had a really bad pc, which i still own. TF2 was one of the games i could play pretty well on this pc but with horrid graphics, but it was one of the more fun games I installed. I met some real cool and nice people on this game as well as people who i plan to keep by my side. The community back then was more humble compared to nowadays. You have competitive gamers who spam their bind keys with unfunny/gross jokes and very obnoxious people who are either yelling at you or telling you to do specific things to win the game. When really, it doesn't even matter if you win or lose. However, you also have those people who are really awesome and you may meet some nice friends along the way! Although you never know what kinda person you're going to meet on this game. In my honest opinion, if you want to have a game to just waste time on (and money) or just mess around with people you know (which is what I do now), this is perfect. Esspecially the mann vs. machine co-op. I mainly play that now. Although to me, the game lost its touch, update wise, and I moved onto other games. I believe it's worth a shot to try it out but other than that, I'd keep it as a casual game. I don't think the competitive scene is worth getting into anymore because it's being flooded by crude people. Atleast from my experiance after over about 4+ years of playing it just got worse and worse. You will eventually be tied into drama even if you try to avoid it. You'll be more stressed than actually having fun, I'll tell you that! Although in all seriousness, this game is losing its touch and probably isn't worth making it your main game MAINLY because the updates they've been releasing are becoming very dull and not as great as they used to be. BUT, it's a great game to just play to pass the time and have fun! All you'll really notice nowdays is...people really love to trade more than actually play. Living off as a free to play would be very tough and you'd need to be patient with items you would want, unless you got that MONEY! Hope this helps. One last thing, I am not saying this game is bad in any way. I am saying that it's worth trying and playing with friends, or even meeting people! Although there are some downsides that you won't like, such as some stuff I pointed out above. Strictly towards the community. I personally think you should have this game as a side game rather than your come home to play sorta thing. Have it as a once in a while game, because it's nothing to be big about, unless you really do not like most of the millions of other games out there. Just give it a shot and see what you think! Have fun <3
Vale;-;Can you name any other unmodded First Person Shooter that lets you play as a cocky and fast Bostonian that can slap the hell out of urine throwing Australian campers with a fresh atlantic fish wrapped in fine christmas lights, eat a bucket of fried proccessed poultry over their corpses, and then get hit with an exploding cannonball launched from an African-Celtic one eyed alcoholic who can leap yards into the air from his own explosives while weilding a mystic ancient talking ghost claymore? I thought so.
A bLuE cOw;-;If you bind forward to a button on your mouse, you can play pyro and eat at the same time
UnfunnyName;-;The vicious cycle of Team fortress 2 First when you'll arrive in the game, you'll want Weapons, tons of them. Then you'll see that everyone has hats, and you'll want these, a tons of them. Then you'll realize that hats doesn't matter, only skill count, so you'll want a lot of skills, tons of them. Then new weapons will be added, and you'll want them, all of them. Then a new hat will be added and you'll want it, cause it'll be fancy on your main class. Then you'll realize again, that you don't give a damn about hats, all is about is skill. Then when you have waited for 3 years, new weapons will be added, and you'll want them. And then you realize that you spent like 2000 hours of your life for this, met great friends, and you'll have a server where's you feeling like home, and you discovered so much things via the community, it learnt you so much. Then the rude reality of life, bring you on earth, and this game is here, Waiting for you to play 1,2,3... hours, and you'll be happy to see that all your good friend are still here.
[CotC] King Conga Gandhi;-;Oh, and if you're wondering, the new update, Gun Mettle, did NOT ruin TF2 for me. I actually find it a LOT more fun now! I think Jerma summed up this game pretty nicely... "Maybe you got like two Pyros that just installed the game ten minutes ago. They don't have any hats, they're spraying  and they're having a blast. They might even be at the wrong point. They might be going backwards to the point that's already been capped. On the same team, there's a Scout with a Hale's Own Scattergun. He's got 18 kills with a 17 killstreak, he just got 18. He's going 'I just got 18, sick!' He runs up the stairs, he's trying his  off. He's get *beeping noises* dodging the 'Oh, the sentry almost got me!' He looks up to his left when he gets up the stairs on Gorge and there's two sandwich Heavies having a ing picnic. So he stops for a second and goes, 'Two... nnnggh!' so he walks forward and gets blown up by a soldier's rocket next door... ...The two sandwich Heavies then decide to move their picnic. There's ants. 'There's ants here, honey. I wanna get out of here.' So they get up, they pack their sandwiches, pack up their lunches, and their breakfast, and whatever the  they're eating. They get up and walk toward the door to go to RED because they think, 'That spot near the A point for RED is pretty good.' They walk out the door, and they see four Level 3 Sentry Guns pointing at them. They get shot a million times and blow up, and there's like nine Engineers swinging their wrenches in random directions. The BLU Scout, at this point, respawns, and walks by the at least 3-4 statues because we all know there's four people AFK when you play this game, you go by the museum of people standing still. He walks out the door and readies his weapon, he's ready, 'I'm going to get another 20 killstreak, just you watch Gaben, I'm going to praise Gaben!' And he goes forward and starts shooting, and he gets backstabbed by a Spy that has been sitting with the Cloak and Dagger in the corner for at least the last 68 seconds." Normally when I do reviews, I turn into a critic and start to examine that game, pointing out every little flaw and pro and determining a final score. However, Team Fortress 2 (or TF2 for short) helped me make so many memories that if I actually tried to make a fair review on it, it would still be way too biased to consider a valid review. Team Fortress 2, is, obviously, an amazing game. The teamplay is necessary and going out and attacking solo may be difficult. You need teammates in order to survive and win. The graphics are unique to a shooter game and really makes it a special game. I'm not here to explain the gameplay or graphics or whatnot. I love this game because of its charm. The game has such a unique and diverse cast of characters, you can't help to love all of them at some point. Scout is cocky and overconfident. Spy, another one of the characters in the game, is technically Scout's father. Soldier is a crazed WWII American patriot. He never actually joined the Army, but instead, he had his own personal Nazi killing spree. His roommate was a magician named Merasmus, who grew to hate Soldier. Pyro is mysterious, but portrays the world as one big happy paradise, known as Pyroland. Demoman is a Scottish alcoholic who, due to Merasmus, lost his eye that is now haunted. Heavy, although he appears to be dim-witted, is actually very intelligent and looks over three sisters. Engineer is very intelligent as well, and his grandfather was a major contributor to keeping the war with RED and BLU continue. Medic isn't fond of normal forms of medicine, but is still an important member nonetheless. Sniper is from New Zealand, but was raised in Australia. He prefers working from a distance and his backstory is very similar to Superman's. Spy is the master of disguise, and is technically Scout's father, as said before. Of all the characters, he appears to be the most "mature" and appears to be the ringleader at many times. Not only that, but the game has an interesting story. I would not like to get too detailed with it. However, it makes little to no sense but is still funny, engaging, and gives TF2 much more depth. There is also a storyline that takes place a few years later where Mann Co. is being attacked, so the mercenaries have to defend it, called Mann vs. Machine. This game mode ties in with the TF comics, which explain many characters' backstories and is currently still in the works as of this review. The other comics (all of which can be found on TF2's official website) are all funny and charming in their own way as well. The community has been quite debatable on how nice it is at many times, but in the end, it's still an overall great community. I've seen people give out stuff, others mentor some of the newbs (something I do as well) along with much, much more. Yes. the game is considered a "pay-to-win game" but it isn't necessarily a pay-to-win game. With lots of patience, you will get what you want from the game, whether it be hats, weapons, or whatever it is you want. The game has a learning curve that isn't too steep, but become dedicated and you'll fall in love with it. No matter how many times you rage to a W+M1 pyro that destroyed your 16 killstreak, or cheer when you unbox an Unusual, or maybe discover a few friends or learn a few things, Team Fortress 2 has been a huge part of my PC gaming life and without it, I would be as bored as hell. I cannot recommend this game enough, and I hope that many more memories are made on here. Valve may be cash cows, but you can't help but admit they are amazing when it comes to making games. Portal, Half-Life 2, Counter-Strike, but this game stands out from the rest to me. Do I recommend this game? Yes, yes, yes, YES.
Nerd House;-;Team Fortress 2. Being ranked as the third most-played game [steamcharts.com] on Steam, Team Fortress 2 is probably one of the best free-to-play games we've got. Why is it so popular? Let's take a look, shall we? First off, the obvious: It's free. 100% free. This means its accessible to everyone on Steam. This is just the icing on the cake though. What really shines about TF2 is the game itself. Team Fortress 2 usually consists of two teams (Red and Blue) going head to head against each other. Sometimes fulfilling certain objectives or just downright killing each other. There are many, many maps and modes, such as Payload, Capture Points, and Mann VS Machine. But the general idea no matter the map or mode is to KILL EVERYTHING THAT MOVES! And my god, is it fun to do so. The game has 9 playable mercenaries, each actually being a certain "class". Each class is divided into 3 different roles: Offense, Defense, and Support. Let's go over each role and class. Offensive roles specialize in dealing damage to the opposing team. These are your main attack force. Scouts are the speedy hit and run class, with the ability to double or even triple jump depending on equipped items. Soldiers pack a bit more firepower with their rocket launchers, which gives them not only power, but mobility due to the ability known as "rocket jumping". The Pyro is great at setting the opposition on fire, as well as extinguishing burning teammates using an airblast. Defensive roles serve to inhibit enemy access and to hold enemies back from vital points on the map. Overall, the defensive group has the most firepower of all the groups. Demomen can safeguard areas with stickybombs that they can detonate when enemies come by. Heavies are great for mowing down incoming troops and pushing back forces. Heavies can also keep enemies in an area while whittling their health for teammates to finish off. Engineers can build Sentry Guns for effective area defense, as well as build Teleporters and Dispensers for logistical support of the team. Support classes cannot hold the fight on their own, but their specialized abilities can tip the balance in their team's favor. They offer the offensive and defensive classes an extra edge in battle and can help turn the tide of the game. Whether crippling the enemy advance from behind or keeping teammates healed, the support classes are always handy to have around. Medics are the team healers, capable of providing numerous buffs depending on their equipments. Spies are great for sneak attacks or eiliminating key threats. Snipers excel at long range, also eliminating key threats, as well as extinguishing burning teammates with jarate and providing a damage boost to teammates. Next, let's look at the presentation. TF2 has a very unqiue art style. It's somewhat cartoonish, but very appealing. It's simple, and un-complex. But it doesn't need to be complex. It's simplicity is it's strength. Everything is detailed enough to where you can easily tell whats going on, what a specific model or item is, and they all stand out. The soundtrack is also very appealing and catchy, especially the main theme. I personally have it as a ringtone/alarm tone on my smartphone! :) One of the best aspects of TF2 is the Steam Workshop. Users can submit designs for items and weapons, and possibly have them added to the game! A very lucrative sub-market has also emerged from this game in the form of the Crate Keys. That's a whole different ballgame in and of itself, so we won't get into it here. During normal gameplay on most servers, you can obtain random items, weapons, and sometimes crates, and taunts....through the item drops system. You can only receive so many drops per week, and you will get them randomly as you play. You can use these items and weapons to customise your mercenary's loadout, or you can use them to craft other items, hats, and weapons. You can take multiples of items and craft them into Scrap, then Reclaimed Metal, then Refined Metal. You can then use these metals to craft specific class weapons/items, among other things. The crafting system is simple yet robust, with lots of possiblities. Some of it is very luck based. You can take some very common items and end up crafting a super rare hat or gun worth a lot of moolah on the Steam Market! All-in-all, Team Fortress 2 is just a very fun game. Endless entertainment awaits when you start up this game, especially if you play with friends on your favorite server. Probably the best free-to-play game on Steam. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=383235670 Highly Recommended Be sure to check out Nerd House Gaming for more reviews!
Mr Squiggles;-;How to play Team Fortress 2: Be polite, Be efficient, Have a pan to kill everyone you meet.
pacsomepuppes;-;> I was only 10 years old. > I loved TF2 so much, I had almost all the weapons I wanted. > I would leave my computer on for hours, Just to get a few drops. > Then I got my first hat, The gibus. > Suddenly everything changed. > I no longer cared about playing for fun, I only cared about the 'hats' > I "borrowed" my mommys credit card and bought more hats. > I had so many hats, I loved them all. > But then someone traded me, I accepted. > They offered an Unusual for all my hats. > It was so sexy looking, I put up all my hats and traded. > But no Unusual, He scammed me. > I lost it all. > I was so sad I cried for hours. > Later that night I prayed to Gaben for my hats back. > I went to bed after praying. > I felt warm. > I looked behind me, It was Gaben! > He said "This is Gabe Newell" and handed me a Burning Team Captain. > Then I woke up, I was wearing my Burning Team Captain and I was naked. > I saw Gabe leave through the window, he looked back at me and winked. > Hats are love. Hats are life. TF2: 11/10 Best hat simulator 1981 Overall, I'd give this game 9 out of 10 Gabe Narwalls Shoutout to ObsidianObelisk17 for making a youtube vid of this Showout to TheDisableBore for making a comic of this I cringe re reading this :smug:
Flexi;-;Ruined my life and cost me over 500. 10/10 would recommend to friends and family
Special;-;Team Fortress 2 is the most realistic hat simulator created to date. There is absolutely no other simulator quite like this one. The first time you start the simulator, you join a server where you can play a minigame where you show off your hats and items. If you kill a person three times in a row in the minigame, you get your very first hat: the Gibus. This is where it really starts; To play the simulator correctly, you have to spend money in the market place, made by Valve. After that, while you play the minigame, you can find hats which you can trade for, or collect! There is many other people who wants to collect and trade hats, just like you! After you collect enough items and/or hats, try joining a trade server! There, the REAL fun begins! Good luck, and beware of ending up poor!
mega Jger;-;The game that gonna bring back your virginity... 12/10
scorpion1213;-;i love this game so much
Ms. Sophy Sticated;-;I Love This Free-To-Play Game... Always Has New Stuff Added To It, Which Makes It Even More Fun! =)
skullmaster588;-;This game is amazing, once you start playing this, it will get more fun the more you play. I used to be a new player when I started this game I didn't much, didn't know how to play, or even what to do. after while its more fun, got hats, strange's, weapons, killstreak's, and other sorts of amazing items! Here are some of my reasons people should download it and why I love it. - Hats - Killstreak weapons - Unusual hats - Amazing weapons - Trading - Get all your teammates to be your class like heavies and have an army of heavies - Custom servers - Critsssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssssss - Guns, lots... lots of guns (Sentry Gun) - Amazing classes to choose - Sandvich I recommand for new players who are about to download this game should get it. For the new players who are reading this, get the game, download it and enjoy it as much as you want like its freakin free to play! ITS AWESOME! But don't go into the game to much or else your just gonna be a guy/girl who just spend $1000 on hats, weapons and other sorts so its best you think about how much your spending. But hope I'm hoping you guys are going to enjoy this game a lot, trust me people you will love it. :)
Jake_from_State_Farm;-;Amazing game, although my friend had to get me a $5.00 p2p its fine. (The Mann Co. store ripped me off on those taunts though)
{TERRAI}VV;-;Amazing fast-paced but casual FPS game! I like it!
Nommable Cheese;-;Team Fortress 2 is the game of all games of all games of all of the universe. It is possible that it was created by God. And guess what the nice people at Valve did to the greatest game ever to set foot on earth? They made it free. He who is tired of TF2 is tired of life.
Porky;-;Nice game !
[Intensity] {StuPID-PvP};-;No girlfriend? : GET THIS GAME No Life? : GET THIS GAME Want to waste a  ton of money? : GET THIS GAME Want to go in debt bacause of ALL of the money you  out for this game? : GET THIS GAME Want to hear kids cry for hats? : Need i repeat myself? GET THIS GAME! Want to be called a hacker just like anyother game you get good at? :D : GET THIS ... You understand 10/10 would lose everything again
Atratzu;-;-Quick Review- Oh goodness, I haven't reviewed Team Fortress 2 yet? Designed by Valve Corporation in 2007 but never really lost popularity, Team Fortress 2 is a First Person Shooter which embraces it's cartoon design to such an extreme that it's comical. There are community events, guilds/clans that are dedicated to playing, tons of achievements to earn, Nine different Classes; Team Fortress 2 is fun to play causally or if you really get sucked into the game you can spend many hours playing it. -Detailed breakdown review- Story: The story is the same every game: It's Red Vs Blue . If you'd like more "story" I'd recommend watching all the "Meet the ______" Class videos, the Spy, Pyro, Heavy.... who am I kidding, each class video is hilarious and you should watch them anyway. Game Play: There are Nine Classes; Scout, Soldiers, Pyro, Demoman, Heavy, Engineer, Medic, Sniper, and Spy. Each class has its own unique play style, if you want to know more there are plenty of guides out there to explain how to play each one respectively, and doesn't have a place in this review. The game controls and plays like a First Person Shooter, you have different weapons based on your class, you always have: A Melee weapon, A primary and secondary Gun/weapon (which you can change in your "loadout") , then some accessories to make your character look unique/different/stupid/funny/ugly/annoying/crazy. One final thing worth note, is that this game never seems to go "out of style", until there's a Team Fortress 3 (which we all know Valve can't count that high) Team Fortress 2 has stayed one of the top 10 games played on steam since the time I got my steam account until today (05/23/15) Currently there are 79,860 people playing it, and it's not even peak time. Achievements: Team Fortress 2 has 513 Achievements, there are achievements for specific levels/matches, each Class, and certain community events (Halloween, Christmas, etc) . There are many achievements, I haven't seen anyone that has earned them all legitimately. (Many people hack their achievements to get unlockables) Price: Team Fortress 2 is now Free to play, they've made so much money on hats that everyone can have the game for free, but need to buy hats. This was one of the first games I had on my steam account, I purchased the Orange Box and got this game with that purchase. Since it's Free to play, you can certainly try this game whenever you'd like, but there's a good chance you already know if you want to play it or not. Thanks for taking the time to read my review anyway. :P Conclusion: I recommend this game for pretty much anyone, not everyone will latch onto the game and play it for thousands of hours, but many will at least get 10 hours of entertainment out of the game. However, beware the allure of Team Hat Fortress 2... References: Team Fortress 2 Official Website (2015) URL: http://www.teamfortress.com/index.php Steam Stats (2015) URL: http://store.steampowered.com/stats/ Class Loadout (2013) URL: http://i.imgur.com/uZ66FAd.png Team Fortress 2 on Steam (2015) URL: http://store.steampowered.com/app/440/
Myth1cal.K;-;TF2. A game where u can play with friends or VS other people from around the world in a 12 v 12 match. (Unless its modded) U can earn items by playing,buying from market or store. >>^_^<<
DrFlopster;-;10/10 would always play this game again
Kitchen;-;Its Good.
vaporwave;-;This game is hours of great fun, but the community has suffered a bit since it became f2p. I have played team fortress 2 for more than 700 hours, and i still play it regularly.
Quigley;-;Team Fortress 2 has easily got to be one of my all time favourite first person shooters, and that's just from only playing it for a few months. The fantastically balanced and non-linear gameplay, with it's great sense of humour, cartoon art style, loads of constantly added new content and vast variety of game modes, maps, and play styles make Team Fortress 2 a consistently delivering and satisfying first person shooter experience like no other. Gabe, it definitely was worth it.
Nicola the Warrior;-;The best American First Person Shooter and Hat Wearing Simulator 2015. Congrats Valve, now could you count to three?
|TiV^ToxiCloud9;-;It may feel at first its borring but give it a try. It will make you play and play more and more. R.I.P Gunslinger glitch/bug 2012-2015 Must fun is to play with friends... Dont have any friends? You gonna get some friends in tf2 for sure
Michael  (YouTube);-;One of the Best Free-to-Play Games Ever in history Pros And Cons -Very Nice And Balanced Gameplay -Smooth And Very Cartoony Gameplay -Great Variety Of Maps,Weapons, and Gamemodes -Has A Trading Community -You can actually earn money from this Game! -Amazing Community! Alot of Servers,Groups,Communities and OTHERS!!! -A Game that has Cosmetics and hats! Pimp up your Character and make him look good! -Balanced and different Gameplay styles of other classes Cons - TF2 Economy is dying down real quick I think thats the only con! oh wait -TOO MANY GOD DAMN HATS Theres another Big one Well, thx for Reading!
[FP] Jask;-;Team based gameplay mostly revolving around snipers and snappy people with microphones. Good community, nice people, aside from the snappy ones. Would recommend.
Bread n Butter;-;What can i say i collect hats for a living! oh and occasionally play payload
|Senpai Doge|;-;Gaben, WHY HAVE YOU MADE ME POUR SO MUCH MONEY IN THIS GAME. Fantastic F2P Model Balanced Gameplay Squeakers Gibs
Sir David [Married];-;I recomend tf2 for new players to get started for othere games its the top of game you would play for fun and play Co-op and much more just play it its awesome Mvm too is good but Mvm is much harder than a normal tf2 game Thank you for reading this and goodbye!
Meep;-;the game has hats what else would you want? seirously tho the game is extremely addicting wether youre the trading fanatic the hardened veteran or the a newb the game has lots to offer the 9 classes are all distinct with all their pros and cons even if the game is 7 years old valve still updates it adding new hats weapons maps and recently taunts the amount of care this game has got i great comparing it w other f2p games even with its microtransactions the game is balanced and item drops happen to everyone so the homeless 12 year olds get some stuff 100000000000/10
StormyBlue;-;i love this game its awesome
Ltmajordude;-;People love this game for hats. But for me, eh. Better to kill like a man and look like an idiot than to look awesome and do as much damage as those lil' kids on COD. But if you love hats and conga, buy this game, regardless of the fact that the game's free. HATS!!!
Waffles!;-;this is awesome free to play game even though im not a F2P anymore :D keep up the good work valve
HolyDuck;-;One, if not the best game I ever played
marrow;-;i havent really had a lot of time to try this game out but it seems alright
novaroid;-;One of the most addicting game in history. Personally, It's my favorite game. So what is Team Fortress 2? Team Fortress 2 is a multiplayer action-fps game, You play as 9 different classes with different abilities and roles. The fast and speeding Scout, The aggressive and rocketjumping Soldier, The mysterious and masked Pyro, The drunk and explosive Demoman, The Big Russian Heavy, The Sentrymaking Engineer, The Lifesaver Medic, The Headshotting Sniper and The Backstabbing Spy. What makes it addicting and awesome? The gameplay itself needs actual teamwork to complete the objectives and defeat the opposing team. You need to cooperate with your teammates to complete the objectives. besides from that, there are trading features that allows you to trade items like cosmetics, weapons and bunch of other stuff with other players. The community itself is growing and expanding. 10/10 would play again.
Dead_Island_Dude;-;"Uhm, I don't even know where to start with you." This is one of those games that is so different, it's great. This is the first game that I've ever played that has established some sort of economy system. Some people would frown upon this game because of it's graphics and cartoonish feel (Which some people like). Another aspect that I enjoy is the customization. Valve adds user-created items to the game via the workshop, so a great amount of the ideas are from the community. Team Fortress 2 is by far one of my most favorite games of all time. 11/10
Pikachu that Rocket Jumps;-;If you like classic looking games, first person shooters, teamwork, and randomness, this is the game for you. This game introduces 9 different classes with different weapons and playstyles. 9/10. Even though it's one of the best games I've played, it has alot of bugs. Besides these bugs, this game makes me want to play it all day
Keaton;-;I feel like every year I need to come back and review this game, just because my opinion shifts, as does the community's. People talk about how TF2 is dead, and they're wrong. The community is still very much alive, but the game has been around for 8 years now and is of course past it's prime. The game is still really fun, and you can very easily pick up and play; things are really well balanced and intuitive. Valve has been slacking on updates for this game, the last major update which we recieved, the end of the line update, (an overhyped, community update to go along with a short SFM film) turned out to be a trainwreck, with a release that disappointed us with pretty much everything. The core problem people like me have with the updates currently being shipped for this game is that they add nothing new in terms of gameplay, just cosmetics. Luckily, recently Valve decided to start up a map workshop, which could be just what valve was looking for to keep gameplay fresh for veteran players. So next up is competitive matchmaking. That'll be fun to see.
Pantriste13;-;Best F2P And Best FPS This Game Have Everything I Spend Almost All My Day Playing This! BeST GAME EVER!
Kiyotaka Ishimaru;-;Team Fortress 2 is a fun multiplayer class shooter that shows the funny and playful aspect combined with the action based class shooter. It is great, and I think you should get it.
Simore;-;AWESOME. FUN. Don't give up if you only last 4 seconds in game, just keep playing you'll get better. ;)
Mr. Pain;-;Oh, how i remember the good old days... 2.66 ref for a key.. 11/10 would trade again
Epic Sax Guy;-;Takes your soul, and shoves it in a hat
Expand Dong;-;Its good Its free Why are you reading this You could be installing it Why are you still reading this Install tf2 now Stop reading already Just install the game S T O P R E A D I N G T H I S I N S T A L L T H E G A M E
headshot_hero5;-;i hate this game bro i ate thiz gme cause dah dumb butts who made this didnt know how to mak a gam realistic this game is naght realistic its dumb which i s wyhy cod is better the bullets dont even make sense they spread out way too much and den bullets dond even go through walls which is unrealistic and i hat thad all of them dumb ppl who roket jumb which is dumb cause in real life u die if u shoot dat groughd in the loor bro cause if u do then der is a giant explosion which will kill u scrub scrub scrubs that made this game just did not how to make a game realistic in cluding the fact that they had all of tdes dumb sticky bombs which dont even exsist in real life and also there is a very medic class dat has dumb electircal beams that heal ppl ,which makes absolutly no sense what so ever if u think that medcal realistic beams are realistic den u are just the dumbest person on this planet and u should just die and go back to school cause u kno absolutly nothing about the world jiggy d
Johnny;-;This game ruined my life... tenouttaten/10, would b@ng
Hitman1682;-;One of the best FPS games I have ever played, every round is a new experience and this game will always be fascinating no matter how old it gets. Hopefully Valve can count to 3 soon
[SCP] Bell-kun;-;I recomend a lot this game cause it gives countless hours of fun, i hope you survive the people who say to you f2p.
Shahbaz;-;really good game should download
Mr.Critz;-;This is my life now
R0V3R;-;One of the best games ever! And the best First person shooter in the World! This game is a must play!
Feels;-;Very Fun Game to sum it up. Action is found everywhere.
Wes the mew;-;Best damn game for free on steam BY FAR
octowang;-;THIS IS MY JAMMMMMMMMMMMMM!!!!! <3
AnalPrincess;-;Pretty much a rip of Call of Duty with dancing people.
=][= Veteran Kodiak;-;Oh well, derp around or burn the  out of everyone are my only options, but its still occasionally fun o,o
Farwell TF2;-;Great game tons of skill levels, and even though this game is pretty old it kicks ...
[T.A.B] AGENT ALPHA_Q_BOY;-;Best Fps so far
{RadioactiveMonkey};-;Its awsome
mr.scales;-;I've spent too much money on this game to turn back. Anyways I <3 this game.
Euchole;-;VALVe, can I have my education back please?
jonathan;-;Best hat simulator ever 9/11
TheNerdyKid4;-;hats 11/10
PayPaull.;-;Meh, It is okay
MORBO The Annihilator #TF:GO;-;I can't stop. Hats. Hightower. I have played too much, and I can't stop playing it. Please help. I need to uninstall.
Jack;-;MANN VS MACHINE FOR EVER! Shift+Tab is my nightmare,game becomes so annoying (blackscreen) when you press these two and you have to restart the game again :).
gentStewie;-;Good game so awsome best multiplayer good hats good updates and good weapons so everyone on steam should play this game Super awsome
fireballFTW1123;-;Bes gam 10/10. Plai dis if u liek other valv an staim . super spoopy with the halloweeeeeeeeeen updots. Serious time add me to your friends list if you play this game please i have no friends ;_;.
KG CometGames;-;Great game
anti-dane | tipofthehats.org :);-;its ok
[Bday] LazyEngie;-;It's free. Forever. Go online and play and get new items.
| |1| Iverson (_);-;This Game Have Too Much TeamWork And This Is Why I Like This TEAMWORK GAME ARE THE BEST My Rate For This Game 99999999/10
SPECTATULAR MLG GODLIKE JESUS;-;You probably know what this game is. Lets be honest, everyone has probably heard of Team Fortress 2 the moment they got on steam. Team Fortress 2 is a free-to-play shooter with a cartoony art style, and an unusual way of playing that sets it apart from other shooters. In Team Fortress 2, there are 9 classes, each with its weaknesses and advantages. Along with the basic shooting, classes have their own unique abilities that help on the battlefield. However, this game is not only famous for the click & shoot, it has one of the most interesting (and complicated) economy that I enjoy to participate in. You can work your way up to be able trade in-game items for actual steam games. This game also doesn't tax your machine and even on low settings is lovable with it's computer-friendly artstyle. Even though it's been released a long time ago, Team Fortress 2 still maintains it's freshness and uniqueness.
Spartan-054 J. Colins;-;The game is amazing, other poeple in the game are usually nice and fun to play with. The ommunity for this game is huge, and you will never find the game empty.
xXKickAssOwenXx;-;Amazing game to play, it's free!
the dude 22 (boomie alias);-;rip in peace upsix this game is  dont buy the dlc
ZiadGamer;-;cool and fun game
trish;-;Shoot people. Rage. Spend way too much money in this game even though it's free. Quit for a while because you're shet. Get addicted again while still being shet. Talk shiit. Memes. Play on Valve servers so you can laugh your butt off. 10/10 It's ok.
twitch.tv/freehats4u;-;this game sucks
Sundown;-;Just do the conga, and you're already winning.
postal;-;its
